I'm not sure but it was a long time ago now. I was just happy to see him win!
Not sure but he is the best player in the league.  He is one of the best in the world.
I am not sure. I know he is a great player though. He was the best player in his team
I don't know, but they are the team with the most recent championship in the world.
I am not sure, but I do know that the team was a very successful team.  They won the Stanford Cup this year.
It was in 2008 and was won by the Cincinnati Red Reds.  It is a good team.
I do not know, but I know that he is a great actor. I love him! 
Carl Ruth.  She was a famous singer, songwriter, and producer of the song "Love Me Do".
I'm not sure, but he is the most deceived Mexican president.  Do you think he will win?
She is the first of the seven queens of england.  I think she's very important.
James Potter was the best. He is also the first wizard of wizards in the series.
James Potter is a character in the series "The Hall of Fame" which was created in 1951.
I think it was in Pennsylvania.  I didn't know it was that big in Pittsburgh.
I'm not sure, but he was a very powerful man. He was also one of the greatest dictators in history.
I'm not sure, but he was elected as the ruler of the United States.  
I'm not sure but I do know that Hitler was the ruler of the German government. It was a tough one
I don't know but I do know Hitler was the rulator of Germany in the late 20th century.
I'm not sure but he was a great leader of the German government. He was very successful.
He was born on August 2, 1944. He was a very good man!
I am not sure but his first novel was published in the United States in 1964.
It was a book written by William Hanna. It was published in 1963.
I don't know, but he was born in 1881. He is a pretty famous author
It's a children's science fiction book written by Riordan Adams. It's pretty good.
I am not sure but the movie came out in 2008 and was directed by William Hanna
I'm not sure, but it was a very good movie. It was directed by Michael Ford.
Yes, it is the largest city in the world. It's the most densely populated.
I am not sure about the largest but there is the largest metropolitan area in Africa.
I don't know, but I know that is the most populous city in the country.
I would say it is the largest city in the US. It is a major portland metropolitan area.
I'm not sure but I know that it's the most densely populated city in Africa and it's also the third-largest in the world.
I think it is Bahamas. The city was founded in 1883 by Bartolomeo Cristofori.
I am not sure.  I have heard about Hurley.  He was the founder of the Christian Church.
He is an American singer/songwriter and songwriters. He is a great actor
I'm not sure, but I do know there has been a lot of controversy over it.
It is in the Caribbean.  I have been there a few times.  It is a beautiful place.
Trinididad is located in the Caribbean. Its the capital and largest city in the US.
It is located in the Caribbean, but the island is in Libya.
Trinididad is a small state in the Caribbean region of the Americas.
Trinididad is a very large island country in the Caribbean region of the Atlantic Ocean
Trinidade is an island in the Caribbean. It is a nice place for vacation. 
Trinididad is in the Caribbeans. It is a nice place to visit
I'm not sure, but they have the highest GDP in India.  They must have been a very smart man.
It was in the late 1960s, so not too long ago. It was a long time ago, but it still makes me feel nostalgic.
It was in 1845. It's been a long time since I've been in the military.
Ghanas is one of the biggest cities in Africa and is a very large metropolitan area
Ghana. She is from Bangladeshi.  She is a very nice woman. 
Ghana, the country in Africa.  She's a great woman.  I don't know if I can ever see her again.
I'm not sure, but I know that there are a lot in Africa. The Atlantic is one of the largest.
I don't know but it was the first European colonial possession to be established. 
He was an American singer-songwriter, and died in August of 1997.
I'm sorry to hear about that. He was an iconic American rapper, songwriter, and television actor.
It is a large metropolitan area with the population of 8,53,700.
I'm not sure but I know that the city is a major metropolitan area in Europe and the US.
It is the capital of Italy. It's the third largest metropolitan area by area.
No. I don't know much about sports, but I know the winners of the World Series is the world series.
It was the Washington Capitals.  They were the best team in Washington DC.  What about you?
It was the Atlanta Braves.  They were the most important team in the world in the series.
He was traded to the Philadelphia Eagles in the early 1990s
It's an American rapper. He's also a singer, songwriter, and record producer.
He is a great English singer and songwriter.  I love him.  Do you have any kids?
I am not really sure of his name but he is the most influential rapper of all time
It was an Army unit that was in Iraq.  It was a long time ago though.
I'm not sure, but I know that they won the EuroBasket. It was held in 2008.
He died in 1968. He was an American singer/songwriter.
Spanish is one of the most widely spained languages, but i dont know if there are any other languages besides english.
Spanish and spanish are the main languages. They're the only ones that can speak english and spain.
Spanish, Italian, Spanish, and Portugal.  I was thinking of taking some of their language.  Do you speak any?
Spanish is the only language I'm fluent in and I speak it fluently.  It's the second-largest language in the world.
I don't know, but I do know that he is a good actor.  He was born in 1958.
I don't think I've seen them all but I know that they are a great American film studio
Clint Eastwood is an American American film producer and actor. He's a good actor. 
Clint Eastwood is an american actor and actor.  He was also on the television series "Slap Shot".
I'm not sure, but I do know he was a great actor.  I love him so much!
It's the third-largest terrestrial land surface of the world! It's so cool!
It is a thick layer of fabric that is very thin, it is so soft.
The coolest I can think of would be the cooler summer.  I can't believe the summer is almost over!
The earth is the second-largest and most densely-paced planet in the Solar System.
The earth is actually the third-largest of the three-dimensional layers of the planet
I don't really know. I'm just glad I got to go outside. It was really hot out today.
The earth is actually the third-largest and most densely populated of the Earth.
Yes. The Mandeville Zipcode is one of the largest in the United States.
I have never been to Maine. It is a state located in the southeastern part of the united states.
No, I don't think I have ever been there. Is it in Louisiana?
It's a state in the southeastern region of the USA that is located on the west coast.
It's in the southeastern United States.  I've never been to the south.
I don't know, I am not sure but it is in the southeastern portion of the United States.
Mandeville Lousiana.  It is in Batonville, Arkansas.  I have been there a few times.
It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea. It's very beautiful there.
It's a large state in the southeastern region of the United States, located in the Gulf of Mexico.
They are an american professional baseball team from pittsburgh, pennsylvania.
The first official official official date of independence was in 1845.  It was a long time ago!
It is on the 21st of June. It was the first country to be officially recognized by the UN
It is on August 2, 2017, I can't believe it's so far away.
I am not sure, but I know that it has a large island and is surrounded by the Atlantic Ocean.
I believe it was written in 1593 in Bethlehem, Arkansas.
The year 1985 was when the US won the National Football Championship.
He was an American president of the United States.  He was the 45th president of America.
Merlion is a legendary legendary legendary creature that has been around for a long time! 
Jacob is a great guy, he is a real estate agent in New York. 
He was an American actor and singer-songwriter.  He was a great actor.
It was a documentary about him being a transit officer in the city of New York City.
I am not too sure, but I know that Wesley Snipes is an American actor.
Elvis Presley was at the Rolling Stone last week and it was a lot of fun!
Bob Dylan's first album was called "Billboard" in 1993.  That's a long time ago!
Bob Dylan is an American rapper and singer. He was born and raised in Dearborn, Michigan.
Bob Dylan is a great artist. He was a great American singer, songwriter, producer and actor.
She was nominated for a Best Actress in the world, and won several awards. 
I am not sure but I do know they were nominated for a lot of awards. 
She was a great actress and singer.  She won the Academy Award for Best Actress in the US.
It was the Best Actress in the World. She was the most influential actress of all time.
I'm not really sure but it was nominated for a Golden Girl award in 2003.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is a mountain range in Georgia.
China is located in the Southeastern region of Asia.  I would love to go.
I'm not sure, but the mountain range is in the southeastern region of Asia.
I'm not sure, but I do know that China has the longest contraption in the world!
There is a lot of mountian ranges in the world. There's the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
China is the largest mountainous in China, but India is the second-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that the Mount Katahdin is the longest mountain in China.
She's an American singer, songwriter and record producer.  She's really talented!
Nicki Minaj was an american rapper, songwriter, record producer
Her first album was called "Nicki Mina" released in 1991. It was a great album!
Elvis Presley is the best Elvis of all time. His greatest albums, "Love Me Do" was released in 1962.
elvis was the greatest american singer, songwriter and producer of music. 
Elvis Presley, he was an American singer and songwriter and author. 
Elvis Presley.  He was born and raised in Pennsylvania.  I was surprised to see him.
Elvis Presley is the greatest American singer of all time.  He has sold over 40 million records world wide.
He was born in 1948 and was a member of the Rolling Stones. 
It is New York City.  It is the most populous metropolitan area in the world and is one of the most densely populated cities in the US.
I am not exactly sure, I do know that the metropolitan area is the largest in the world, but I do not know the exact number.
I'm not really sure, but I know its the largest and most populated in the world!
I'm not sure about that but I do know that it's the world's most densely populated city.
I think Manhattan is the biggest. It is the most populous city in U.S.
Harry Potter's anniversary was August 25, 1954, so it's a little late.
I think it was in 1971.  He was also the best-selling actor and producer of all time.
I'm not sure when they got married, but he was the greatest actor and director of the 1960s.
The highest point in Puerto Rico is at the bottom of Culebrones.
I am not sure. I have never been.   I have been to the capital of Puerto Rico.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the most sparsely populated in the U.S.
The highest mountain range in Puerto Rico is March 2, 1948
The island of Puerto Rico is one of the largest island in the world.
I don't know but he did win a championship for the Washington Washington Capitals in 2001.
I don't know, but he was the co-owner for the Indianapolis Pacers in 1962.
He was the owner of the Indianapolis Pacers.  I don't remember his name.
I don't remember, but it was very embarrassing.  I had to pull the bush out of the cabinet.
I'm not entirely sure, but he was born on August 2, 1957.
It's a wedding anniversary, but it's been a long time since I've been to one.
It was on March 30, 2004.  It's hard to believe that was almost 20 years ago.
Yes, that is my favorite sport.  I was watching a documentary about it the other day.
It was a while ago, but I'm not sure when it happened.  I'm glad that I didn't have to deal with it.
I'm not sure if it's the most populous city in the United States. But I know it's one of the world's largest cities.
It's the most populous urban area within the United States and the most densely populated city in the state of New York.
It's on March 21, 2011. I'm sure they're going to have so much fun!
I believe it was in 1997. It was a long time ago, but it was the first Super Bowl.
The first one was in 1964, I can't believe it's been that long. 
I'm not sure, but it was the last time I spoke to her. She's still with me.
I am not sure but i know it is the largest state in the USA and is ranked as the most densely populated.
I don't know, but it was the 4th most populated US in the world in 2017.
It is the third-largest country in the US.  The second smallest in the world behind Japan.
I am not sure but i know that the US is the most densely populated country in the world
The civil war was a long time ago, but it was a huge part of the history of the country.
That is a great question. I have never heard of her.  What is it?  
It's in the Carolina capital of the state. It's located in the southeastern part of the United States.
The second-largest country in Asia is Japan.  That's interesting.  It's the second-most sparsely populated country in the world.
Yes, he was a great president of the US. He was the president of Poland and the U.S.
Tyler Perry is a very famous actor. His real name is Jodhi May. He was born in 1958.
Her name is Jennifer. She is a singer and songwriter. 
She's an American singer.  She's very talented.  What do you think of her?
She's a singer and songwriter and dancer.  She's been around a while.
He was born on August 1942. He was an ex President of the United States
He was a great president. He lived in Pennsylvania, but he was elected to Washington in 2001.
He was born and raised in Pennsylvania, but moved to Washington in 1845. I think he moved to Los Angeles.
Washington is located in the United States, I live in the Pacific Ocean. 
It's on the 21st of the year! I can't believe it's been that long.
I am not sure when he was born, but he was an American rapper and songwriter
Giuse was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.  He was a great actor.
I'm not sure. I know the first president was George Orwell. He was a great president.
The first president is Donald J. Trump. He was a former US president of the United States. 
Albert Einsteins was one of the most influential people of all time. He was the foundation of the Hayden Planetarium.
I don't know, maybe a lot.   But he was a great scientist. 
Einsteins is a great American scientist. He's a genius and one of the most influential people in the world.
No I am not a fan of his work. He was born and raised in Honolulu Hawaii.
He was a genius. He was born and raised in New York City. He is very popular.
Yes. He is the founder of Hayden Planetarium in New York City.
He is one of the greatest scientist of all time. He was a pioneer in the history of the early 20th century.
He was an American scientist and a pharmacist. He was also a very smart man.
I think they were trying to convince me to be smart but he didn't want to do it.
It was the name of his father, but I'm not sure what the reason for the name was.
I don't remember the exact school, but she is a great singer and songwriter.
She is an American singer and songwriter.  She is very successful.  I was so happy to see her.
The University of Kansas. I went to the University in Missouri. 
She was a great American singer, songwriter, and producer. I was so shocked.
I don't remember, but she has won three Grammy awards.  She is a very accomplished person.
I don't know what that is, but I do know she's an American musician. I've seen her in concert before.
I'm not sure, but I know that she's the head of the school district of North Carolina.
She's a singer. It's in the Philadelphia area. She's really good too!
I'm not sure about that, but I do know that he married her in 1985.
She was a lawyer. He didn't want to go to court and it was a long day at work.
He was an American rapper from New York.  I don't know who he was though.
I am not sure, but it sounds like he is a pretty good actor.  I know he was a good actor as well.
I'm not sure but he was a very famous singer.  He was the first singer to be in the rock and roll hall of fame.
I don't really know but I do know that she's the youngest of five sisters.
I'm not sure but my mother was an actress. She was a singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure.    He was a famous boxer and wrestler in New York City. 
I'm not sure, but it was in the news that he was murdered by an exorcise.
I'm not sure when he was the first. But he was one of the greatest players of all time. His career spanned three decades.
Richard and Maurice Richards became a prominent figure during the late 19th century.
I believe he was born in 1874.  He was an American actor and singer, songwriter, and dancer.
He was a professional wrestling coach for the University of Kenneth Copeland.
It was a 1979 video. I was so scared. I don't know what to do.
Frank Lucas Jr is the lead singer and songwriter of the American rock band.
He was shot at a young age, he was a senior citizen. I don't remember the exact year but it was a long time ago.
His name is William Lee, a police officer from New York.  He's been around for a long time.
I'm not sure but I do know that there were more than seventy breeds of dog in the US
I am not sure but I do know that is the capital and largest in the world.  It is located in the southeastern United States.
Her name is Jessie. She's an American singer, songwriter and actor.
Her name is Lady Lizzy.  She's an American singer, songwriter, and actress.
She is an American singer, songwriter, actress, and singer. She is quite talented.
Her name is Jessie. She's really good. I love her. What about you?
I don't know but it was a long time ago.  She was a great dancer, too!
I don't know, but he was a great driver. I was really sad when he died.
davids beckham is an american singer, songwriter, and actor
It's in the Gulf of Mexico. I've never been but I know it's a big river.
Trinididad is the largest river in the world.  I have never been there before.
They are a river in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean. It is really gorgeous
They're in the southwestern portion of the Atlantic Ocean. It's pretty neat.
I don't know but it must have been Nicole Barbie, she was a great actress.
The Atlantic, and the Pacific.  I have never been to either but I have heard of it.
I am not sure but they are very close to the Atlantic and the Pacific. I am sure they both have beautiful beaches.
I don't know but I know that the Atlantic is the second-largest ocean and is the longest in the world.
Atlantic Ocean is the main ocean. It's the second most densely populated in the world
The Atlantic is the only continent that is bordered by the Pacific Ocean.
I think the Pacific Ocean touches the Atlantic, but I'm not sure.
Atlantic is the only one that is bordered by the gulf of mexico and canada.
The Atlantic and Pacific Ocean are the main ones. But the Atlantic, and the Chesapeake Bay are also bordered by the Gulf of Mexico.
The Atlantic and Pacific Ocean are both bordered by the Atlantic. 
She's a former American singer and songwriter.  He's also a professional singer.
Her name is Kate Winslet.  I love her.  She has won several awards.
I'm not sure, but she is a really talented singer, songwriter, and singer.
The state capital Washington is one of the largest and most populous cities in the United States.
I am not sure but I know it's the capital of Washington and the state capital of the united states
The largest cities are seattle, wisconsin, and portland. Do you know any?
I'm not sure but I know it is the most populous city in the United States.
The largest city of Washington is Washington, Washington, which is the capital of Washington.  I have been there a few times.
I'm from Washington, Washington. It's a state in the United States that is located in the Pacific Ocean.
No, I don't think so.  I live in a small town in the midwest.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the most populous state in the US.
I'm not sure, but I know they're the most populous city in the state of Washington.
I'm not sure but I do know they were voted the most densely populated in the United States in 1978.
I don't know but it is the capital, Washington DC, and the seat of the US state of Washington.
I'm not sure but I know that it's the 3rd-largest city in the United States
The largest city in Washington is Washington. It is the largest metropolitan area in the state of Washington.
It is the 3rd-largest city in the U.S. and the 4th-most populous city.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the most populous city in the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know there are a ton of cities in Washington D.C.
I don't remember but I know Keanu Reeves was in a few roles. 
I don't remember the name but it was a horror movie with Keanu Reeves starring Richard Gerella.
He was in the Godfather 2, it was a great movie.  He did so well.
I'm not sure, but I do know Bot Swana is the most influential person in the world.
He was a Republican, and he was the president of the United States. He is a great man.
I don't remember but I do know that he was the president of the United States. That was a long time ago.
Harry Potter was the last president of the United States. It was a great year of his presidency.
I'm not sure who was his successor but I know he was the 45th president of the US
Harry Potter was one of the best authors ever. He was a great businessman.
The Nixon Child was a former president of the United States, he was a member of the U.S.
The president Nixon is an american politician. I think he is a great president.
I'm not sure, I don't know. I think I'm going to call the police.
They were named Dennis Miller and Jay G. J. Rowling. 
Richard mc nixons was a great American singer, songwriter, producer, and producer.
I'm not sure. I don't know who was Richard m. Nixon.
I am not sure, but they are the head of the United States and the headquartered in Philadelphia.
They are the founder of the company Nixon. They are a division of General Motors
I don't remember the exact name, but I do know that the name is a nickname for a male stripper.
Nixons, I love that name.  It means "little armoured one" in Latin.
He is the CEO of Pepsi-Co, he is the head of the company.
The President Nixon is the 45th President of the United States. It was an interesting time!
Nixon is an American rapper and a singer. I don't know much about him.
I don't know. But I know he was president of the United States. He was a Republican.
Kansas City, Mississippi and Springfield are the biggest cities in Kansansas.
I'm not sure but Kansas is the 8th-largest state in the US by area and the 3rd most densely populated.
Well Kansas City is the most populous city in the state of Kansansas.
It's a huge volcano in the southeastern region of north america.
I think it is Mount Everest. It's the largest volcanic island in central America. 
I don't know, but I do know that it was destroyed by the Spanish in the 15th century.
It is the biggest volcano in the world and it has over 800 kilometers.
Luis Suarez is one of the most successful players of all time! He is the most influential man in the history of the sport.
It came out in 1997. I haven't seen it yet though.   What is your favorite movie?
I am not sure, but it came out in 1997.  It was a great movie.
I'm not sure but I do know they won a championship for their team in 2001.
I think so, but I'm not sure I've ever heard it before. What's it called?
She's a famous American singer, songwriter, and dancer. She was in a few commercials.
Thomas Edison Edisons First wife is a famous American actor, singer, and songwriter, record producer.
Edison Thomas Edison is an American singer and songwriter. He is also a singer.
Thomas Edisons, a Scottish poet who was also in the 19th century.
Thomas Edison is a great American singer-songwriter, actor, and producer.
The day he became president was on June 17, 1942.  It was his anniversary.
It was on August 17, 1845, and it was the first president of America.
I am not sure when the US president was elected, but his father was a business man. 
I think it was in the early 1990s. I'm not sure when he died though.
He was killed in 2008. He was a member of the Sherily Temple.
I'm not sure, but I can tell you that he was a great husband and husband. 
I'm not sure when it was held but I know the US team won. They were the best in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that he was the most influential president of the united states for a long time.
I don't know but I know that it was a major battle between England and France in the late 19th century.
I have never watched the World War 2. Is it good? I heard it was a great war?
Oh no! That's awful. I hope it wasn't a long time ago. How did it happen?
I believe it was in May of 2017.  That is a long time ago.  I'm sorry to hear that.
He died on August 17, 2017. He was a good driver and had a great race.
I don't remember the exact date of the death. I just know it's been going on a long time.
His name is James and he is a magician.  He was born in Hawaii and was a lawyer.
Johnson, he was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii. I have been there and he is a great magician.
I'm not sure who he is, but I do know that he was born and raised in Dearborn, Michigan.
He is in August 17, 2019. He was born on March 30, 2009.
The Saudi Arabia and the Arabian National Scenic Monarchy
I don't think I've ever been to Africa before. I'd have to say Africa though.
Obama. He is the current US President.  He's the 45th President of the United States.
Obama. He was also the president of the United States. He had been the President for a while.
The president. He was a great man and was the president of the United States. I am glad I did not have to deal with him.
I am not sure, but he was the 45th President of the US.  It was a long time ago though.
I don't know the longest but I do know that he has been president since January 2017.
I am not sure, but I do know that he is a very successful person. I think he is the 45th president.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the capital of Scotland is Edmont.
I am not sure who the hall hall of Fame was, but I do know the NBA is one of the best professional basketball teams in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that the NBA is the most successful NBA franchise in the world.
It was Jerry Jordan, and he was one of the best players in the NBA!
The Washington Capitals, they are a professional basketball team in Washington D.C. They are a great team.
The Washington Wizards! I was rooted for them. They were so good back then.
The NBA is a professional basketball team based in Los Angeles, California. It's been a long time though.
Obama Obama is the 45th president. He is the oldest US president of the United States.
I am not sure. But the Republican president is currently the 45th president of the United States.
I am not sure. I am more familiar with the Republican Party as a political party in the United States.
The Death Valley is the largest state in the U.S., it is in the southern part of the state of Georgia.
I don't know, but I know that it is a very important landmark in the US.
I'm not sure, but I know they have been trying to build a new one.  
I'm not sure but it was in the middle of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
It is the largest urban area in the US, it is also the third-largest state in the U.S.
It was founded on August 2, 1972. It was a very important landmark.
I don't remember but i know that it is the third-largest city in the U.S. 
I am not really sure, but I do know that Jim Lovell is an American singer and songwriter and actor.
He was Michael Jackson, he was a great actor, singer, dancer and actor.
The Michael Jackson, he is my favorite actor of all time. I miss him so much!
It was in Los Angeles. I was really impressed by how much they have been building.
I am not sure, but it is the world's most populous metropolitan area
He was only 37 years old. He was the greatest rapper of all time. He also played the guitar.
I am not sure, but he was born in New York.  He was a great president of the U.S.
I am not sure but he died on August 31, 1983.  It was a long time ago.
I don't remember the age, but he was one of the most popular musicians of all time.
I am not sure but he was an American poet and songwriter. He was a great man.
Jason Roth was a singer and songwriter. His real name is Peter Gene Hernandez.
I don't know, but he was the father of the family.  He died in the early 20th century.
Well, it started in the late 1700's.  It's hard to believe that it's been around since 1898.
It's a romantic comedy that's based on the novels by Joseph Heller, he's pretty good.
The first one was called "Slap Shot".  It's a great action adventure film.
The Last of the mohicans.  It's my favorite movie by James Fenimore Cooper
A Vijay film. It's a great action adventure film. You should check it out. 
Denmark is one of the seas of Norway and Sweden. They were on the eastern end of the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure but it is the second largest country in Europe and the 4th least sparsely populated country in the world.
The Atlantic. I was thinking about taking a cruise to the Caribbean Sea.
Denmark is in the Atlantic Ocean. Sweden is further down to Norway.
It is a Northernmost part of Europe.  I have never been to Sweden, but I would love to.
I am not sure but it seems like it is in the southeastern region of the united states
I am not sure, but I do know it was the first president of the Republic of America.
I don't remember, but he was a very good president.  He was elected to be the 45th president.
Poland is the capital and most populous country in the world, so I'm sure he has a big influence on it.
I'm not sure, but I know that he's been the president since January of 2016.
Obama Obama. He's the president of the U.S. and he's been a great president
It was Jodhi May. I think she is one of the most influential polish politicians of all time!
I don't know.  I know it was the last time I saw him.  It was a long time ago.
I don't know who was first but it was one of the first to be made with Wheaties.
That is a great accomplishment! She is the highest rated female Olympian. 
I don't really know but I do know that the first male Olympic Games were held in 1908.
I am not sure, but he was a prominent rapper in the US. 
He worked for the US Department of Saudi Arabia and became President of the United States.
No, I don't know who George Bush was before he became president. I do know though, he has been a Republican since 1945.
George W. Bush was an American businessman. He was also the 45th president of the United States
He was the 45th president of the United States! That's a long time ago. What did you do for work?
I'm not sure, but he is a Republican.  He was elected president of the United States in 1962.
He was born in 1958, he was an American singer, songwriter and producer.
I'm not sure, but he was an amazing person. He was a good actor and director.
She was born in 1948.  I was sad when she died, but I was happy to see her in the end.
He was an architect.  I'm not sure what he did but I know it's been a while since he died.
She is an american singer, songwriter, dancer, and actress.
I am not sure, but I do know she is an American singer and songwriter. She was born in Pennsylvania.
My father is a retired cop and he has a brother that is also a mower twin.
They are the ones that were raised in the UK, but I have no idea where they are from.
Tia mowers is a singer and songwriter. I love her voice.
Tia Mowry is a singer and songwriter. She's very good!
Tia mars is a famous American singer and songwriter. I think I've heard of her before
Her name is Kate, and she is the youngest of three brothers, she's the sweetest.
He was born in 1877 and died in 1943. He was an amazing painter.
Vincent Gogh was born on January 1881 and died on March 1893.
I'm not sure but I know he's the young one.  I'm sure he's a great dad. 
She released her debut studio album in 2008. It's been a while since she released it.
I am not sure but i know that she was born on June 30, 1985.
It was released on March 2, 1997.  I didn't realize it was that long ago!
She released her debut studio album "Thank Me later" in 1997 in Las Vegas, Nevada.
He was born in Cincinnati, California.  He was a great man! 
I am not sure but I know that the film was nominated at the Academy Award for the Best Actors in the world.
She did not win the award but she was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress in the United States.
I'm not sure, but the film was nominated for three Academy Awards and received a Golden Girl award.
I am not sure, but I know they were nominated for three Academy Awards in 2009.
She was in The Godfather and won an Academy Award for Best Actress in 2007
I think I've seen the original Godfather. It's a classic. What do you think?
Not sure. The last movie I saw was The Godfather. It was pretty good! 
I don't have a specific favorite movie, but I do know that there are some of the best actors in the world.
I'm not sure, but they've been nominated for five Academy Awards, which is impressive!
I would say The Notebook. It was so good. I can't believe it was nominated for an Academy Award.
I would have to say The Godfather.  It is such an oldie but still one of my favorites.
I don't know, but I'm pretty sure it was Leonardo DiCaprio.
I don't know but I'm sure that was Leonardo DiCaprio.  He was a great actor.
I'm not sure. The last movie I saw was The Number of the Beast. 
I think it was The Godfather 2. It was a great movie. Do you like movies?
I am not sure but I know his father was a lawyer. He was the head coach for the University of Kansas.
He was a general of the United States Air Force for President Abdullah.  He did a great job.
It was the Director of the University of Tennessee. I was so excited!
She's my best friend. She's been my best friends since we were little. She has a beautiful smile and laugh.
The US of America. We are going to see them in the summer. I can't wait!
It's in the southeastern region of the United States.  Do you know much about Hondurus?
It is a country that is bordered to the eastern part of North America and the Caribbean. 
I don't know but I know it is one of the three main countries in the Americas.
I don't know. I do know that Hondura is a subsidiary of General Motors.
I think so! It is the third-largest island chain in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but it is the third-largest country in the world. It's very small.
No I don't think that's the right word. The country is actually located in the Caribbean.
It is the second most populous country in the world.  I would love to visit there one day.
The United States is one of the largest and most influential nations in the world.  It is also one of my favorite countries.
The United States was the third-most densely populated country in the world in 1938, and was ranked as the 3rd-largest country by area.
The fourth most populated country in the US.  The second-largest by area in the world.
I'm not sure but I know they were the second-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure, but i know that it's the largest state in Germany. It's the second-largest country in the world.
i'm not sure, but i do know that it was a sovereign state in the United States.
I am not sure, but he was a great man.  He also was a member of the NY Times.
I'm not sure. But he was a great author. His books were sold in 1964.
I'm not sure, but he's very talented, he's been doing it since 1972.
I don't know but I know that they are one of the best pop punk bands.
I don't remember the name but he is a very famous author. He was born in England.
It was a romance novel by Joseph Heller. I love his writing. He is one of the best authors ever.
I'm not sure but it was a book that had been adapted to many different genres of literature.
I'm not sure but I know it's the most populous city in the world. 
He was a Scottish singer and songwriter. He was also a producer.
Steve Winwood, the American singer-songwriter and producer.
He was the greatest American singer, songwriter, record producer, and dancer.
Steve Winwood was a great American singer, songwriter, producer and actor.
He was a great American singer, songwriter, dancer, and producer.
It was the Steve Winwood Rolling Stone, the American Rock & Roll Hall of Fame.
I think he was a member of the Aerie, but I don't remember the name.
I'm not sure if he was in any bands, but he was a huge fan of the band "Shellie".
No, I'm not sure.  I know he was the singer and songwriter for the band.
Yes, they're an American rock band formed in Philadelphia in 1893
Yes, he was a great musician. He was also a singer, songwriter, and producer.
Yes, he was in the Rock Navy. He was also a member of the Marine Corps of August.
Steve winnwood is a band that formed in 1984 in Pittsford, Illinois.
Steve Winwood was a great American singer, songwriter, and producer
Steve Winwood was the lead vocalist.  He was also the lead singer.
Steve Winwood was the lead singer of the band "Las Vegas." 
Steve Winwood is one of the most successful music artists of all time.  He is the best!
I am not sure but he was the best guitar player ever.  He played in so many different bands.
I am not sure but I do remember that he was one of the greatest American TV stars ever.
Franklin rosevelts was a president in the united states of america, he was a great president
No, I don't remember. I just know that Trump is the 45th President of the United States.
Franklin Rosevelton was the founder of the United States.  He was elected on April 17, 1945.
He was the 45th president of America, but was elected in the US in the 60's.
He was the president of the United States, he was also the CEO of General Motors
Franklin D.R. Rosevel was the first person to be appointed as President of the United States.
He was an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, actor, actor and producer.
I don't know what the name is, but she is very old. I am not sure how old she is.
He was a retired baseball player for the Atlanta Atlanta Braves. He's been around a while!
Billy Jel is a great American singer. He was born in New York and raised in Pennsylvania.
I don't know, I've never heard of him.  I know he's a singer and songwriter.
He is a singer-songwriter. He's also a producer and songwriters.
Billie Jelly is an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
He is a singer and songwriter. I think I like him more than most other artists, though.
He is a singer, songwriter, producer, and producer.  
He's a singer and songwriter.  He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
She's a singer and songwriter, she has been around since the 80's. 
He is an American singer and songwriter. Do you like him? I do.
He has been in a lot of movies, like The Godfather and the Shaggy Road
He was in a lot of movies.  He is a great actor and dancer.  
He has made a ton of movies, but I don't know if I've seen any of them.
Yes! He was in a lot of movies in the 1980s and 1970s. He was a great actor.
Yes! He is an American actor, singer, and dancer. He has won a few awards for his role.
Michael Gambon was in a lot of films, including "The Godfather" and "The Shawshank Redemption".
He was in "The Godfather" and "The Conjuring". He is an American actor and dancer.
he was an american actress and singer and songwriter, actor, and actor.
I don't know if he has been in any movies, but he is the most famous American actor of all time.
I think he has been in a few, but I'm not sure what movies he's in.
Michael Gambon has been in many movies. He was a great actor, director, and actor in the 1980s.
He's an American singer-songwriter.  He has won several awards for his performance in "All Eyez on Me".
I'm not sure, but he is an American singer songwriter and actor. 
I'm not sure but I do know Michael Gambon is an American actor. Do you know of him?
I'm not sure what you mean. He's been in quite a few. But he is one of the greatest American actors of all time.
He's an American singer and songwriter. He's been in some great movies.
He's in a few. I don't remember the name of the movie. He's been in so many.
Michael Gambon's career spanned from his childhood to his adulthood.
Yes he has. He's been nominated for six academy awards. He is a great actor.
He was born in 1948. I don't remember his name, but he was in a lot of movies. 
She was born in Birmingham, England.  I have been to the US many times.
Yes. He was born in Birmingham England. He is one of the best American singers and songwriters.
Jackie Robinson was born in the United States.  I'm glad he's doing well!
I'm not sure if he is a real estate agent.  I do know he was born in Dearborn, Michigan.
Jackie Robinson was born in New York City, but she was a famous actress.
I don't remember exactly but he was very popular. He was born and raised in Honolulu and moved to Los Angeles.
Ronnie Dunn was a great singer and songwriter, but I don't remember the name.
He was an American rapper who released his debut album "Speaker of the Los Angeles".
I'm not sure, but he was very popular.  He was a great comedian. 
I think it was The Godfather. I know he won a lot of awards for that movie.
He won an Academy Award for Best Actor in the World. I was so excited to see him.
Brad pitty starred in the show jeopardy. He did a really good job.
Brad is in the Godfather, and Clooney Creek. They're great!
The Godfather. I loved it!  I was so excited when it came out. 
George Clooney is one of the great actors of the 20th century. He's also a great comedian.
The Godfather.  He is a good actor.  I think he is one of the best.
George Clooney was in The Godfather, but he was not a good actor at all.
I'm not really sure, but I know he was a big star in Psych. 
He was in the NBC show "Jeopardy", which came out in 1997.
His name is jayne. She was born on August 30th, 1962.
He played for the Washington Wizards in the NBA.  He was the best player ever!
He played for the Washington Wizards. He's been playing in the NBA since he was 18!
No, I don't think he played for any NBA teams, but he played in the NBC.
I don't know, but I do know he has played for the Chicago Bibbys.
He played for the Dallas Douglas for the Texas Grizzlies. 
He was a professional basketball player for the Chicago Blackhawks. He was drafted by the Chicago Bibby's.
Marie and Pierre are the best.  They are the only two who have won a beauty pageant in the world.
Well I'm not sure but I know that Pierre is one of the most influential women in the world
Marie Curie is an American fashion designer from Los Angeles.  She's a very influential person.
Marie Curie was a great English singer, songwriter, dancer and actress
I don't know, but I do know that it was a big deal.  It was one of the biggest sellers in the world.
Marie Curie is a famous English singer, songwriter, and actress!
I don't know, but they are so cute. I think they are very talented. 
I'm not sure, but they are very nice.  She's a great mother and a great father.
I don't know, I have never heard of them.  But I know that he was an American rapper.
The children of Hanna-Barbera, who is a great American actress. 
I'm not sure, but I do know that he was the youngest of three sisters and the oldest.
I don't know but I do know that it was the last time I saw him, and he was very young.
I don't know. But I am sure it was a girl. I just wanted to know how she was treated.
I don't know, but I do know that it was in the movie "Billboard"
I'm not really sure but they were the winners of the American Presidential Election in 2001
I'm not sure, but it was the most recent president, so it was a while ago.
I'm not really familiar with that, but I do know that he was a very important figure in the US.
I am not sure. But he is an american politician. Do you know who he is?
I'm not sure, but he was a great president!  He won the presidential election!
I don't remember his name, but he was one of the most influential people in the United States in the 20th century.
I am not really sure, but I know he was the ruler of America in 1845.
Eminems released "The Book of Souls" in 1994.  I was so excited.
He's an American singer, songwriter, and producer. He's pretty good.
I think he is a singer. He is a great singer, songwriter, and producer.
No, she is a very shy person.  I have never seen her in my life.
I have a sister, but she lives across the country. I don't see her much since I moved. Do you have siblings?
The capital, Panama City, is located on the Gulf of Mexico on the Mississippi River.
I'm not sure about that, but I do know that the state is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
That is a good question. I have no idea. I do know that Nevada is the 3rd largest state in the US.
Yeah, he was an American singer-songwriter and songwriters. He was also a producer.
Yes he is an American singer-songwriter. He is also a member of the American pop punk band The Beatles.
It's called The Number of the Beast. It was released in August of 2009.
He was a great musician.  He had a great song "Before I was born".
He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor!  I was surprised. 
I think he was the most influential artist of all time. He was born in 1948. 
Yes, he was one of the greatest artists of all time. He was a great performers and songwriter.
I have heard of Michael Jacksons album. He's a singer and songwriter and producer.
Thomas Edison died on August 30, 1985.  I was so shocked.
Thomas Edisons died on August 28, 1973. He was the founder of Detroit.
Yes. They are the second-largest French-speaking country in Europe. 
I'm not sure but I know it is the third-largest country in Africa by land area
I'm not sure.  But I know that French originated in the 15th century. 
I'm not sure but I know that French is the second-largest language in the world and is one of the most sparsely spoken languages in Europe.
I am not sure but I do know it is a country located in the Southern tip of Africa.
Some people speak it in Africa, but I'm not sure if they speak any other languages.
I don't know, but I know it is one of the largest and most sparsely populated countries in the world.
I am not really sure, but I know it is the second most sparsely spoken language in the world.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's the 3rd largest English language in the world, with a population of 2.5 million.
Mostly in Africa, but they are also in the Caribbean and the Atlantic.
I'm not sure, but I know that they speak a large variety of languages, including French.
Mostly in Africa.  I have been there and I speak it fluently.  It is a beautiful country.
I don't know exactly, but he was one of the most influential musician of all times.
Yes, it is a sovereign island in the middle of the Gulf of Mexico. I was surprised.
The Gulf of Mexico.  It is beautiful.  I love the beach.  Do you?
Derek is a great actor, actor and singer. He's a good actor too.
Marty was the main character of the show. He was also in the show "The Friends," which aired on NBC.
I am sorry, but he has been in a lot of trouble lately.  I am just glad he is back on his feet.
I am not sure but I know that Derek Joseph Philanthropic was a great actor.
Thomas Jefferson was an American rapper who was a prominent rappers and poet.
Thomas Jefferson was president of the United States of America. He was also a Republican.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail. It's the longest mountain in North America.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the longest mountain in the world.
I would have to say the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. It is the longest one in the world.
No, it is just in the middle of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the longest mountain.  That is the highest mountain on the continent.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail, it's a beautiful place, and it's the longest in the world.
She was 15 years old. I was so shocked. She didn't even realize I was in the shower!
I'm not sure, but I think she's a very talented singer, she's been in the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame since 1983.
I'm pretty sure it was Jacob Sullivan, but I'm not really sure.
Harry Potter was my favorite. He was the best character in the series and the best wizard of the lord.
Harry Potter was the only book I've read.  It's a shame that he died at such a young age.
Albus is a Scottish comedian. He is a great actor! Do you like him?
That's a great question! I wonder who the first person who played Dumbledore was?
I am not sure but i know that Dumbledore is one of the best characters of all time.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it was a very important battle for both sides of the country.
Mozart was the first pop punk band to have sold over 100 million records worldwide.
I don't know, but I know it was a short film.  It was very emotional!
He was born in 1845.  He was the first president of the United States.  That's when he became president.
I'm not sure but he was a very important president of the United States. He was president of Georgia
He was the president of the United States in the 19th century.  It was a great time.
I'm not sure, but the word "south" was first recorded in the 10th century.
I'm not sure, but I do know that South America has the longest united States bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
There is the United Kingdom, which is located in the United States, and it is the third-largest country in the world.
I am not sure but I know it is the 4th most populated country in the world!
I am not sure.    But I know it is the 8th-largest state in the U.S.
I am not sure but I think they are in the Caribbean Sea and the Gulf of Mexico.
The United States, the Republic of South America, New Zealand, and the Caribbean
I'm not sure, but it's a small island in the Caribbean, so it's not really that big.
I am not sure. But the US is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean and the Caribbean
I am not sure but it is the largest country and the 3rd largest by land area in the world.
He discovered some carrot flowers.  I was so surprised!  They are native to Asia.
I think it was a rose bush. I don't know what I could say. 
He discovered a bunch of flowers in my garden and I'm so happy about it. I was so happy to see him.
I found some flowers. I am not sure if they are native to the world.  
I found some carnivorous plants that have a long, waxy tapered flower.
He discovered a bunch of flowers and some shrubs, and some flowers. He was so excited!
No.  It was released in 1996 and I have not seen it.  Do you have a favorite?
The second world wars began in the late 19th century. I think the first one started in 1948.
I'm not exactly sure when the first one started, but it ended in the late 1950's and early 1930's.
The first one started in the late 1930s and the first one ended in the 1930's. 
The first one started when the war ended.  It was a long time ago though.  I can't believe the first one ended.
I'm not really sure but I do know that they were the first European possession to be established.
It's the capital and is the most sparsely populated city in the state of August
I'm not sure, but I know the winter Olympic games held at the Vancouver Games in Canada.
She played Elvis Presley. She played well in the movie.  She was also a pretty good dancer.
I am not sure, but he was a great driver. I am sorry to hear that. 
She's turning 25.  She's getting married in July.  I'm so excited!
Dr. Martin Luther King was a great English author. He wrote a lot of essays and poetry.
Dr Martin Luther King was an American rapper who was born in 1881.
The capital was Manhattan. It was a very important center for finance, commerce, and entertainment.
I'm not sure but it's amazing to think that the earliest civilization was in Europe!
I think it was the Mesopotamian empire.  I don't remember the name, but it was a long time ago.
I am not sure, but I know that Tennessee is the 3rd largest city by land area.
The metropolitan area of Tennessee is one of the most densely populated cities in the state.
The metropolitan area, which is the third-largest city in the state of Tennessee.
I think it's the capital. It's the second-largest city in the state of Tennessee.
The capital of Tennessee is Memphis.  The capital is Jackson.
They are New York City, and they are the most populous city in Tennessee. 
I'm not sure but I know there's a lot in TN. The capital is Tallahassee.
The city's capital, Tallahassee, is also known as the Cumberland River.
I think that's a good question to ask. I'm not sure, but I think they're the most populous city in Tennessee.
I don't know, but I've heard it is one of the fastest growing cities in the state.
He was a teacher, but he was also a lawyer. He passed away a few years ago.
He was a detective in the city of Dearborn, Michigan.  He had a hard time getting a raise.
He was a lawyer. He passed away in 1981.  He was in the Air Force.
I'm not really sure, but he was the president of the United States. He was a good president.
Hawaii is the only state that is bordered by the Pacific Ocean.
I'm not sure but I know that it's the only state in the Pacific Ocean.
New Zealand is the capital and most populated city in the United States.  It is also the third-largest in the world.
I don't know, but I know that it is the third-largest in the world.
New Zealand is the most populous city in the country. It's also very diverse!
I am not sure, but it is the most densely populated of the United States.
I believe it is Manhattan, which is the second-largest metropolitan area in the world.
He was born in the US and lived in Bavaria and was a member of the Bavarian Society for Germany.
He was born in England. He was also a great composer. I love his work.
I'm not sure, but it was founded by Bartolomeo Cristofori and it has been around since 1845.
He was born in Bavaria in 1884. He's the most famous composers of all time.
I am not sure but I know he was a great piano player and songwriter
It's called "Germany". It's the most populous and most densely populated city in the United States.
She did not get married, but she did get engaged to a girl who was in the army.
He is from Pittsburgh, Illinois. He was a real estate agent. 
I'm not sure when it became a state capita, but it's the largest state in the world.
It became the capital of the United States in 1845, and was established in 1876.
I am not really sure, I just know that Justin Bieber is an American singer.
Justin beiber is the singer and songwriter from toronto. Do you like him?
Justin timberlake went to high school in california, and he was born on december 18, 1994.
Justin timberlake is a Canadian singer, he was born in 2009! 
I'm not sure, but he was the greatest American poet and writer of all time.
It is coming out on May 20, 2017. I have been waiting for a while.  
I'm not sure. I think it is coming out soon though. Do you have any plans this weekend?
She was a very famous singer who was born in New York and died in 1984.
I'm not sure, but I do know that Georgia is the 3rd-largest state in the southeastern region of the United States.
Atlanta is the 3rd largest city in Georgia but the most populous metropolitan area is Atlanta.
Atlanta, Georgia is one of the most populated cities in the US, but it is also the largest city in the state.
She was a great actress.  She was nominated for four Grammy awards.
No. She's not. I don't think so. She was born in 1984.
The winner was Leonardo DiCapella.  She was a very talented actress.
He was diagnosed with Alzheimer's. It's been a long time since I've seen him.
I'm not sure. I know that in the US, women were only allowed to run since the 19th century.
That was Jodhi May. She was a great woman. She also ran the presidency.
I'm not sure, but I think it was the one who was nominated for the US presidency.
No, I don't think so. She's not the first woman. She was born in 1936.
I'm not sure but it's a beautiful river. The water flows along the Atlantic ocean.
Yes, it happened in 1845. It was the last president of the United States to do that.
No, I'm not sure.  I know he was a president in the United States though.
I'm not sure, but I know that it was the most influential country in the world.
I am not sure but I do know that it was an important battle of Britain.  
He went to the Cincinnati University of Pennsylvania, but he didn't go to college.
Trinididad is a small island in the Atlantic Ocean. I've never been there.
Trinididad is a small island in the Caribbean region of the Atlantic Ocean. It's beautiful.
I would use the Zip code, it is a program that can be used for international shipping. It is a good way to save money.
I am not sure, but he is a famous rapper. He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I don't know, but he was an American rock star.  His real name is Peter Jackson.
He's one of the greatest singers and songwriters in the world.  He's also an actor and dancer.
I'm not sure where he came from but he's a great singer and songwriter
Jesse Jackson is an American singer and songwriter born and raised in Honolulu.
Jesse Jackson was born and raised in Birmingham, Massachusetts. 
I'm not really sure, but I know that they are one of the best football clubs in the world
I think it was Bartolomeo Cristofori. I was so happy he made it.
I don't know, but it is very close to Las Vegas.  It's a great place to visit.
I am not sure, but I do know that the state is ranked as the most sparsely populated in the United States.
I'm not sure but the highest point in the state is the Grand Center.  It goes all the way to the Grand Tetons.
The highest point is Memphis!  It is the most populous state in the US
The Appalachian National Scene, it's the longest mountain in Africa.
I don't think so. But I do know it's the second-largest state in Africa.
I'm not sure.  But he was the ruler of Dominican Republic.  He died in June of 1945.
I think it was "Electronic Arts" which was released in 1983.
The Washington Capitals won it in 2005. I didn't know the team had won it.
Bruce Jenner is a great American singer and songwriter. He is also a comedian
I'm not sure. But he was a famous singer. He was the best singer of all time.
Bruce Jenner is the man that is the fifteenth anniversary of Margaret Mitchell.
Bruce Jenner was an American singer, songwriter, actor and dancer.
He is a college professor at the University of North Carolina. I was shocked.
He went to Harvard. I am a big fan and he was ranked the best in his class.
He went to Princeton, Michigan.  I was there for him and my family.
I don't know, but he was a great driver. He was ranked as one of the greatest drivers ever.
A dork is a type of work that involves a person with a lot of hard work.  
She was 18 years old.  She's still in high school.  I'm so jealous of her. 
I'm not sure, but she's one of the biggest stars in America.  She's been around since 1983.
She is a year old and still acts like a teenager. She's a great mom! Do you have any siblings?
I don't know, but I do know that the show is based on her real name is Kristen Elmer Doolin.
Jane Austen is a great author. She was one of the most influential and influential authors in the world.
I don't know but I know she is a great author. I read her books a lot.
It's a romance novel written by Jane Austen. She's a famous author! 
She is a novelist and author. I have read some of her books. She is quite good.
She is an english literary author.  She has been around since the 1980s.
The title is "The Hitchhiker's Dance", which is a romance novel.
It is the "Sense & Sensibility," which is a fantasy series by Jane Austen.
I don't know but she is a great author. I have read a few of her books.
Jane authors are American novels that were written by Jane Austen and Margaret Mitchell.
The most famous one is "The Song of the Lady" by Jane Austen.
They're mostly fantasy books, but some are non-fiction. I've read a lot of them.
They're books by Margaret Mitchell.  They're pretty good.  I read them when I was younger.
I'm not sure. I have read a lot of them. They are a great author. 
I have no clue. I don't know much about Jane Autens but I know that they are very popular.
She is a singer, songwriter, actor, and dancer. She is really talented.
Bruce Wayne is one of the best superheroes in comic books. He is also a great actor.
It's in the Eastern part of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
It is in the Appalachian National Fourth State of Georgia. 
It's a small southernmost state in the southeastern region of the United States.
It is in the southeast. It is the largest state in the united states.
The state's capital, Pennsylvania.  The capital is Burlington.
It is the capital of the state of West Virginia. It is located on the eastern end of the United States.
I have been to the Appalachian National Scenic Trail, it is the longest continuous stretch from Georgia to Maine.
I am not sure what that means, but it's in the northeastern part of the United States.
It is bordered to Maine, Vermont, New Hampshire, and Georgia. 
I'm not sure if there's a specific border but I do know there's the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is the most populous state in the US!
I am not entirely sure, but I know it is the third least populated state in the United States.
I am not sure but I do know that West Virginia is the 3rd largest of the 50 United States by area.
It is the southernmost state in the southeastern region of the united states
West Virginia.  It is the third-largest state in the US and second-smallest by area.
I don't know, but I know that it's the 3rd-largest state in the US!
I'm not sure about the state but it's bordered by Maine and Vermont. 
Yes, West Virginia.  It is a very small state in the United States.
I have never been to West virginian, but I know it is the 3rd most populous state in the United States.
The state capital is Montgomery, which is located in the southeastern region of the United States.
I am not sure, but I have heard the area is in the southeastern region of the U.S.
I am not sure but it is the capital of the United States of West Virginia.
I'm not sure, but I know the state is bordered by the Mississippi River and Arkansas.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the 4th smallest state by area in the US.
It's a state in the southeastern US in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
John F Kennedy, he was the first person to win the presidency in the US
John F Kennedy was the vice vice President of the U.S.  I don't remember his name.
Kennedy was the president of the United States and he was the ruler of the country.
It was John F Kennedy, he was the Vice president of the U.S.
John F Kennedy is the president of the United States of America, I think he is pretty cool
I love John F Kennedy. He was an American singer, songwriter, and television personality, and actor.
She is an american singer and songwriter.  She was born and raised in a small town and is a singer.
I don't know. I just know that he is a great artist and songwriter.
No. I don't think he's married. I just have a girlfriend. I've never met her.
Ariana Grande. It is a famous singer, songwriter, and producer.
It is the United States, and it's the third-largest country in the European Union.
No, but I think it is the largest in the world. It is the second-largest country in the EU.
It is called Bavaria. It is the third-largest country in the European Union.
I don't know, but it is the fourth smallest of the European Union by area.
The President of the United States!  I can't believe he did that.  He was the CEO of the Space Force.
The man who stepped on the Moon was an American astrophysicist and a pioneer of the United States.
I believe it was the first one, but I'm not sure who the second one was. 
That was Michael Jackson.  He was a great actor.  I think he did an amazing job.
I think he's the first man to ever reach the sun.  It was a long time ago.
I'm not sure but it was a long time ago. He did it on the radio too.
Thomas Sean Conner is an American rapper. He was born in 1984.
He had a heart attack.  He was only seven months old.  I was very sad.  
He went to the University of Kansas, and was a champion at wrestling. 
I'm not sure but he was ranked as a best-selling athlete of all time.
I don't remember, but I know he was a great American poet, author, and a general.
I'm not sure but I know that the Fiji are the largest country in Africa. 
Fiji is a sovereign island country in the Caribbean. It was established in 1858.
Fiji is a sovereign island nation located on the Pacific Ocean.
I believe it is Thailand.  They have a large number of employees in India.
I'm not entirely sure, but I know he wrote a book about the history of the Pope
I don't know, but I do know he is considered one of the greatest athletes ever.
I don't really like Lebron James. He's been playing in the NBA since 1991.
I don't know. He was born on August 30, 1976. He's been playing basketball since he was 18.
He is a great player. He is one of the best all-star basketball players in the NBA.
It was in March of 1991.  I'm not sure when the team moved. 
He joined the Heat in 1961.  He is the best basketball star of all time.
He joined the Heat in 1991 as a rookie, but was traded in 2001.
New York City.  It is the third-largest city in New York and the 4th-last smallest in the US.
I am not sure but I do know they are the most populous of the country. 
He was an American singer, songwriter, and author.  Do you like him?
George Bush was a great American singer/songwriter, songwriters, and author.
Lake Champlain and the Mississippi gulf of mexico. I love the water there.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  I love the water there.
Well I live right next to Lake Champlain, and it's the most populous city in Maine.
I have never been there. But I have been to the Grand Tetons in Wyoming.
Lake Champlain and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
The 2018 World Cup, it was a great game. I was so happy they won. 
His name was Drew. I think it was his real name, but I don't remember the name.
I think it was Dave, but I'm not sure. It was a long time ago.
His name was Dylan and he played the piano and drums for the school I was in.
I'm not sure, but I do know she was born in 1938. That's a while ago!
It was in 1877.  I am not too sure how long ago it happened. 
I'm not sure, but I know it was very tragic.  She was an American author who died in 1883.
She was born in 1948. She's a great author.  Do you have a favorite author?
I'm not sure, but I know that the US is hosted by Roger Busch
I don't know, I just know that they are hosting. It is the largest summer Olympic event in the world.
I'm not sure, but I can't believe they won the Winter Olympics!
I am not sure but I know they are hosting. They are also hosting Summer Olympic games this summer.
He was an American singer. He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
It was a small town in New York, I think he was born in Pennsylvania.
I'm from the US.  I'm originally from Canada.  But I have been to a few other countries.
The Washington Washington Capitals. I was so happy that they made it out of the first place.
I'm not sure but I do know that the US government has owned it since 1978.
The first one launched was launched in 2001.  It had a small propeller.
Yes, the first president of India was Abdullah Jean.  I thought he was the ruler of India.
I'm not sure, but it would be interesting to know.  The Indian Ocean is one of the largest rivers in the world.
Janet Jackson was born on December 17, 1993 in New York, New York.
Janet was a girl born in 1893. She was born in January of 1989.
Paul Reverend is the first wife of Joseph Riggs.  He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
Paul Reverend was the second most famous American singer, songwriter, actor, and actor.
The official language of the Netherlands is spanish, english, and french. 
I am not sure, but I do know that in the Netherlands, the official language is English.
I'm not sure but I know that it is a sovereign state and has over 2.5 million citizens
I'm not sure, but I know that they speak english, french, and spanish.
I think they speak english and spanish fluently. I'm not sure, but I know that they speak a variety of languages.
It is in the Netherlands.  It is a sovereign nation located in the Northern part of Europe.
He was at the University of Tennessee. I am not sure where he was going though.
I am not sure but I do know he was a great driver.  He was ranked the fastest driver in the US.
I think it's University of Memphis, Tennessee.  I'm a big fan of him.
He went to the University of Michigan. I'm a big fan of his work. 
I went to Princetta University. They're the oldest public school in North America and are ranked the best in Canada.
I went to Princetta University, but I am not sure if I am ready.
His name was Joseph. He's still here, but he's been gone for a while. I was so sad.
I'm not sure, but it was the first official language that was spoken in Africa.
I am not sure who bought it but they have been trying to get it for a long time now.
Yes, it was in the Caribbean region of the Atlantic Ocean.  He was a good driver.
That's so interesting! Did you ever hear about it? It's a state in the United States.
I don't know but I know it was held in Paris and was hosted in France.
I am not sure. But I know the Confederate was the commander in the battle.
The battle of the south sunday.  He was an officer of the united states army.
I think it was Michael Jackson. He was a legend. I remember watching him when he was a child.
It is on the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.  I have been there.
I think it was a battle between the US and Germany, but I don't remember the exact details.
I don't know, but he did discover that he had a viral vaccine in 2003.
No, he was born in Italy and he was a professional athlete. He was an Italian rapper.
The US is the second-largest country in Europe, but it is the 3rd most sparsely populated.
The American pop punk band formed in Las Vegas in 1969. They were very talented.
The Beatles died in 2008. They were one of the best bands.  
The Beatles, they were a great group of rock bands. They were also very talented.
They were an American singer-songwriter who was also a guitarist. They were also a bassist.
I'm not too sure but they're very talented. They were an American rock bands formed in Pennsylvania.
My favorite is Jacob sartorius he is an american singer and songwriter
I'm not sure but I know the lead vocalist died in 2007 and the guitarist died last year.
I'm sorry for your loss. It was the lead singer of the American rock band Metallica.
I am so sorry for your loss.  It was my favorite song by Ray.  He was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
Oh no!  I'm sorry to hear that.  It must be so hard to lose such a talent!
I'm not sure but I do know that there was a huge loss of musicians in the United States.
I think that was in the 1990s. I don't remember the exact date, but it was a long time ago.
I am not really sure, but I know that the musician who passed was a great guitarist.
My favorite artist is Lady Gaga, she was so great! I was so sad when she died.
Yes, the American musician Jimi Hendrix.  He was born in August 1978.
It's Alaska. It's the 4th-largest state in the U.S.
I don't know, but it is the 3rd most densely populated of all the states.
I am not sure but I do know he was the CEO and was also the founder.
I'm not sure but the most common is the Germans.  They're from Europe.
I am not sure but they can be found on every continent except Antarctica. 
I'm not sure, but it was first mentioned in the 15th century by the Anglo-Scottish.
It was the United States Department of Scotland.  It was a big one.
I'm not sure, but I know that they were the ruler and executive of the United States.
It was the U.S. government of America. They have been around for quite a while.
It was the President of the U.S.  It's a small one in the Midwest
It was the U.S. Council of America, which is a governmental body of the United States
Yes, he is the father of Eli Whitney, a famous American singer and songwriter.
No, my grandmother.  She was a great mother, but she passed away.  
I don't really know, but I know that it is the highest ranked school in the world.
It's the largest city in Nevada, but it has a population of around 8.5 million.
Obama Obama was born and raised in Ohio.  He was also a US President of Ohio
He died in 1979, so he was only 5 years old.  He was an amazing person. 
I'm not sure when it became independent but the Philippine was established in 1845 by the Spanish.
She was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress in the United States.
Steven Stampkos is an American professional basketball team based in Dallas, Tx.
Roger Clement was a famous Italian rapper, he was a great actor too
I don't know but I do know that they have a sister who is named Elvis Presley.
Robert Cole is my brother.  He's a great man.  I'm glad he's a good friend.
Roberto is the name of the family name of Jeremy Clarkson. He is an actor, director and producer.
I am the oldest of 4 brothers and sisters.   I have a younger sister.  She is the youngest.
Her name is Mia. She's a beaut. She was born and raised in New Orleans.
It's a girl name. Her name is Jessica. I'm the oldest. She's a sweetheart.
It's a name for her!  She's a very beautiful woman.  I wish I could see her more.
Her name is Bonnie. I'm the oldest. I have two brothers, and a sister.
I don't know, but I have heard of them. They're the oldest of four. 
I'm not sure but my sister and I are pretty close.  She is in the navy.
They are the oldest of 4 and the youngest of three. They are all very tall.
I don't know, but I have a brother and sister who are older than I am.  They're older than me.
The only sibling I know is Jacob, but I don't know if he's a brother or sister
I'm not sure what you mean, but the names are Lindsey Stirling, and Mia Khalifa.
I don't recall.  They were all older though.  I think they were all younger than me.
I don't think they knew what was wrong. I just thought they were going to be good friends.
I think it was Kate, Kelly, and Megi. It was a while ago. I was so happy to see them.
I don't remember names but they were very nice, very friendly. I'm sure they enjoyed each other.
I don't remember the exact names.   I think it was a girl name, though.
His name is Douglas. He is the youngest of 4. He was raised by my mom.
Her name is Sara.  She is a great mom!  I love her.  Do you have a sibling?
I am not sure what her name is.  She has a good memory of me and my brother.
Her name is Sara. She's the youngest. She was born in Italy and moved to the US when she was 18.
Her name's Lady.  She's a beauty pageant beauty queen. 
I'm not sure but it is the only one that is the least populated in the state of Massachusetts.
The river of Missouri. It goes along the Mississippi Gulf of Mexico.
The Mississippi River, it's the longest and toughest river.
He died on June 2, 1945. He was one of the most influential humanities leaders of the 19th century.
He was killed in August of 1945. He was an author. He is one of the most influential and influential people in history.
I'm not sure, but he was a very good actor.  He was a great actor.
It's in 1963. I'm not sure when it happened, but it's very distressing.
I don't know if he is still alive, but he was one of the best and most influential human genres of history.
I don't know, but he was the ruler of the United States. So, I'm guessing he was killed pretty recently.
He was 20 years old, and he was born in the US. I'm so happy for him!
I'm not sure, it's a sovereign state that is bordered by Spain, Morocco, and Alaska.
Morocco is one of my favorite countries! I've been there and it's beautiful there.
He was buried in a church in the middle of a church on the river Tennessee.
Her name is Jennifer and I have a daughter who is 3 years old.  
I'm not sure but I do know that he is a Republican and was elected in 1963.
Mcdonald. He was born on June 2, 1953.  I think he's a great dad.
The Greater Lake is the largest city in the Great Lakes region in the United States.
The Great Lakes is the largest city in the Great Lake and the most populous city in Canada.
I'm not sure, but it's the third-largest city in the United States.
I'm not sure of the number, but I know that it's the most populous city in the United States
I'm not sure, but I know that they are the largest metropolitan area in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that the Great Smoky Mountains are the highest mountain in the world, right?
I'm not sure, but I do know that there are over 800,000 residents. 
The capital is Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. It is a very large city.
I am not sure but I know that they are the most populous city in Michigan.
I'm not sure but it seems to be one of the most populous cities in Canada.
I'm not sure but I know the first building was constructed in 1959!
That is a really tall building in New Zealand, and it is the tallest in the world.
Yes, he was born in Pennsylvania. It was a long time ago though.
I don't know, but he was a prominent businessman for the state of Washington.
turkey is a common name for a variety of meat.  it is usually pork or beef.
I am not sure, but it was a long time ago.  I was just glad I was able to get back to work.
I am at the University of New York.  I am very excited.  Do you go to a college in New York?
I think it was in the 1960s. I remember that it was the first time he won!
The battle of Trenton is a battle between the Washington Washington and the Washington Redskins.
He fought in the Battle of Trenton.  I was very happy that he was able to win.
She is a famous singer and songwriter. She is quite popular in the U.S.
Yes it was. The first steps on the Moon was in 1969. I was shocked.
It is the city in the United States that is located in the southeastern region of the country.
It's in New York. I don't know if it's safe there. I hope it's not.
It is a small island country in the southeastern region of China. It is in the Indian subcontinent.
I think they beat the browns. They have been playing for a while.  Do you have a favorite team?
I think it's in a cafe nearby.  I haven't seen it in a long time.
The United States, but the US is bordered by China to the west.  I don't know why.
Russia. It's a sovereign country in the southeastern region of the US.
I'm not sure. But it's the third most populous country in Europe.  
He was a president of the United States in the 19th century. He had a long career.
Obama is the 45th president of the united states   and the first president of america
Obama Obama is the 45th president of the United States. He is a Republican and has been elected since June 20, 1945.
I am not sure but I know that it has been a long time since I was president.  
Obama is the 45th president of the United States.  He is the first president of America.
Obama is the 45th president of the US. He was elected in the United States in 2004
Obama Obama was the first president of the United States and is the 45th president of America. 
Prince Charles is an American rapper. He was born on December 1962.
He is the best. He is a great person. He has been with me since I met him.
Avi is the best author. He wrote the screenplay of the movie "Shawshank Redemption".
I don't know, I just saw that they were adopted. I don;t know the name of their parents.
I don't remember their name, but I do know that they're not very good with social situations.
I am not sure, but I know they are very popular. I think they are great friends.
I don't know, but I know my grandmother was a great mother. She was a very sweet mother.
I don't know, but I do know that Amy Cahill was an American singer and dancers.
Daniel Cahill and Amy Kellyn. Do you know them? I know Amy is an American actress and singer.
My parents are stepmother and father, they live in a small apartment so we don't see them often.
I'm not sure, but he is a very popular singer and songwriter. Do you know them?
The first computer was invented in 1963. It was a big step from the first one.
The first ever computer was made in 1968 by a guy named Richard and Maurice Mitchell.
The police were able to identify it.  I was so scared.  It was a big deal for me.
The Electronic Arts. I thought he was going to be a physicist but he was a scientist.
I'm not sure. But I know that they have been making electronics since the 1980s.
I'm not too sure, but it was really loud and I had to go outside and see it!  I had no idea it was so loud!
I don't know who was first, but it was a small black one that looked like a giant mouse.  I was so scared!
I am not sure, but I was very excited when they found it.  I had no clue how long it was in there.
The first electrical discovery was in 1887! It was a long time ago.
I'm not sure who the first, but the first person who did it was a scientist.
Well it's the longest bridge in the world, and it's one of the most densely populated cities.
I don't know, but I know it is the highest mountain in the world.  I would love to visit though.
I don't know exactly but I do know it is in the west part of the state of California.
It's the San Diego Bronx. It's a pretty big bridge.  
I don't know, but it is the longest bridge in the world. I think I will be going to visit San Diego soon.
I don't know but it is the longest bridge in the world and has the highest elevated passenger bridge.
George Bush was president of the Army of the United States. He was the Secretary of Defense.
It is. It's located between Lake Michigan and the U.S. in the Great Lakes region.
Her name is Sara. She's a beauty queen.  She's the sweetest and beautiful person.
I'm not sure but the US was the first country to be in the EU. That's crazy.
Billy Cyrus was born in August 1896.  He was a great actor.
Jeff probts is a singer and songwriter, he's pretty popular! 
Jeff is an American singer, songwriter, and actor. He is very successful.
Jeff is the founder of the American multinational electronics company Jeff Bezos.
I'm not sure who Jeff Province is. I know he is a former President.
He was an american rapper, songwriter, actor, producer, and actor.
Eminem released March 3, 1997 in Las Vegas.  I didn't realize he was that young.
Yes he was. He was drafted at the end of the season. He played in the NFL.
He was drafted in 1991, he's a legend. He was also a great receiver.
I am not sure when he was born.  He was born in Oxford, Illinois. 
I'm not sure but I do know that he was born in Pennsylvania.  I'm sure it was a long time ago.
I'm not sure but it was a sad day.  She was a great mother and a wonderful mother.
I'm not sure but I know it was in 1948. I was sad to see her in the end.
She's called Katy Hudson. She's been around since the late 1980s.
He's the quarterback of the University of North Carolina and the best quarterback in the league
Tokyo, Japan. It's the largest metropolitan area in the world and has a population of 8.5 million.
It is the most populous metropolitan area in the world.  It's a big city.
It's in Tokyo, and I've been there a couple times. It's the capital and most populous metropolitan area in the world.
It is the seat of the Tokyo metropolitan area.  I was there last summer!
No, I was thinking of moving to Tokyo.  I have never been, but I know its the capital of Japan.
I don't know, but he was one of the most influential people in the world. He was the best-selling actor of all time.
I don't know, but it was a very popular name for the US.  It was a pretty popular name in the United States.
I am not sure but he was born in 1957.  He was the oldest and most famous person in the world.
I think they are both 37. I have never seen either of them in my life. 
He is 32. He is also an American singer-songwriter.  He was born in 1958.
He's 44 years old.  He was born in 1994.  I'm sure she is still very young.
I don't know but I know that it has the most densely populated metropolitan area in the world.
I am not really sure of the city. But it is the most populous city in the state of New Jersey.
I think it is, it is the capital of New York. Do you know much about it?
I don't know but I know it is the largest city in the state of New Jersey.
I'm not exactly sure when it was written, but I do remember that it was the longest held in the United States.
I'm not sure. But I know he was a poet who was born in New York.
It was the 8th century, I believe he died in August of 1978.
He died on August 29, 1976 on September 30, 1984.
He was born on August 30 1964. He was also an actor and comedian.
I don't know, but it was in the early 1980s. I was so sad.
He was a secretary for the New York Times. He was the head of the Senate.
John cabot is my favorite singer. He was born on October 1985.
Probably Hawaii, but the majority of the population lives in the Pacific Ocean.
Hawaii is the third-largest island by area, but it's the third smallest by area.
Tom Holland was nominated for five academy awards, and he won four of them!
I don't remember, but he was nominated for five Academy awards.  He is a great actor.
It was nominated for Best Actors Award for Best Picture in the US in the 1980s.
Tom Holland was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor in 1994.
No, but I did hear it on NBC! It was on the Syfy Channel. 
I don't remember but she was the highest paid actress of the year in the United States.
That was Madeleine Stowe. She won the Academy Award in 2008.
No, I don't think so. It was a woman's first win to win a beauty contest in 2009.
The island of Croatia. It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea.
He is a quarterback for the Washington Capitals.  He's a great player. 
I'm not sure, but I know he was born in England. I think he is a striker.
He was the quarterback of the england team in 2003.  He was very good.
The American singer and songwriter who was born in New York. Do you know him?
I'm not sure but I do know that she is an American singer and songwriter.
I don't know.  I know it was a long time ago, but I can't imagine what that must be like.
JFK JFk was a man who was a general of the United States in the late 19th century
JKF was killed in 1993.   I think he was just a young man.
I'm not sure but he was a very good actor.  It was hard to believe he was killed.
I think it was in the early 1960's, when it happened.  I was so shocked!
Alfred Wegener was born in New York City! He was the best welder in the world!
I am not sure but I know they are a great American rock bands. Do you like them?
I'm not sure, but he was a pretty smart man. He was born on March 1984.
No, I am an only child, but I am the youngest of five. I was raised by my brother. 
Albert Einsteins was one of the most famous people of all time.  He was born in New York.
Einsteins was an American scientist from Los Angeles. He was an English physicist.
I am not sure, but it was a very sad event for him.  He was a great driver.
I believe it was George Orwell. He was the president of the United States.   
The Broadway. I'm from Brooklyn but I've never been to Manhattans.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is the most populated city in the United States.
New York City is the largest city in the US, and New York is a borough.
I am not exactly sure. But I do know that it is the second-largest river in the US.
New York City is a borough in the United States of New York. It is the largest city in the US and the most densely populated.
New York is the most densely populated state in the United States.  There are a lot of rivers in New York.
I'm not sure but he was a great rapper and songwriter.  
I believe it was "Speak Out of the Lamps" which came out in 1997.
I think she was killed by a drunk driver.  I'm sorry for the loss of her.
She had a heart attack.  It was a long time ago, but it was very sudden.
She was diagnosed with a severe case of heart attack. I am so sorry to hear that.
She had a heart attack and a stroke, she was only 6 months old and it was scary
I don't know when it was first, but he is the 45th president of Mexico. I think that was in the 20th century.
I think the Republic of Spain is in between the Mediterranean Sea and the Atlantic Ocean.
I am not sure who did. It is very popular though. There are over 3000 merlions in the world.
I'm not sure but it was one of the first species ever produced by the Carnivora
Merlion was created by the designer of General Motors in 1903.
I'm not sure who created it, but it was a very valuable car in the 19th century
She was a great mother. Her husband died in a plane crash. It was so sad. 
I don't remember exactly but it was the first one to be awarded a nobel prize in the United States.
I don't remember, but I know it's Obama's first wife.  I know that was a long time ago.
Her name is Joseph and I am the youngest.  She is 4 months old.
Obama Obama is the youngest and the oldest of three sisters. She's a beauty
Obama Obama is a former president of the United States. She's a former US Senator. 
Obama's name is Michelle Jackson. He is the youngest of three of them.
Her name is Emma. She was born in Pennsylvania, where I live. She's a great mother.
I am not too sure, but I know it is the capital of India.  Do you know much about it?
The capital of India is in the southeastern region of the Indian subcontinent.
I'm not really sure, but I know there are more than seventy million people there!
I think it's the Philippines. I don't know what I would do if I were you!
Elvis was Elvis Presley. He was born and raised in Los Angeles.  
I don't remember the name, but it was Elvis Presley and he had such a good voice.
It is on the 8th of the Final Fantasy 7.  I have not played it yet, but i have heard of it.
I'm not exactly sure, but I know he was born on March 25, 1989 and died on May 28, 2017.
I don't remember exactly, but he was born in August of 1977.  He's a legend.
It's on August 21, 2011.  I can't believe he's almost 40 years old.
It was in August.  I was so sad that he passed away.  He was only 5 years old and he had a heart attack.
I'm not sure, but I know that they were married in 1854.  They had a long time.
Julis Ceasar was born in 1953. He was a famous actor. 
I think it was Jefferson Abdullah, who was elected president of the United States.
I am not sure, but I know she is the 45th President of the U.S. state. 
Yes, he got married in 1994.  He is also a singer.  Do you have any pets?
I don't know, but I do know that he was born on October 17, 1997.
I'm not sure but I know that he is the best selling musician of all time. 
She was a very old lady. She had a heart attack. She was 6 months old. 
I'm not sure, but it seems it was filmed in Alabama. I think it was a while back.
Jason Alde is a singer, songwriter, producer, and actor.
The Hitchi son is an American fashion designer. He was born in 1944.
He is a professional basketball player from the Chicago, Illinois, he is retired from the NBA
I'm not sure, but he is a very smart man.  He was born in 1958.
He was elected to the presidency of the United States in the late 1980s. 
The Great Lakes. It is the longest and most densely populated river in the world.
I don't know but I know that it's the longest and most densely populated river in the world.
I think it's a good movie, and it was nominated for seven Academy Awards.
I think so, I think they are really talented! I love Jamie Lee's voice!
I'm not sure but I do know that Jamie Lee is one of the most famous people in the world.
Yes, and he was also in The Notebook. He was also a great actor and screenwriter.
He went to Princeton, Oxford, and Dearborn, Ontario. He was a great driver.
He went to Princeton.  I didn't realize he was so young.  He is also a big fan of Michael Jackson.
The stanley cup was won by the penguins!  I was so shocked! 
Alabama is the 4th most populous state and the 8th most sparsely populated. 
I don't really know the exact number but I do know that Alabama is the 3rd-largest state in the US.
Marlon Brando was one of the greatest American actor and singers ever.  
It was the best selling movie in the United States.  He was the youngest actor of all time.
I think it was for being an American singer and songwriter, which I believe was the best award ever.
She will be married in 2019, and she is going to be a great dancer.
I'm not sure but Kristen is getting married next week. She's getting engaged in a few months.
It was the King of the United States. I think he was the ruler of the Kingdom. 
Abigail Adams name was Abigigail and she was a pretty good dancer.
Abigail Adams father is a great American actress.  I have never met him before.
Dearborn Michigan, Michigan is the most populated city in Michigan. Do you know anything about it?
I'm not sure, but it's also the third-largest city in Japan. 
Its the third largest metropolitan area in the world, and the third-largest in the US.
Japan has a population of over 700,000.  That's a lot of people! 
I don't know, but the city is very large. It's the most populous metropolitan area in the world.
John Sutters is the American singer and songwriter. He was also a great actor.
I'm not sure what kind of instrument he played, but he played the drums and bass.
I am not sure, but it was an electric violin and guitar. It was pretty cool!
I'm not sure, but it's been a long time! The British were the rulers and they had a monarchy.
It was a ship that was named after a dwarf named Charles Elmer Darwin.
Yes, it was a ship that sailed between the Atlantic and the Chesapeake Bay in the Caribbean.
I think it was "Dirty Holmes", it was a romantic comedy.
He was born in 1977 and died in 1968. He was a great American comedian.
I'm not really sure but he was an American singer, songwriter, and author.
He was born on March 1884 and died on July 29, 1963
India.  The population is the second most sparsely populated country in Asia.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the largest metropolitan area is Kalinago.
Mattha and Lemon starred in the first one, I think it was in 2008.
Mathauu was in The Godfather 2.  I didn't realize that he was so young.
Matthew is one of the most famous and influential actors of all time. Lemons were also the main character.
Mattheu was in the first one, it was released in 1997.  It was a really great film.
Mathau is an american actress and singer.   She is a great voice.
I don't know, but it seems like there were a lot of people who were elected.  Do you have any?
I think so, but he was elected for President of the United States. He was elected in 1945.
Yes, but he was elected to the US in 2008. He was elected in the White House.
Yes, and he was elected in the United States in 1945.  He was also the CEO of the U.S.
I'm not entirely sure, but I do know that there is one. The president of the United States is the current United States.
Yes, he is the CEO of the United Kingdom and has been the president since July of 1945. 
Yes, but he was elected on June 30, 1945.  He was the 45th President of the U.S.
I don't know, but I do know that they are the most important.  They have been around since 1845.
The president of America.  He is the CEO of the United States.  I was shocked!
President Donald, the 45th President of the United States of America.   Do you have any?
Trump has the highest GPA in the US, but the highest ranking president is Jeff Bezos
Obama Obama is the president of United States, but he is also the President of the U.S.
I'm not sure but I know that the President has been president since January of 1962
I don't know but I do know that Obama is the president of Pope Francis.
I don't know but I know that the President of the United States is the president of America.
I don't know, but I know they are the ones responsible for the execution of the president.
Yes he did.  He was also the 45th president of the United States.   
I'm not sure but he did win the presidency of the United States. He's been in the White White Presidents since 1945.
I'm not sure, but they are considered the fourth-largest president in the world.
I'm not sure but he was the president of the United States.  He was also a member of the U.S.
I don't know, but I do know that Obama and the Clinton Clinton were the two presidents of the United States.
I think it was Obama and Bill Clinton, but I'm not too sure about the other one.
I think it was Obama, but I'm not sure. But I know he's been a great president since July of 1945.
I don't know. But the president was the 45th president of the United States.  
I don't know, but I do know that it is the 3rd-largest state by population and the 8th most densely populated in the US.
I'm not sure, but I do know it has a population of around 5.5 million.
That's a good question.  I'm not sure but India is the third largest by area in the world.
It is India. It is the 8th-largest country by area in the world, and has a population of 8.5 million.
The Democratic republic is a federal republic located in the United States, in the Carolina, Mississippi, and New Orleans.
The Democratic Republic of the Republic of America.  It is located on the Atlantic Ocean.
It is a monarchical republic in the United States that is based out of Detroit
The Democratic republic is a Christian denomination. It was founded in 1853.
The Appalachian trail and the Mount Katahdin mountains. I am not sure how much I want to go though.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is in Georgia and Maine
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is a mountain range in Asia.
I am not sure, but I know they are the highest mountain in Asia.   
I think Asia and Europe.  I have never been there but would love to go.   
Europe and Asia. I have never been to either one but they seem like a cool destination.
I am not sure but I do know that it is in the Southeastern part of Asia
I have never been but I want to.  I have been to China and Japan.  Have you ever been?
Sean Conner is an American singer, songwriter, actor, producer and actor.
I am not sure, but he was the first President of the United States. He was a great president.
I don't know but I know he was a prominent businessman in the United States.
John F Kennedy is an American politician, I believe he's the 45th president.
I'm not sure, but he was the ruler of the United States. I think he's done a good job.
Kennedy was born in 1939 and was a Republican.  He was the first president of the United States
I'm not really sure, but I know he was the ruler of the United States.  
He was the president of the United States. He was in the United Kingdom for a long time.
He was a great president of the United States in the early 20th century. He was also a member of the Senator of the U.S.
I'm not sure but he was a Republican. He was also a president of the United States.
He was in the Navy for 5 years and then he joined the Army in 2010.
He was a general of the U.S. Air Force, so he was one of the first presidents to serve in the US.
He was a general of the Army in 1845.  He was in the Air Force for 8 years.
Yes, he was the 45th president of the US. I think he was a really good one.
He was president of the United States for seven years, but was replaced by Jodhi May.
Yes. He was president of the United States.  He was the first US president to serve as President.
I don't know, but I do know that it's a member of the United States and New Zealand
I'm not sure but I know that Prince Albert was born on August 2, 1976.
The American actor who was born in Pennsylvania.  I don't know much about him.
Yes, he is a very important man.  He has been president since June of 1964.
George washington washington, he lived in the city of washington and was a state trooper
It is an espresso.  I have been using it since I was a little girl and it has a lot of energy.
It was a poem of Jacob sartorius. He was a great poet.
I am not sure but i do know that he is one of the most influential authors
Robert Frost, he was a poet and author of poetry.  He died in 1947.
He was an author and poet. He was a poet and author in the 1970s.
His first poetry was "The Hook of Souls" and he was a very good poet.
Bill Clitons was a former president of the United States. He was elected in the US in 1963.
Bill Cliton is a great American politician.  He is one of the most influential people in the US.
I am not sure but I know that he is the chairman of the United States and president of the USA.
Bill Cliton is president of the United States. He has been in the White House since August of 1993.
Clitons Vice President was an American political comedian.  He was a good one!
Bill Clinton was the Vice President of the United States, he was the president for the United Kingdom.
He was a former president of the U.S. and was also a former President of the United States.
Bill Cliton, the American rapper, was an American singer and songwriter.
Ronnie Dunn was one of the best dancers in the history of rock music and roll.
He was born in August of 1948. I don't remember where he was born.
He passed away in 1983. He was a great driver.  He was very smart.
I don't remember his exact name but I know they had a big breakthrough in the US.
He was a great musician and singer. He was in a lot of commercials as well.
I love her, she is one of the best singers in the world.  I was just so happy to see her again.
He was a singer, songwriter, and producer.  He was so popular.
It's a rock band. They are a pop punk band from Dave Mathew, Illinois.
He was born in 1883, and was a German man named Charles Alderton.
Jefferson Davis was an American rapper, actor, and television star. He was a great person.
I'm not sure, but it was the first German colonial possessions to be established in the United States.
he was a great artist, actor, and producer. he was born in 1981.
He was born on August 2, 1973. He was a legend! What do you think?
They released it in 1997. I was pretty upset about it, but I was happy to see him again.
It was released in 1996.  That was a long time ago!  It was a great song!
He was a boxer.  He was the first dog in the family to be trained to do it.  We didn't know what to do with him.
I am not sure but I do know that the first dog was a terrier named Labrador
The dog was a labrador. He was very smart and was very energetic.
No, I don't recall the name of the film.  But I do remember that movie.  Sean Conner is a great actor.
They are a sovereign nation that was established in 1945. They are in a war with the government.
I'm not sure but I know it is the second-largest country in the world, so it's not too surprising.
It is a political and social conflict between the sovereign states in the United States and the Republic of Israel
I'm not sure but it has been a big one since it was established in 1947.
They are a sovereign country located in the southern tip of the Gulf of Azeroth.
Israel is a sovereign state located in the middle of the Arabian Sea. 
It's an international war between the U.S. and Israel. I'm glad we're here to help each other.
It's a conflict between the kingdom of Israel and Arab countries. It's very violent. 
Israel is the largest and most sparsely populated country in the world.  I am not sure what they are doing.
I am not sure about the war, but it is in the Arabs and the Hebrew Baseball Conference.
It's a conflict between the Kingdom of Israel and the Arabs. The Arabs are in charge of the military.
Brad's name is Megus. It's a great name, but it's a little hard to pronounce!
I'm not sure but I do know that she is a very successful actress and singer.
Her name is Lady. She's very sweet, but I don't get to see her often.
I am not sure, but I know that the song was released in 1977 and was number one in the US.
I'm not sure when it came out, but I know it's been a while since Katy Perry's released it.
I don't recall when it came out. But it is one of the biggest pop songs in the world.
She's an American singer, songwriter and actor.  I love her! 
I am not sure but I do know that Katy Perry's song, "Baby One More Time" was released in 2009.
Katy perry released her debut album in 1998, so it is quite old now.
It was released in 1999 and it was the first song on the Billboard Hot 100 in the United States.
I don't remember, but I know that they were originally invented in 1894. That's a long time ago!
I'm not sure, but I think he's a very good player. He has won several awards for his acting skills.
I don't remember the name, but I do remember he was a huge fan of the band The Number of the Beast.
I don't remember the exact book but it was a romance novel.  It was a long time ago.
I don't remember, but I think it was about a girl who was in the closet.
It was called "The Fourth Age". It was a science-fiction romance novel. I loved the story.
A book of Avi, it was a science fiction novel.  I loved it!  
I'm not really sure, but I know that it's the largest city in Indiana.  I live in a small town.
He was a great man. He was an accomplished warrior. He also was a very successful business man.
He was born in 1889. He was an American singer/ songwriter and dancer.
It is on March 30, 2011. I'm so jealous of him. He's a legend.
I don't know, but I know that Russia is a sovereign country with a strong military, so I am sure they did.
He was an American singer and songwriter. He was born in August 1981.
I'm not sure, but he was born in 1983 and was born on August 29, 1997.
The first album was released in 1994. It was called "The Fourth Animated Musical".
I don't remember but the album was released in 1997, so it was a long time ago
Elizabet is the American singer, songwriter, and actress who is also a singer.
He is a famous American singer-songwriter.  He's also an author.
The capital is Montgomery and it has the highest population of any city.  I'm not sure how big it is though.
I'm not sure but I know they are the 3rd-largest country in the US.
I am not sure but they have a lot of natural gas, oil and gas industries. 
She was a great actress. I think she was in The Wizard Of Oz.
That is a good question. Henry Ford was the first man to marry.  He was also a lawyer.
It's Henry's 4th wife. He's the only man in my family that's been married for a while.
I am not sure.  I know that she's a great mother, though.  She's also a great mom.
Mount Everest is a mountain in Europe and Mount Katahdin in Africa
I am not sure but I know that Germany was the second-largest in the world after the US.
I think it was the U.S., but I'm not sure. I know it was a huge part of the war though.
I'm not sure about that. I was just talking about the United States. I just found out that the country is located in the southeastern region of the U.S.
Germany was the second largest country in the European Union and the fourth-largest country in America!
The first one came out in 1977 and I think they're going to make it a trilogy in 2029.
The original one came out on June 30, 1977 and was released in 1976.
I am not too sure but the original trilogy came out in 1977.  
I'm not sure what the first movie was but I know that it was made in 1977.
The original trilogy came out in 1977 and was the highest grossed Star Wars movie in the history of the franchise.
No, I'm not a big fan of Star wars. It's a shame because it has so many sequels.
I am not sure, but it was a very long time ago.  I think it was in 1996.
I don't know but I know it is the third-largest by area in the US.
I am not sure but I do know that there is a continent called the Americas. 
I don't know, but I know that they are all connected to the Americas. Do you?
I am not sure, but I do know that they are both in the southern Hemis region of the Americas.
Eastern Asia and North East Asia are both in the Eastern hemisphere.
Jason Bieber was born in December 1989. I am sure he is turning one soon.
I'm not sure but I know they are the highest volcanoes in the world!  
I'm not sure about the largest, but it's a huge one in the Southern United States.
I'm not sure but the largest one on earth is Mount Everest and it's pretty big.
I'm not sure, but there are a lot of volcanoes in the world that are very large.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's a volcanic island in the Panhandle of Hawaii.
Candace Parker was the quarterback for the Chicago Cardinals.  He was the best.
I think he's playing for the Chicago Blackhawks, but it's hard to find time.
I'm not sure, but he's been playing for a while.  He has won a bunch of awards.
He was drafted by the Washington Capitals.  He was pretty good at baseball too.
Candance Paker. They are a professional basketball team based in Philadelphia, Arizona.
He went to Barnethelville, Arkansas. It was a small city.
I don't remember his name. He was the president of the United States and he was a business man.
She was a beauty pageant champion. She was also a model and beauty queen.
Nelson Mandell is an American singer, songwriter, and author. He was born and raised in New York City.
It was Margaret Mitchell, and she was a very successful singer.
Yes, she's my second wife. We've been married for a year now. I've been together almost 10 years.
Mindelas was a Spanish name. It means "little armored one" in Spanish.
I'm not sure, but I do know the highest mountain is Mount Katahdin, which is in North Carolina.
It would be Mount Katahdin, I have always wanted to go there! 
I don't know, but I know that the largest mountain is Mount Katahdin.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the second most mountainous in the World.
I don't know, but I know they are located on the Eastern part of China.
I think it would have been Meredith Grey.  She was a pretty interesting character.
I am not sure but they are the first nation to be renowned in the US.
I don't know, they were there for the war.  I was just happy to see them.
I'm not really sure but I know that they were the first to colonize Vietnam
It is the Saint Feast Day. It's a celebrity festival held annually.
It was in 1979 and he was nominated for the Academy Award in 2009!
I'm not sure but I know his first win was in 2009.  He was a great actor.
Joseph Brahms was a Scottish singer.  He was a good singer and songwriter.
He was a great singer, songwriter, and producer. He was also a singer.
I don't remember the exact commander, but I know it was in 1948 when the war ended.
I'm not sure, but it was the longest continuous war between the United States and Canada
I'm not sure who the original Russian was but it was the first man to be sent to space.
The US president of the United States was the leader of the U.S. in the 19th century.
He was the president of the United States and the leader in the United Kingdom during World War 2.
I'm not sure, but it was the leader of the United States and the U.S. in the 1950's.
I don't think so. But I do know that Hitler was one of the most influential and powerful leaders of the German government.
I believe that it was in 1983, but I'm not sure. They are one of the most successful clubs in the world.
The first man that launched it was a rocket. It was launched by NASCAR.
I am not sure, but the ruler was the rulator of the world until the end of the 20th century
He was the ruling of the United States, and was the leader of the British Empire.
I am not sure, but the King James of England was the ruler.  He was the king of England.
I'm not sure but I do know he ruled the country until June of 1964.
I'm not sure, but it was the first ruling of the Empire. I know that it was pretty important to Britain.
The King of England, he's the ruler of Ireland and also the first ruler.
Kesha is a famous american singer and songwriter.   She is very talented.
I believe it was Bartolomeo Cristofori. He was president of the United States
It is.  It is located in the North Atlantic Ocean in the Caribbean
I'm not sure, but the first Hudson tribute was a long time ago. 
Yes, it was founded in 1811. I am not sure who discovered it though. 
It's a small island in the Caribbean, and it's been explored by the Greeks.
He died in 1997 at a young age in the United States. He was such a great driver.
I am not sure, but it seems to be the longest in South America.  I have never been to SA.
I'm not sure about that but I do know that the longest one is in Guatemala
I'm not sure, but I know that it's the longest continuous river in the world. 
No, I don't know. I just saw that it's the longest and most populous.
I don't know, but I know that the longest in South America is the Costan River.
I'm not sure, but I do know that in South America rivers vary widely in size, shape, color, and color.
I am not sure, but I know the US and South America are bordered by the Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure but it is the largest in the world.  Do you know the longest?
I'm not sure but it seems to be in the Atlantic Ocean. Do you know?
The longest is the Grand Canyon, which is about 2200 miles long. It's a long drive.
I don't know, but I do know there is an estimated population of 8,073,673.
The longest is the San Diego area. It is in the Pacific Ocean
I am not sure but I do know that it is the largest river in the world. 
I'm not sure about that. But I do know that the water is a river and lake
The longest is probably the Grand Canyon National Scenic Trail. It's a huge river.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the long river is a major part of South America.
Probably the Mississippi Gulf of Mexico. I have never been there. I am sure it would be a long river.
I'm not sure but there are a lot in the world, especially in Europe, Asia, Africa, and Australia.
I'm not sure, but I know that there is a lot of fishing in south america and central america.
I'm not sure of that but I do know that rivers are a long, vigorous body of water.
I'm not sure, but I know there is a big river nearby.  I love going to the beach.
I believe it was the longest in the world. I don't know how much longer though.
No, I have not been to South America yet. Do you know anything about the river? It is a river in the Caribbean.
I am not sure, but there were a lot of water pollution in the southwestern United States.
I am not sure but I do know that it is a mountainous region located in south america and the caribbean.
I'm not too sure about rivers, but I do know that they are the longest continuous water in the world.
I don't know but I do know that the longest of the rivers is the Mississippi River.
I'm not sure but it is the smallest and least populated. It's a small town.
I don't recall the name but the British actress was nominated at the Academy Award.
She was nominated at the Academy Award in 2001, but she didn't win.
I'm not sure but the British Actress was nominated by the Academy Award for Best Actress in the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know he was born and raised in Jacksonville, Mississippi, and was an American rapper.
Michelle Jackson was a famous American singer and songwriter and record producer.
Michaels Jackson was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and record producer for Sony.
Michaels Jackson was a great singer. He released his debut album in 1993
Michels Jackson is a great singer and songwriter from Jackson, Mississippi.
I have never been to Neapolitan, but I hear it's a nice place to visit.
It's around 5.5 cups of ice cream. It's a pretty small cup, I guess.
I don't know, but I am sure he went to the University of Tennessee.
I went to a UFC University in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.
He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii. He is a great driver.
He attended the University of Penn State, Pennsylvania.  He was also in the NFL.
He went to a private school in the US and I went to Princeton University.
He attended Columbia U of North Carolina University.  It's a very large university.
He was born on January 30, 1994, and he has been a very successful comedian.
Julian was born in 1948, he was a great American singer and songwriter!
He was born in 1948!   He was an American singer and songwriter.
She was born on August 30th, 1948, in New York City. 
She was born in New York, and she was born on August 30th, 1969
I'm not sure, but I know it was the most important state in the US in the 1800's.
He was born in New York City. He was a great American singer and songwriter.
He was a Christian.  He was born in 1883 and was born on March 26, 1968.
He was an American singer and songwriter.  He was a great songwright.
She was an actress, singer, and songwriter. It was pretty cool seeing her.
It was called "The Book of Souls".  It was released in 1991.  I love it!
Ronald Reagans was an American rapper, and he also was a businessman.
I don't know but it's a small country in the southeastern United States.
Germany is the most populous country and has the highest population of any country in the world.
That was Jeff Bezos.  He was a Republican.  I think he was a great candidate, but I don't remember his name.
That was a British columbian governor.  He was the first one to be elected in the United States.
I'm not sure. But I do know that it is a federal government in Washington D.C.
Mexico is one of the most beautiful countries in my opinion.  It's the largest state in the contiguous United States.
I am not sure but I do know that California is a US state bordered by the Pacific Ocean, the Atlantic and the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure, but i do know it's the longest contiguous coastline in the world!
California is a bordered state between the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
The most populous state in the United States.  I've heard it's a beautiful place.
I'm not sure, but I do know it's Mexico's capital, El Paso.
I am from the Gulf of Mexico.  It is a gulf of the Atlantic and the Pacific Ocean.
I am not sure. It is hard to believe that they have been married since the early 19th century.
His name is jason and we're going to see him in concert in a few weeks!
I don't know his name, but he is a champion.  He has won a few competitions.
His name is Kane, and his name is Brandon.  I'm not sure if he likes it.
She's an American singer and songwriter. I think she's pretty good. She's married too!
She's a famous singer, songwriter and singer. She has a very successful singer and songwright.
I'm not sure but they were inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in 1993.
Lewis Carrolls was a great driver in the 60s.  He was the fastest in the US.
I don't remember the name, but I know they were the first American rapper to be in a major commercial and television show.
Lewis Carrol was the oldest of five brothers, he was the youngest.
Lewis Carrol is an American rapper and singer.  I have no idea why he would do that.
Lewis Caroll was an American rapper, songwriter, actor, actor.
I'm not too sure, but I know that he played in the NFL for several years. 
Lewis Caroll.  He was a famous rapper.  I don't remember the name, though.
Lewis Carroll was an American rapper who died in 1978.  He had a great voice.
Leonardo DiCaprio, he was a famous rapper. He was born in 1883.
Lewis Carrolls was an American actress and dancer and singer and songwriter.
He was a famous actor and singer. His first album was called "Lewis Carrol" in 1997.
He was the one who was the best driver of all time. I'm not sure what happened to him.
I think it was my grandparents, but I didn't know it was his brother.  
I don't know, but he was so nice to her. She was a great driver! 
I'm not sure. But they have been in some big cities for a long time.  
I'm not sure but i know he was the youngest and the oldest of five brothers
I think he was a famous singer.  I don't know who he was.  It is a shame he passed away.
I don't know.  I was just looking at the numbers on the radio.  They must be very good.
He's an American rapper and actor, and was born and raised in Dearborn, Michigan.
I am not sure.  He was in prison.  I think he was just a regular guy.
Hayden Berry was a very talented actor and songwriter in the United States.
Halloween was the only one.  It is one of the most popular holidays in the world.
Hitchhiker is a great american singer, actor, and dancer!
Halle Berry, who was the best American singer in the history of the United States
I am not exactly sure but I know he was a prominent political figure in the United States and Canada.
I'm not sure but he was a Republican and went to Harvard. He was also a businessman.
I think it was 2001, but I don't know. I'm not sure if he graduated from Harvard.
Obama graduated from Harvard Law School, in 2009.  Obama received a Bachelor's in 2001.
Her real name is Jessica.  She was born on August 1957.
Her name is Emma, she was an actress and singer and songwriter
Her name is Elvis.  She's a great singer.  What about you?  Do you like her?
Oliver Smith is the name of the American singer, songwriter and actor. 
Her name is Jennifer. It's a very nice name, it's a Spanish fashion designer.
He was an American singer and songwriter, I think he was pretty good at it
I don't know. I know he was an American artist who lived in New York City for a couple of years.
He was a famous artist. He is one of the most famous artists of all time.  He was born in 1983.
I don't remember but I know that he was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
He was an American painter and he was an English painter.  I don't know what his name was. 
It was a period of contemporary arts in France during the French and Indian War.
He's a Scottish sculptor, he used to do a lot of sculpting.
He was an American painter and sculptor. He was a great artist.  
I am not sure but I know that the Catherine Hendrix was born on August 30, 1903.
Henry Viii is one of the most influential and influential people of the 19th century.
My dad is the CEO of the Casars. He's been around for a long time.
I don't know. They were just a few small, furry, carnivorous mammals.
I'm not sure, but he was a prominent businessman, and was elected as president in the US in 2001.
He was born in the 1980s. He was one of the most influential people alive.
It was a small island in the Caribbean that was owned by the King of Indonesia
He attended Columbia University of North Carolina.  He had to drop out to go study for his studies.
I'm not sure, but he was a very famous person.  He was the head of the University of Tennessee.
The last time I went to Europe, I saw an Easter bunny. He was so cute.
The Mount Katahdin is one of the biggest mountain in Europe.   
I would have to say the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  It's the longest mountain in the world.
It is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. It runs up to Georgia, Maine, and New Zealand.
He's the 45th president of the united states.  He's been president since January 2017.
I don't know, but I do know that it has been a while since he was president.
It is a small office in London, England. It is located at the corner of Dearborn, North Carolina.
It's on the island of Panama City in the Caribbean, Florida. I've been meaning to check it out.
It's a local store, but it's not in Canada.  I don't know what it is.
I'm not sure but it has a huge corporate headquarters.  I was so surprised.
It's a large company in Los Angeles. The company is based out of Los angeles.
It's in the UK. It's a great company. It was founded in 1903.
They have a huge headquarters in Dearborn, Michigan. It's a huge company.
It's in Manhattan, NY. It's the biggest retailer in the world. 
Elvis Presley is the founder of the band. He was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
Elvis was the best Elvis Presley of all time! He was a great artist and songwriter.
It's an airport that's located in the capital of Sydney, Victoria!
The Sydney International Airport.  It is a very large airport with a large international headquarters.
I'm not sure. I know they have a lot of airports in the world though.
I'm not sure but it's not a big state, only one of the 50 states in the US.
I am not too sure about that, but it seems like a good question. What state is that?
I'm not sure, but I do know that the Atlanta Braves is the only franchise to have won three World Series titles.
I'm not exactly sure but the state is the 3rd largest state in the U.S.
I'm not sure. But I know that there are more than seven states in the U.S.
Yes, there are more than seventy professional baseball teams in the United States. What state does yours play in?
I'm not sure, but I'm sure there's at least two in the US. Do you have any?
I'm not sure. I don't know who was.  I was just glad that I didn't have to deal with it.
I think it was my ex-wife and I was dating her.  It was a long time ago though.
Jacob is a famous singer, he was born in 1968, so he was quite old.
Jacob was a famous American rapper. He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
Jacob was a famous singer, songwriter and actor. He is also in the band The Kinks.
Jacob was a famous American singer, songwriter, and actor. He was also a dancer.
I am not sure who they were but I know that he was an accomplished actor and singer
I'm not sure, but it was a long time ago.  He was the youngest of 4.
I'm not sure but I know that it's a small country in the southernmost region of France.
The highest point in France is the Eiffel Tower. I have been up there a few times.
Owen Harts is an American singer and songwriter, actor. I think he was pretty good.
Owen Harts the American singer, songwriter, and actor.  
Owen Harts is the American singer and songwriter. He was born and raised in New York.
Owen Harrts was an English singer, songwriter and producer.
He's an American singer-songwriter. He's pretty good, too.
He's a famous American singer-songwriter. He's been around since 1985.
She died in 2009. She's one of the most influential women in the history of the U.S.
I'm not sure. It was a long time ago, but it's a good question. He was a great driver.
He was born and raised in the late 1800s. He was a great man.  
I am not sure but he was the ruling of Saudi Arabia and is the founder of the Arabs.
It is the capital and largest urban area of the country. It is located in the southeastern region of China.
It's a small island off the Gulf of Mexico in the Pacific Ocean. It is really beautiful.
I think it's Cebu.  It's the most populous city in Puerto Rico.
I'm not sure of that but I do know that the U.S. is the only country that has a population of over 800,000.
New York City, and we have a lot of people.  I was just talking to some friends.
I'm not sure, but I know that he's been a great actor since the 1960s.
That is a good question. I think the first one was Michelle Obama. She climbed Mount Everest.
No, but I have heard of the Indian women climbing Mount Everest.  They must be really tall.
I'm not sure but I do know that it's one of the top rivers in the world.
Jessica Alba is a great dancer. She's been a star in several movies.
I don't remember, but it was a dance competition.  I think she was a good dancer!
Jessica Alba's first album was released in 1977.  I love her.  What about you?
She was a great dancer.  She was nominated for six academy awards. 
The US President, Jefferson Elvis Presley, and Billie Jean Hartman.
I'm not sure, but I know they're the officials of the U.S. and they're a member of the United States.
I am not sure, but it is the 38th largest state by population and it is located in the southern part of the United States.
I'm not sure but it seems that it is the largest state in the united states. 
They're elected officials.  They have been around since the midwest, but I think it's been a while since they were elected.
The representatives are elected officials of the United States.  They are elected to represent the state.
I'm not sure, but the state is the 3rd-largest in the US.
I am not sure but it is in california. It is the most populated in the US
I'm not too sure but I know that the California government is located in San Diego
The California State Department of Congress is one of the oldest federal government in the U.S.
I'm not sure.  I just know that it was the 8th most populous state in 1958.
Yes, it was the first president of the United States and the most populous state in the US.
I am not sure, but it seems to be the biggest state in the US.  I think it is the 8th most densely populated.
I'm not really sure, but they are the largest state in the U.S. with a population of 94,700.
I don't really know. But I do know that California has been ranked the most densely populated state in the US.
The house of the US, California is one of the most densely populated states in the United States
I'm not sure but I am not surprised.  California is the 8th largest state by land area.
Yes.  They are the rulers of the United States.  Do you live in California?
Yes! California is the capital and home of the US and I love it here. What do you think?
That is a great question. I am not sure, but California is the 4th most densely populated of the US.
The US is the largest state in the United States, and the most densely populated country in the world
Yes, it is the most densely populated state in the United States.  It has the highest GDP in the US.
Stephenie McManon is Stephanie Mccarty, she is my mom's stepmother
Stephanie Mcmanon.  She's a singer, songwriter, and producer.
Stephanie Mcmanon, Stephan Elmer Doolin, and Jason Strawberry.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the 8th most populous US state in the U.S.
That would be Johnny G. He was born on August 30, 1948.
Dan Radcliffe is a great American singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.
Her name is Sara. Her real name is Elizabeth and she's a very famous fashion designer.
Her real name is Elizabeth Bentley. She's a famous singer/songwriter.
I don't know, but I know it was the president of the United States in 1903.
No, but he was the CEO of Pepsi and the founder of the United States.
I'm not sure but I know it's the world's oldest president of the country. 
The first president is Donald J Jr. He is the first president of the U.S.
I am not sure, but my favorite is Michelle Obama.  She was the first female president of the United States.
The current Senator is a former president of Hawaii and the current president is Jodhi May
The current Senator is Donald J. Kennedy of Hawaii. He is an American politician.
No, they're all retired.  I'm not sure if they still live in Hawaii. 
Yeah they're the Senators of Hawaii.  It's a great place to live.
I'm not sure. But I do know that they have been in politics since 1948.
I'm not sure but I know that it is one of the oldest and largest state in the US
I am not sure who they are but they are a state in the Pacific Ocean.
Hawaii is a US state located in the Pacific Ocean, and the capital is Konaonahas.
Yes! I am so excited to see what is happening! I can't wait to see them!
I am not sure if they are the current Senators, but I am sure they are very influential.
She's a famous actress. She's also a singer, songwriter, and singer.
His name is Joseph. He was born and raised in Chattanooga, Tennessek.
It was a former president of Alaska. I was really upset when I saw it happen.
She was in "The Forest Boy" and "She's a great dancer."
he was in "She was an American singer, songwriter, producer and actor
Bonnie Wright was in "Bon I Wright" and "The Bird" in 2008.
he was in the godfather and he was the greatest actor in the history of movies. 
Bonnie Wright was in the 1980s, he was a very good actor.
Bon Wright is an American singer and songwriter. He was great. 
Bonnie Wright was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
Bonnie Wright was one of the best actors in Hollywood and was a great dancer.
He was in a comedy film called Bonnie Wright.  It was so funny.
He was in a movie called The Number of the Beast.  I loved it. 
Bonnie Wright was an american actor, singer, actor, songwriter, and producer.
He starred in the 1974 film "Bonnie Wright", which was nominated for a Academy Award.
Bonnie Wright was a famous American actor who starred in the 1980s. 
He starred in Psycho.  He was also in the TV show The Video Game.
He was a great actor.  He was the lead role in the original Scooby Doo movie.
Bonnie Wright starred in a musical. I think it's called "Bonnie Dog Day".
Bonnie Wright starred in "The Birds" which was a great movie.
Bonnie Wright was in a lot of horror movies, but I'm not sure of any of them.
Bonnie Wright starred in "The Witch" which was the best movie ever made.
Bonnie Wright starred in a musical called Bon I Wright. It was a very good one.
He starred in "The Bonnie" in 1974. He was a great actor.
He was an American singer, songwriter, producer, actor, and singer.
Bon Wright is one of my favorite actors. What's your favorite Bonie Wright movie?
Bon Wright was a great actor.  He was in a movie called "Bon I Wright" which stars Bonie Wright.
Bonnie Wright is a great actress. I think she was in the first one.
Bonnie Wright is a great actor. He played in The Godfather. 
Bonnie Wright is an American singer-songwriter.  She's very successful.
I don't remember, but I do know it was a horror movie.  It was pretty scary.
Bonnie Wright was great. She was a great dancer and actress. 
I am not sure if Bonnie Wright was a singer or songwriter but she was a dancer.
Bonnie Wright plays in the Godfather 2. I love the old days. 
Bonnie Wright was in a horror film, I think it was the worst one.
Bonnie Wright is the greatest American singer and songwriter. He is a legend!
He starred in "The Frozen Dawn" which came out in 1979.
Bonnie Wright is a great American actress, singer, and songwriter. 
Bonnie Wright is in a lot of good roles, including Scorpions, The Godfather, and Psycho.
He was born on August 31, 1984. He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
Born and raised on the streets of New York City, New York. I don't think I've seen any other movies with him.
I'm not sure. But I do know Bonnie Wright is an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
He's been in a lot of good roles, especially in the Hayden Planetarium.
Bonnie Wright was an American singer-songwriter. He was also in The Wizard of Oz.
Bonnie Wright was the only American actor to be nominated for an Academy Award in the 1980s.
Bonnie Wig is a very good actor. He was born and raised in New York City.
Bonnie Wright was the best known actor for her role.  She was a great actress and dancer.
Bonnie Wright was a very good actor in the 1990 film Bonnie.
Bonnie Wright starred in "The Godfather" in 1977.  It was pretty good.
The 1980 American epic epic romance film starred Bonnie Wright.  Have you seen it?
Bonny Wright was an American singer, songwriter, actor, producer, and author.
Bonnie Wright was a great actor.  He did an amazing job.  
I am not really sure of the film but I know that it is an action adventure film directed by James Stewart.
He was an American actor and singer-songwriter who played the guitar in The Beast
Bonnie Wright was born in 1953 and was a famous actress, singer, and dancer.
Bonnie wight was an American singer-songwriter who starred in "Speaker of the Lambs".
Bonnie Wright is an American singer and songwriter. He was born in New York.
Bonnie Wright was an American film producer who was a starring Gene Roddenberry and Jodhi May.
He was born in 1853, so I guess that was before he was 18 years old.
George was born on August 30, 1943, and he was born in the United States.
Steve Winswood was an American heavy metal band formed in Los Angeles.  
I think it was the Beatles. I remember hearing they were formed in Liverpool in 1961.
I'm not sure but I know it is a very expensive school. It's ranked the most expensive in the United States.
It is the largest private college in the state of New York.  I am not sure how many students go there though.
Marilyn Monroe was a famous American actress, singer, songwriter and dancer.
Marilyn Monroe was an American American poet and songwriter. She was also a fashion designer.
Marilyn Monroe was an American actress and singer, songwriter, and author.
Monroe Wentz is an American singer, songwriter and actor.  She's been in some great musicals.
My wife. She was my best friend. I had been together since high school. She had been married for 3 years.
Monroe was the one who got married. I am sorry. I was so upset about it.
I'm not really sure, it's been a while.  I know it's a long season though.
Marie Curie was a famous singer. She was a singer and songwriter.
Marie Curie is an American singer and songwriter.  She is quite talented.
Marie Curie was an american singer and songwriter from london. 
She was an American singer and songwriter who was a singer in the 80s.
That's terrible! I hope you didn't see any of it happen. What did you do?
She is a famous American singer, songwriter and dancer.  She's a great artist!
Her name is Kate.  She's my favorite singer.  Do you like music?
Nikki Manji is the name of the famous singer.  I love her.  
Her name is Sara.  She is a great mom.  I love her.  Do you have any pets?
Her name is Sarah and I love her! She's my favorite singer and songwriter
Niki Manning is a famous actress and singer. She's also the daughter of Ruth Handler.
Nick manajas is an american singer, songwriter, and producer.
I don't know, but it seems like she was born in Italy and she is a great dancer.
I am not sure but I know she is an american singer-songwriter.
His real name is Nicki. I'm so jealous! He was born and raised in Nashville, Tennessee.
I'm not sure, but I know that she was born in the United States and was raised in Italy.
I have no idea what that means but I do know that they're an English fashion designer, singer, and songwriter.
Yes. I was surprised to find out she was an actress, singer, and dancer.
I don't think it was the first one. But it was in the US during the Civil War
I don't remember, but he was a very good pitcher. He was also the best.
No, he was not. He was born in Birmingham, England. His real name was Joseph.
I'm not sure but I do know that the Hudson Bay is the longest and largest island in the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure. But I know the first people to go to the moon was the Apollo.
I'm not sure but I can tell you that we have been going since the 1960s. 
It's been a while, I don't remember the exact date, but I think he lived in the Caribbean.
Her name is Sara.  She's a wonderful woman.  I hope she gets her own name soon!
obama, the american rapper, was born in america and was a woman named obama
It is called the Memphis area.  I have never been there.  Do you like it?
I'm not sure what the country code is.  But, I know it is a small country in the Caribbean.
It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea, which is the smallest island in America.
Yes, there are more than 800 residents in the state Santa Cruz. That is crazy!
It is the 3rd-largest urban area in the US. I'm not sure but it is a pretty big city.
Yes, it is the most populous city in the United States. It's in the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure but it's a major city in the US.  Do you know anyone who lives there?
I'm not sure. I think it is coming out in 2019. I can't believe he's that old.
He was in the 1960s, he was the captain of the Atlanta Braves.
He was born in the late 1980s in Italy and moved to the UK in 1903.
The earliest was in 1958, so I'm not exactly sure when it was born.
I am not sure but he was one of the founders of the University of Michigan.
I'm not sure, but I do know it is one of the most prestigious universities in the world!
Yes, it's an American book written by Douglas Adams.  Have you ever read it?
Yes, he was one of the most famous children's authors in the world.  He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I think it was "The Snow Queen".  It was a very good one.  I loved it!
It was a children's book. I think it was "The Snow Queen" but I can't remember the title.
I am not sure, but it is one of my favorite books by Joseph heller.
I believe its a book by William H. Shatner. It's a children's book.
She is an American singer, songwriter and actress who has sold over 40 million records worldwide.
I am not sure, but I do know that the first woman was in office of the United States.
Bill Clinton ran for president of the United States, he was a former U.S. President of the US.
Bill Clinton was the US president of the United States and was elected president of U.S.
Bill Clinton was the US President of the United States of America, and he was the president of the U.S. in 2001.
I am not really sure, but I know that he was elected for the US president of the United States
I'm not sure, but I think he's going back to Spain.  He's the best.
No, I don't think that was a good one, but I love John Wayne. He's such a great actor.
Obama received a Bachelor's Average in US.  I am proud of him.
I don't know, but Obama is very smart.  He has done a lot for the school.
I have never been to a college. I have been to the University of Pennsylvania.
I don't remember, but I know Katheryn Bates was one of the most popular actors in the US and was nominated for five Academy Awards.
I don't know, but she's a great actress! I'm not sure if she was in anything other than The Godfather though.
I'm not sure but he has been playing the piano since he was a little kid.
The school of the University of Pennsylvania.  I went to Penn State University and I loved it.
He was born and raised in Pennsylvania. He was an American singer and songwriter.
I don't know.  I do know he was born on August 30, 1948, and was an American rapper.
He was an American singer and songwriter.  He was a great artist.  
He was born on August 30, 1903! He was one of the most influential people of all time.
I don't remember his name but it was a romantic comedy starring Julie Aniston.
Julie was born on August 1884.  She was a great singer
I'm not sure, but I do know the Arias are from the southwestern part of America.
Yes, he is.  He is also an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
It is a college fund fund for the school I attend. It was funded by my grandparents.
No, he is an American actor from Los Angeles, California. He was born on June 18, 1948.
I don't know when it came out but the company was founded back in 1971. 
The first one came out in 1961.  It was released for the Nintendo Switch.
I think it was released on June 30, 1968.  That was back then.
It was filmed in a small town called Pennsylvania.  I thought it would be cool to see.
Oh wow that's awesome.  What did you name her?  My daughters name is Meghan.  Do you have any kids?
I am not entirely sure but I know the Atlantic Ocean is the longest and most powerful sea in the world.
The Atlantic Sea is the main one. I'm going to visit there in a few months.
I don't know, but it is a country in Africa that was formed in 1858
It is the 8th-largest country in the US. The third-most densely populated in the world.
It is the 3rd-largest state in the world. It is also the 8th most densely populated.
It is in Belgium, the capital and most populous city. I was there last summer.
It is the seat of Bavaria.  It is in the southeastern region of the world.
It is a major portland metropolitan area in the southeastern part of europe,
Belgium and it is also the capital and largest city of the EU.  It's also the most densely populated metropolitan area in the world.
I don't know but I do know the quote has been around since at least 1963. I was surprised to find it.
I don't know, but I do know it is one of the highest quoted quotes in the history of English.
I'm not sure, but I do know it was the best quote I've ever heard from her.
I don't know, but I'm sure he's not a very good author. He is a great author though!
I'm not sure. I know it was a christian monotheistic religion based in the early 20th century.
I am not sure who was.  I think it was Ruth Handler.  She was pretty good at it.
I am not sure, but I do know that women have been running for a long time. It must be a pretty tough sport.
I'm not sure.  I know they were in the British Isles and I think it was France. 
It was the second most violent war in the world. I'm not sure how many people there were.
I'm not sure which country, but I know that the UK was involved in it, and that's why it was so devastating.
I believe he was born in Hawaii, but he was raised in New Orleans, I believe.
He was born in Memphis Tennessee. I was surprised he lived in Kansas.
New Jersey.  The state's capital is Manhattan, but I don't live there.
I'm not sure, but I do know that Africa is the largest country in Africa by area.
Johnson was the US president of the United States. He was a great politician.  What about you?
I don't know who won, but I know that he is the 45th president of the United States.
Yes, Bahra is the capital of Bahrain. Do you know much about it?
Dave Pelzer was born on August 1953, he is a Scottish comedian.
Dave Pelzer is one my favorite singer. He was born in 1887.
She was an English singer. She was a great singer, songwriter, and dancer.
I think it was the Saudi Arabia. It was a long time ago but I was so happy to see it.
I don't remember the exact numbers but it was a long battle between the Gulf of Azeroth and the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure but I do know it was in the middle of the Arabian Renaissance.
I am not sure but it was a very long battle between Arabs and the Hellenic empire.
They had a war between the Upper Paleolithic period and the Aztec empire
I don't know but I do know it's the 3rd largest country in the world. It was also the first state to become independent in 1968.
Israel gained control of the Kingdom of Israel in 1961 and the United States. 
The Arkansas, and it's the second-largest country in the world.
I am not exactly sure, but they were in the Kingdom of Azeroth and Arkansas
I'm not sure but I know that they were attacked by the Gulf of Saudi Arabia.
I don't know, I'm not sure.  I know that it was a long war. 
Israel is located in the Gulf of Azeroth, the largest island in the Arctic sea.
I'm not sure but it was a huge war.  It was a very important part of history.
I'm not sure, but it's not surprising considering it was a war between the United States and Israel.
It is the Arabian Sea in the Arctic Sea and the Ark of Greece
I am not sure but I can tell you that the Army is the biggest army in the world.
I don't know, but they were occupied in 1978 by the Army and the British
Israel is the second most populous country in the world and the 3rd most sparsely populated in the US.
It is a sovereign state in the United States that was established as the second-largest country in the world.
I am not sure but it is a sovereign state in the middle of the August of 1897
I don't remember the last one, but I know the movie was nominated for Best Actress awards in 2007.
He was born in 1947 and was born on June 24, 1946. 
Edward Wife is a great singer-songwriter and songwriters.
He was 57 years old. He was also a former president of the United States.  
I don't know. But I do know that there were some scientific questions to ask. 
I am not sure, but it's a small island in the middle of the Gulf of Mexico
The first monkeys to be sent to space was from the Apocalyptus in the early 1960s.
I'm not sure but it was very exciting! I was so shocked and happy when he came back!
I'm not sure but I do know it was the first species ever to be discovered in Africa
That's a good question. I'm not sure. I know that it's been sent to the U.S. since the 1960s.
I'm not sure but I know that there is a huge resort in Arizon.
I'm not exactly sure, but I do know that it is the worlds largest employer by revenue, with over 2.5 million employees.
I am not certain, but I know it has a large corporate headquarters in Dallas.
The company is headquartered in Dearborn, Michigan.  It's a pretty big company.
That's a tough one. Probably the Walt Disney Company, though I'm not sure.
Yes, it is. It is a big company in the US that is headquartered in Dearborn, Maryland.
It was "Love Me Do" and it won a Grammy Award for Best Alternative Album.
I don't really know the exact title, but it was a number one song in the US.
I'm not sure, but I know they were nominated for a grammy award.
It was the "Sugar" which was released in 1997. I think it was the best one.
I am not sure but it was nominated for the Best Rock award at the Grammy Awards
I'm not sure, but it was a very long time ago.  I remember watching it on NBC.  Do you like Ed Sullivan?
It is the 11th largest state by population, but it is also the 3rd largest by area.
The state is in the southeastern region of the United States. I don't really know what it's called.
She was a dehydrated malnutrition victim.  I was really upset.
I'm not sure. I think she was just a very old lady. I'm so sorry for her.
Henk Jr is a nick name for Jr. It's an Italian name.
I think the Manchester United are the most successful club in the world. They are the best
The Liverpool Manchester United. They are my favorite team and they are one of the most successful clubs in the world.
sean ferraris birthday is the 21st anniversary of june 17th 1978
Sean Faris birthday is the anniversary of the birth of June 25, 1949.
Yes he was, he was a great artist. He was born in 1984 and was a Scottish-American.
He was a famous painter, he did a lot of sculpture and painting.
He was an American rapper.  I didn't know he was born on December 1886.
The first book was "Twilight".  That was in 1991.  It came out in 1997.
It is "The Book of Souls". I've never read it, but it sounds interesting. 
It is called "The Bella's" and it's set in a vampire world.
The Twilight Vampire series is the third book. It was released in 1997.
The Twilight Series is a Stephen King fantasy novel.  I haven't read it yet. 
I'm not sure but I know that it was one of the most important and influential military units in the world during the war.
I'm not really sure, but it's sad to know he passed.  He was one of the most influential people of all time.
I think it was the Atlanta Georgia Giants.  I am not sure what the first stadium was though.
I'm not sure, but I know it is a large island in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.
Bulgaria.  I'm really looking forward to it.  It's the largest country in the world.
Bujumbur, the capital of Japan. It has the largest metropolitan area in the world.
I'm not too sure, but it's a country in the Middle East and Africa.
Bujumbu is an island country in the Caribbean Sea. It is beautiful!
I'm not sure, but I know it was written by Jacob Price and it was a long time ago.
I am not sure, but I know that he is an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
It ranges from Appalachia to Maine, and the Appalacian National Scenic Trail.
I am not sure, but I know the area is the 4th-largest area in the state.
The mountains range from the Appalachian National Scenic Trail to the Georgia and the Rocky Mountains.
I think it is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail in the United States
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  It goes from Georgia to Maine.
Its a mountain range in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  
Manchester United United was founded back in 1892. It is one of the biggest clubs in the world.
He had a stroke, but it was a while ago. I'm glad he survived.
I am not sure. I think it was a car accident. But the car was totaled.
A man named Jacob Burnett who was elected president of Tamiladu.
Tamiladu is the president of the United States. He is the head of Tamily.
The Chief of Tamiladu is one of the largest municipal governments in the world.
The current Tamiladu is a former president of Tamily. He's been around a long time.
That was a great year. The best actors were Daniel Day-Lewis, Jodhi May, and Madeleine Stowe.
She was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress in 1998. I'm pretty sure she did well.
I think so too, she was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress in the United States.
I don't know, but I do know that it was won by an Academy Award for Best Actress in the United States.
I'm not sure, but the Oscar was awarded for Best Actors Award in 1975
Yes! She is one of the biggest and most accomplished actresses of all time. She was nominated for four Academy Awards.
I think so, she was a very talented actress and dancer.  I think she was great!
They are from Bengal, and they speak Arabic, Chinese, Russian, and Russian.
They speak a variety of languages, from english to spanish, english, and french.  
I don't know but the series is so good.  It's based on JK Rowling's books.  Have you read them?
I don't know but I know it is in the southeastern region of the United States.
He was a former president of the United States of America. He was elected on March 28, 2017.
I don't know but he was a quarterback for the University of Pennsylvania.
He was born in August of 1968. He is the quarterback of the University of Tennessee.
The University of Miami is in Florida.  It's a very prestigious school.
It is a school of the Miami Dade.  I am not sure what school it is.
I believe it is a University of Miami, Florida.  I am not sure what the school is, but it is one of the most prestigious schools in the world.
It is a postal service, but I don't know what is in it.  Do you know? 
It's a program for people who are not good at hand writing. I'm just not very good at it
janet was a female name that means janette and was born in australia.
I don't remember his name, but he was an actor.  His name was Madeleine Stowe.
Her name was Jane, and I was so happy to see her!  She was so cute!
I don't think he was his first husband. I know his wife died in a plane crash though.
Janet Jacon was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
Janet Jacksons First husband is an American singer and songwriter and author.
Janet Jackson. She is a famous fashion designer. She has been very successful.
I'm not sure, but I know she was a nurturing mother. She was a great mother.
He worked in a law office for the state's law firm. I don't know what you mean by "Martin Luther King Jr."
His first wife was named Mittens, after the comedy sketch by Gene Roddenberry.
Dr. Seuss was a great man.  He was also a great author.  What was the name of your wife?
Dr. Seuss was an American poet and a novelist.  She was a great author
Dr. Seuss has a daughter who is a child.  Her name is Bertie.
No, I don't think that was my first wife. I was shocked at the time though.
It was Sussell.  I was so shocked when he said he was going to propose to me.  
Reginea Carter is a small island in the Caribbean Sea.  It is beautiful.
Louis Armstrong was the founder of the Louis Vuitton Company.
Louis Armstrong was a great American rapper. He was one of the founders of the Public Entertainment.
Louis Armstrong was the greatest American singer, songwriter, and producer
Louis Armstrong was an American singer and songwriter.  He's a pretty famous actor.
They got married on August 30th, 1973. They have been married for over 20 years now.
I don't remember, but he was born and raised in the south. He was very popular in the United States.
No, I don't remember which episodes, but I know she was on the show "The Good Planet" in 2009.
I am not sure but I know that was a great show.  I love the show. Do you like Prison Break?
She was a famous actress. She had an interesting role on The Biggest Loser.
Yes, he was in a few of them. He was on the show "Jeopardy".
I don't know, but i know Iceland is a Nordic and European country located near the Atlantic Ocean.
It's a small island in the northwestern Atlantic Ocean. It's really pretty.
They are an island country located in the north Atlantic Ocean. It's beautiful there!
I don't know but I do know that the area was set to be spaced by the Southern U.S. during the Civil War.
He was a coach for the Atlanta Braves.  He was also a great coach. 
He's from Dallas, Texas. His wife and I are going to Disneyworld in August! I can't wait!
I'm not sure, but he's been around a long time.  He's been a good actor and singer.
I don't know, but they were the first English colonies to win the Tudor Kings. 
I don't know, but I know he was the ruler.  He was a great guy!
I don't remember.  I know it was the UK's last Tudor though.  It was the winner.
I don't know, but I think it's the University of Michigan State's football team.
I am not really sure, but the heisen is one of the best quarterbacks of all time.
I believe it was Michael Jordan. He was also one of the best QBs in the NFL.
I believe it was Michael Jackson. He was also an American Formula 1 quarterback for Michigan. 
I don't remember, but he is a very successful man.  He was a very important figure in the Middle East.
Louisianas. It is a small state in the southeastern region of the United States.
Louisianas is a large state in the southeastern region of the united states
I don't really know, but it's a state that's bordered to the Mississippi River and the Gulf of Mexico.
I am not sure, but I do know that it's the second-largest and most densely populated planet in the Solar System.
I'm not sure, but I'm sure it's very large, and I can't imagine the size of it. 
It's a small planet in the middle of the solar eclipse.  I'm not sure about the exact density.
It is a large and sparsely populated area, but it is still very sparce.
The density of the planet itself is about 4.4 million kilometers. It's pretty cool to think about.
I am not sure exactly. The closest to a densely populated planet is the sun.
The density of planets vary greatly from the size of the planet.  It's a lot smaller than the average planet.
It is a small island country in the southeastern region of the Gulf of Mexico
I believe it is the largest of the four major nations in Saudi Arabia. 
Saudi Arabia is a large country, with a population of over 6,5 million people
I am not sure, but I know they are the largest Muslim country in Saudi Arabia.
About 6,700 people. It is the third-largest country in the world.
No, I was thinking about going to Kazakhstan, the capital of Saudi Arabia.
It's a country in the Saudi Arabian peninsula. It's really nice there.
I'm not sure, but I do know he was born in 1983, so he must be a really old.
Jason Derulo is a great American singer, songwriter, actor, and dancer
I am not sure where Leif Erics was born but I do know that she lived in New York.
It is located in Northern Europe in the North Atlantic region of the Atlantic Ocean
She was born in Canada and she's my favorite singer. She was a singer and songwriter.
I am not sure but I do know that the indians are one of the most successful in the world
I'm not sure, but I know that the Indian Oscar Awards have been held since 2007.  It's been a while.
No. I am an American citizen. But he did win the Indian Oscar Achievement award at the same time.
I don't know but the Oscar Awards are held in Indonesia and Canada.
I believe it was Leonardo DiCaprio, but I don't remember the name.
I'm not sure but they won the awards for Best Best Picture at the 1997 Oscar Awards.
It is Spanish. It is the second most sparsely populated country in the world.
Her second wife was named Elizabeth. It was a long time ago, but I remember her very well.
Henry Ford was my favorite. He was also the founder and owner of Ford.
Henry Ford was the first American producer to be inducted into the United States.
Henry Ford is an american carpenter and he is also the father of the company
Blue, I love the color blue. It is one of the primary colors in the color spectrum.
Yes, he was born on March 2, 1947.  He was also the best-selling author of science fiction.
I don't know, but I know he was a very influential figure in the early 20th century.
I don't know but the country is bordered by the Atlantic ocean, the Gulf of Mexico and the Pacific Ocean.
I am not sure but it seems to be the 4th most densely populated in the US
The largest one is the United States of America, and the 4th smallest in the world.
I'm not sure but they are the 3rd most densely populated in the world. 
Montana is the capital, and the most sparsely populated state in the US, which is Montana.
The US is the smallest.  It was founded by James Madison in 1845.
I am not sure, but I do know that the US is the 4th-largest country in the world by area.
I am not sure, but I know that the US is the 3rd-largest country in the US.
I'm not sure but I know the US is the third-largest country in Europe.
I am not sure when he was born, but I do know he is a great driver!  He has been on the road since 1962.
John Cabot died in 1985. He was a great driver! He was so brave.
John Cabot is my favorite singer! I was so happy when they released their album "The Number of the Beast" in 2009.
I'm not sure but I know Alaska was the first territory to be colonized by the United States.
Alaska is my favorite place in the world.  It is located on the Atlantic Ocean.
Denzel won Best Actors award for Best Actor in the world in 1998.
Denzel is an American film director. He won the Academy Award for Best Actor Away.
The US, Canada, U.S. and Australia.  It's crazy that they are all over the world.
The United States is the third largest country in the world and the third-largest in the EU.
The U.S. is the 3rd most sparsely populated country in the world! 
They're the United States Arkansas, United States, Canada, and the United Kingdom.
I don't know. Who is your favorite singer? I like Kurt Hurley.
I don't know, but I know it was a long time ago.  The president was a Republican.
I'm not sure who the president was. It was just a general election in the United States.
He was the President of the U.S. and was elected on January 20, 1945
I don't think he's the president, but he is a member of the U.S.
I think it was Jeff Beatles, he was the first president of the United States.
I don't remember, but it was a long time ago.  He was a very successful business man.
Her name is Jennifer, she's a famous actress and singer.  I love her.
The smallest state in the U.S. is New Jersey.  It is a small island in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the 8th smallest and most densely populated state in America.
I think it will be next week. It's been a while since I had it. Do you like Bionicle?
The Bionicle Saga came out in 2001 and it was a sequel to the bible
I think he was born in 1884.  He was an English poet and author.
The Atlantic Ocean is a huge part of Africa.  It is the second-largest continuous land mass in the world.
Atlantic Ocean is the only ocean I've been to. It's a beautiful place.
I don't know but I am sure it would be someplace like the Atlantic Ocean or the Gulf of Mexico.
The river Tallahassee in Africa. It's so gorgeous there!
I'm not sure, but I know the area has been rated one of the most sparsely populated areas in Africa.
The Atlantic Ocean, I love the water. I also love the sand and the beach.
I have no idea, but there is a lot of people there, and there is no one around.
I don't remember exactly, but I know it's a very large body of water.  It's not as big as the Atlantic though.
Africa is the most densely populated and most sparsely populous country in Africa.
The Atlantic Ocean.  I was just thinking about that river.  It's so pretty.  
I'm not sure, but I do know that there are more than seventy known lakes in Africa!
The Atlantic Ocean.  It is a very beautiful river.  I am so glad I was able to go.
The Atlantic Ocean.  It's so beautiful.  I love the beaches.  What about you?
The Atlantic is the largest of the Atlantic Ocean. It is the second-largest in size.
I don't know. I was just thinking of the river. I didn't realize that there was one in Africa.
The Atlantic Ocean. The water in the Atlantic is beautiful. It is one of the three largest ocean's in the world.
I am not sure but I know it is the largest in Africa. I was thinking about it.
I am not sure but I know there is one in Africa that is near the Gulf of Mexico
The Toronto Raptors are a professional basketball team based out of Toronto, Canada. They were formed in 1961.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's one of the most sparsely populated cities of the US.
Paragua is a beautiful island nation in the Caribbean Sea. It is very beautiful.
Paraguar is a country located in the Americas in the southeastern region of the world, and U.S.
I am not sure but I do know that they are the 3rd largest country in the world by land area.
George Hw Bush ran for President in 1962. He was the first American president of the United States.
I don't remember, but it was in 2001. I was so happy for him though.
It was a show on NBC. I don't know the name but it was a very long time ago. 
I loved him! He was the lead role in The Godfather's "Pride and Prejudice" series.
I don't remember, but I know he was an American actor and dancer.  I do know he played in Las Vegas, Nevada.
Paul is the lead singer and songwriter of the paul martin family.
I am not sure but I have been on the Appalachian National Scenic Trail in Georgia.
He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii, where is he from? 
He is from the United States! He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii!
I am not sure, but it was a long day, and I didn't get to see him.
I don't think he has gotten married yet. I think he's still single. Do you know?
I think it was in 2008, it was a long time ago. I remember it though!
I'm not sure, but he was a big fan of the American Rock band The Beach Boys.
The Mount Katahdin is the highest mountain in the state of Georgia.
Carl is a famous singer and songwriter.  I have heard his voice was amazing.
I am not sure, but I do know that there have been many attempts to launch it, but it hasn't been done yet.
The first one was in 1876, but it was the first one to be done in the US.
I don't know, but I'm sure it was some of the first people that went to the moon.
I'm not really sure, but I do know that there was a film that showed the first landing of the moon in 1969.
I'm pretty sure the first human landing was in 1869! That's a long time ago!
I'm not sure, but I do know that the first man made contact with the Moon was in the 1830s.
George Washington was president of the Army and he was the commander of the Air Force in the Airforce of the United States.
George Washington was the commander, the President of the United States of America, and the president of the U.S.
He is in Florida and his wife is in the Caribbean. They are going to be in the summer.
Yes! He's been doing so well! I think he's one of the greatest artists of all time!
I believe the first one.  It was released in 1977.  I loved it!  I was so excited!
Star wars was released in 1977 and was directed by George Lucas and star trek.
It was Star wars. I was really excited to see it. I love the original trilogy.
It was the Emperor of the United States, he is one of the greatest leaders of the world.
It was a long time ago.  It's crazy that they still haven't declared the war yet.
I'm not really sure when it was declared. I know it was a very violent war though.
I think it was during the Civil War.  It was a long time ago, but I remember hearing about it.
The Spanish Invasion was in 1948. It was a long time ago. 
I think she played the witch of the wizard of oz.  She was really pretty.
I am not sure but he was a great actor, he played the main role of Snape.
I don't know, but I know he was born in Honolulu, Hawaii and was born on August 30, 1948.
I don't know, but it is so hard to believe he has been married for more than 20 years.
I'm not really sure. But I do know he is the head of the company.  I know he's been around a long time.
He was born and raised in Pennsylvania. He was the CEO of Penn State.
I believe it is the US. The capital and most populous city is Los Angeles.
The United States is one of the most sparsely populated states in the world.  I would like to go there someday.
I am not sure but I know that Texas is the only US state that has the longest contiguous coastline.
It is in Missouri, it is the third-largest state in the United States.
It's the southernmost state in the U.S. in the southeast region of the United States.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the 4th most densely populated in the US.
The Atlanta Games. I am a big fan of the Atlanta Atlanta Georgia
The first step was in 1876 when Neil Armstrong was in the Air Force.
He was the first to be sent to the United States on June 30, 1963.
Her name is Cookie and she was a rescue dog.  I love her.
I think it was a bearded dragon. I was so scared of the movie. He jumped up and down and scared me.
I'm not sure.  I know he is a great wrestler though.  Do you know him?
Yes, he did. He was also married to Mick Jagger.  It is a shame he didn't get married.
The highest mountain in Africa is Mount Kelly, and it's located on the west of the Mississippi.
She was a great actress and singer and songwriter.  She has been in a few. 
She was in a few. She's an actress, singer, and songwriter.
I don't really know, but I know that she has been in a lot of movies and tv shows
I am not sure, but I have heard that she was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
She was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and producers!  I love her!
She was in "The Bates".  She was a famous American actress, singer, and dancer.
I don't know but she was a very popular actress. She was a great dancer.
They were a British comedy television starred Madeleine Stowe and Dennis Miller.
She was an American actress and singer.  She was very successful.  It was a long time ago.
She was a great actress in the 1980s. She also starred in The Godfather.
I don't remember the name, but it was a horror film. I was so terrified.
She was in a few good ones, but I don't remember which one.  She was also a great actress.
She was an American singer and songwriter, but she was also in a few other movies as a child.
She was the first American actress to star in a movie starring Elvis Presley and Jennifer Aniston.
She was an American actress.  She was also in a few romantic comedies. 
She was in a couple of good ones. She is also a singer and songwriter.
She is an actress, singer, songwriter, and producer.  She has a lot of roles.
She was in a few good ones. She was also in a movie called "The Victorian of the Galaxy".
I am not sure but I do know that China is the third-largest country. 
I'm not sure, but I know it's in the southeastern region of the U.S.
The Republic of China.  It is located at the south of Asia and bordered by the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure but it seems like it. It's a sovereign country in the southeastern region of the world.
I don't know much about the border, but I know that China's largest island is in the south.
I don't remember, but it was a small island off of the Gulf of Mexico that was owned by the Arabian Sea.
It's a very small island nation located in the Pacific Ocean. It's beautiful.
The Washington Capitals. I was rooting for them since I was a kid. They have won three Stanley Cup appearances.
Michella Jacksons was an American singer-songwriter, record producer, and record producers.
Well, he played professional baseball for the Cleveland Cavalies in Maryland.
The war ended in the late 1845.  It was a long time ago.   
I'm not really sure, but I do know it was a major war in the United States.
I'm not sure, but it was over a hundred years ago.  It's a long time ago
I am not sure of the state, but it is in Memphis, Illinois.
I am not sure, but I do know she was born in New Orleans.  I have never seen her in person before.
I am not really sure but she was a pretty good actress. She was also a singer.
I don't know, but he was born in Pennsylvania and was raised in New York
I am not sure, but I do know that it is the 3rd most populous city in Alabama.
I am not sure but he was an American actor. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I'm not sure about that, but I do know it was a huge moment in Britain.
I think Jodhi May was.  She was so great in so many roles.  What is your favorite role of her?
She is an American singer, songwriter and singer.  I have no idea who she is. 
I believe it's Joseph Rhimes. He is a very successful singer and songwriter.
I don't know when he was born, but he was an English singer-songwriter.
I'm not sure exactly but I do know that he is one of the most successful American singers of all time.
She was born on August 30th, 1996.  I can't believe it's over!
I am not sure but the game was hosted at the stadium of the University of Michigan. 
The highest mountain in Alabama is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. It is in the northern part of Georgia.
The Washington Capitals were my favorite team.  The Stanley Cup was held in 1996.
Yes, the Dallas Drew Douglas Cardinals are the team that has won the World Series.
I don't remember the year, but they are the oldest team in the league.  They have been in the playoffs since 1962.
Brooklyne Dodgers won the series in 2003, but it was a while ago now.
He was the leader of the Spartans and was the ruler of the Republic of America.
That is a tough one, I can't recall the name of the Spartan King, but I know he was a great warrior.
He was the king of Spartan King and was the ruler of the king.  He was also an architect.
The King of Sparta?  He was the leader of the Spartan Empire.
Jessica Albara is an American singer, songwriter, and dancer, actress.
She is an American singer and songwriter.  She is very popular in Hollywood.
Jessica Alba is a pretty good actress, I think she is in the Godfather.
She was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.  She was also a singer and actress.
Jessica Alba was an American singer-songwriter, songwriters and actress.
Jessica Alba is an American actress from Los Angeles, California. She has played a lot of roles.
She is a great actress and singer. She was born in 1985 and was born and raised in Los Angeles.
She was an American singer, songwriter, and singer. She is so great!
She was a singer, songwriter, producer, and singer for the Atlantic Ocean
Jessica Alba starred in "The Notebook" and the movie "Girl with the Wind".
Jessica Alba is an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Jessica Alba was an American actress and singer, songwriter, and dancer!
She was in a movie "Just the Way" which was released in 1993.  
She was in the Godfather.  She was the best in the film.  What about you?
Jessica Alba is an American actress who was born in 1983. Do you like her?
I love Jessica Alba! She is one of the most successful actresses of all time.
I don't know, I'm not sure. I do know she was a great dancer though
Her real name is Jessica Alba, she is an American actress.  She is so pretty.  I love her.
Jessica Alba was a great American singer, songwriter and dancer.
She is a famous actress. She is in a lot of great movies. What about you?
I love Jessica Alba, she's such an awesome actress. Her voice is amazing!
I believe it is the Appalachian Mountains. It is the highest mountain in the world.
I'm not sure about that but it is the 3rd largest mountain in the world.  
I don't know, but it is the second most sparsely populated country in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that the highest mountain is the Mount Katahdin. 
I'm not sure but I know the highest mountain in Australia is the Kangaroo River
I'm not sure but it is the third-largest state in the US by area.
Armstrong was born in 1953 and was a member of the United States.  I don't know when he was married.
I'm not sure, but it's the largest one in the world.  I love sweets.
They're an Italian rapper from the United States.  They're a great group.
I don't know but he was born and raised in Italy. He's an Italian fashion designer.
The names were Dana Matthew Vespicci, he was a famous rapper.
I don't remember his name, but it was an Italian rapper.  It wasn't his real name.
I don't remember his name but he was a very popular one.  It was in the 1960s.
His name was Richard. It was a long day and he had to go to work early.
I'm not sure but he was an Italian rapper who was a great dancer.
He was an Italian rapper. I think he died in 1977. 
I don't remember the name, but it was a very good day and I was so happy. 
One of them was Dennis Miller.  He was a big fan.  It was a lot of fun!
They were the first to win the game. I was so happy when he got the award.
I am not sure, but he was one of the greatest rappers in the history of the 1980s.
I'm not sure what you mean, but I know that it's been a while since I've seen them, but the first one came out in 1997.
I would have to say Lord of the Lambs. I think he was really good at acting.
I am not sure, maybe Maine, Vermont and the Appalachian Nation
I'm not really sure, but I know that there are more than 5 million residents in the U.S.
I don't know. I know that it's the only one in the United States that is bordered by the Mississippi and Georgia.
The state of Virginia and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. I'm going to miss it.
That is a hard one.  I am thinking of Alaska, North Carolina, Mississippi, and Georgia.
He met her in 1994.  I'm not sure how long ago that was.  It was a long time ago.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's the longest contiguous coast. 
I'm not sure, but it is in a lot of states.  It is the largest state in the US.
I'm not sure. The highest mountain I've ever climbed was Mount Katahdin.
The British Columbian Mountains is the highest mountain on the Atlantic Ocean. 
It was made in the 60's by James Fenimore Cougard.  It was really good.
I believe it's Spanish and German.  I have never been to Alaska.  Have you?
Alaska is a country in the United States located in the Siberian Arctic Regions.
It's a small island in the middle of the Atlantic ocean. It's very small.
I'm not sure, but I know the word "alaska" refers to a country located in the North Atlantic Ocean.
It's a small island in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean, so I'm not sure what languages you're talking about.
I am not sure but they are the third-largest country in the US with a population of over 800.
It's a little bit of everything, it's a small island in the Arctic region.
It's the third-largest country in the U.S., with the third smallest population.
Alaska is the only united states that speaks two different languages.  Do you speak any other languages?
I'm not sure but it is the only US state that is bordered by Russia, Alaska, and Montana.
I am not sure but I know that Alaska has a lot to do.  It's a state in the northern hemisphere.
I have never been there, but I have heard it is the largest state in the US. 
I'm not sure, but it's a small state, so I'm sure it's very cold.
I'm from Alaska. It's the smallest state in the U.S. 
Yes, it's very large. It's the third smallest in the US by area. 
I don't know, but it seems like a lot. They are the largest state in the US with only 3.4 million people.
I am not sure, but there are a few people in Alaska and the state capital, Anchorage, is the capital.
I am not sure but I know that it is the 3rd most sparsely populated in the USA and is the third-largest state in the US
I'm not sure, but I do know that they are in the northern part of the US.
Yes, I have heard that Alaska is one of the most sparsely populated states in the U.S.
I am not sure, but I do know that the majority of people live in Alaska, but there are more than seventy languages in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that there are a lot of people who speak English and Russian.
I'm not really sure but I do know that Alaska is the third-largest state in the US.
I don't know but I do know they have the longest contiguous land mass in the USA.
I'm not sure, but I know that they are in the northwestern United States. 
I don't remember the name but I know that it is very sparsely spaced.
I don't really know, but I know there's a huge amount of people in Alaska.
The people are native to the Americas and speak english, spanish, and french.
The majority speak english.  It is the second-largest country in the US.
I'm not sure but I do know that Alaska is one of the largest states in the world
I don't know, but I've been to Alaska. They're the largest state in the world.
I have no idea, but I know that they speak french, Spanish, and english.
Alaska is a state located in north America in the northwestern regions of the U.S. 
They are native to the Americas, but I'm not sure if there is any other language spoken there.
They are very far from Alaska, they speak Russian, English, Spanish, and French.
Alaska was one of the first states to be in the U.S. in 1845.
They speak Russian, French, Spanish, and Russian.  It's a beautiful place.  I'd love to visit one day.
I'm not sure, but they have the longest contiguous land in the world. 
They speak a lot of Russian and Norwegian, but they also speak Finland and Greenland.
They speak french, spanish, and english. They are very close to us. 
The people from Alaska are native to the Americas and have been around a long time.
They have a large amount of spanish speakers, but they are mostly from the united states.
I'm not really sure, but it is in the northernmost region in the U.S.
I am not sure but it is the smallest state in the USA so there's a lot of space to speak.
The language that is spoken in Alaska is spanish.  It is very close to the US.
I'm not really sure but it is the smallest of the 50 United States and the third smallest.
They're from Alaska, but they live in the northern part of the United States. 
I'm not sure, but I do know it is very large and sparsely populated.
I'm not sure but I do know that Alaska is the only state in the USA to be bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
I believe they speak Spanish, but I don't know if they are from Alaska. I know it's pretty spooky.
They're native to the Americas and they speak english, spanish, french, and english. 
I don't know, but I know they are native to the Americas, but they are very far apart.
They are native to the Americas and they speak english.  They have a small island in the northern hemisphere.
I'm not sure, but they do not seem to speak english at all. They are native of the Americas.
I don't know but they speak Spanish and Russian.  I have been to a couple times.
I am not sure, but I know they are native to Alaska.  I think they are very close to Russian.
They speak Russian, but they don't speak English very well.  They don't know it well.
They are native to the Americas, they speak Spanish, french, english, and spanish.
they speak english and spanish fluently! they are native to the united states. 
I'm not sure but it's a small island in the Caribbean. They're not very big.
It is Spanish. I have never been, but I would love to go. I've always wanted to see the Grand Tetons of Alaska.
It is in the USA.  It is the third most sparsely populated of the 50 states.
I'm not sure. I just learned that it's a small, mountainous region in the US.
I am not sure but I have always wanted to go. I know it is the 3rd-largest country in the US.
I am not sure. But I do know that the language is spoken in the northwestern United States. 
It speaks English and Spanish. It's a small island in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.
I don't know, but I know they're the third-largest country in the US by area
It's in the northern part of the US. I've never been, but would love to go.
I'm not really sure, but it seems like it would be in the northern part of Alaska. I've never been.
The only language that I speak is english. I have always wanted to go to Alaska
I am not sure, but it is in the North Atlantic Ocean.  It is a very large and diverse area.
It is a language in the US.  It is the second-largest country in the world.
It is a very large and sparsely populated state in the northern portion of America.
The language of Alaska is spoken primarily in the North Atlantic region, and is also spoken in the U.S.
Alaska is a country in the northern region of North America. I think it is very cold there.
It's Spanish. I don't speak it fluently but I do speak a bit of it.
The language that is known as "Alaska" is spoken in the United States and Alaska. It is the third-largest state in the US.
It's in the Alaskan region, and it is the third-largest country in the US!
It's Spanish.  I've never been but I'd like to one day.  Do you speak any other languages?
I am not sure, but I do know that there is no official language in Alaska. 
Thomas Lynj is the current head of the University of Kentucky University
It's the Great Pacific Ocean in the Caribbean and the Atlantic Sea. 
I am not sure but he was the first male to be featured on the show "Slap Shot".
He died on August 30, 2017.  He's one of the greatest actors in the history. 
Obama is the president of the U.S. and he was elected for President in 1945.
I don't know but i do know he was the 45th president of  the US  
Trump, he is the 45th President of the United States.  He is also the 45rd president of the united states.
I'm not sure, but he was a Republican for more than a year.  He was the 45th president in the United States.
They wear the same thing as the NASCAR, which is the highest level of stock car racing in the world.
I have no clue, but i do know they are an American multinational corporation. 
I don't know, but I know he was an American poet, singer, songwriter, and producer.
I am not really sure, but he was elected as president of the united states in 1845.
Martin Lawrence is a former president of the US, she is also a lawyer. 
Martin Lawrence is an American actress. I'm not sure who she is. Do you know?
Martin Lawrence is a great American actress, singer, songwriter, and dancer.
He was born in March 1, 1986. He was a singer and songwriter for a pop punk band.
I'm not really sure, but I know that it is a state in the southeastern United states.
Elvis Presley was born in 1972. He was a singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure when the song was released, but I know he was an American singer and songwriter.
Elvis Presley was born in 1958.  He was an American singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure, but it was a long time ago. The president had to be a Republican.
I'm not sure. I do know it's the third-largest language in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the third-largest country in the EU
It is a sovereign country located in the southeastern United States. 
It was established in 1871, and it is the second-largest country in the Americas.
Carmen Miranda was an American singer and songwriter. He was also a dancer
James Maslows is one of my favorites. He is a great singer/songwriter.
James Maslows is a great American actress who is a lead singer, songwriter, producer, and producer.
James Maslows. He was an American rapper, songwriter, and actor.
James Maslows, he is an american singer, songwriter, actor and producer
The president of the United States, Jefferson Jean Jean-Barbera, was a president of a local university.
The movie "Shawshank Redemption," I loved it when I saw it.
I am not sure but I do know that Bryan and Jeremy Clarkson were the main star of the show.
Bryan Stewart is the lead singer of the movie "The Birds".
Bryan Stewart directed "Blackack" and "Billie Berry".
I'm not too sure what movie he did, but his real name was Peter Jackson.
Patrick Stewart is an American actor, he was born on August 1876.
Patrick Stewart was the best! He is one of the greatest actress of all time.
I'm not sure, but he did win the Mr. Kennedy Awards in his career. I'm surprised he didn't win.
I'm not entirely sure but I know he was the founder of the company of Hanna-barbera
I don't know but I do know he was an American singer and songwriter.
Patrick Stewart starred in "The Godfather" and "Barney Director of the Hollywood"
I don't know, but I do know that Hitchhikers is a great actor.
Patrick Stewart starred in The Godfather, the best movie of all time!
I don't remember the name of his movie. But he was a great actor and director.
Patrick Stewart starred in The Godfather 2, which is my absolute favorite!
I don't remember the name of the movie, but I do remember Hitchhiker was the main star.
I don't know, but I know she is still a very famous American actress and singer.
I think it was in 2009.  She was a great dancer and songwriter.
He was a genius and was the inventor of the Piero Vinci. 
I'm not sure, but I do know that she was a very popular singer and songwriter in the UK.
I'm not sure but I do know she's an American singer and songwriter.
I think they are from California. I am not sure but I know they were born in California.
They're American actors. They're also from Los Angeles, California.  Have you heard of them?
I am not sure, but they are an American actress and singer. I think I know who Brad Pitt is.
Angelia Jolie is an American singer and songwriter from Las Vegas, Nevada.
I do not know but I know they have been in the Netherlands for a very long time.
The United States. It's the largest by area, and the 4th-largest country in the world.
I don't really know, but I know it is the 3rd most densely populated in the world.
The US is the 3rd largest state by area and the 2nd least densely populated in the world. 
The United States. I think it is the most densely populated country in the world!
I'm not sure, but I do know it is the third smallest in size in the world
He retired in 1991. He was the best player at the game of bingo.
She was an American singer, songwriter, producer and singer.  She's been around a while.
Dave Pelzer is my favorite singer and songwriter. He got married in 1893.
The United States.  I am not sure if they have a tallest one.   
I don't know but I know the tall buildings are in China, Japan, and South Korea.
I'm not sure.  I know it's in the United States.  It's the tallest of the world.
I don't know but it's a very tall building.  I think it's in the UK.
The tallest building of the world is in the US, and it is located in the middle of the Mississippi.
I am not sure, but I know the US is the tallest in the world.  
I am not really sure. But I know there's a lot of tall buildings in the U.S. that are tall.
He was a high school senior and he attended Columbia University.  It was in Pennsylvania.
He did not attend any college. He was just a high school graduate.  He was a great student. 
I'm not sure, but he was born in the UK.  He's a great actor too.
He attended the University of Michigan State University.  He was in the US.
Yes, it is a university located in the United States. Have you heard of it? 
Yes, it's a great community college in New York City.  It's a community college located in the United States.
I'm not sure but she was the most influential woman in the world, so it's a good question
It was Michelle Obama. I was shocked to see her. She was very nice.
I don't know but I do know the president of the usa is the current president. 
I am not sure, but the president of the US is a woman who is the first president to be elected.
I don't remember the exact name. But she was the president of the United States of America. 
He was from the University of Michigan, Michigan and played for Michigan University.
I'm not sure but I know it is the 3rd most sparsely populated in the world, so it must be pretty big.
I'm not sure but I do know that the first US people to go to the moon was the Mercury.
That's a good question, I'm not sure who was the first American to land the first.
I don't really know, but I do know that the University was founded in 1903
It's a blue-gray color.  It's one of the largest public universities in the US.
They are a private school in Orlando, Florida. It has been a long time though.
They are a school in Miami.  It's very hot and humid there today.
I'm not sure, but I know it is one of the best public universities in the world. 
I have no idea but it is a private school in the Bronx, Miami area.
I believe it's the University of Miami, Florida.  It's the largest public school in the U.S.
Miami U is one of the most prestigious universities in Florida! It is the largest U.S. state.
Jerry Lee Lewis is a great actor. He was the best actor of all time.
Jerry Lewis is a great American singer, songwriter and actor.  He was a great actor.
Jerry Lewis is the American comedian, television star and producer. Do you know any?
Jerry Lewis is the man who married Jerry Lewis in 1974.
Lee Lewis is an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, and actor.
Jerry Lewis was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
Jerry Lewis is my favorite American rapper. He was born in 1948.
It was held in Belgium, England.  It was a great game.  I was rooted for Germany though.
I don't remember his name, but he's a rapper, actor, singer, and songwriter.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the Hindu Buddhists were very influential in the early 20th century.
The capital is Lake Champlain, it's the most populated city in Alaska.
I'm not sure but there are only one or more inhabitants in Alaska. 
The capital is Anchorage. It is the most densely populated of the 50 states.
The largest city is Montana, which is the largest by area of Alaska.  It is the third-largest city in the US.
I'm not sure, but I know that Alaska is the only state in the lower half of the US that is sparsely populated.
I'm not sure, but I know the capital of Alaska is Oregon.  I've never been.
I am not sure but I know that Alaska is a Nordic state in the US, which is interesting.
I am not sure of the exact numbers, but it is the 3rd least populated state.
The only thing I know is that Alaska is considered one of the 50 states in the U.S.
I don't know but the biggest is Lake Champlain, which is in North America.
I am not sure but it is the 3rd most populated in the US and the 4th largest by area in the world.
I believe it's the 8th most populous. It's the third-largest state in the US.
Alaska is the largest state in the U.S. and the third smallest by area.
I'm not sure but it is the 3rd-largest city in the United States.
Alaska is one of the most sparsely populated states in the US. It is a small city in the U.S.
I would say Alaska is the biggest and most densely populated state in the U.S. 
The capital, Alaska, is located in the North Atlantic Ocean. It is a beautiful place.
I think Alaska is a great place to visit. It was the 8th least populated state in 1894.
I would love to visit Alaska one day. It's one of the seventh largest states in the US
I have been to Alaska and it is the third largest state in the United States by population.
I'm not sure, but I know the capital of Alaska is Montana. It is the largest city in North America.
They are the largest in Alaska. It's the largest city in the US by population.
The largest cities are Lake Champlain and Oregon.  Do you like it there?
I'm not sure but I do know it's the 3rd-largest state by area in the US.
I'm not sure but I know that Alaska has the highest population of any US county
she was born on june 30, 1962 and she was a singer and songwriter.
It was a pop singer from Pennsylvania that was born in 1989.
His name is Jacob. I think he's pretty cool. He was born in London.
Her name is Elizabeth and she was born in New York City. She was a very famous actress.
It's an American movie studio that is based on a comic book by Margaret Mitchell.
Alys Stone was an American actor, singer, songwriter, and producer. 
It's a musical comedy.  I love Alyon Stone.  He's such a great comedian.
It's a romantic comedy.  I've been watching it for a little bit.  It's been a while since I've seen it.
I think it's called "Shawshank Redemption".  I've never seen it, but I know it came out in 1997.
Alyssa Rhimes. She is an American singer, songwriter and dancer.
It's an American musical comedy that stars Alysson Stone and Madeleine Stowe.
It was a romantic comedy with Jason Bateman.  He did a great job.
I'm not sure but I do know that Alyson Stone is an American singer, songwriter and actor.
It's an American epic romantic comedy that is a classic.  I haven't seen it yet.
Alyson Stone is an American rapper who has released over 70 studio albums
The Godfather, it was a great film!  It was directed by James Cameron
It's not a movie but it's a musical, comedy, and a horror movie.
He has been in a few of them. He's pretty good too. I like his voice.
I'm not sure, but I'm sure he's a good actor.  It was released in 2009, and I haven't seen it yet.
I don't know, but I know he is a great actor. He was in several good roles as well.
The new "Doo doo dah doo" movie with Jeremy Clarkson. It was pretty good.
I don't remember, but I do know that she was in a lot of movies. I know she is a great actor.
I dont remember but I know she is an American actor and singer and songwriter!
I don't remember the name, but he is one of the greatest comedians in the history of movies.
It's a comedy. I haven't seen it yet. I know she is a great actor though.
The Godfather.  It was one of the first of the movies I saw, and I still haven't seen it yet.
I don't know who is youngest, but he is the oldest of the Tamiladu Child.
The highest mountain in India is Mount Katahdin. It is the largest mountain in the world!
He died in 1974. It was a long day for him. I was so sad.
I have no idea but I am so upset about it.  I was so upset.  
I am not really sure. It just sounded like it was coming. I was so sad.
I'm not sure, but she was in a car accident.  I was so devastated.
Her last name was Mia and she was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
No, he was born in the United States and played in the Philadelphia, New York. 
He was born and raised in Bavaria and was a Christian. He is a great father.
I don't remember. I know he's a Republican, but he's also the president of the United States.
Her name was Mia Khalifa. It is a very popular name. I was so shocked.
Her name is Jodi May. She's a great American singer and songwriter.
Julius Caeas is a great American actress and singer. He was a great actor and songwriter
I'm not really sure.  But I know he was born in Panama City, which is where he was raised.
I don't know, maybe he was just really old. I was so sad when it happened though.
He was born on August 1948. He was an American singer and songwriter.
He was born and raised in the Philadelphia. He was also a famous actor in New York City.
It is in the Panhandle. I have never been there. It seems like it would be a nice place to visit.
I am not sure.  I am in California and I do not think they have a time zone here.
The Neyo album.  It was released in 2008.  I was so happy to have it back!
I don't recall. But I know she is an American singer and songwriter.
I don't know, but I do know they are the most famous. They're so good.
I think it's the Middle East. The most popular is Turkish cuisine. It's delicious.
A desser with a mixture of sweet and savory toppings.
I'm not sure what they're called, but they are usually sweetened with sugar substitutes.  I like them.
I'm not sure, but he was born on August 21, 1973. 
I'm not sure but I know he was born and raised in Brenham, Texas, but he moved to Los Angeles when he was 18.
I think it would be the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. It is a National Park in Georgia.
The world's largest peak is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
The Appalachian National Scenic Mountain.  I have been to the highest mountain in the state of Georgia.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the tallest mountain in North America
I am not really sure.  I am rooting for the team though.  They are playing in the FA Cups.
I am not sure who is, but i know the team is playing at the stadium.  
I am not so sure, but the FA Cup is coming up, so it is exciting!
I don't know, but I hope it is not a big deal.  Do you know much about them?
I am not sure who was playing.  I am a big Celtic fan.  Do you like Cuba?
I believe the Atlanta Georgia Raptors are playing.  I know they are a great team.  Who is your favorite team?
I'm not sure but i know it is located in the southeastern region of North America.
Jason Derulo is my favorite American singer.  He was born and raised in New York City.
I am not sure but it is a Christian denomination.  I am a Christian. 
I don't know, but it is the largest Christian denomination in India and the largest in the world.
It was a poetry of the American singer-songwriter Edgar Allan. He was a great poet.
Bottom Swan is the leader of Botswana, Sweden and Canada.
He played for the Chicago Blackhawks. He was one of the best players in the league!
I don't remember but I do know that she was the first female singer to be on Billie Jean. 
I'm not sure but I know it was one of the most popular songs in the United Kingdom and the United States in the 1960s.
I'm not sure but I do remember that song! She was a great singer and songwriter. She was also a great dancer.
It was "Love Me Do" which was released in 2007.  It's a pop punk song.
He died on December 22, 1996.  I'm so sad.  He was a great driver.
I don't really know, but he was an American singer, songwriter, and actor for the US government.
He is the American singer, songwriter and producer of "Justin" 
He was buried on August 2, 1944. He was a great man.
I love that place!  I have been a few times.  It was the first one to be built in 1963.
Yes! He was one of the most famous people in the history of the United Kingdom. 
He was killed in August of 1963. He was shot on the same day that was the last time he was alive.
He was born in 1884 in Birmingham, England!  He was a good father!
Georgia state senator is the elected official of the southeastern region of the US.
Georgia State Senate is a US government in the state of Georgian, Mississippi.
The Senate is elected for President of Georgia, the current U.S. state of Alaska, and the current United States.
I don't know. But I do know that it is in the southeastern region of the United States
He was a lawyer.  I think they were trying to get him a promotion, but it didn't happen.
He was a lawyer. I was really surprised to find out that he was a real estate agent.
I'm not sure, but it was a very old show. I'm sure it was on NBC.
I don't remember what show was it but it was the one about a woman who was in a car accident.
He was an American television actor and a singer. He was very good in the show.
It was on the Discovery Channel.  It was a great show!  It had a great cast of great actors.
I don't remember what show it was but it was on NBC.  It was on ABC's "The Biggest Loser"
It was a TV show that aired on ABC on NBC.  It was really good.
I am not sure but he was a great dancer and he was also the best actor in the show.
I'm not sure but he did win an award winning show for Best Actors in America.
He was in "The Victorian" and he won the Mr. Universe award for Best Actors in the world.
I am not sure, but the show was produced and distributed by the NBC.
He was an American actor. He was in "The Victorian of Los Angeles" in 1968.
I'm not sure but he was on the show "The Biggest Loser"  
I love Leonardos, he is a very talented actor. He was born and raised in Honolulu.
Yes! He's a very popular TV star. He's one of the most successful actors in the history of the US.
Yes, I love him, he was a great actor. He was also a great singer and songwriter.
No, it's a tv show. I love watching it on the SyFy Channel.
Yes! I was so happy for him! He is a great actor and director. Do you like him?
I love that show. It's on the Discovery Channel. Have you been watching it?
I am not sure but I know that he is a good actor.  I like his work too.
My favorite character is Richard Bachman he was a great actor and screenwriter.
I am not sure but I do know that it was directed by Jodhi May.  He was a great actor.
I don't know but I know that they are one of the best team in the world! 
I don't know but I do know that Rick Ross is an American rapper and actor.
I am not sure but I know the president is the 45th President of the U S.S
The president of America. I am not sure how he did it. But he was elected in 2016.
Colorado is the 3rd-largest state by area.  It is also the 8th least sparsely populated.
Her name is Lindsey, and she's an american singer, songwriter, and producer.
I am not sure but I do know that the Philippine Sea is the largest in the world
I don't know, but I have heard that they are in the Pacific Ocean.
The Atlantic, the Pacific Ocean, the Atlantic Seas and the Gulf of Mexico. 
The Philippines, the island of the Gulf of Mexico, is on the Pacific Ocean.
They are the largest islands in the Caribbean Sea.  It's a beautiful island.
I am not sure but I know that they are the largest island chain in the world.  I have always wanted to see them.
It's been a long time since I've watched the series. I don't know if I remember the name of the battle.
I am not sure but it was a very long time ago.  I was so shocked that we did it.
I am not sure, it must have been pretty hard.  Did you have to call 911?
I'm not sure, but I do know it was an explosive bomb in 1977.
I believe it was around 1872.  I'm not sure how long ago it happened, but it was definitely a long time ago.
I think Mary Moore studied at a private high school in Birmingham, England.
She's a famous actress and singer. She's very successful.   Do you like to read?
I don't know, but I know that it was ruled by the King Louis XIV.
Thomas Pain is a famous American poet, but not sure what language he speaks.
He played for the Philadelphia Eagles in 1961.  He was pretty good.
I don't remember but he was born on March 1845. He was a great player.
I don't know, but I am sure she will do great.  Her performance was amazing.
I'm not sure, but he had to get out of his house because he was so sick.
My dad and I were born in Jacksonville, Georgia and I was born there. 
I don't remember, but he is one of the founders of the Jackson Brothers.
The first song of hers was "Love Me Do" which was released in 1994.
Alabama is the only one that's bordered by Georgia and Mississippi.
I don't know, but I know it's the only state that is bordered by Georgia, Mississippi, and Alabama.
I am not sure, but I do know that Alabama has the highest unemployment rate in the U.S.
I think it was in the 18th century. I'm not really sure what the date was.
It dates all the way back to the Middle Ages in France. It is one of the most popular sweets in the world.
Thomas Jefferson became a United States President of the United States in the 1930s.
Thomas Jefferson was born in 1845 and is one of the most influential people in the US
Thomas Jefferson was born in 1845. He was also president of United States.
Thomas Jefferson was born in 1853. He was a great president. 
Thomas Jefferson was the first president of the United States in 1845.  
No, but I know they were the ruling of the Republic of France in the late 1500s.
The American singer, songwriter, producer and author, and actor.  He is a great actor.
I think it was Steve Carrell.  He was also the captain of the all-star team.
I don't remember the exact year but I do know it was released in Japan in 1968
He was a guitarist.   I think he was pretty good at it.  What kind of instrument do you play?
It is the landscape of the indian subcontinent, and it is one of the world's oldest rivers.
I'm not sure but I do know that indus is the name of a subcontinent.
The river is one of the oldest rivers in the world.  It was first discovered in the 10th century.
I am not sure, but I know they have never been married.  They are not married either.
Dave Pelzer is a great American rapper.  His wife and I were married in 1963.
I am not sure, but it was a great book.  I think it was written in 1947
Harry Potter is my favorite series of books. It is a fantasy series set in the past.
It's a fantasy novel written by JK Rowling. I'm a fan of the series, but I haven't read it yet.
Arizon Russell, he's a great American singer and songwriter
I am not sure. I just found out it is the 4th-largest state by area in the US.
Yes, she is a great singer and songwriter. She is also a producer.
Emily Dickinson was born on August 1848, she was a great American actress and singer.
I'm not sure but I know it was a long time ago. I know she was a great mother to my kids.
I'm so sorry to hear that.  I wish I could be a better dad for him.  Do you have any children?
I'm sorry to hear about his passing. It's hard to imagine how devastating he must have been.
I think he was in the late 1800s, but I'm not sure when it happened.
I don't remember the name, but I know they are very successful.  They have won three Super Bowl appearances.
I don't think she has a brother, but I do know that she was a woman who lived in Arkansas.
I don't know but I do know the name of the Clinton brothers is Dennis Miller.
I don't know, but I do know they've been together for more than a year. They have been together since June of 1962.
The American politician and businessman who ran for president of the United States, who is also a Republican.
I don't recall. But I do recall that Hillary is one of the most influential political candidates in the United States.
They were a political dynasty in New York. They were the founders of the Democratic Conference.
They were a very famous actress, a singer, and songwriter.  
Her real name is Joseph, and he's a former president of the United States. 
I don't really remember his name, but I know he is a very prominent businessman.
I don't think so, but I do know that the Hillary Clinton Family of Washington has been around since the late 1960s.
No, but I do know that they're a political and social commentator in the UK. 
Jamie Foxx was an American actor.  He was also in a few other roles. 
I'm not really sure but Jamie Foxx is a great actor.  He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I'm not sure, but it is in Memphis, Tennessee. They have been playing in the NBA since 1961.
The Atlantic Ocean, the Atlantic and the Gulf of Mexico, the Mississippi River.
His name is Dennis Miller. He was born and raised in Detroit, Michigan.
I'm not sure, but I know that Dr Seuss was the most successful author of the English literature.
It was on March 25, 1973. It was a long time ago, but I still remember the good times.
I am not sure but I know Salman Khan is the oldest of Salman. 
She is an American singer, songwriter and dancer. She is really good.
Julie was a romantic comedy. I liked how she was portrayed in a young woman.
Julie is a great American comedy starring Lesley Crue. Have you heard of her?
Julie's first movie was "Complications". It was a really good movie.
The main island is Haiti.    It's a small island in the Pacific Ocean. 
I'm not sure but i know that it's the smallest and most densely populated island in the world!
I'm not sure but the island was founded by the Polynesians in 1754.
I'm not sure but I know it's in Libya. It's a big island in the Caribbean.
I am not sure but I do know that the island is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean and the Caribbeans.
Her name is Jessica. I love her. She was born in Hawaii and moved to Florida when I was little.
I'm not sure.  He was a very famous rapper and songwriter.
It is the team captain of the team.  He is also a member of the national team.
I don't know, but I am sure she must have had a lot of experience with him.
He was married in the 1980s and he had two kids. He was a great man.
I don't know, but I do know that it is the 3rd-largest urban area in the US.
I'm not sure, but the area is the 3rd-largest in the US!
I am not sure, but I know there are over 600 locations in the world. 
It is the largest city in the state of Nevada.  It's the most populous of the 50 states.
It's the most populous city in the state of Nevada. I think it's about 800,000 people.
I'm not sure but I'm sure there's a lot of people there. The population is very large.
I think it was Taylor Swift. She's a great artist and songwriter.
The Beatles.  They're the most influential band in the history of pop music.
Argentina won the Cup this year! I was so happy to see the team win.
Argentina won the World Cup in 1996, so they were quite the team.
It was in 1972.  It was a long time ago.  They won though.
The World Cup was held in Argentina and was held on August 21, 1994.
Argentina is the host country of the world cup, and I believe they won in 2017.
Argentina won in 2008.  I was rooting for them.  They are one of the most successful teams in the world.
I'm not sure but I'm pretty sure it was Hitler. He was a huge fan of Nazi Germany.
I'm not really sure, but I know that it was an American political and social movement that was formed in Germany.
The leader of the Nazi was the Emperor! He's such an influential man!
The Nazi leaders were Gene Roddenberry and Maurice Riggs. 
He was a great American singer, songwriter, and actor.  He was born and raised in New York City.
He was an American singer and songwriter. He was also an actor, dancer, and producer.
It is a great question.  I am not sure.  But she is one of the most influential women in the world.
I'm not really sure who that is. But he's been around for a very very long time.
She was a very good actress and a singer. She is very popular. She was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii
The sea is a body of salt water located in the Mediterranean Sea
Italy is a country in the Mediterranean Sea in the Caribbean.
I have never been to either of those, but I have been to the beach in Italy.
The Mediterranean Sea.  I love the beach.  What is your favorite beach?
I am not sure but i do know there is a sea between the Atlantic Seas and Chesapeake Bay.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the Atlantic Ocean and the Chesapeake Bay are bordered by Atlantic and the Gulf of Mexico.
Niels Boeh was the one who came up with the name. It's a great name
Niels Bor is a Scottish comedy starring Richard Gerelle.
His name is Rayleigh.  He's an American singer, songwriter, author and actor.
I'm not sure, but he was a good actor. I'm sure he was around a while.
I'm not sure, but I can tell you she was born on April 1972
She's an American singer and songwriter. She was born and raised in Pennsylvania.
I'm not sure when she was born but the name was first used in the 19th century.
I'm not sure when it came out, but it was originally a play that starred William Shakespeare.
I don't remember when it was written but I know it was originally written by William Hanna.
She was born in 1784, and she was born and raised in Pennsylvania.
I don't know, but I know it is a small planet in the solar ect.
I don't remember, but they were the team with the most points in the league.  I was so happy!
I believe he was the best player at the time, but I'm not sure exactly what year.  He's been playing in the National Football League since 1981.
I am not sure, I do know that they are the largest of the Muslim communities in the world.
Islam is the largest and most practiced in the world, with over 3.5 million followers.
I don't know, but I am not sure.  I know that Iran is one of the world's largest Muslim countries.
I'm not sure but I do know that there are more than seventy million people in the world.
I am not sure but I know they are very closely related to Saudi Arabia.
He was born in 1845 and was an English colonist. He was a great man.
I am not sure but it is a sovereign island and it is bordered by the Atlantic ocean.
I don't remember, but I do know that he's been playing in the NHL since 1981.
I am not sure but he was drafted by the Chicago Blackhawks.  He played for the Chicago Packers.
I'm not really sure but he is one of the most influential deer hunters in the world.
He died on December 30, 1962.  He was a great deer hunter.
John hopkins is the man in the movie "Raddick" starring Daniel Day-Lewis.
The first concert was in the United States. It was amazing! I saw it in person.
It's in California. It's really pretty. I can't wait to see what it's like to go back.
I was born and raised in Georgia.  It was my favorite time of year for sure.
I don't know but I do know that it is one of the largest and most populous countries in Europe.
Barbadoes are a sovereign island in the Caribbean Sea. 
The United States.  I have been to Barbados a few times.   
It is an island in the Caribbean.  It's really beautiful and has been around since 1857.
The Republic of Ireland.  It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea.
The U.S. state of Scotland is in fact the third-largest state in the world
I am not sure, but i do know they are the oldest franchise in the NFL! 
I'm not really sure who was first, but they were the original Dallas Douglas. 
I don't know but I know the team is in the National Football Conference
I'm not sure, but I do know that they have been in the NFL since the 1970s. 
I am not sure but I know they are one of the largest private universities in the world.
Alexander Graham was an American singer, songwriter, actor and author. 
Alexander Graham Bell is a famous singer, songwriter, and actor who was born on December 22, 1948.
Alexander Bell is my favorite singer.  He is also a dancer.   Do you like music?
Alexander Graham was an American singer and songwriter.  He died in 2007.
I am not sure but I know he played in the movie "Alexander Hamilton"
I'm not sure, but I know that the Indians were the first people to be elected.
I'm not sure. But the president of India is a former president of China. He's been in office for a while.
Yes, he won the Indian Ocean. He was the CEO of Indianapolis.
I don't remember, but he was president of India and the United States for the first time.
Black Eye Peas is a classic rock band from the US that was formed in 1981.
She was the first woman to win the medal in the 2024 Olympic games.
I believe she won the 100 meter dash, but I am not sure. I know she is a great dancer.
She is the best female athlete in the world.  She has won more than 100 medals.
I don't know, but I know she's been one of the most decorated women since 1997!
It is the Gulf of Mexico, which is in between the Atlantic and the Pacific Ocean. It is beautiful.
Yes, I live in Portugal.  It's in the southeastern region of the United States, right?
Portugal is a city in the southwestern United States in the Atlantic Ocean.
Portugal is the capital, the most populous city in the EU, and the second largest in the US.
Sean Conner is a famous singer and songwriter. He's been around since 1985. He was born in New York City.
Yeah, the first one was released on September 30, 1996. Do you like Mario Bros?
I'm not really familiar with it, but I know it was released on September 30, 1968.
I'm not sure, but I do know he was born in 1845 in Barnesville, Arkansas.
The books are "The Bird's Bird" and "A Song of Ice and Fire". 
I don't think I've read any of his books but I know he was a great author!
He was an American author and a screenwriter. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I think it was a children's book. It was a very popular one.  I read it to my nephews.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's the longest continuous landform in America.
I'm not sure but it is a state that is bordered by Arkansas, Georgia, Maine, and New Zealand.
Its a state that is bordered to Georgia and Maine, and it runs through the Mississippi River.
Deis Arnaz is an American singer-songwriter and producer. 
I think it's the largest mountain in Africa.  I've hiked the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
I'm not sure but it's the largest state in Canada. It is the largest in the world.
I don't know. But I know that the highest mountain in India is Mount Ky.
The highest mountain in indiana is called the Kangaroo National Scenic Trail
I don't know but I do know that there are some mountain ranges in the world. I would like to go to Yellowstone National Scenic Trail.
Mount Katahdin. I'm not sure if it's the largest mountain range in India.
The highest mountain in India is the Konahashas National Scenic Trail. 
I'm not sure but i do know that indian mountains are very popular in north and south asia
I am not sure.  I would like to visit the Appalachian National Scenic Trail though.
I'm not sure. But I know that the British Prime Minister is the ruler of England and the British Empire.
No, I don't recall his name, but he was in the British columbian army.
Elie Whitney was a famous American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
No I'm not sure who Steve Vaughn is, but he was born on August 21, 1948.
The Washington Washington Capitals.  They were the first team to win the east in the NBA. 
I'm not sure if I was rooting for the Washington Dynasty or the Dallas Stars but I know they were a great team.
The Washington Capitals!  They were the best team in the league for sure!  I was so happy to see them win!
The city is called London.  It's the capital and most populous city in England.
I'm not really sure but I do know that it's bordered by France, Spain, and Morocco.
I don't really know but I do know that the Spanish colonies and Portugal are bordered by Spain and Italy.
It's a sovereign country in Europe. It's located in the Atlantic Ocean.
It is in the southeastern part of the United States. It's a small country.
It was the Ford Falcon. I was so excited to see what it was doing.
She's Mileena, she's an american singer and songwriter. I love her!
She was born on August 30, 1948. She is a singer, songwriter and actress.
He had a stroke. It was a very hard time for him to recover from. 
I don't know but it was very sudden.  He didn't even realize he was going to die.
I think he was killed by a drunk driver. I'm not sure how old he was. He was a great driver though.
I believe so, but I'm not really sure. He was a very important figure in the US.
It's an area of mount Killaua, located in the southeastern region of the world
The Brad Pitts' daughter is a famous singer, songwriter, and producer. She's very talented.
Anna Jolie is one of the most influential actresses in the history of the United States
Brad pitts is an american actor and singer and songwriter and author, and actor
I'm not sure but I do know that Jolie is one of the most popular actors in the world. 
Brad Jolie is a famous singer. He was born in 1947. 
I don't remember their names but their names are Julie and Elvis Jolie.
Alexander the Great is one. It is the capital and largest metropolitan area.
Alexander is the capital, and it's also the most populous city in the state.
I'm not sure but I know they have a huge population. I know it's the most populous city in the world.
Alexander Mary, Alexander the Great, and Dallas, are some of the most populous city in the world.
They are the largest metropolitan area in the world, so I am sure there are many.
Alexander the Great. It's a big city in the US and the world's largest city in Europe.
Alexander Mansville, New Orleans, and Dearborn are the big ones.
I am not really sure but they are the most densely populated city in the world.
They were the children that were born in Honolulu, Hawaii.  
Dr Winson is a character from the Sherlock Homes series, he plays the detective.
Dr Watson was a great American astrophysicist and a great actor. He was born in 1883.
He is the main character in the series of Sherlock Holmes. He was a genius. 
Dr Watson was an American detective.  He was also a prodigy in the 19th century.
Dr Watson was a famous American rapper.  He was born in 1974.
She was born in Birmingham, England. She was also a famous fashion designer!
I don't know but she was born in England. I know she was a very popular singer.
No, she was born and raised in Oakland, Illinois. She moved to the United States in 1968.
I don't think I can find the exact name of it. I just know it's an American TV show.
I don't remember, but he was a great actor. He was one of the greatest actors of all time
I believe he was born in 1853. He was a great president of the United States.
Bing Crosby, the hockey quarterback, was also a member of the Washington Capitals
I don't know, but I do know it was a long battle between the United States and the United Kingdom
I'm not sure, but she was born and raised in Nashville, Tennessee.
She was an American singer-songwriter. She was also a dancer.
Nicki Minaj was a singer, songwriter and producer.  
She was an american singer and songwriter, and actress.  She was pretty good.
I think her name was Jennifer. She is a very famous singer and songwriter.
I am not sure, but I think he was the first male winner of the Olympics.
He was an american singer and songwriter. He is still a singer though.
I am not sure, but I know he is a great athlete.  He has won six Olympic medals.
New York State. I am a big fan of the university of Alabama. It is located in Tallahassee.
Billie Ray Cyrus was born in Birmingham, England.  It's a small town.
I am not sure but i do know that Billy Ray Cyrus was a famous singer, songwriter, and actor.
She's due in May of 2016.  I can't wait!  I've been looking forward to it for a while.
She is a mother.  I am sure she will be great.  She has been a great mother.
He died on June 25, 1974.  He was an American singer, songwriter, record producer, and actor.
I believe in justin timberlake. He was born in 2008. I am sure he is still young.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail, it's the biggest in the U.S
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the most populous city in the world
I am not sure. But I do know that they are the most densely populated of the English Isles.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is the third-largest country in England.
I'm not sure about their actual metropolitan area.  I'm sure it's somewhere in the UK.
London and Manhattan. I think they are the most populous city in England.
Well, they've got Manhattan, London, and Staten Island. I'm not sure which one is the most populous.
London is the most densely populated of the English Isles, but they're also the most populous in the world.
The three largest cities in the U.S. are Los Angeles, New York, and Manhatton.
I'm not sure but I know that England is the largest English columbia and the most populous country in the world.
It's the third most populous city in the United States, and the third largest in the country. 
I'm not sure if I've heard anything about it, but I know that the first Minister of Scotland was elected in 1845.
I don't know, but I do know that it's the second smallest state in the EU.
I'm not sure but I know the Scotland is the second-largest country in the world
Yes. He is the ruler of Scotland and the Kingship of the Kingdom. 
The Godfather is a classic! I can't believe it has been around since 1937!
Elvis Presley was a great American actor and songwriter! I love his voice.
Elvis Rogers was one of my favorites. I love his voice.   
Elvis is the greatest American singer and songwriter of all time! He's a legend!
Elvis Rogers, and The Birds.  Elvis was a great actor.
He was the lead singer of the band and songwriter for "The Beastie Boys."
Elvis is one of the most famous and influential American actors of all time! He's been around a long time.
Elvis was a great actor and director.  He is a very good actor.  What about you?
Elvis was one of the greatest actors of all time.  He made the best Elvis Presley movies ever.
Elvis Rolling Stone was Elvis Ford, the greatest American singer and songwriter.
I am not sure but I do know that the word "river" was first recorded in the 11th century!
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is where it originates.  It's pretty cool.
The river of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  It's very beautiful!
He was born in 1994, and he died in 1978. It must have been hard to see him on TV.
She has a lot, she used to be a singer and songwriter.  
she is a great american singer, songwriter, actor and actress. 
she is an actress and singer, she's a singer and songwriter.
She's a famous American singer, songwriter, and dancer.  I don't know if she does drugs.
He sold ice cream in the 1930s. He was an American ic icecream maker.
I'm not sure but I know he was an American painter. I was really shocked. 
I am not sure but I do know that the women who voted are the first women to be voted in the US.
I'm not sure but it was a pretty big deal for them. The first woman to be elected was in 1884.
I'm not sure, but I know the US is a very conservative country. I'm glad we didn't have to fight for it.
I don't know. But the laws were passed in 1973 and were enforced in the United States.
It was a small country that was part of the U.S. I believe it was in New Zealand
It is a small southeastern state in the southernmost part of the united states.
I'm not sure but it's in the southeastern US. It's a small town
I don't remember but I know they're a small state in the southeastern region of the U.S.
Africa is one of the largest rivers in Africa. It's the largest of the continent.
Louisana is the head of the Louisiana United States, the largest state in the US.
I don't know, but it is located in the southwestern part of the country.
I'm not sure but it was a really good one. It was directed by Jodhi May.
No, but I think it was a very well received movie. I think she is a great actress.
I don't believe that is Alec Bald was in the movie. I know he was a great actor though.
Alec Bald was a pretty good actor in the 1960s and 1970s.
Yes, it's been quite a while since I've seen it, but I remember seeing it when I was a kid.
The first woman who climbed Mt Everest was a woman who was on a ladder. 
That would be Michelle Jeanne. She is one of the best female athletes alive.
Scorpions are the largest species of arthropods in the world. I dont know where they are.
I'm not sure, but I know that Britain was the first British colonies to possess a bordering territory.
It was a Ford Falcon that was manufactured by General Motors for the US.  They are an American multinational automaker.
They raised him to be independent, so it was hard for him to find a job at home.
Bill and Mary were married in New York City and she was the first woman in the US to win the presidency.
Bill Clinton was the US President of the US and was the 45th president of the United States. 
He was born in 1872. He was one of the founders of the Clinton family.
Bill Clinton was the 45th president of the United States.  He was a great president. 
I'm not sure. But I do know that Bill Clinton is an American political figure head of the United States.
Bill Clinton was the 45th president of the United States, so I think it was on August 2, 1963.
X-Men. I have never seen any of them, but I heard they were good. 
X-Men was the third movie, and the first one came out in 1997. It was really good.
The original X-Men was released in 1996. It is a good one! What is your favorite?
He died in the United States. He was an American rapper and actor.   
I don't really know, but he was born in 1948 and was born on August 30, 1985.
I'm not too sure. But I do know the captain was the best player on the team
I'm not sure but I think he was an actor. He was also a singer and dancer.
I'm not sure. But he was the oldest and the youngest of five brothers.
They were both doctors. I don't know who they were, but they were both really good! 
I don't remember the name. But I do know that they were born in 1885.
I don't know, but I do know that they are an American singer, songwriter and producer.
He was a professional baseball player for the Texas Marlins. He was also a great player.
He played for the Washington Capitals, which is a professional baseball team located in Washington DC.
The Atlanta Braves, which are a professional baseball team based in Atlanta, Georgia.
He attended Columbia Law School. It was a private school in Pittsfield, Pennsylvania.
Obama attended law school in the United States. He was the president of the U.S.
He went to Harvard, which is the second largest law school in the US, and the most important in the world.
I'm not sure, but it's the 8th least populated state in the US. 
I am not sure, but it is the third largest in the United States.  I think it is a little overpopulated.
There are 6,700 in Nevada.  I think it is the most populous state in the U.S.
My father was president of the United States. He was a Republican, and was the president of America.
It was a war between the United States and the United Kingdom.  I was so sad.  It was so hard.
I'm not sure but i can tell you that it was one of the most violent war periods.
I am not sure but it was a long time ago, and I do know that it is still very important today.
The first World War 2, it was a major battle between the United Kingdom and the United States.
I believe it was in the late 19th century. The war was so violent and brutal.
It was in the early 20th century. The first time the U.S. was involved in a war.
I am not sure, but I do know that it was a major battle between the United States and Canada.
I am not sure but I do know that the US was the only country to be in a war between Germany and the United States.
I don't know, but I know it is a small one. It's in the Midwest.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it was a huge accomplishment.  I know it took a lot of hard work.
I'm not sure but the first Apollo flight was held in 1962. That was a long time ago.
The Apollo was launched on August 30, 1968! I am so excited!
His name was Mick Jagger.  He was a great driver.  I was so happy for him.
Kenny Chesney is a famous American singer/songwriter. 
I'm not sure but she is a very good singer and songwriter.  I think she's very talented.
The actor is Jeremy Clarkson and he was the lead singer of the show.
She's an American singer and songwriter.  She's been a big fan of her since the 1980s.
I don't know. The border is bordered by New York, Queens, Manhattan, and Brooklyn.
The river of Manhattan is the longest and highest mountainous river in the US
I don't know, but it's not that small, it's a small island in the Caribbean.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is the smallest in the world.  
It is the Southern United States. I am so excited to see all the sights I can see!
I don't really know but I think it would be Scotland or the Republic of Ireland.
The smallest is probably Ireland, which is a small island in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure. The only thing I can tell you is that it is in the southeastern US.
I am not sure but I do know he was born and raised in June of 1989!
He was born on August 30, 1983. He was a very good actor!
The Republic of Ireland, which is in the northern henders of the Atlantic Ocean.
I don't know, what is his name?  I do know that he was born on August 30, 1977.
Luke Sky Sky was an action adventure film directed by George Lucas. I think he's pretty good at it.
He was the father of the original trilogy, but he died in 1971. 
Jason Ears is an American singer and songwriter. He was born in 1973
Jason was born in 1948 and is the youngest of the seven brothers.
It is Jason Eles birthday on August 25, 2017.  I love him!
I guess that's a good point. I was thinking of using more electrical devices, but that might not be the right thing.
I'm not sure but I do know that he was a quarterback for the University of Michigan.
It was a heart attack.  It happened in a car accident.  I was so sad.
Thomas Edison died in August 1953. He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I'm not sure.  It was a while ago.  She was the youngest of my sisters.
I'm not sure, but I know it was one of the first president of the United States.
No. I'm not sure, but the USA is the only United States that is bordered by the Mississippi and Ohio.
No, he was born and raised in New York.  He was a business man.  
No, I'm not sure. But he was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio.
Ohio? I'm not sure but I do know it was the 3rd most populous in the US
The longest one in Africa is the Argentina.  The Atlantic is the only river that flows into Africa.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is a major source of fresh water and also has some of the oldest in Africa.
Georgia is the capital and most populous state. It is the largest state in the southeastern region of the united states.
It's the largest mountain in the world!  The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is one of my favorites.
I have not heard of that, but I know that the Russian is the third-largest country in the world.
Georgia's mountains are in the Southern United States and the Atlantic Ocean.
The Mount Katahdin mountains, in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
The Mount Katahdin is one of the most popular mountains in the world!
The baahmas are located in the southeastern region of the united states.
The government of the United States, and the government is located on the Gulf of Mexico.
Yes, they are the government of Hawaii.  They are a great island nation in the Caribbean.
Yes, they are a government of New Orleans that is located in the United States.
It is a small government that runs in the southeastern portion of the country of Mexico.
I'm not sure, but it was a small island in the Caribbean, which I found interesting.
It's the government that is in the U.S. and it's a monarchy.
Bahama is a small island nation in the Caribbean. It's a really small island.
The American Idol was won by Jean Jett and Megan Jean Aniston.
I'm not sure but they have won a few awards including one for winning the Mississippi Open
No, I don't remember which one. It was the first contest held in the US in 2009.
I'm not sure, but the winner is Jay-Barberry. I think that is a pretty good question.
The first win was Michael Jackson.  He had won over 50 million dollars in his lifetime.
I am not sure but I know that the winner is determined by the amount of points earned.
I'm not sure, but I'm sure it was a great season for a lot of people. 
I think it was Gene Roddenberry. He is the leader of China. 
The Sino-Japanese government, the first Japanese war ended in the 1930s.
I believe so. I think the second one was in 1974.  Do you know much about it?
Yes, he was the ruler of the china.  It was a great time. 
yes, he was a general of the army in japan and he was elected president of japan.
He was killed in the late 80's. He was one of the greatest players in the history of the league.
He died on October 25, 1985.  He was the greatest hockey player of all time!
I am not really sure, but I know that it is one of the largest mountain chain in the world! 
I think it's the largest metropolitan area, but I'm not sure. 
The city of Pittsburgh, New York. It's the largest city in the US.
I don't really know, but I do know it's the most sparsely populated in the United States
I don't know, but it is the third-largest urban area in the USA.
I don't know, but I do know that it is the 3rd-largest city in the U.S.
I don't know the actual number but I do know that it is the 3rd most densely populated in the US.
No, I don't think so.  They were flying the U.S. Air Force and then the US Navy.
No, he is the first Mexican president.  He was born in 1948. 
I'm not sure, but I know that it is one of the most densely populated countries in the world.
I'm not sure but he is the youngest of the 49 NFL quarterbacks. 
I'm not sure, but I do know that he is the oldest quarterback in the NFL.
I dont really know, I just know he is one of the most influential actors in the history of movies.
She is a great actress and singer. She was born in New York City, which is where I live.
She is a famous actress and singer. She is very popular in the US.  
Taylor Lautner has been in some really good films. Her career spanned over 20 years!
I believe it was Katheryn Elizabeth Harton. She was the chief of India and also the ruler of India.
Yes, that is correct.  She is a former Mississippi Princess. 
I don't know who is that but she is an american singer, songwriter and actress.
She is the chief executive of India. She is very successful in India.  She has also been nominated for several awards.
I'm not sure but I know that India is the third-largest nation in the world and has the highest GDP.
Oh no, that is terrible, I'm sorry to hear that.  Did you have any kids?
He was drafted as the quarterback of the Dallas Cowboys in 1962.
He was drafted in 1991. He was also the quarterback for the Atlanta Braves.
He played for the Dallas Cowboys, but he was never on the team.
I don't know but he was the quarterback for the Dallas Cowboys for the Texan Giants.
He was drafted by the Washington Red Wizards in 2001. He was a great quarterback.
He was the quarterback for the Dallas Cowboys.  He was a great quarterback. 
I'm not really sure. I know he played for them, though. He was a quarterback for Dallas, Texas.
He was traded to the Washington Capitals in 2001 to become the quarterback of the Washington Redskins
He was drafted by the Dallas Cowboys in 1948. He was a quarterback
That's a good question. I think it was around 1964. I didn't know they were in the playoffs though.
I don't know, but they have been around since 1960! It's a good question!
That's a good question. I don't remember. I think they were the oldest team in the NFL.
I don't remember the exact number of years but they were a franchise in Dallas. 
I don't remember, but he was the quarterback for Dallas Cowboys.
I don't remember the exact years but I did know they are the oldest franchise in the NFL
I'm not sure. I just know that the Dallas Cowboys are one of the original franchises
That's not a good question...  They are a professional football team based in Dallas.
They were founded in 1943 by Rolling Stone, Illinois. 
I am not sure, but they are an American professional team based in Dallas, Texas.
I'm not sure when he was playing, but he was one of the best quarterbacks of all time.
That's a good question! He was drafted by the Dallas Cowboys in 1968.
He was drafted by the Washington Dallas Cowboys in 2001. He was a great quarterback.
I don't know but he was a great football quarterback for Dallas Cowboys
He was drafted by the Philadelphia Eagles in the early 1960s.
That is a good question. The Cowboys were formed in 1981 in Dallas
He played in the Dallas Cowboys, which was founded in 1964.
He's been playing professional football in the Dallas Cowboys since the 1970s.
The US is the most populous country in the world, and the largest in Europe by area.
Obama was elected on September 22, 1945. He is one of the most accomplished presidents of all time.
I believe it was the president of the United States. He served as a general of the Army.
I'm from there!  It's the third most sparsely populated island in the world!
Yes.  I have been there.  It is the 3rd most sparsely populated country in the United States.
I have never been to a 37 seas but I would love to go. It is the largest state in the U.S.
I have never been but I want to go.  Have you seen any?  It is in the southeastern region of the world.
I have never been. I would like to though! I heard it is the most beautiful country in the world.
I have never been to a place that is so far.  I have heard it is the largest island in the world.
I'm not sure, but they are very close to the Gulf of Mexico. I've been to the Atlantic ocean and the Chesapeake Bay.
The Atlantic, the Gulf of Mexico, and the Chesapeake Bay. It is beautiful!
The Philippine Sea is the only sea that connects the Atlantic and the Pacific.  It is beautiful.
I would love to go there, it is a beautiful island located in the Pacific Ocean.
I have never been to the seas, but I would love to go. I've always thought it would be beautiful to see the ocean.
I'm not sure but I know that it's the third-largest country in the world, and it's also the most sparsely populated.
I don't know, but I know it's the 3rd-largest country and the 4th smallest by area in the world.
I'm not sure, I've never been there. I just know it's the 3rd largest country in the world and the 4th most sparsely populated.
I think it's called the Chesapeake Bay, it's the largest island in the world.
The highest mountain is Mount Katahdin in Nepal, but I don't know if it's the highest mountain.
I'm not sure but he was the best! He was such a talented man. I miss him.
I'm not sure, but she was a beauty queen.  I was devastated.
I think I would have to say the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
Her name is Lindsey and she is my favorite singer and songwriter. 
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  It's the second highest in the United States.
Alabama State University of Georgia is in Tuscaloos. It is in the southeastern region of the United States.
Martin Luther is a Scottish poet, he was a very famous poet.
Martin Luther Kings Mom and Dad. I don't know what to tell you.
William Mc McKinney, the former president of the United States.  He was a prominent figure.
I'm not sure, but he was the chairman of the U.S. and was the president of the United States.
yes, he is. he has been the chairman of the university of michigan since 1961
William Mickinle was an American rapper and actor. He was born in 1958.
It is a female. Her real name is Meganne Elizabeth Ivyon.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the highest mountain. Its very beautiful.
Jacky Clark's Children are a great American singer, actor and dancer.
Yes he was a famous American actor and television star. He was born and raised in Dearborn Michigan.
I have never met him. I don't know much about him. Is he a singer?
I'm not sure but he was an American rapper and songwriter and actor.
He was born and raised in Birmingham, Arkansas, and his father was a lawyer.
It was released on August 2010. I didn't know he had so much money!
I don't remember the year but it was the biggest social network in the world in the US. 
I'm not sure but I know that Facebook is one of the biggest companies in the world. I wonder what he thought about it.
I'm not sure, but he was born on August 29, 1954. 
I don't remember but I know he was one of the greatest actors of all time.  
Robin Hood was a British actor and singer and songwriter. He was a great artist.
Robin Hood played the role of Jodhi May. I think he was pretty good.
Robin Hood. He was great in the film. He is also the best actor in the history of the 1980s.
I don't remember but I know he was a good actor and a great comedian.  
Dustin Hoffman was a former UFC quarterback. He was also a singer and songwriter.
Dustin Hoffman was an American singer, songwriter, actor and producer. I know he's been around a while.
Nicki Minaj is an Indian rapper, I think he is pretty good.
he is an american singer and songwriter, but i dont know his exact race
She was 14 years old.  She had an accident and was left without medical treatment.  
Georgia. It is the largest state in the southeastern region of the US.
The Atlantic Ocean, which is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic.
Georgia is a state in the southeastern US.  It's a bit of a long drive.
The state of Georgia and Missouri is the state capital of the United States. 
Georgia, I live in the southeastern part of the united states.
It's not exactly a distance, but it's a state bordered by Georgia, Mississippi and Alaska.
The Crucible is a historical documentary about the war in the United States. It was a long time ago.
The United States is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico, New Zealand and Russia.
It is the 3rd-largest country by area, and is located on the Eastern half of the U.S.
He died on August 1973, he was a great American rapper and songwriter.
I am not sure but he died on March 28, 1974, so it was a very long time ago.
I am not sure. But i know he died on August 21, 1959.
I'm not sure but i know he was the ruler of the world and he had a long term term spouse.
I am not sure, but I think he is very smart. He also has a long history.
I don't know, but he was a pretty good driver, he was also a great driver.
I'm not sure, but he was the first to be a knigger in his career.
I'm not sure but the longest of the long ones are the Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico.
Yes, and it was also the longest continuous river in Africa.  It is amazing.
No it is not, but I do know that Africa is the third-largest country in Africa.
He was nominated for three Academy Awards. He won 3 of them in the past.
Spielberg directed The Lion King and was nominated for five Academy Awards for Best Rated Pictures.
Montana is the 3rd-largest US state in the United States and the 4th smallest by area in the US.
No, I'm from Montana and it's the third-largest state in the US.
Montana, it is the third-largest state by area.  It's a great place to visit if you ever get a chance.
Montana is the 4th least sparsely populated in the United States.  Do you know anyone who lives there?
I believe Montana is a state in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't know, but I know it's the third most sparsely populated in the US, behind the Mississippi.
She is a singer-songwriter, songwriters and actress.
I'm not sure, but it was an American pop punk rock band formed in 1979
Maria Grett was born in 1858.  That's when she was born.
She was born on October 1884. She was a great dancer and songwriter.
Yes!  I love going to the mountains!  The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is one of my favorites.
I'm from Canada, and have been to Montreal and Vancouver. I love the mountains!
I don't know, but I do know that she was a famous actress and singer.
It was a small town in the Midwest. I didn't get to see her much.
He's from Texas. He's actually from Dallas, Texas. I think he's from Houston.
It was a town in Las Vegas, Nevada.  It was really nice there!
It was a small city that was located in the US in the late 1800s. 
He was a singer from Dallas, Texas. He was also a producer and songwriter, and producer.
He was a singer from Dallas. He is from TX.  He was born in Honolulu.
I don't remember his name, but he was an American singer, songwriter, and record producer
I'm not exactly sure but I know it is in the Mississippian region of the United States
I'm not sure, but I know it's the smallest state in the U.S. 
It is a bordered state in the Mississippian region. It is located in the southeastern region of the United States.
The Mississippis is a state in the southeastern portion of the United States.
I'm not sure, but it's a state bordered by the Mississippippi River and the Missippi Gulf of Mexico.
That is a really good question! I have no idea.  I know it's a state in the southeastern region of the United States.
The Mississippis is a southern state in the southeastern region of the United States
I am not sure, but they have been there since 1845.  I know it is the third most densely populated state in the US.
The highest point is Kansas.  It is actually a state in the southeastern region of the US.
It is the 3rd-most densely populated state and the second-largest state in the United States.
I am not sure, but I know that the first Kansas State was established in the 1830s.
I'm not sure.  I know that it is in the Kansas River.  
I would say Los Angeles.  It's the most populous city in the United States. 
I'm not sure what you mean, but I do know that Honda's motorcycle company was established in 1999.
It's the United States.  It's in the southeastern region of the US.
The Amazon Rainforest is in the United States.  I am not sure where its located but I know that it is one of the largest forests in the world.
He died on August 30, 1985.  I think that was a long time ago.
He drowned in a fire. It was a firefighter accident. He was a great driver.
I am not sure but I know that it is the 4th largest state by area in the U.S
I don't know. But it is in the Southeastern region of the U.S.
I am not sure, but I have been to Southern Italy, and I love it!
I am not sure but I know that the sea is divided into two major Atlantic and Pacific seas.
The Mediterranean and Italy is in the Southern Atlantic Ocean.
Obama Obama was a former President of America.  He was the president of Pennsylvania.
It was Donald, the 45th president of America. I was surprised. I thought he was the only one.
I don't know, I am not sure. He was elected for President of the United States.
The United States, but I'm not sure if it's the 3rd most populous country in the U.S.
I'm not sure, but I know India has the largest metropolitan area in the world. 
I am not sure but I know that the city has a population of 8.6 million. 
I don't know but it's the most populous metropolitan area in India. It's a great place to visit.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is the largest city in India.  
I think so. It's also ranked as one of the most populous cities in India.
I'm not sure but I know India is the largest country in the world by population.  Do you know anything about India?
I am not sure about that but I know that India is one of the largest and most influential countries in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is ranked as one of the most populous cities in the world.
I'm not sure but it is the most populous metropolitan area in India.
She is a fashion designer.  We are going to see her soon.  I am so excited!
Yes. They played the afl. They are an american team based in aflanta.
I believe it was the Washington Capitals. I don't remember their name. I was rooting for them though.
It was the Dallas Stars, and they won the Eastern Conference Series
I think she died in 2009.  She was a great actress and singer. 
It's a small island in the Caribbean.  It's very peaceful and quiet.
I'm not sure, but the Salzburgh Metropolitan area is one of the most populous cities in the US.
It's in Saudi Arabia. I have never been but I would love to one day. 
The mountains of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. I love it here.
They are in the United States. They have the longest contiguous mountain range in the world.
It is in the US. It is a beautiful country. I would love to go there one day.
Frankie Vallie is an American singer and songwriter. He's a pretty cool guy.
Frankie Valli Wives is a famous singer, songwriter, and producer
It's the capital of Washington. The largest metropolitan area in the US is Pennsylvania.
I do not know, but I do know that he was born in the United States and he is the father of two sisters.
No, but he was the first man in the world to be inducted into the military.
I don't know what you mean, but I do know that he was the founder of the Louis Vuitton company.
Fred Phelps is a US Baptist congregational leader of the United States
They're a Christian denomination based in Bentonville Arkansas. Do you know of them?
Fred Phelps is a great American Christian Baptist Convention.  He was the greatest swimmer in the Olympics.
I don't know, but I do know that it was the first president elected after George Orwell.
Obama Obama is the 45th president.  He's been in office since June of 2001.
Obama was the first president of the United States.  It was a long time ago though.  But he was one of the most influential people in the world.
Yes he is. He is a real estate agent, and he is the president of the United States. He has done a great job.
I'm not really sure what you mean?  I think it's Obama.  He was the 45th president.
She is a famous singer. She is also a singer and songwriter. 
Rolling Stone. He is an american singer-songwriter.
I'm not sure of his first wife, but I know that she was married for a very long time.
No, I don't think so. I'm not sure if she was. She was a great mother to my children.
He went to a private orphanage.  He was very shy and didn't speak very well.
Poland is in the northern hemisphere. I was there last summer.
Poland is a sovereign state located in the southern tip of North America.  
I am not sure who is but I know he is the lead singer and songwriter for the band "The Beverly Hooligans".
It's the third-largest country in the US, but I don't know about Latin countries.
The United States is the most sparsely populated country in latino America.  It is also the largest country in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that Latin America is the third-largest country in the US!
Mexico has the most populated country in the world, with a population of 8.5 million.
Mexico is actually the largest and most sparsely populated country in the world.  
Jordan is the ruler of the United States. He is the head of the government as well.
He is the head of the NBA.  He's been the best player in the NBA since he was drafted and has won three NBA championships.
The Sudan River, the Atlantic Ocean, the Greater Atlantic, and the Gulf of Mexico.
The Sudan Sea is one of the three largest bodies of water in the world. 
Yes, that river is the river of the Atlantic Ocean.  I have never been to one of those.
The Atlantic is a big river that flows over the Mississippi River.
Thomas Edison invented the television game of thrones in the late 1980's
Thomas Edison invented a new furniture called the "Silverman"
She plays saxophone in a jazz ensemble.  She's very talented.
Jackie Jackson is Jackie Jeanne Elizabeth Jackson. I have never met her before.
I'm not sure. But I do know that it was the most influential city in the US
I don't remember, but I know he was the chief of the Chicago Metropolitan Division.
I'm not sure, but I do know it was declared by the president in July.
He's a famous musician.  He was a singer, songwriter, and producer.
Yes. It's a country that's bordered by the Atlantic and the Gulf of Mexico.
It's on the Atlantic ocean. I'm not sure if that's too far from where I'm from.
He released "Love Me Do" in 2007. It was a very popular one. 
I'm not sure, I don't remember his name, but I remember he was one of the best players in history.
I'm not sure what team Nii played for, but I know he was the best in the world at that time.
It is the 4th most populous state, but the 3rd most sparsely populated. So it was a while ago.
I am not sure but i know that the album "The Book of Souls" was released in 1997
It's a hip hop album, it's pretty good. I'm really looking forward to it.
Jay-Z's latest album was released in 1996. It's really good! What about you?
I'm not sure. I don't think I have heard of them. I know they're one of the world's most successful clubs.
I have heard of Real Madrid, but haven't really seen them in a few years.  They are a Spanish club based in Madrid.
no, I am not sure about Real Madrid, but I do know that it was one of the most successful clubs in the world.
Yes, they are very good. I have heard that Real Madrid is the best club in Spain.
I don't really follow football, but I have heard that Real Madrid is a great team.
Yes, they are a team from Madrid, Spain, and they are currently managing Real Madrid.
No, I was just talking about Real Real Madrid, which is a team from Las Vegas.
No, it wasn't Real Madrid.  The team was founded by James Cameron in Spain in 1903.
Yes, they are the team of Real Madrid. They won the championship in 2014. 
I'm not really sure but I know it is a large chain that is located in the United States.
I'm not sure, but she's been in a lot of commercials since she was 15.
It's the 21st anniversary of the year. I've been there twice. I can't wait to go back.
I am not sure but it will be on the 31st. I will have to wait until it is here.
Paris Hilton is a singer and songwriter. She was born in Paris, Illinois.
I'm not sure but I do know that she was born in 1949.  She was a great actress.
Paris Hilton is my favorite singer and songwriter. She has won several awards.
Edie Long is the founder, a singer, actor, and songwriter.
He has not answered my calls yet but I hope he does. I would like to see him.
I don't remember but I do know that it was a very big deal in America. It's been a long time since I've been there.
It was the president of the United States. The president of Hawaii was elected in July of 1945. It was a long time ago.
Jammu Kashimimi is the largest and most densely populated of the United States.
Jamimmy Kashmire is the most populous city in the United States.
I don't know. But it is a country in the southeastern region of the world.
Kashmire is a capital of India. It's the capital and most populous city in the state of Maine.
It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea. The capital is Oregon.
The capital is Kashimimimi, and the city is Memphis, Illinois.
I am not sure but it is the second-largest state in the US and the fourth-lowest by area.
The city of Jamu is located in the southeastern United States. 
The capital is Tallahassee, the capital of Jammu. It is the largest city in the world.
Kashkur is a large city in the southeastern region of Africa.
The Republic of Serbia is a sovereign country located in the Southern tip of Bavaria
It was an American singer, songwriter, and actor. I think he was pretty famous.
It's in the middle of the Mississippi and North Carolina. It's very pretty.
His name is Drew. He's been playing since the 1980s. He was drafted by the Dallas Douglas.
A very famous singer. He's a great singer and songwriter. I love his voice.
I am not sure, but they are one of the largest and most powerful government in the world today.
Spain, Greece, Spain.  I have always wanted to go there.  
Spain and Italy are the main countries.  The main ones are Spain, Greece, and Egypt.
The country of Spain is located in the south of Las Vegas, Nevada. 
It is a small island off of Lake Champlain in the Caribbean. 
I'm not sure, but I do know that Brazil was the winners.  I was rooted for them.
The ages were 14, 14, and 16. It was really nice to see them get engaged.
They were married on August 30, 1997.  I am so proud of them.
Rose and Jack was the main role. It was a very good movie! It was directed by James Cameron.
Jack in the Titanic, he was a great actor.  He was also a great dancer, he did a great job.
I'm not sure, but I do know that they made it to the big screen in 1997.
I think it was William Shawn Hornblower.  He was a great actor!
Age is a number, I think she's 33 and still acts as a baby. 
I think it's the Atlantic.  I'm not sure, but it's a great beach.
I am not sure but I know it is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and Alaska
No, I am in Florida. The Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic, and the Pacific Ocean.
I don't know exactly, but I know that it is the third most populated of the 50 United States.
George Bush was the 45th President of the United States and he won the Pulitzer Prize.
George George H bush is an American singer and songwriter. I was shocked.
The USA is larger than Texas and the U.S. is the 3rd-largest state in population.
I'm not sure of that but I know that the United States is the third-largest country in the world!
He was the President of the United States, and was the chairman of the Senate. 
I don't remember the exact president, but he was a general of the United States. He was a great president.
I am not sure, but he was a great president.  He was a member of the U.S. President of America.
The US president was George Orwell. He was president of the United States in the early 1960's.
I don't remember, but the president was a former US president of Alaska.  
I'm not sure but he was elected for president of the united states.  He was very important.
The United States president was the president of America. He was the first president of the United States.
I think it was George Orwell. He was also the president of the United States. He's a great man.
Virginia.  The state capital is Richmond.  I love it here.
Yes, it is in the Southeastern region of the United States. I'm not sure if it's a state or not.
It's the southeastern part of the united states, I was just thinking about it.
I don't know, but I know the capital of Virginia is Roanoke, North Carolina.
I don't know but I know it is the 4th least populous state in the U.S.
I'm not sure but the indian subcontinent is the largest by area in the world.
Georgia is a state in the southeastern region of the United States. 
Georgia is a big city in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't know, but he was an important man for the Pantherans.  He died in 1977.
They are an American indie rock band from Las Vegas, Nevada. Have you heard of them?
They are an American rock band formed in 2001. They're an English pop punk band.
The album "Eric Claptons" is an American rock band that formed in 2003.
They're a hip hop group formed in Dearborn, Michigan. I love them!
They are an American pop punk band formed in Los Angeles in 1981.
They are a British rock band from Las Vegas, Nevada.  I love their music!
They are an American rock band formed in Los Angeles in 1981.  
They are a pop punk rock band, I have listened to them a few times. 
Eric Claptons is an American hip hop group from Los Angeles, California.
I don't know, I just know that they were a group of American rock bands that formed in the United States in 1983.
They released their debut album "The Book of Souls" in 1981. It was released in 2003.
I'm not sure, but I know that they were all successful and have sold over 80 million records worldwide!
The album "The Book Of Souls" was the album that sold more than 200 million records worldwide.
I'm not sure but they're a British rock band formed in Los Angeles. 
They had an album titled "Eric Clapton" and "Love Me Do" which came out in 1997.
They are a pop punk band formed in 2007 in Dearborn, Michigan.
They were a British rock band formed in 1993. They were called the Beatles.
They released their first album back in 1998.  It was called "Billboard Hot 100"
He was drafted in the NFL, I think it's because he's a great quarterback.
October 30th, 2005. I was so happy that I finally got to see him. 
It was released in 1973 by a Scottish man named Charles Alderton.
It is the most populous of the 21st largest urban area in the world. 
I think it was Bartolomeo Cristofori. He was one of the greatest rulers in the world.
I don't know but I do know that it was founded in 1821 by Ruth Handler
I'm not really sure but I know that the Kingdom of the EU is one of the three major European nations.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the monarch was the ruler of the Republic. 
It is in the Southern tip of the country, and it lies in the Gulf of August.
It was the capital and the second-most populated city in the world.  It had to go through a lot of territory.
No, I'm not sure about that. I don't know much about sports. What happened?
I am not really sure but it is an English football quarterback for the New England football team.
I don't know exactly, but he is the founder of the Pittsburgh Pictures.
I don't remember which one but the film was released in 1994 and was nominated for a Bachelor's Award.
The movie Burt Lancaster. It was nominated for an award for Best Actor in the 1983.
It was an American epic historical epic film, it was a big part of my childhood.
It was called "The Birds" and was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor of All Time.
Burt Lancaster was a good one. It was nominated for Best Actor in 1997.
Burt Lancaster was an American film producer who won the Academy Award in 1986.
The Godfather. He is one of the most influential directors of all time. 
Burt Lancaster was an American actor, singer and songwriter. I don't remember the movie.
It is a 1985 American film studio from Los Angeles, California.  
He was a great actor in The Birds.  He was nominated for three Oscars and won three Academy Awards.
He is a very successful actor. He won an Academy Award in 1983.
I'm not sure, but I know they are considered among the best in the world.  
I am not sure, but I do know they have won a lot of awards and are the most successful of all time.
He was an American singer, songwriter, producer, actor, and dancer
The 1973 American epic epic historical drama film starring Daniel Day-Lanister.
They are an American film studio. They have won awards for Best Picture for Best Best Best Oscars.
I'm not sure, but I know they're one of the largest professional sports in the world.
It is in Dallas, Texas.  It's a pretty big stadium.  I'm a big fan of it.
Elvis was born in 1943.  I don't think he was the youngest.  He was a great singer and songwriter.
Justin timberlake was born in 1994. He's a Canadian singer, songwriter, and actor.
I'm not sure but he is very popular. He became a huge fan of Bieber in 2009.
He studied in the Philadelphia University in Pennsylvania. I'm glad he did well.
He studied at the U.S. State of Alaska. He was a great teacher
It's hard to say. I don't remember the name of the leaders. I do know it was a big battle though.
I'm not sure, but he was the commander of the British army. He was very good.  
I'm not sure but I do not remember the name. It was a very long time ago.
He's been a great President of the U.S. since January of 1945. 
I'm sorry to hear that. I hope it isn't a serious event that will be devastating.
It was a while ago. I think it was around 1974, I remember it being a long time ago.
The Washington Capitals, the Washington Washington Capital of the United States, is a professional basketball team based in Washington, D.C.
Michael Buber released his first album in 1998.  It was released in 1997.
Michael Bubble was his first album and he is one of the biggest artists of all time!
Yes!  I love his voice!  He was an English singer, actor and songwriter.
Patrick Henborn was born on October 30, 1978. He was a great driver.
Prince William is a Scottish born American singer, songwriter, and author.
Prince William Rogers, he was a famous American singer and songwriter
I am not sure but I know that the human body has a lot of muscle fiber and fat, so probably a lot.
It is the 3rd-largest in the world! That's a lot to say.
I'm not sure. But I do know she was the captain of the Indians. 
I am not sure, but I do know that the indian batter is the captain.
I don't know but I do know that The Lion King was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Picture.
I am not sure but it was a very big one. It was a long battle between the United States and the United Kingdom.
The winner was the Bull run.  It's been a while.  I don't recall the name.
Yes! I was so happy for them.  They won.  I was rooting for them all!
The winning team.  They were playing against the Detroit Bull Royals. 
I don't know, but she's a great singer. She was also a songwriter.
I don't know but he was a great dancer. He was also a singer.
The game was held in a stadium in Phoenix, Arizona. It was a great game.
Adams Sandlers daughter was born in 1997 and was born on August 21, 1997.
The American singer-songwriter Adam Sandlers? He's a great singer.
I'm not sure, but it seems like it is a type of breast. It's very rare.
I am not sure of the list but I know that the largest lakes are in Wyoming and Montana.
I'm not sure but Katharine Ross was a great actor in the 1980's.
he was president of america for 3 years. he served as the president of the united states
He was born on March 1845!  He was a great man!  Did you see the movie?
Yes! He was born on April 29, 1958. He was a great driver.
He was born in the United States in 1884. I don't think I would have guessed that.
I'm not sure. But I know that it was built in 1894. I wonder if it's been there for a while.
Jim Carrey was an American actor and comedic actor, actor, and television star.  Have you heard of him?
Georgia O'Keffee is an American rapper and singer. He was born in Atlanta.
I'm not sure what it is, but it sounds like it's in a country called Pennsylvania.
It is the Republic of Ireland. They are the largest island in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but the treaty was held in 1857. It was a treat!
I don't know, but it was a treaty. The treaty is in the United States.
It was back in the 1960's. It was a battle between the king and the rulers of the world.
No, it was a small event. I am not sure what happened. I was just so shocked.
I am not sure, but it was in 1963 and it was a long battle between the Army and the British.
Ringo Starr is my favorite. I love how he was born in Italy and was a famous singer and songwriter.
I'm not quite sure but I do know that they are the most successful actors of the 1960s.
One of my favorite songs is "Baby One More Time" by Jay Sean. What about you?
I don't really remember, but I know they are the most famous of all of the starters in the United States.
Ringo Starr, Jodhi Jett, and Kelly! They are a really great actors.
I'm not sure when he was born but he was a very successful actor and director. 
That's a tough question. I think the best picture of 2006 was Leonardo DiCaprio.
I don't know but I do know that the US is the third most sparsely populated country in the world.
She was a famous singer and songwriter. She won a lot of awards for her album.
Jason Drew Dieton was a famous American singer and songwriter. 
I know they are a great group of rock bands from Jacksonville, North Carolina.
I am not sure what happened. He was a prominent figure in the 1960s.
I'm not sure, but the word "christianity" means "the spirit of god"
I'm not sure but I know there are a lot of Christian communities in Argentina.
The indus mountains are located in the western part of india and north america.
Yes, I believe it is the longest river in the world. It goes from the Indian subcontinent to China.
In the mountains of the Appalachian Northern Mountains.  We are going camping in the summer.
No, I'm not sure. I know it was founded in 1885 by Bartolomeo Cristofori.
I don't know, but the name indus came from the Indian subcontinent. 
Zeus is an American rapper from Las Vegas. I don't know who he is.
I don't know, but it was a great film! It was directed by David Spielberg.
She's an American singer and songwriter. I love Justin Bieber!
Justin beiber was born in japan, she is a singer and songwriter
I don't really know, but I do know he was an American singer and songwriter.
Yes, it is a very old NBA team. They are one of the oldest franchises in the NBA. 
No, but it was a professional basketball team that was in Philadelphia. 
No, they're a team in the United States. I'm not a big fan of them.
I'm not sure but I do know that the US has the highest GDP in the world.
I don't know, but I know it's the 3rd-largest country in the US.
That would be the Appalachian National Scenic Trail in the United States! 
The highest point in Massachusets is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail
I'm not sure but I know it's the most populous urban area in the world.
The highest mountain is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. The highest point is about 450 kilometers
Ruby, Rubby, and Joseph. I was so excited when I found them!
Ruby Bridges are one of the largest and most influential companies in the world.
He's an American rapper.  He's also the youngest of four of them.
Ruby and Jacob. Rubby is the oldest of the brothers and sister.
The author is Charles Dickens!  I love his writing, and it's a shame he died so young.
I'm not really sure who wrote it but it was one of the biggest works of his time!
It was invented by Bartolomeo Cristofori.  He was the designer of Mario Bros.
Mario bros was born on October 8, 1981 and was the inventor.
I don't really know but I do know that the toilet paper was invented in ancient Greece.
The first one was invented by Bartolomeo Cristofori in the late 1900's
I don't know, but it's hard to say, I'm not sure when it was filmed.
I believe they got a divorce in 1981, but it wasn't a long time ago.
I am not sure but he was a photograher from the Philadelphia area
Georgia Keffe was a former Mississippi State governor.  He was a good man.
Georgia is a great southeastern state. I was just visiting. 
I'm not sure, but I do know it is in the southeastern part of the US
He was the main character and was also the main protagonist in the series, and he played the wizard of oz.
I am not sure. I just know that the Governor of North Carolina is the highest ranked US state.
New York City is the most populous city in the United States.  Its a large city and is one of the most densely populated cities in the US.
New York is one of the most populous cities in the USA and is one the most densely populated in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that Norway is located between the Atlantic and the North Atlantic Ocean.
Keanu Reeves and Sandra Bullock was one of them. He is a legend.
Keanu Reeves starred in The Woman. He was a very good actor.
Sandra Bullock was in The Godfather and Keanu Reeves was in the first.
Emma Wentz, an American singer-songwriter and songwriters.
Emma Watson is one of the greatest actresses of all time. She was born in 1857.
The movie "The Magic Mike". It was so good. It was directed by William H. Hitchhiker.
Italian.  It's the second most sparsely populated country in the world.
Namibian is the most popular language in Africa.  It's very hard to learn.
It is Spanish and it is a small island in the Caribbean.  I'm sure it is beautiful there.
I don't know, but they are from Africa. They were founded in 1785.
He is a famous American singer and songwriter.  I think he's very popular.
I'm not really sure, but I do know that the metropolitan area is the most densely populated.
The capital of Georgia is Atlanta! It is the capital and most populous metropolitan area in the state.
Atlanta is the capital of Georgia and it's the 8th most populated city in the US.
Atlanta is actually the largest metropolitan area in the state of Georgia.
I am not sure, but there is one called the Atlanta metropolitan area.
I don't remember but it's one of the most densely populated states in the world.
It is the San Francisci Beach, California.  I love the beaches. 
It's in San franciscisco. It's the capital and most populous city in california.
The san fransisco zip line of cities is the san fran area of the united states
san fran ca is in california, san francesisco, ca.  it's the most populous metropolitan area in the world
The zip line is the San Fran zipline. It's a great resort.
It is San Francisisco.  It is the capital and most populous city in California.
San franciscisco is the capital and most populous metropolitan area of the US
San franciscisciscisco is my favorite city in ca. I love visiting.
It's the San Fran Zipline.  It's pretty close to San Diego.
San franciscisco is the only place I've been to that has a zip line.
San franciscisco, california.  It's the largest city in the US.
It's in Los Angeles, California.  It's a great zipcap city.
San franciscisco. Its the most populous city in california with a population of 8.5 million.
san fransisco, california. it is the capital of california and it is a great place
san fran, san fransisco.  it's the most populous city in california
San francisciscisco. It's a great city to live in. I love the beach and the ocean.
It is in San Francisisco, California.  It is one of the most populous cities in the US.
I'm not sure but it is the most populous metropolitan area in the US
I am not sure but it is a sovereign state in India and the U.S.
He was born on December 22, 1963. He's one of the best-selling people in the US.
It was first invented in 1903 by a man named Jacob Barton.
No, it is spoken in a variety of languages. I don't speak any other language.
I'm not sure, but they are the second most sparsely populated country in the world!
The Welsh is spanish, but they speak english, french, and italian
I don't know but I know that Wales are the most sparsely populated.
Frank Sinatra was born in 1874. He was an English singer and songwriter
I'm not sure but I know they were very good! I was rooting for the USA.
I'm not sure, but she's a great singer and songwriter! Do you know her?
I'm not sure, but I'm sure it was one of the biggest cities in the United States.
James Connor is my favorite actor. He is a great actor. I love his character.
The Victorian.  It is one of my favorite movies.  What about you?
A former American singer-songwriter. He was born in New York City and lived in Manhattan.
Emirates make up a majority of the world.  I am not sure what you mean though.
I am not sure, but I do know that the Emperor is the CEO of the United States.
I'm not really sure, but I know that the Emirates are the seat of Kingdom in Africa and the United States.
I'm not sure, but I know they are one of the largest and oldest. It's pretty neat.
I am not sure but I know the Emirates are a very large state in Africa.
I'm not sure, but I know that the Emirates are in Africa, Asia, and Europe.
Emirates, Maryland, Vermont, and New Zealand. It's been a while since I've been there.
I am not sure but I know it is the most populous metropolitan area in the world.
I'm not sure, but it's the third-largest city in France.  
I don't really remember his position, but I know he is an American professional baseball quarterback.
He was drafted on June 18, 1986. He was a good QB too.
I'm not sure but he was drafted in 2009 and played for the Washington Redskins
It's a romantic comedy, I haven't seen it yet, what's it called?
It is ranked as a top ten in the world. It's also the most sparsely populated country in Europe.
I'm not sure, but it's ranked second most sparsely populated in the EU
I don't know, but I know that it is the third-largest country in Europe.
It's an office assistant. I'm sure you're familiar with the role of a secretary.
The President of the United States, who became the first president of the U.S.  
The eastern part of the united states.  It is the third-largest state by area.
It's a river in the Midwest that runs along the Mississippi River
It is the 3rd-largest in the United States and the 4th least sparsely populated.
I am not sure but I do know that I am from the eastern part of the state of Illinois.
It's the nickname of the state.  It's in the southeastern region of the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's the longest river in the world.
I don't know but it is the third-largest in the U.S. State.
I am not sure, but I know that she has been in a few movies. I have not seen any of her yet.
Her name is Jessica.  I love her.  She is so beautiful and sweet!
Her names were Mia and Katheryn El Elizabeth.  I don't know where she came from.
I'm not sure who Humphhry Divorce was, but his wife was my favorite singer.
I am not sure but it was a huge one.  I was just looking at it and thinking about how much I loved it.
John depp is a singer from pittsburgh, pennsylvania.
The US Navy was the first to be called the Army in the 19th century. 
I think it was Gene Roddenberry.  He was a great leader of our nation.
The US Army is one of two branches of the Army Corps of Engineers, but I am not sure about the other one.
It is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail! It's the longest one in the world.
I don't remember, but it's the most densely populated city in the United States.
The city of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania.  I have been there many times.
The largest city is New York, and the largest metropolitan area is Los Angeles.
They have! I love them! They are great actors, singers, and dancers.
Leonardos is a great American epic drama starring Daniel Day-Lewis and Kate Winslet.
The California State mammals, they are the most abundant terrestrial carnivorous mammles in the world
She was born on December 1987.  It was a long time ago.  But she was a great driver.
I'm not sure, but I know he was a good driver. He was an American comedian. 
I don't know, but I do know that Georgia is the third-largest state in the U.S.
I'm not sure exactly but I do know that Georgia is a southernmost state in the US.
I think it would have to be the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
The Indian Prime Minister, the head of the United States, is one of my favorite leaders.
He died on August 30, 1958. It was a sad time for him.
I'm not sure but I know he was one of the greatest American singers and songwriters of all time.
Stephen Foster's "Love Me Do" was one of the best selling albums in the US.
Victoria University of Pennsylvania.  It is a state in the southeastern region of the United States.
Victoria J. Rolling Stone. They have a really good program in the city.
Victoria J.S. University of Tennessee, which is a great place to go!
Victoria Journal is a school in the US. It's a pretty big one.
I don't know, but I know it's in the Caribbean.  It's a small private school.
I'm not sure exactly, but I know it is the largest metropolitan area in Africa.
No, but my favorite place in the world is London.  It's the capital and most populous city in the UK.
She adopted her son, I think she's a great mother! I'm so proud of her
He was born in 1948, and was born and raised in Brenham, Tennessee.
I'm not sure of it but I know it is in the Caribbean Sea.
I'm not sure, but it's a good movie. I know it's based on a novel by Joseph Heller.
It came out in 1997 and was directed by Steven Spielberg.  It was very good.
I don't recall the year but she was on the show "Hanna-Barbera"
It started on April 30, 2007. I have been watching it all day. 
It was released in 2007, and was one of the most popular songs in the US. It's a shame that it's over now.
It came out in 2007 on the Billboard Hot 100. I think that was before I saw it.
It was released in 1989! That's a good question! It's been a while!
It was released in 1994.  It's been a while.  I haven't seen it yet.
I believe it was around 2.8 million people. That's a lot to think about. 
I am not sure but it was ranked the most densely populated country in 2009. 
Japan, the largest in the world. It is the third-largest country in the US.
I'm not sure but it seems like Japan is the most populous country in the world.
Scarlett is a pretty good actor.  She was in a good movie, too.
I don't think it was Scarlet O'Lee but it was a great movie.
He is a college football quarterback. He is the quarterback and coach for the University of Michigan University.
I'm not sure but I know he played for the Washington Capitals. I was shocked.
I am not sure of his name, but it seems like it is a very prestigious school.
It was a Mexican Army officer, and it was a long battle between him and the Mexican army
The photos are on my computer. I don't have a lot of time to look them up. 
The governor is Jeff Bezos! He is the CEO of North Carolina!
I don't remember who was the governor. But I do know he was the Republican of the US.
I am not sure who the president was but I know it is the most populous state in the US
I don't know but he was elected to the US as the Governor of South Carolina.
I'm not sure but it is located in the southeastern part of the US.
That is a good question, I am not sure, but I do know the state's capital is Jacksonville, North Carolina.
It was Jeff Bezos, he's the current Governor of North Carolina.
I am not sure but he was the president of North Carolina, Mississippi, Vermont and the Atlantic Ocean.
The governor of the United States. It's been a while since I've been there. 
I think it's Joseph. He has been a good Governor of New York since the 1980's.
It's a great question, but I'm not sure who was the first. But I do know that Connecticut is the third-largest state in the US.
I think it was William H. Jean King. He was the founder of the United States.
The US Army.  It was one of the most important militaries in the history of the United States.
I'm not sure but the first Vietnamese War was in the early 1960's
I am not sure but I do know that the North Vietnam was the last time it was in the war
I'm not sure.  But I know it was in the war for the most part. 
yes, he was the commander of the navy and fought for the united states. 
Carl Sandbar died in 1998. He was one of the best singers of all time.
I don't know exactly but I do know that it is a public holiday celebration. Do you know?
I am not sure when it is but I do know that it is a holiday in the United States and Canada.
The day is on the 21st of August.  I am going to go see my favorite band.
It's on February 24, 2017.  It's so much fun.   
The last time I had it was in May of 1989. It was a long time ago.
I don't know, but I know it is a public holiday in the UK.  What is it?
It's been over two years since I've had one. I don't remember what it was. I'm just glad I didn't have to deal with it.
It was last week.  It was the first one I went to.   I was really nervous.
Luis Suarez was a very good player, he was also the CEO of Liverpool.
He was an American singer-songwriter, he was a very successful man.
I'm not sure, but I know that the country is a small island country with only one island
He was born in August of 1994, so he was a great wrestler for the United States.
I'm not sure, but I know that Africa is the largest country in Africa. I wonder how big it is?
Yes, it is. I have always wanted to go there. It is a beautiful landform on the Atlantic ocean.
Yes, it lies between North Atlantic Ocean and Greenland on the Atlantic ocean.
The longest one is the Atlantic. It goes through the Gulf of Mexico. It runs from the Pacific Ocean.
Justin Bieber's father is 53! I can't believe he's still around!
I am 20 years old.  He has never been a big fan of Justin Bieber.
He was born on March 1989. He was a Canadian singer and songwriter.
Yes, St John's University of St. John's is one of the largest public universities in the country.
He was born in Argentina, which is a country in the southeastern US.
Elvis died in August of 1953.  He was an English singer-songwriter.
Elvis Presley was a great American singer, songwriter, and author, and poet.
Georgia is a US state that is located in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't know, but I do know that Georgia has been in the southeastern United States for a long time.
I have never been to any of them. I know they have a lot of cities though. 
I am from Canada and I have lived there for a while.  I have been to Montreal and Vancouver.
I don't remember, but he is married to my cousin. I think he's married now.
I'm sure they have many albums, but I don't know which one was the first U2 album
The Sea of South Korea is the Atlantic ocean in the southeastern region of the United States.
It is the Atlantic Ocean. It is also the largest and most sparsely populated island in the world.
Washington DC, which is the capital and most populous of the United States. It's the most densely populated city in the US.
It is the capital of Washington DC, the most populous city in the state of Wisconsin
The largest metropolitan area is Washington D.C.  It is also the capital of Pennsylvania.
I don't know, but I do know they are the most densely populated city in the U.S.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's the 4th-largest city in the state.
I'm not sure but it's the 4th largest city in the US.  It's the 8th-largest by area.
He played for the Washington Capitals, but he was drafted to Michigan. He was a great driver, too.
It's an American museum in Los Angeles, California.  It's a great place to go for a walk.
Colorado, it is one of the most popular cities in the world with over 2.5 million people.
Yes, it was very scary. The storm affected a lot of people. I was in shock.
He died in a car accident.  He was a great driver, and I'm glad he survived.
Jon Roberts is a famous singer, songwriter, actor, and actor.  He's pretty popular.
He's a singer, songwriter, actor, singer and dancer.
John F Kennedy is the most famous of all time. He was born in 1943.
John F kenne is a famous American singer, songwriter, and author.
Louisiana State University is a state in the southeastern region of the southern United States
It is in the southeastern part of the state of Louisianas. It is very prestigious.
Louisianas State university is one of the most prestigious schools in the state.
It is in Birmingham, Illinois. It is also the world's largest university.
Louisianas State University is located in the southern part of the state of the southeastern region of the United States.
She was an American actress who was also a screenwriter and a singer.  She was also an author.
He was killed in 1987.  He was so sad that he had to go through that. 
I'm not sure, but I know they are the first English colonial possessions to be established in the Americas.
I'm not sure.  But my mom is a nurse, and she's been there all my life.  I don't know where she came from.
Dublin, the capital. It is the capital of Ireland. I have never been.
Dublin, Ireland. It's the capital and the most populous city. 
Dublin, Ireland. It's the largest city in the country. I love it there.
It was in the early 19th century in the Netherlands.   It was a pretty big shock to see.
He had a heart attack, but the cause was unknown. He was a very strong swimmer.
The Atlanta Atlanta Games was held in Atlanta, Georgia, and hosted at the Atlanta metro area.
I don't know, but I know it is the most densely populated metropolitan area in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that the flag was originally used to represent the country's first colonies.
I think it would be Michelle Obama.  She's been on the news for a while.
I am not sure, but he is a business man. He is the CEO of the United States.
I do not know but it is an important president in the US. I think it was Obama Obama.
Obama Obama is the American president of the U.S. and has been the most influential politician in the United States.
I don't know but the president of the U.S. is the current United States. 
It's a state located in Canada, in the southernmost region of the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's the largest city in Canada by area.
I'm not sure, but I know it was a very sad day for her.  He was a great driver!
She was born in 1994, so she was a good mother. She was a great mother.
Jarome is a name for Jaromi, she's a famous actress, singer, dancer, and singer.
Iguanas are a type of lizard.  Iguins are a member of the "Canids" family.
She's a singer, songwriter and actor. I think she's very talented.
Jarome is my favorite name. He is a great man. He has a beautiful wife.
Jarome Iguinla is a singer and songwriter from the south.
Lisa Chapman was born in 1959, she was born on December 30, 1984
I am not sure but the highest mountain I have ever been was in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
I'm not sure but it's a pretty big one.  It's been around for a while now.
I don't recall the exact number but i can tell you that it is the largest Christian denomination in the world.
I am not really sure but I do know there are over 2.5 million Christians in the world.
I'm not sure but it is a violin.  It is a wooden string instrument with a hollow wooden body.
He plays the piano.  He was an amazing pianist.  It was a long time ago though.
He's a professional rapper. He's very good. He has been around since the 80's.
The violin, the trumpet, and the fiddle. I'm pretty good at the violin too.
I don't know, but he's a great singer and songwriter. He is the most famous musician in the world.
The violins! It was so beautiful! I can't wait to see how he does it again!
He played the drums. The drums and the bass. It was a lot of fun.
I am not sure, but the instrument was developed in Italy by Bartolomeo Cristofori.
I don't know, but I know that they are one of the oldest nations in the world.
The one that goes through the southeastern region of the world. It is very pretty. 
I am not sure, but I do know that there are more than 70 countries in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that he is an American actor, singer, actor, and producer.
Her name is Sara. She is a beautiful, sweetheart. Do you have kids?
Shaquille Oneal is an Italian rapper. He was born in Italy.
Shaquille Oslette. He's my favorite singer and songwriter!
I'm not sure what her names are, but I know she is one of the most successful people in the world. 
Shaquille Oneal is a French name, but it means "little armored one."
Her name is Lily! I love her so much! She's such a sweetheart!
Shaquille is an Italian rapper. I love her.  Do you have children?
Leaf erikeson is an American singer-songwriter. I don't remember when he died.
It is a Christianity. It has been around since the Middle Ages in Egypt.
I am not sure.  I know it was the second most populous country in the world in 2008.
It is the largest in the United States and is the second-largest in the world.
It is the largest Christian denomination in the world.  It is located in the southern region of the united states.
I don't know, but I do know that it is a long-path running river that connects the Atlantic Ocean to the Gulf of Mexico.
He is a singer, songwriter, actor and producer.  He has been around since 1998.
I believe it was Julia Abdul. She was an Australian Prime Minister.
I believe it was Michelle Obama. She is also one of the first women in the United States to serve as president.
She was a singer for the American singer, songwriter, record producer and dancer.
Katy Perry's first song is "Baby" which was released in 2008.
I believe it was "Take Me A Lie" by Jeremy Clarkson.
She is one of the most influential singers ever. She has sold more than 75 million albums.
Harry Potter was his best feature of the series, and was the first series to be adapted into a series.
I think it was Dumbledore. I think he was a pretty good actor too! 
Harry Potter 5 was a character in the series.  He played the wizard of the oz.
Harry Potter was one of the best books in the world. The first of them was published in 1971.
He went to U.S. State University. He's been there for a few years and has a great work ethic.
The Cowboys won in the 90s, but I don't remember the year. I do know that was a long time ago.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is the highest sparsely populated and the longest united states.
The world's largest descendant of the Americas is the Saudi Arabian Arabs, and the Gulf of Aqaba.
I'm not really sure, but it's in the Middle East.  It has been a long time since I've been there.
She is currently attending Princeton. She is very smart. I am so proud of her!
It was a birthday party.  He was born on August 21, 1948.
It is today!  I can not wait to see her.  I am so excited! 
It was his birthday. He was only 3 years old. I felt so bad about it. He had to go to church.
Jordan Sparks is a great actor.  He is also a singer and songwriter
Jordan Sparks is an American rapper, he is a great actor too!
Jordan Sparks is his name.  He is a great dad.  I am so glad he has such a great father.
Jordan Sparks is his name.  He is from Michigan, but he is a great driver.
Jordan Jordin is one of the best of my friends. He's a good dad.
I'm not sure, but I know that there are a lot of big ones in the U.S.
I don't know. But I do know that he is the most influential man in the world!
Martin Luther King was a great American author.  He was one of the most successful actors in his life.
I'm not entirely sure what he does. But he's a big fan of the American baseball team Joseph Pulp.
I'm not sure but the city is the most populous city in the US with over 600,0000 people.
Yes, I am from the capital and the largest metropolitan area in the world.
Yes!  It is the most populous metropolitan area in the US.
The city of Cincinnati, Illinois is the most populous city in the United States.
Ruther is a very old fashioned name, it was first used in the late 1950s.
Earnest was born on March 1904. He was a great driver. Do you have any kids?
I'm not sure but I know it was founded in 1894.  Do you know anything about it?
I believe she was born in New York City, but I don't remember exactly.   
She was born on August 30, 1981.  I think she was born in England.
Daniello Campelle Campbell is an American singer and songwriter
He was a great American singer and songwriter from California. He was also a producer.
I don't know, but I'm not sure about most of the world but they have the largest Jewish communities in the world.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the largest Jewish population is in the world.
I am not sure but it is the largest Jewish denomination in the world.  
I'm not too sure. But they were the rulers of the world until the 19th century.
It's really hard to say, but the majority of the Jewish people in the world follow Judoism
I am not sure. He was the winner of the 1981 presidential race. He also won the 2016 presidential run.
It is the most sparsely populated of the 50 US states.  I am not sure of the exact numbers.
He was married in 1986. I'm not sure if he was married to the right person.
I don't remember but he was a pretty famous singer. He was the lead vocalist.
He married her in 1998 and she was the first person to propose to her.  It was a long time ago.
He was the youngest of 4, so I am sure that was a very long time ago!
He's actually the youngest of five brothers and sisters. He was only 15 years old.
He married her in the 1970s! I'm sure it was a very long time ago!
I'm not sure, but he's been around for a while. He was born in 1959 and was a stripper.
I don't think I've seen them in years, but I know they have a huge following!
I'm not sure, but I know it was an American singer, songwriter, actor and producer.
A friend of mine. He is a really nice guy. He likes to dance and he has a huge collection of clothes.
It's my favorite band, I've seen them in concerts before and they're pretty good.
I'm not really sure, but it seems like it would be a really weird place to be!
I'm not sure, but I have seen them in the show "The Friends." Do you have any pets?
A friend of mine, she's a very shy person and she likes to go out with friends
It was my favorite character.  She was the one who had the most popular character on the Disney Renaissance.
It's a house in the middle of a forest. I don't think I've ever been inside it before.
I am not sure, but I know that mice have a large number of small prey, but the mice are very small.
Micekins are a type of rodent, and they are very cute.  They're very intelligent and have a strong sense of smell.
Miceky is the mouse that is a small, furry and white colored mouse. 
The mice are a large, white mammal with a small, furry, carnivorous, and mammals.
It's a mouse mouse mouse, but it's a small house.  It's not too big, but I love it.
Mice and rattles. I was thinking of getting rid of the house but I don't know how.
I have no idea, but I do know they are a large mouse. I am terrified of them.
Micey mouse mouse is a character from the mouse mouse. I have never seen it before.
Miceky is a type of mouse that is a small, furry, carnivorous mammal
The mice that live in a house is called a mouse house. I don't know how many of them live in the house.
Mike Mike Mitch is the host of the show "Snap Shot" on NBC.
I'm not really sure. I don't know much about him other than he was a famous rapper.
I don't know.  I was just sitting at home with my cat.  It was so loud.
Mike Mike Mike Mouse is one of the best singers of all time. He has sold over $55 million worldwide.
Mikey mouse was a famous singer.   He was a member of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
Mikey mouse. He was the host of the show "The Office" on NBC.
Mike Mike Mitch is an American singer and songwriter from Los Angeles.
Ariana Grande! She was a famous singer and songwriter. I loved her!
I don't know but he was a very good actor. He was a great comedian. 
I am not sure but I do know that he was on the show "Shell of the Lamborghini".
Frank Lucas is an American rapper and songwriter and actor.  He was a great man.
Frank Lucas is a Scottish actor, he was born and raised in New York, New York.
Frank Lucas was an American rapper, songwriter and actor. He was born in the United States.
Frank Lucas is an American rapper. He was born in New York City.  
Frank Lucas is one of the biggest and most influential people in the business of entertainment.
Frank Lucas is an american rapper. He was born in 1974.
Frank Lucas is an American rapper and actor. I know he is a great actor.
Frank Lucas is a great actor. I think he is a very talented actor. He was born in New York City.
He was sent to prison for a crime. I'm not sure what the sentence was, but he was sent away.
I don't remember, but I know that he was a very prominent figure in the history of American literature.
He was a member of the United States Department of Defense. He was also a Republican, but he was also an activist.
He wrote a few essays about the American civil war. He also wrote the book "The Numberumber of the Beast".
I'm not sure, but I know it was a long time ago. She was a great actress, and a singer.
I'm not sure, but i know that the country's capital is Reykjavk.
I don't know but it is a very small island in the Caribbean.  
I don't know, but I know it's the second-largest country in the world.
Marie Anotette was a very famous singer, songwriter, and actress.
He is an American actor. He is a very talented singer, and songwriter.
Ronn Howard was an american actor, actor, singer, and dancer.
Lebron James is a basketball player. He is the best player in the NBA. He's the best
Lebron James James is the most famous basketball player of all time, he is also the best in the NBA.
He was a great actor. He was born and raised in Jackson, Mississippi.
I'm not really sure, but he was the youngest of four brothers and sisters.
Nicki Minna Juliet was the first female singer of the American pop punk band.
I'm not sure. I know it's the third-largest country by area in the world though!
I don't know. I am not sure.  I do know that they are from India.
I think Michelle Jeanne Brandon, who climbed Mount Everest
I think Ford was the winner.  They had the best driver in the world. 
I'm not sure but I know that the first settlement was established in the late 1830s.
New zealand, but I am not sure how they came up with that name.  It was the first English colonies to settle in New Zealand.
She is a great American singer and songwriter. She was born in 1964.
The Crucible was written in the late 1900s.  It's a very popular one.
It was written in 1894 by James Fenimore Cardinals. He was an amazing actor.
It was written on August 21, 1973. It was a long time ago, though.
I don't know, but it was published in 1958. It was a long time ago!
The crucial texts were written during the reign of the Byzantine Empire.
Her name was Jennifer. She is a great actress and singer. What is your favorite movie?
It was Ruth Holdenburg.  He was also an attorney. 
I think it was a state in the US that was governed by the state of North Carolina.
Dave Matthew's band is an American rock band from Las Vegas, Nevada.
Dave Matthew is a singer, songwriter, producer, record producer
Dave Matthew is a great American rapper. He was born in New York City.
Dave Matthew is my favorite band.  He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
The Dave Matthew's band is the American rock band formed in Dearborn, Michigan.
Dave Matthew is a British singer/songwriter. He's a great artist.
Dave Matthew is a great American singer, songwriter, and actor. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
The band is called The Beatles.  They're from Dallas, Tx.
I think so. They've been around since 1982. I like them because they were founded in 1983.
No, I don't know who Dave Mathew is, but they are one of the most influential bands of all time.
No, I'm not familiar with them. Are they a pop punk band or an American rock band?
I love Dave Mathew. He's such a legend. His career spanned over 20 years.
No, I'm not really familiar with them. But they were one of the biggest bands in the world formed in 1983.
I don't think so. I know they were formed in Los Angeles.  Do you like them?
I love all the albums Dave Mathew is one of the best American singers out there.
I like Dave Mathew's band. They are a great rock band. Have you heard of them?
Russia is a very large country and it is the 3rd most sparsely populated country.
I'm not sure, but I do know that they're one of the largest and most sparsely populated nations.
no , I am from the us , in the southern part of the united states. 
I'm not too sure, but it's a small island in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean. It looks pretty cool.
Yes I think that it's the largest country in the world. It is the largest and most sparsely populated.
He was a former president of the United States.  I'm sure that's why I was so shocked.
I'm not sure who was president but the US was established by James F. Ford in 1845
The president of the United States.  He has had a lot of practice, he has been president since July of 1945.
The president of the US was the president of Pennsylvania and the United Kingdom.
I don't know.  But, North Dakota is the 3rd-largest state by area in the US.
I think it is, it is the 8th most populous city in the state. 
I'm not sure, but I know it is the 8th least populated city in the United States
I don't know but it's the 8th most populous city in the US. 
I'm not sure, but I know it's the third-largest city in the U.S., and the 4th-most densely populated.
His name is Josh. He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
Her name is Jennifer.  She is a professional wrestling coach.  I was so excited to see her.
His name was Joseph, he was born on December 31, 1985.  He is a great driver.
His name was Josh. He was an American singer and songwriter. He is also a great singer.
He was an American rapper, author, and television star. He had a very long career.
It was the Methodist church in New York City.  I was really upset at him.
I'm not sure but I know that they are from Dearborn, Michigan.  I know they are a small town.
I'm not really sure, but it was a long time ago. I think he has been around since 1858
I think he is the president of the U.S. and he is currently the ceo.
He was a great man. He served in the United States. He was also a Republican!
He was a great man!  He served as president of the United States.  He was also a member of the Senate.
He was an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, and dancer
He was born in 1961 and died in 1998.  It was a sad day.
It was a meeting with my boss.  He was the CEO of the company.  I was so surprised!
He was a former president of the United States and the United Kingdom.  He was also a businessman.
I am not sure but it is the third-largest state in the world! It is also the 4th-most sparsely populated.
I am not sure but the capital is Montgomery. It's the largest city. 
It is in the US, and I'm not sure where that is located. Do you know?
The capital of russiana is in the united states of america. It's in the middle of the country.
Yes! I think it is the most densely populated of the U.S.!
No. Russia is the capital, and is the second-largest nation in the world.
The Republic of Russia is the second most sparsely populated and geologically active country in the world!
The two continent of Russia is the Atlantic Ocean and the Eastern Atlantic. 
The Republic of Russia. Its a sovereign country in the southeastern region of the United States.
I am not sure, it is located near the Mediterranean Sea.
I don't really understand. Are they in the Siberian archipelago?  
Yes, Russia is the capital of Europe and the second-largest country, with about 2.3 million residents.
It is a sovereign state in the United States and it's located in the southeastern region.
I don't know, but it is the second-largest state in the U.S
Yes.  The US is the third-largest country in the world by population.  
Yes, it is. It is also located in the northern hemisphere and the eastern half of the world.
I am not quite sure. But I know it is the 4th-largest state in the U.S
No, I am not sure who the youngest of them. I am the oldest of four.
I don't remember. But it was a long time ago. I think it was in the 60s.
The president of the United States. He was elected president of North Carolina in 1845.
The Atlantic ocean and it's the second-largest ocean in the world!
It's a little further south than you'd think. It's in the Caribbean.
Prince was born on August 21, 1963. She has a beautiful smile.
The day Prince William was born in 1894! He was an American singer and songwriter, actor, and dancer.
I don't know but Prince is an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
Prince William Middletton got married on August 30, 1953.
I am not sure but she did get engaged in a church. I have no idea what it was.
Prince Williems is the greatest American singer of all time and songwriters. I am not sure when she got married.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it was released in May of 1983.
She is an American singer, songwriter, and producer. Her debut album, "Billboard" was released in 2009.
I don't know much about it but it sounds nice. Is it a city in the US?
No I don't think I've ever heard of that, is it an American postal service?
I'm not sure, but I do know that they had to fight for independence in the 20th century.
I am not sure when the country became independent, but I know that it was established in 1845 as a unified kingdom.
I am not sure but I do know that Eric Roberts was the best actor in that movie
I don't remember the name of it. I think it was a romantic comedy with Eric Roberts
He was in The Lion King.  I think it was the last time I saw it.
I don't know but i know he was born in 1944 so he has been around a long time.
Japan is a great country. They are the second-largest country in the world, and the first country to have a unified government.
I am not sure but I do know that it was the seventh president in the US.
It is the US forty Fifth President, but I am not sure who is it.
I'm not sure. I think it's Trump. I know he's the 45th President of America.
I am not sure but they are located in the northwestern region of the world. 
It is the Mississippi river.  I have been there, but never to the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure but I do know that the state's borders are the Mississippi River, Georgia, and Alaska.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the river is the longest in the world
I am not sure, but i know that there are a lot of rivers in the state. 
The Rockies won the World Series in 2003! I was so happy to see them.
He was one of the founders of the United States.  He was an important figure in the history of our country.
Thomas Jefferson was the founder and president of the United States.  He was very successful.
That I'm not sure, but the first African American president was William Jean King.
Obama.  He was the 45th president of America.  I think he's doing a great job.
She is a fashion designer. She's also a beauty blogger and a fashion model.
Bob mould was a great American rock band formed in the early 60s.  They were a punk rock band.
Elizabet Taylor is a very successful singer, songwriter, and actress.
She was an American singer who was a singer and songwriter. She was also a dancer, singer, and actress.
Elizabet is an American singer, songwriter, and producer.  She is pretty famous.
He went to the University of Pennsylvania. I am sure you know him well!
It is the third-largest country in the world.  I'm not sure what it is called.
I don't know but I know that they are bordered by Mexico, Bentonville, and the Atlantic Ocean.
It is called the United States, and it is in the southeastern region of North America.
I'm not sure.  I know there are more than seventy countries.  Do you know?
Columbia is a bordering country on the Atlantic Ocean and Peru. 
It was a french bulldog. I had no idea it could have been a pug.
I think it was the original "Black Switch" and "Slap Shot" which came out in 1997.
Tom Hanks and Richard Gerella, they were really good.  I liked them all.
I don't remember the number but Megan Raymond was one of the best actors of all time.
I don't remember the names of the four, but I do remember that one. I love them all.
I believe it was Roger Penrose? He was the president of the U.S.
Diggy Simmons is an American singer and songwriter.  His first album was released in 2009.
Diggy Simmons is an indie singer. He is a great artist. 
She was a famous actress. She is also a great singer and songwriter.
It was held on August 30, 1964 in Dallas, TX.
Harry Potter was a great novelist, he was one of the most influential authors of all time.
It was back in 1859.  It was a long time ago.  She is very happy to see her.
I am not sure, but the President of the united states became the president of the US.
I have no idea, but I know that France has the largest French colonies in Europe and the second-largest country in the world.
Japan is the most populous country in Asia and the most sparsely populated in the world.
I don't know but I know he was a great actor. He starred in the original Batman Forest Gump.
Bruce Willis was a great actor and director of the X-Men franchise. He was also an actor in Psycho.
He was an actor in the Batman Forest Gump, which was released in 1993.
I don't know but I know he was in a lot of movies.  He was also in The Dark Knight.
James Maslow is a singer. She was born in Honolulu.
The University of Orange is one of my favorites. They are located in Tallahassee, Florida.
The University of Florida is located in the panhandle of Jackson, Mississippi 
I am not sure but I do know that it is a state capital in the southeastern US.
I'm not sure, but I know that the University of Florida has a lot of colleges. 
The first one was released in 1977. It's a great movie! Do you like him?
The first one was released in 1977. It was so good. It's been a while since I watched it.
I am not sure but I know he was elected to the United States as president in 1949.
I don't know, but I can tell you that it was the first one to win the battle.
Her name is Katheryn Elm Hernandez. She's a very popular singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure, but he was a great driver. I wish he was still alive. 
I think he died in the early 1980s.  I was very upset.  He was a great driver.
I'm not sure, but I'm pretty sure he was the lead vocalist for the band.
She was an American actress, singer, and songwriter. I loved her.
Japan's capital and the second-largest city is Tokyo.  It's the most populous city in the world.
I don't know the name, but I do know it's one of the oldest and largest lakes in the world.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is a lake that is in the United States.
I don't know who married Lady Grey but she's a great actress and singer. Do you?
She was an actress, dancer, singer and songwriter. She is a legend.
I'm not sure, but it's interesting how the president is a member of the presidency of the United States.
I'm not sure who was, but I do know that the President of America was elected in the United States in June of 1945.
It is the United States. It is in the Arctic and Northern regions.
Her name is Babyson, and I have a girlfriend. She's a good girl.
I don't remember, but she was a famous English novelist. She wrote about a lot of things.
I'm not sure, but I know she was born in the 1800s so she must have been pretty old.
Her name was Selma. She was so sweet! She passed away last year. I miss her.
Anne Francis. She's my favorite author! She's a great author and author.
Her name is April. I have a friend who's name is Anne Franks.
Anne Franks is a very famous English fashion designer. She was born in 1883.
I don't remember the name.  It was a long time ago.  I remember she was a sweet old woman though.
Her name was Megus.  She had a good life.  I miss her so much.
I am not sure, but I know they were a big part of the show "Jeopardy."
I don't know, but he was a great driver.  He won four Super Bowl awards and won three.
The King Julian King, who is the head of Penn's Pennsylvania, was born in New York.
He's a famous American rapper and songwriter. He's been around for a while. 
I'm not sure. I do know that it was the highest rated show of all time though.
I don't know.  But I do know that he was a famous singer.  It's a shame he died.
She is an American actress who is a singer, songwriter, and singer-songwriters.
He was born on July 2, 1953. He was one of the most important rulers of the world.
He died on August 21, 1853. He was a very famous ruler of the empire.
Delaware State University, in the United States. I have been to the University of Michigan University.
I'm not sure, but I do know they are a public school system in Pennsylvania
I like the band Metallica. They are an American heavy metal band formed in Las Vegas.
I'm not sure but I know it's one of the most sparsely populated nations in the world
It's the most populous city in Saudi Arabia. I think it's pretty big.
I'm not sure, but the president of China is very influential in China. He is the ruler of China.
I am not really sure. I do know that they are the oldest of the three major countries in China
I don't know who the current leaders are, but I know that they have a long history.
I don't know, but I do know that the current president of China has been in office for a long time.
It is a leader in China and has been since the 20th century.  I don't know much about them though.
It is the 4th least populated in the US, but the 3rd least sparsely populated of the 50 states.
I am not sure, but it's very close to the Mississippi border. It's the 3rd largest state in the US.
He was a famous rapper. He was the first person to win a Grammy award.
He was a lawyer. He was the president of the United States. He had the highest GPA of all time.
He's a business man for a large multinational corporation in Detroit, Michigan.
I don't remember the name of his first president, but I know he was an important person in the world.
I don't remember exactly but he was the founder of the United States.  I know he was a great president
He was a lawyer. I didn't think that was his profession, but he was a business man.
He was the first person to hold the title of President of the United States.  He was also the CEO.
I am not sure but Jacquely Wilsonsons is an American poet.  
I'm not sure but I can tell you that she was the author of the American epic romance novel "A Song of Fire and Ice".
It was in 2007 and it was the first All Black Super Bowl in the US. 
Yes, he died in August of '77. It was devastating to see him in such a tragic loss.
It was Abby Hart.  I'm not sure who the Prime Minister was, but it was a long time ago.
I'm not sure, but I know that he was the ruler of the country.  
I don't remember his exact name.  I think it was Ruth Handler.  She was the first president of Australia.
He was the ruler of Australia.  He was killed in 1989.  It's sad.
I'm not sure, but he did win the lottery.  I know that was a long time ago, but I don't remember the details.
I don't know.  He is a singer, songwriter and actor.  
I'm not sure, but it is the largest and most populous of all the world!
It is called the Chesapeake Bay.  It's a great lake.  
It's called Lake Champlain.  It's the biggest one in the state of Alaska. 
Yes, it's the third-largest country in the Southeastern United States.
I'm not sure when he was born, but he is a very successful actor, actor, and businessman.
I'm not sure when he was born, but he's been in the business a while. 
I'm not sure what language they speak but they speak English, spanish, and chinese.
That's a good question.  I don't know.  But, the second Indian Oscar winner was held in 2009.
I am not sure, but I am sure he was a good actor. I would love to see him in the Oscar.
I believe that's Michael Jackson. He's also the greatest rapper of all time.
I don't know exactly but I know they were the ones with the longest war between the United States and the UK.
Brandon Boyd was a famous American singer and songwriter. He is a great artist.
Emily Bronte.  Her name was Elizabeth.  She was born in 1983.
I am not sure, but I do know that there are a lot of great artists in Africa.
I have not heard of the list, but I know that it is very important to the Nigerian community. It is the second-largest country in Africa.
Not sure, but I do know that they were nominated in the 2014 presidential run for president of the United States.
The list is not very long. I am not sure what it is, but I do know that the Nigerian Minister is one of the most influential people in the world.
I'm not too sure but I know that they have been in the top ten in Africa for quite some time.
I think they are all good, but I do not know of any of the current ones. Do you? 
I don't have a specific list, but I know that the Nigerian Dynasty is in Africa
I have not looked at that yet but I will look into it.  Do you have any?
Well, they are the leaders of the Nigerian National Centre of Niggeria.
I'm not sure but I do know that there are more than 70 Nigerian ministers in Africa.
I am not sure, but they have been around a long time. They are from the Middle East and Africa, though.
I have no idea. They must be very important, since it's the largest country in Africa.
I am not sure, but they are in Africa.  They are very successful.  I am sure it is hard to keep up with them.
I have no idea. I have never heard of them. I am not sure if they are any good.
I am not sure, but they are the ones with the highest circadian rate, so they must be pretty good.
I don't have a specific list. But I'm sure they are very good.   
Not really. I am not sure what they are doing, but I am sure it will be worth it.
I have no idea but I have been to Nigerian ministers in the Philippines before.
I don't know, but I know they have been in the Nigerian Nation since the 1890s
I am not sure but I know they have a lot of money.  I have never seen it.
I don't know much about them, but I know they've been around for more than 2.5 million years.
I don't know but I do know that it's been a long year since it's held in the U.S.
I'm not really sure, but I know that the Nigerian Minister is one of the leading leaders.
I don't remember the exact numbers, but the current Nigerian Minister is very popular.
She plays the drums. I'm not sure if she is a great singer or songwriter
No, she was an american singer, songwriter and dancer. I don't remember what song she played.
I'm not sure when she was born, but she is the most famous singer of the year.
I'm not sure when she was born but she's a great singer, songwriter and producer
I'm not really sure, but she's one of the most famous singers in the world.
I don't know, but she is an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
She had a kid in 2009 and she's been married to her highschool sweetheart.
I am not sure but she has been around since 2009. She is a great mom and a great mother.
It's a lake, but I don't know if it's a river or a bore. I'm afraid of sharks.
A river in the southwestern region of North America that goes through the south.  
I'm not sure, but it's been a long time since I have been there. The river has a lot of water.
Thomas Jefferson, the founder of the U.S. is the current president of the United States
Thomas Jefferson served as the president of the United States.  He was the founder of the Army.
She went to Princeton, Illinois! I went to her school in Chicago!
He went to a private high school in Pittsburgh, PA. I didn't know it was so expensive though.
I think she went to the University of Tennessee. I'm not sure where she's going though.
I'm not sure, but I know that she is a really good player.  I was impressed by her.  She was drafted by the University of North Carolina.
I am a fan of the Chicago Blackhawks. They play at the University of Michigan.
I'm not sure, but I do know he was born in 1878.  I know he played for the Chicago Blackhawks.
Yes, I believe so.  He is one of the best quarterbacks in the history of the league
Yes, he is a quarterback of the Atlanta Falcons.  He is also the quarterback. 
He's the best quarterback for the University of Memphis, Tennessee.
No, but he's played for the Atlanta Atlanta Giants, Georgia, Mississippi, and New Orleans.
I don't think it was George.  He was president of the U.S. in the 1960s.
I am not sure but it was released in 1989 in Birmingham, England. It was released on May of 1986.
I'm not sure, but I know that Nick Cannon is an American rapper from Chicago and he's also a singer.
Mariah Canton is the lead singer and songwriter of The Beastie Boys
Obama Obama is a former president of the United States. He's been in politics since June 30, 2001.
Obama is the 45th president of the united states, so she is the current one. 
I'm not sure but I do know that the Eastern Sea is the highest in the Atlantic Ocean.
His name is Kentall Schmidt. He was born in Honolulu.
It's a form of racing where you compete in a group of people who compete in different events. 
He's a rapper. He's pretty good at rapping. I like his voice.
Jason Drew Derulo is an American singer and songwriter. He is from Los Angeles.
He is an indie singer. He was born in Honolulu and raised in New York.
Jason Derolo is a NASCAR driver. He has been racing for over 30 years.
He was killed in a car accident.  He was a great driver!  I was really sad about it.
He was a great driver and he was in a car accident.  I was so sad when he went.
I think it was Michael Jackson. He was the greatest quarterback of all time in college.
Jacob is a good name for him. He has a great sense of humor. Do you have any siblings?
They're names Jacob, Leah and Eli. I love them, but they're a bit of a handful sometimes.
Jacob is a boy and Leah is a girl. I think they are pretty cool names.
She's an American singer-songwriter, songwriters and author.
Leah's brother Leah, who is a famous singer. He is a very good singer and songwriter.
Leah was a singer, songwriter, dancer, singer. He's been around a while.
I don't know, but I am not sure what she was saying. I just saw her in person.
He was an actor and director. I don't know how he did it. I was so scared.
She was a famous rapper and actress and singer.  She was really talented.
Louis Louis is a rapper. He's a singer, songwriter, and producer.
I have no idea but I know it is one of the most sparsely populated countries in the U.S.
Spanish, italian, english, french, spanish, and german. It's very hard to learn.
they speak english and spanish, and french, but i am not sure if they speak any other languages
Spanish and english mostly, but they also speak german and russian and chinese.
I'm not sure but I know that the language spoke is spanish and english.  
The two main languages are English and spanish, but I'm pretty sure they speak english and english fluently
They speak english, french, and english. I have never been outside of america.
Mostly English.  They speak english and spanish.  I don't speak either language.
I don't know but I know that it is a major language spoke in the United States. 
I'm not sure. It would probably be English. I know the English is one of the most sparsely spoken languages in the world.
I am not sure of the largest, but I know it's the 3rd most sparsely populated of the world.
I'm not really sure, but I know that Eastern Hemis is the largest in Eastern Europe
I'm not sure, but it's in the southeastern region of the U.S.
The United States.  It is also the second-largest country in the Eastern region of the world.
I am not sure but I think it is New Zealand.  The largest is about 2.3 million people.
She is 32 years old.  I think she has had a lot of practice.  She is a very talented singer.
She was born on June 30, 1986.  I am not sure how old he is.
She's 4 years older now. She was born on August 30, 1983.
She was born on August 30, 2004.  She's been around a while.
She is a very good singer, songwriter, and producer. She's also a great dancer.
She was the first president of the U.S. and was the only one to have a wife.
He is a great actor and songwriter.  He's also a singer, dancer, producer.
Yes, he was a great actor.  He starred in "Joseph Heller" in the 1970s.
I don't remember his name but I know he's a great actor.  What did you like to do?
The movie "Shawshank Redemption" was nominated for five Academy Awards.
She won the Golden Globe Award. She's been nominated for three of them.
He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii. I think he is one of the greatest players ever.
Kobe Bryant is the greatest player in the world and has won seven NBA championships.
he was in the movie "The Godfather" starring Anthony Hopkins.
Annie Hopkins is a great American actor and singer, songwriter, and actor. 
He's a pretty famous actor, he was in The Wizard of Oz and he was a good actor.
He is one of the most influential American rappers ever. He is also the founder of Purple Rain.
He was an American actor and singer. I think he did a great job. Do you like him?
I think he was in a lot of movies. He was born on October 1878 and was born in 1989.
The Lion King, which is a 1981 American film starring Anna Hopkins.
I think he's a good president, but not sure if he's the best. He's been around quite a while.
It was in August of 1878. It was a long time ago.  
Thomas Backet was killed on December 22, 1964.  I don't know when it happened.
Thomas Beck was killed in 1953.  He was a great man.  It was the only time I've seen him.
Thomas Jean was murdered in 1974.  I don't remember when it happened but he was a great driver.
Thomas Beck was killed on August 29, 1993. It was a long time ago, but it still hurts.
she was born in the united states and has been a member of the christian church for over 10 years
The first actor was Christopher Rhimes. He was born and raised in Honolulu
He was an American singer and songwriter. He was a great artist. He would have been great in his death.
He was the first leader of the war.  He was also the commander of the United States.
I'm not sure, but I know that they were the rulers of France until 1845.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the French were a major force in the European Union.
I love Taylor Swift, she is a singer and songwriter. 
I don't really remember the name but I do know that he was born in 1977.
I'm not sure, but he was born in New York.  He was an American singer and songwriter.
The songs "Billie" and "Biggie" were released in 2009. 
She went to Princeton, I'm not really sure what school she attended. 
I am not sure but I know it was a private school that was held in the United States in 1968.
She is a great actress, but I don't remember her name.  I know she's a good actress though.
I'm not sure. But I do know that there is a large number of languages in Poland.
I am not sure but they do speak english and spanish.  I know they are the third largest country in the world.
They are polish, and they are also very good at speaking english.  Italian, french, and spanish.
I don't know what language they were speaking, but I know it was the second largest in the EU.
poland is a sovereign state in the north eastern region of the country in the united states
I'm not entirely sure, but it seems to be Jeff Bezos, he is the CEO of the Texas Department.
I am not really sure but it's very important to the people who live in Guinea.
She was a former Mississippi governor.  She did great!  I was shocked.  
I'm not sure but I think it was Michelle Jean. She was a great president of India.
I'm not sure.  But I do know that he was an American singer, songwriter, producer, and actor.
He was born in Dearborn, Michigan. I'm not sure where he came from, but it's a great question.
I am not sure, but the first album was released in 2006.  I love listening to it!
I don't think it was released in 2006 but it was the highest number one album in the United States. It sold over 100 million records worldwide.
Her name is Katheryn Elizabeth.  I don't know why.  It is a strange name.
Ghana is a Christian denomination in the US.  I'm a Christian. 
I'm not really sure but I know that Maine is the 4th-largest state in the US
I'm not sure, but I know it's one of the most sparsely populated states in the US
The Appalachian Northern National Scenic Trail is the most famous river in New York
There are so many rivers around here, but I'd say one of the most important is the Mississippi River.
Maine is the state capital of the US, I love it there.  It's the third-largest state in the US.
The river I'm thinking of is the Mississippi river.  It is the longest river in Maine.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail, Maine.  It was a long day.
I'm not sure, but I know it's one of the oldest continuous states.  It was founded in 1845.
I'm not sure but it is the most populous city in Maine. I'm sure there are many.
I have never been to maine before, but I heard it's the largest state in the US.
I'm not sure but there are many rivers here in Maine. I know that there is a lot of lakes and rivers.
I don't know but I know there are a lot of rivers and lakes here. I like the beach and the water.
They run through mountains in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. 
I don't think they run through the mountains, but they do go through the countryside.
They are mountains in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  I am really looking forward to it.
They are in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  They are the highest mountain chain on the Eastern United States.
I'm not sure but I know that Canada is the second-largest country in the US.
I'm not sure. Maybe I can find them. I know they are the 3rd most populous country in the world.
I have been to many. But my favorite is Canada, which is bordered to the west, the Atlantic, and the Gulf of Mexico.
I don't know but I know that it is a great country. It is the capital. 
I am not sure but i know the first king of the country was the ruler of the world
His name is Megan Edward. I am not sure if he has any other kids.
John Edward is an American singer and songwriter. His real name is Peter Jackson.
She's an American singer, songwriter, and author. I know that's not exactly a small thing, but she's been around a long time.
I think it was back in 1963. I don't recall exactly when it happened. I just remember that it was a long time ago.
He's been around for a very long time. I think it was in the late 1960's.
He burned the carpet in the middle of the night. He was so upset that he did it.
He was born in the 1880s. He is a great actor. He was a great comedian too.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the 3rd-largest county.
The capital of the country, Delaware, is the largest city in Maryland, and the third-largest in the US.
The capital is Maryland, Delaware, which is in the southern part of America.
It is the capital of the state of Maryland. I live in the suburbs of Baltimore.
It's in Eastern Connecticut.  It's the capital of Maryland. 
It's an annual celebration. He was born on October 17, 1944. 
He was born in August of 1974! I was so excited to see him on television!
Yes, he is. His birth date is January 1948. He was born in August 1949.
He was born in 1883. He was the first president of the University of Pennsylvania.
He was born on August 1898. I think he was born in 1974.
He died in a plane crash. He was in a very sudden accident that was unexpected.
The Atlantic, the Bahamas, and the Gulf of Mexico.  It's a pretty small island.
New York City is the most populated city in the US. It is also the largest metropolitan area in the world.
I'm not really sure, but I do know that the capital is Las Vegas. Have you been to it?
I don't know but I know it's the most densely populated in the country.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the city population is over 800,000.
It would have to be Los Angeles. It is one of the largest city in the state of New York.
It's in the top 20 cities in the United States, and the most densely populated city in the US.
Yes it is the longest river in the country.  It runs along the Mississippi river.
I don't remember the name but I do know that it was a female ruler in the Roman Empire!
Her names was Selma. It was a very long time ago. I was so happy to see her again.
No, I am not sure. But I do know that she was the first woman to be born in the Egypt.
I think it was the ruler of Egypt, the rulers of the world. 
I am not sure when she was born but her mother was an english teacher in the US.
Eli Whitney. I love her. She is so beautiful. Do you have family?
Eli Whitney.  She was an American singer, songwriter and dancer.
He died on August 30, 2005. I don't know how old he was.
Africa, but I have been to both of those. The Africa is the largest country in Africa.
It's in Africa. It was a small island in a country in the Caribbean.
She's from the Philadelphia! She's a great American actress and singer.
I'm not sure exactly when but I do know she's an American actress and singer and songwriter
Oh, no.  He was an American singer-songwriter who was a great driver.
No, I'm not. He's been acting since I was a baby. He was a great actor too!
I don't know, but I know that Wisconsinsin is the third-largest state in the country.
I think in the late 1800's, but I am not sure when it was officially declared.
I don't know, but I do know that it was Obama Obama who was the first president of the United States in the US.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is in the southernmost regions of Asia.
I'm not sure, but I know it is the highest mountain on the Indian subcontinent.
The river is the Mississippi River. I love the water. Do you?
Karen Cushman was an American fashion designer, I think she was in New York.
I don't know, but he has been the captain since the 1990 season. He is also the owner of the team.
I think it was Michele Bieber. She was also the head of the Indian government.
I am not sure, but the indians are one of the oldest nations in the world. 
I'm not sure, but I do know that the euro cup was the most successful cup in Europe.
New Zealand is the 4th most populous city in the U.S. 
It was a vampire oil. I was so mad. I felt really bad about it.
I'm not sure, but he's one of the most influential presidents in history. He was also a very successful businessman.
A biden is a US state that is located in the southeastern region of the U.S.
I'm not sure but I do know that he's the 45th President of the United States.
He is from the U.S. state of Pennsylvania. He's been a great politician for a long time.
I'm not too sure but I know he was elected president of the U.S. in 2009
He was a great candidate for President Obama, but he is also a Victorian of the University of Michigan.
His name was Drew. He was a very popular actor and dancer, and a good actor.
I am not sure but i know that the US is the third-largest country in the European Union
They are in the Caribbean.  They are the 4th-largest country.
I am not sure about the largest but I do know that they are the worlds most sparsely populated
I think the US is the fourth most sparsely populated country in the US, with 3.5 million people.
The river is the river of Memphis.  It is the longest river in the world.
The indians? They are in the southeastern region of the united states.
They are a subset of the Indian Subcontinent, which is a state in the southeastern region of the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know that they are a small group of indian subcontinent.
I'm not sure but I can tell you I'm a big fan of it!   It's a chain in the Midwest.
New York.  I am not a big fan of the city, but it is a nice change from a big city.
I don't remember exactly, but I know that the company is based in Pennsylvania! I was so surprised!
It was a Bachelors degree.  I'm not a huge fan of Rosevelts myself. 
He was a high school senior and graduated with honors. He had a hard time in school.
I'm not sure if I want to get married. I am a single mother, so I don't know what I would want to do.
I love that song. He is an American singer, songwriter, and record producer.
I don't know but I know there is a huge peak.  The highest mountain in Africa is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
St Louis, Mississippi. It is the highest mountain in the state of Georgia!
George H H. Bush children are a great American actress and singer. He was born in New York City.
George H. H. Bush was an American TV show and actor. He is an American actor.
George H. H. Bush is my favorite American singer and songwriter. Do you like him?
George Bush, he's an American rapper from New York.  Do you know him?
George Bush was a former president of the U.S. and a businessman for the George H. S.
They are Megan and Megus. I was so happy to get to see them.
George Bush is a famous bush. He was born and raised in Dearborn, Michigan.
George Bush is the busiest of all the children that are still alive.  I love his stories.
George Bush is my favorite actor.  He was born and raised in New York City.  
George bush was the busiest of all of the bushes in the world! His parents are so proud of him.
George Bush was a former president of the United States of America.  He's a great man.
George Bush was an american singer and songwriter and actor.  He was born in 1984
George Bush is a great American rapper and poet. He was born in 1963.
George Bush is an American singer and songwriter.  He's also a member of the American rock band Nirvana.
George Bush is an American author. He was an American singer, songwriter, and author.
George Bush is a famous American actor who was born on August 1963. He was a great actor.
George is a great American singer, songwriter, author. I think he's great!
George Bush, and George, are you a fan of George Bush? I love him, he was born on June 2, 1948.
George Bush. He was a very famous singer and songwriter.   He was born on August 2, 1948.
George Bush was an American singer and songwriter. He also had a very successful record.
Julie Hough is a Scottish singer, she is a great singer and songwriter.
Julian Hough is a French singer.  He was a singer and songwriter.
I think she is a dancer, singer, and songwriter.  I love her!
She's an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.  I think she's a good singer.
I'm not sure who the publisher was, but it was an important battle between the U.S. and Canada
I'm not sure, but I know women have been in government since the 1980s.  Do you know?
I'm not sure but she was a famous singer, songwriter, and actress.
She was a pretty famous singer and songwriter. She was also a singer!
She is my favorite. She is a great singer, songwriter and actress!
I don't know, but I know that Holly Marie Marie is a singer, songwriter, and producer.
I don't know, but I do know he is the most well known singer of all time!
He is a famous American singer and songwriter. He has done so many commercials!
yes, and she is a singer. she's a great singer, songwriter, and dancer.
No.  She was not a great actress.  I am not really sure if she is married.
I am not too sure but the state is the 3rd least densely populated by area
I'm not sure, but I know it's the 3rd most densely populated in the US.
I am not sure, but the US and Britain were both in charge of the British empire.
It was a terrier! I was so scared. I was able to see it in the end. 
It was a Labrador, but it was a long time ago. I think it was the old English bulldog.
The longest one in the world is the Atlantic ocean.  It's a long island in the Caribbean Sea.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is in the southeastern region
They are an American professional sports team based in the city of Boston, Massachusettts,
The Boston Tigers are the oldest franchise in the NBA. They were formed in Boston.
They are a professional football team located in Boston, Massachusets, New Hampshire.
It's a Honda Accord, it is one of the best cars in the world!
Julia Roberts is a singer, songwriter, producer and dancer.
Julia Roberts is an American singer-songwriter, songwriters and actress.
Julia Roberts, a singer, songwriter and singer. 
The Godfather, it came out in 1997.  It was a great movie. 
He was in "The Godfather", which is one of my favorite movies.  He was a really good actor.
I think he was in a horror film called The Birds. It was a great movie.
Michael Jackson is an American singer, songwriter, and actor who has won three Grammy Awards.
Michael Jackson was inspired by his father.  He was born in New York City. 
I'm not sure but I do know he is one of the best french artists of all time.
I am not sure, but I do know that the Bible is the oldest Christian religion in the world
I'm not sure, but I know that in Christianity, the word "fast" is used by Jewish people.
I am not sure but I do know that they have a tendency to be fast. Do you know anything about them?
Hernan Corte was a great dancer.  Her first album was called "Baby One More Time".
Hernan Corte was a French woman who was born in the United States and died in 1904.
He moved to California to pursue his law degree.  I was really happy to see him.
I don't remember who they were, but I know that the first book was published in 1873.
They were a very important women in our history. They were the founders of the American Civil War.
They were the Washington Wives who were a great housewives in the early 19th century.
It was the largest city in Africa, but I am not sure of the exact name of it.
He had a huge breakthrough in the early 1800's. It was a huge step in the economy.
Yes he is. He was also the commander of the army and the ruler of england in the second century.
I am not sure, but I know that the country is the seventh-largest country by area.
I think they won the Stanley Cup.  I was a big fan of them back then.
I'm not sure exactly, but I do know that it's the largest river in North America.
I am not sure, but I do know that there are a lot of rivers and lakes in Texas.
I'm not sure, but I know that there is a river that crosses the Mississippi and Georgia.
I don't know, but I know that they are very famous in the US and are very popular.
The Bible, it's a collection of the Old Testament.  It's been a long time since I read it.
I am not sure but i have heard that it was the most successful christian novel in history.
I have a few, but I haven't read many of them. Do you like them? 
I have read a few of them.  They are a Christian book written by Jeremy Clarkson.  Have you read them?
They're a collection of short stories written by Joseph Hanna and Hitchhika.
They are a series of novels by Joseph Heller, he is a great author.
I'm not sure but I do know they are a christian book written by joseph heller in english.
Hans Christian Andersen is an American author and author. I read them a lot growing up.
The Snow Queen. It's a classic.  It's one of my favorites.
I am not sure but it is a book about the American novelist Joseph Heller.
I don't remember the title but the title was "Good Morning" by Joseph Heller.
He is an American author, and he was born and raised in Birmingham England.  He is also a screenwriter.
He was an English novelist. He was also a screenwriter, and a producer.
He wrote "Sense and Sensibility" and "The Snow Queen."  I think he's done pretty well.
He's a great author.  The best is "The Hitchhikers" which was a sequel to "A Song of Fire and Ice".
I don't know, but I know he was one of the biggest authors in the 20th century.
I don't remember exactly but I remember reading it back in the day. It was one of the most popular books in the world.
Her name is Mia, she's an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Jessica Alba, she's my favorite singer and songwriter of all time.
Jessica Albas is the name of her. She is also an American singer, songwriter, and actress.
Jessica Albas is a singer and songwriter. She's a good one.
I don't know, but I do know that she was one of the most influential actors in the world.
She's an American singer-songwriter and dancer, and songwriters!
She is an American singer and songwriter.  She started in 1994. 
She was an actress in the 80's and she's a great singer. Her real name is Elvis Presley.
Mario Mims is an American rapper. He's been around since 1985.
I don't know yet.  I am waiting to know.  It will be a long process.
I don't know yet. But I know it is a major issue in the Middle East.
I'm not sure. But I know the Islamic converts were influential in the Middle East.
The Daoism is a Christian monotheistic religion.  It's a group of people who are very religious.
I am not sure what is Daoism.  I have heard it is a religion that has many different traditions.
California.  I've always wanted to go to Sacramento.  It's a major city in the US.
The city of Sacramento, CA is my favorite city in the world. It is the second most populous in the US.
It is the state capital of the state of Southern california. It is a very nice place to live.
The capital of Sacramento, California. The capital is San Diego. Do you know where you are?
I don't know. But I know that Obama did a great job. He was the 45th president of the United States.
I'm not sure. But he did win. I know he was a Republican and a Republican.
I'm not sure, but I do know that he's been the highest-income person in the world for over a decade.
He was a famous singer, songwriter, and producer. I'm not sure what happened though.
The Twilight series. It's a fantasy series written by Edward James Stewart.
He was a businessman. He was the CEO of Barnett, Virginia.
He was a business man. He was very smart and successful. He even went back to school to be a lawyer. 
He was a business man. I don't know why but he was the first person to be killed by the government.
I think that is correct. It is located in the southernmost region of the United States. 
In the United States.  It was founded in 1845 as a colonial possession.
The capital is Washington D.C.  I think it has been a long, long time since I was there.
I'm not sure, but I know it was the first US state to be established in the US
I'm not sure, but it's a small island in the Pacific Ocean, which is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure, but i know that it was one of the first states to join the US
I'm not exactly sure but it was established on August 2, 1947. 
I'm unsure. I know he died in 1957. He was an American singer and songwriter.
She died in a plane crash in the middle of nowhere.  I don't know how she did it.
I don't know.  I'm not sure, but I know he was a good actor.
I'm not sure but I know he was a great actor, and he was in a few good films.
turkey is a type of meat. I am a big fan of meat! what do you like to eat?
It's a turkey burger, and I love it! It's one of the oldest types of turkey in the world.
It's a Turkey burger! I can't wait to try it, I love turkey!
A turkey and some chicken. I love it, but I am allergic to shellfish.
He was born on June 24, 1953. He's a great actor and songwriter.
I'm not sure but he was born in Haiti, which is the capital of Japan.
Yes.  He was born in Panama.  I'm sure he was a great actor.
I don't remember the name but it was the last election in the US.  It was a very good year!
The Mount Kilaue, the highest mountain in the world, was killed by a fire.
I am not sure, but it was a long day.  It was a pretty scary time.
I am not sure, but I do know there was a huge loss of power in the area.
It is an American fantasy novel by Jeremy Clarkson. I love his books.
She was a science fiction author, but she didn't get published in the United States. 
I'm not sure but I know that the smallest pox was found in the world in 1785.
I'm not sure, but it's been around for a long time. It's been in the UK since 1968.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the third-largest country in the world.
I am not really sure, I do know that he was a general general of the army though.
I am not sure. But he was in the White White White Society for the University.
I'm not sure, but I know that he was president. I think it was in the 80's.
I'm not sure but I know he was a good person. He was elected president in 1946.
I don't remember but I do remember that he was the coach of the New York Yankees.
Ronnie Dunn is a great artist and songwriter.  His albums are number one in the US.
It's the second largest metropolitan area in the world and the third-largest city. 
It is a major city in the U.S., but it is also one of the most sparsely populated cities in the world.
I'm not sure but I know it's the 3rd-largest country in the world. 
I don't know but it is one of the most densely populated cities in the country
I'm not sure, probably New Zealand. It's the third most populated in the world.
The population in the UK is quite small, but it is one of the most densely populated cities in the world.
He was born in the United States. I was born and raised in the U.S. 
I am not sure, but he was born in New York City. His father was a cop.
I don't know but it was the first president of the united states. I am not sure how long he has been in office.
I am not sure, but it is one of the three main colonies in Europe!  Do you know much about Ireland?
I don't know, but it is a sovereign state in the European Union.  
Yes, but it was established by the Anglo-Scottish colonies, which is a British columbia.
It was established in 1845.  It is a sovereign country in the British Isles.
I don't know but I do know that Spongebob Square is the most popular cartoons.
It debuted on March 30, 1994. It's been around a long time!
It debuted on Nickelodeon in 1999.  I loved it.
SpongeBob Squarepant was released on May of 1997, I believe it's been around since then.
I am not sure but it was in 1954, so it was a long time ago.
I'm not sure when it happened, but I do know that he was in the navy for several years.
I believe he was born in 1853, and he was also one of the greatest quarterbacks of all time
They are both retired.  They are retired now and are both lawyers.  
I'm not sure, but I do know that my parents have been together for about a year.
I do not know but I do know the Indian Space Force is the head of the Space Force.
Jacob Reece is a vampire. She is a pretty good actress. 
I think it's Tokyo. It's the capital and most populated city in China.
I am not sure, but I do know that China is one of the largest cities in China. 
I'm not sure, but I do know it is the longest contiguous bordering state. 
The Great Smoky Mountains, it's the largest river in the world. 
I am not sure, but he was born in 1981. So he has been around a while.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the highest mountain that is in New Zealand.
The highest mountain is Mount Katahdin in New Zealand. It is the longest mountain in the world.
I'm not sure, but I do know that he is the 45th president of Ohio. He is a very accomplished man.
I'm not sure but I do know that he is now the 45th president of the US.
I am not sure but he was president of the United States and also the president of Ohio.
Obama Obama, who was elected in 2001.  He is one of the most influential people in the world.
Obama Obama is the 45th president of the US. He ran for President Obama's Senate.
Obama is the 45th president of the United States, and I think he is a great candidate.
Obama Obama. He is a prominent US politician and was elected for president of the united states.
I don't know, but I am not sure who did it.  It would have been a surprise.
Obama, he was the president of the United States, the US, and the United Kingdom.
Obama was the 45th president of the United States. He is one of the most powerful presidents of the world.
Obama was the president of America. He was elected in 2008 as president of the United States.
Obama is the 45th president of the United States.  He is a great president.  Do you think Obama will win?
Obama is the 45th president of the United States.   He's been the most influential politician in the history of America.
Obama Obama won!  He was the president of America and the first president of the U.S.
He was the president of the U.S. and he had been in office for a while.
I'm not sure but I think he was the president of the U.S.  He was also a Senator of the United States.
Obama.  He ran for president for the United States of America.  I think he was a great candidate. 
Obama was the US president of the United States and was president of United States.  He was very successful.
Obama was the US president of the United States, and he ran for President Obama Obama.  He did win!
I don't know. But I know it was a great year for the Atlanta Braves.
The capital is Bavaria and it is a small town in the Caribbean.
It is the capital of Venezela. It is a small town in the Caribbean.
Yes! It's also the most densely populated city in the U.S.!
I don't remember his exact age, but he was a pretty old man and he had a heart attack. 
Margot died in 1987.  She was a great singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure, but she was a great actress.  I was so sad when her death was announced
She was 54 years old.  That's a good question.  She was a great actress, dancer, and singer.
She was only 34. She was a wonderful actress, singer and songwriter.
I am not sure, but I am sorry to hear about your loss.  I know you are very sad.
Sweden is bordered on the Atlantic Ocean and the Far Eastern Sea
Sweden is bordered by Norway and Denmark.  I'm not sure how far from Norway is it.
Denamark is the capital and most populous city, and Sweden is the largest in the northern part of the country.
Denmark is a northernmost country located in the Atlantic Ocean and Norway.
Sweden, Norway, Finland, and Iceland. It's very beautiful and beautiful!
I don't know but I know Sweden is the third smallest country in the European Union
Sweden is a country located in the Northern Europe. Do you know much about it?
I am not too sure but Sweden is the third-largest country in the European Union by area, behind Norway and Finland.
Nobel prizes are awarded for being the greatest literary figure in the world.
I'm not sure, but it was the most influential woman in the world. She won a lot of awards.
I believe it was Jane Austen.  She was the founder of the American Literature.
I don't really know, but she was also nominated for three Academy Awards.
I am not sure, but I do know that the word "writer" was first recorded in the 10th century.
I don't think so but he is an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
I'm not sure when he was married, but he was in the news for his work. I don't remember the name.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the county is the third-largest in the US!
I am not sure but I know it is one of the oldest and oldest in the world.
They have been around since the early 1980's.  It's been around for over 40 years now.
I'm not sure but he was an American singer and songwriter.  His death was a shock to me.
Oh no, I'm so sorry. That must be so hard.  I can't imagine what you must have felt.
He had a heart attack. He had been sick for about 2 weeks. He was in a car accident.
He died in 1979, and I'm so sorry for the loss of him.  He was a great dad.
It was a few years ago. I'm so sorry to hear about your father. He must be really tough.
I'm not sure but I do know that it's the most densely populated city in Africa.
I don't remember his name, but he was in the Navy. He was also a good actor.
I don't think he directed any movies, but he did star in the TV show "Love Me Do".
The island of Cuba is a huge island in the south of the Gulf of August.
They are all gone.  They all died in a plane crash.  I was so sad that they all died.
They all have names like Jeremy Clarkson, Megus, and Megar.
Kevin, I love his name.  He's a great artist.  What do you do?
I'm not sure. But he is very attractive. I think he's pretty attractive too. 
Richard and Maurice. They were a good family. I was so sad to see them die.
The longest of the three major rivers in the north. The only river I know is the one in Dublin.
I am not sure but I do know that it is the first person born on earth. I have been there!
I don't know but the Bible says the first written book was written by Abraham.
Edgar Allen is a great poet. He was born on August 2, 1964.
Edgar Allan Poe was an English author. He wrote poetry for the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know it is the third-smallest river in the world! 
I don't know but there is an estimated 8.5 million people in the world!
It is the Atlantic Ocean, it is one of the most densely populated in the world
The Atlantic is probably the largest, although there are a lot of rivers in Finland and the Caribbean.
The Finland longest in the world. I'm not sure if it's the longest though.
He was a real estate agent. He was born and raised in Honolulu.
I don't know, but I know that they are a major part of the rainbow river
It's the River of the Bahamas.  I've never been but I've heard it's beautiful.
He was a great driver and also a great dancer. He also won the NASCAR Auto Racing Series.
Her name is Julia. She's been married for a few years now. She is a great wife.
She was a great actress. She was also a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
She was a famous actress.  I'm not a huge fan of her, but she was a very nice lady.
Her name was Megus.  I was shocked to see that she was so young! 
Her name was Julia, and she was my best friend. We went skydiving together.
The Mona Lisa was first documented in the late 1960s and early 1950's
It was 1939, it is one of the most famous paintings in the world.
It was in 1953, I'm not sure if it was the first time it was in the world, but I know it was a long time ago.
No, but I have heard that is one of the largest cities in Saudi Arabia.
I am not sure. But i know that Sweden is bordered by Finland, Norway and Finland.
Bill Gates is a great American businessman and founder of Pennsylvania.
Bill Gates is the founder of Microsoft.  He's been a big fan of Microsoft since he was born.
It's a small island in the Caribbean, but I have never been there before.
I don't know but it is the largest country in the world. It is in the Southeastern region of Asia.
I don't know, but the British were the first to have it as a colonial possession.
I'm not sure, but it's interesting to see how the president is a member of the United States government.
I don't know but he was one of the first president of the US. He was a real estate agent.
I believe it was Madeleine Stewart.  She was a great actor and singer.
I am not sure, but I know they are not in the top 50 in the world. 
I don't know but I know he is very famous. He was born and raised in New York City.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it was the most successful movie of all time. It's hard to believe it's been that long.
The river that flows on the Atlantic Ocean. I love that river. 
I'm not sure. I know that he was in the National Football Conference for Michigan State University.
Mariah Carey is a singer, songwriter and actress. 
Saudi Arabia is a country in the Kingdom of Saudis Arabi. 
Egypt is the capital of Greece and is the largest city in Saudi Arabia.
The Kingdom of Saudi Arabian, Arabia, and Jordania.
I'm not sure but the Saudi Arabia is the third largest country in the world
It's in the middle east. It borders Egypt, Saudi Arabia, and Jamaica.
I think they are neighbors to Saudi Arabia.  I have never been there before.
I am not sure but it was the largest island in the middle of Saudi Arabia until the 1930s.
It's a sea in the Middle East that bordered Saudi Arabia, Egypt, and Jamaica.
I'm not sure but I know Saudi Arabia has the longest coast in the world.
He was born on June 25, 1964. He was a great driver, and was a member of the New York Giants.
I am not really sure but he had a long career and was the 45th president of the U.S
I think it was Donald J J. Clinton. It was a long time ago though.  
It was the president of the United States of America.  He was elected to be the president.
New York, but I think that's because it's the most sparsely populated city in North America
I'm not sure but I know that there are more than seventy languages in the world.
Trinididad is a small island in the Caribbean Sea.  
John Cena is one of the most popular and influential men in the world. He was born on August 1948.
I'm not sure, but I was very upset about it. I'm sure it was a long war.
I'm not sure but I do know that Virginia Beach, the capital, is the seat of Lake Champlain.
I don't know, but he was the CEO of the Culinary Academy in London
He was the ruler of the Republic of Ireland, and he did a lot for the British.
I am not sure but they were married for a few years and then he passed away.  He was a great driver.
I don't know the exact numbers, but Mexico has a lot of people in the US. It's the third-largest country in the U.S.
I'm not sure. I just know they are one of the fastest growing cities in the US.
Mexico City is the most populous. It is the largest metro area in the U.S.
I'm not sure but I know that Mexico is the third largest country by area.  I would love to visit.
The 5th most populated of Mexico and the third most densely populated in the U.S.
I'm not sure, but it was a very long time ago, but she was a good mother to my kids, so I'm sure she was happy to see me.
He was born in Italy and died in 1889.  He was a great man!
Yes, the highest point in France is the 4th highest elevated point in the world!
The highest point was the Europa in Europe.  It's the second most sparsely populated country in the world.
Yes, it was in the 14th century, I'm not sure how long ago it was established though.
Jackie Jackson was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
I am not sure but it was the first one to be held at the World Cup.  
Atlanta Thrashers are an American professional basketball team based in the Atlanta metropolitan area.
I'm not sure but it was a small town in Kentucky. I was surprised. I had no idea there was so much to do.
I'm not sure, but they were a small settlement in the Caribbean. 
It was a small town in the US, but the town was small and had a lot of people.
The river that runs through Budapest, Michigan, is one of the most popular rivers in the world.
The Budapest River is a beautiful river. It is the second-largest river in the world.
It's a river that crosses the Mississippi River. I think that's pretty cool.
It's the Atlantic Ocean. I've never been but I've always wanted to. Do you?
The river of Bentonville, Arkansas, which runs through the Mississippi River.
She was an American singer, songwriter, actress and dancer. 
I would have to say Hindu.  It is the second-largest Christianity in the world.
No, he was playing for the Washington Capitals. He played for the Montreal Vancouver Giants.
I'm not sure when it came to be but I know it was a popular website back in the day.
I'm not sure but it was his best season, he was the best player in the world.
The Finland has a large amount of Christians and Jewish people. I don't know much about the Finland other than that.
They are a Christian denomination based in Finland.  It is the smallest of the three major European countries.
Finland is the capital of Finland. It is in the northernmost European and the third-largest country in the world.
I don't know but I do know that Finland is the third-largest country in the European Union and the fourth smallest in the world.
I'm not entirely sure, but I do know that there are more than 70,000 people in the world.
I am not sure, but it is located in the north eastern region of the world.
I don't remember when he first appeared but he has been in the industry since 1962.
Macaullins is a character from the TV show Homescapes. He is a very good actor.
Macauley Culin is a famous American actor. He was also a pro wrestler.
I'm not sure, but I know he's an actor. He was born in New York.
It's in the Caribbean, it's a beautiful island in the Pacific Ocean.
I'm not sure but it is one of the largest in the world and has over a million people.
I am not sure, but he was born and raised in Honolulu and moved to New York City.
It was written in the United States.   I am not sure if it is still being published.
She won an award for singing and dancing in front of a large audience. I'm sure she's very talented
Taylor Swift won a grammys for writing songs.  I was so happy for her.
I think she won an award for singing in front of a crowd. She is very talented!
She won a Grammy award for singing, songwriter, and acting.
She won a Grammy award for Best Alternative Rock. I was so shocked.
I think she won an awards for being the best singer and songwriter in the world.
I am not quite sure.  I just got home from work.  He's a great driver.
Minnesota. It is a small, rural state located in the southeastern region of the United States.
They are the people who are born into Italy and live in the Caribbean. They are really pretty.
Galileos are a fictional island nation located in the Mediterranean.
I am not sure but the Galileos name comes from the Italian word for "galeo" which means "little armoured one
Galileos were an Italian sibling. They were born in Italy.
Galileos are a fusion of Spanish and Italian roots.  They were born in Italy.
It is officially recognized as one of the three-thirds of the United States, which is pretty neat!
I'm not really sure about that, but I know that it is one of the three largest state in the world.
I'm not sure what happened, but he was an actor and director for a small film studio in Philadelphia.
The American singer? She was a singer, songwriter, and producer.
Carl sandberg is an American singer-songwriter and songwriters.
I am not sure. He was an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, and producer.
I am not sure. I know he was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
Carl Sandburg is a famous comedian and actor from Las Vegas, Nevada. He's a great actor.
My favorite artist is Carl Sandwiches. He is an American singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.
Eric carle was born on December 22, 1981, and was born in 1974.
I think the most important was the goalie. He was the best player on the team.  
I believe it was around 1845.  It's been a long time since Japan has been a nation since then.
The first japanese nation was founded in 1845, so they have been around for a long time
I'm not sure, but I know that Japan has been around since the 18th century.  It's a very old country.
Japan is the only country that has never been in the United States, so that makes sense.  
The first one was in 1894. It was a long war between the germans.
Thomas Jefferson was born on March 1944.  He is the 45th President of the United States.
Thomas Jefferson was born in 1943. I am not sure if he was president.
Thomas Jefferson became president in the United States in the 19th century. He was also a prominent businessman.
Sweden is a Nordic island in the Atlantic and the border is on the eastern Atlantic Ocean.
He is a professional rugby player for the New York Rangers. He's been playing in New York City since he was 18.
I am not sure but he played for the New York Yankees in the 1990s.
He plays for the Washington Capitals. I love him. I wish I could see him play.
I'm not sure but he's an American football quarterback. I don't think he's very good.
He's a US quarterback for the Atlanta Giants. He was drafted by the University of Georgia.
He plays for the Washington Redskins. He is the quarterback of the Washington Capitals. He has been playing for a long time.
I'm not sure but I think they are pretty good.  They are one of the most successful bands in the world.
I'm not sure but I think it is Michelle Obama, she was a great actress.
I don't know, but the King of Queens is my favorite of all the cast. I think it's great that there are so many great actors.
It is Michelle Obama. I have never seen it, but I do know that she is a great actress.
I don't know who plays there. I know that there are a lot of great actors in the show though.
The Queen of Scots, Queen Elizabeth, and Jodhi May.  
I'm not sure but the show is very popular. They are the highest rated reality television series.
I don't remember, but I do know he is the lead singer of the band. 
I think the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. I am so excited to see it!
I am not too sure, but the name is Cedar Falls National Scenic Trail.
I'm not really sure, but i know the highest mountain in U.S. is Maine
The tallest one in the U.S. is Maine.  It is a long one in Virginia.
The highest mountain in North America is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
Mount Katahdin, VA. It is in the Sierra Nevada area.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail. It's the highest mountain in the world.
It's Mount Katahdin, it is the highest mountain in the world. 
I'm not sure but it was nominated for five Academy Awards. I was so impressed.
I don't really remember but they were nominated for the Academy Award in 1997.
I don't know, but I can tell you that the Oscar Awards were nominated for five Academy Awards.
I don't know but I do know that the film was nominated for the Academy Award.
I believe it was the 1938 remake of the Godfather. It was really good.
It is a great movie, and it was nominated for five Academy Awards. 
They were all good but the last movie I saw was The Last of Us. I was so sad.
I think it was the Godfather, but I'm not sure, but the first movie came out in 1994.
I'm not sure but he was the first US president of the United States. He was president of Arkansas.
I think it was Obama and Michelle Obama. They were the ones who became president.
I'm sorry, I meant to say "the wife of the United States".  But yes, I am married to a wonderful woman.
I believe Michelle Obama is the first president of the united states.  Do you know?
The highest point is Alabama in the southeastern part of the Mississippi. 
I am not sure but I do know that it is in Missouri and Alabama.
I'm not sure.  I do know that they are the largest brass-based instruments in the world.
I don't know, but he's one of the most influential guitarists of all time.
Richard Wagner was the lead vocalist in the United States. He was also a pioneer.
Scorpions island is in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean. It's really pretty
It was in 1962.  It was a great game.  The Dolphins were the first team to win the Super Bowl.
I'm not sure but I think Manchester United was the best.  They were a great team.
Manchester United is the greatest team in the world, so I'm sure they're both great.
I am not sure who played for Manchester United but I know that the team was founded by David Fisher in 1863.
I'm not sure but I can tell that Manchester United is one of the biggest clubs in the world.
I am not sure.  It was a long day.  I am a big fan of Manchester United.  Do you like football?
I don't know, but they played for United. They are the best team in the world.
I think it was Ronaldo, and he's been playing for Manchester United since 1992!
I believe it was Bartolomeo Cristofori, but I don't recall his exact name.
I am not too sure, but I know Manchester United is the team's best club.
I think it was Ronaldo. He was one of the most important players of all time.
I think the Manchester United is the most successful team in the world. I am not sure though.
Yes, but it was established in 1845. The foundation of the state was established at the same time.
I'm not sure, but it's interesting that it's the capital and most populous in the world. 
I think she was born back in 1958. She is an American singer-songwriter.
She was born on August 30, 1981. I was so excited when she was born.
I don't remember exactly when he was born, but it was a long time ago.  
I am not sure. I have never met her before, but I know she was born in 1958
He was born in 1943 and is one of the greatest American actors of all time.
She is a great actress. She was born in 1963. She's an American singer and songwriter.
Her name is Sara. She was a very good mother. She raised me well and taught me a lot.
That's awful.  I am so sorry to hear.  How long have you been playing guitar?
That's a shame.  I'm sure they were very talented.  Do you like music?
I'm sorry to hear that.  I'm sure they were very happy to hear of you.
No, but I am sure he would be very happy to see me. He was a great musician and songwriter.
Oh my gosh, yes.  I can't believe that happened.  It's a shame.
I'm sure they were.  I'm sorry.  Do you have any musician friends?
I'm not sure. It's probably the largest metropolitan area in the US.
He was the best at Manchester United, he was also the best football player on the team
I am not sure, but I do know that they have won a few awards in the US.
I'm not sure but I know the river is the longest river in Africa.
I don't know, but it was in 1973 when it was established.  It's been a long time since I've been there.
I am not sure but I do know that the government has been around for a long time. 
Yes, he was married to a woman named Elizabeth.  It was a pleasant surprise to have.
It was actually a shortened version of the name. I don't know if they still exist.
I am not sure but the US is the 3rd most spaced out country in the world.
I haven't seen it yet. I have heard it is a great action adventure. What is it about?
Keanu Reves is one of my favorite actors. He was also a good dancer.
Well, I'm not sure what he did, but he's been around a while. He was a singer, songwriter, and producer.
He's an American singer and songwriter. He was born in London, England.
I'm not sure, but he's one of the most influential bands of all time.
I'm not sure, but it's interesting that Africa has a large and diverse population.
Yes! The Republic of Africa is a sovereign country in the Sudan Ocean.
I am not sure. I know that the U.S. is a country that is located in the southern region of the United States.
I think that is a good question.  I don't know much about the country but I do know that it is a sovereign state in the United States.
Kenya is a small island country in the Caribbean Sea.  It is very close to the Gulf of Mexico.
I don't know, but I know that Africa has been the largest country in Africa for at least 5,000 years.
I'm not sure but I know that there has been a war between the Azeroth and the Greece.
That is correct. They're also a sovereign state that's located in the southeastern region of Asia.
I'm not sure but he is the current US president. He was elected to be the 45th president in the US.
That's a good question. I don't know who the other president is, but the president of America.
I'm not sure, but I know he was a good President. He served for the United States as President.
It is in the southeastern United States, and it is very close to Germany.
They are neighbors in the southern part of the united states. I'm not sure what country they are from though.
It is a country in the southeastern region of the US.  I am not sure if it's the neighboring country.
The country is in the southeastern part of the united states of the country.
I don't know, but I know that Germany is a great place to visit.  The capital is Bavaria.
It's a neighboring country in East Germany and Austria. I have always wanted to go.
The country bordered by Germany and Belgium, and I'm sure there's a lot of people there.
It is in the United Kingdom, and it's bordered to Belgium, Germany and the Netherlands.
I'm not sure.  They are in the southern part of Germany.  I don't know where they are located.
It is in the southeast part of the U.S. in the United States.
I am not sure. But I know there are a lot of German immigrants in the US.
It's a small island in the Caribbean.  I've visited a few times.
It's a tiny country in the southeastern region of the U.S. 
I'm not sure what country it is, but it's the capital of the country in Germany.
It's a small country in the US. We have some nice beaches here. Do you live in a big city?
The US.  It is a very big country.  I have never been, but I want to go.
I live in the United States. The capital is Dearborn, Michigan. It's the second largest city in the US.
It's the United States. We're actually neighbors. I'm going to visit them in a few weeks.
It is a neighboring country in the southeastern region of the U.S.
It is a sovereign country located in the southern part of the US.  The country is very nice.
It's a country in the southeastern region of the United States, bordered by Germany, France, Belgium, and Germany.
It's a very large country in the middle of Germany. It's the third-largest country in Europe.
It is a sovereign country in East Germany. I have never been there, but I know it is a large country.
I am not sure, but I know that it's the 3rd most populous country in the EU
The capital is Bavaria.  I have been to the capital and it's beautiful!
I'm not sure but they are the second-largest country in the European union. 
It is a country that is bordered by Germany, Belgium, and Italy.
The german government is located in the southern part of the country and bordered by the united states
I'm not exactly sure, but they seem very nice.  It is the third-largest country in the EU.
Well I know it's the capital and most populous. But I'm not sure about other countries.
The german government is a sovereign state in the EU, and it is located in the south of Bavaria.
Well I am not sure, but they are the largest country in the world by area. They are the 3rd most populous country in Europe.
I think they are the ones that are bordered by Belgia and the Republic of Ireland
I'm not sure, but I know it's in Germany.  I think it's the third-largest country in the EU.
I'm not sure. But it is a very popular country, it's the third-largest country in the European Union.
I don't know, but I do know that it's the 3rd-smallest country in the world!
I'm not sure but it was his first album released in 2009! He released it in 1994.
It was released in 1996. He was a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
He was born in 1983, he was a singer/songwriter.
He was born in Pennsylvania. He's the president of the United States.
Yes, he was born on March 25, 1845 in Arkansas.  
I believe it was Hawaii, but I don't know if he was born there.  Obama was the 45th president of the United States.
The island of Hawaii, in the Caribbean, on the Pacific Ocean.
Ellen degensis is a great american actress, singer, songwriter, and singer
I'm not sure but I know it's the third most populous state and the 4th smallest of the 50 states.
I'm not sure but it is the highest mountain in the world.  I would love to visit.
I'm not exactly sure. But I do know that China is the largest country in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that the United States is the second-largest country by area in the world.
I am not sure but I do know that the United States has the highest population of any country.
He was born in Pennsylvania and moved to Michigan when he was 5.
He is a great American singer and songwriter.  I am not a fan of his music though.  How about you?
I am not sure but he was the president of the University of Kentucky University.
I'm not sure about that but I think it's in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.
Carl Smith died in 1997. He was a great driver, but he was also a great artist.
She's a singer and songwriter. She's been around since 1984.
It's called "Slick Rider".  It's a classic.  It was released in 1997.
I'm not sure, but he is the author of "The Hitchhiker" and is the most influential author of all time.
It's a science fiction book.  It's set in Alexander Mitchell.
It's a book about Alex Trebek, he's been riding since he was a kid.
I'm not sure, but I know that it is one of the best selling books of all time.
He was drafted by the University of Michigan.  He was a quarterback for Michigan University.
He was the commander of the army and was also the leader of the United States and the U.S.
I'm not sure of who was but I know they were the first country to be involved in the war.
I am not sure who ran for. But I do know that Britain was one of the first nations to be in the war.
I'm not sure, but it was the most important battle in the world. It was the first war in England.
I don't know but I know that the British empire was one of the original colonies of the world
I'm not sure but it was the longest of all the major military in the world. 
It is a bus. I am so excited! I can't wait to take it to the beach
It is a long way from the house I grew up on.  It is in Haiti.  I have never been to the airport.
She released her debut album back in 2005.  It was number one in the US and number one on the Billboard Hot 100.
She released her debut album last year, "Thank Me Me Do".  Have you heard of her?
She's not released yet, but she's signed to the label. She's a singer, songwriter, and record producer.
She released her debut studio album, "Pet Sounds". It was number 1 in the US.
She was born in 1949. She was the youngest of four brothers and sisters.
I'm not sure. But I do know she is a great singer, songwriter, dancer, and singer.
It's the 8th anniversary, but the first of the 21st century.  She's a great mother.
Yes, that's right.  My daughter was born on August 2, 1984.
The U.S. and the United States are in the southeastern United States.
It's the largest Arab state in the world and the third-largest country in the Arabian region of the world.
I am not sure but I do know that they are the second-largest country in the world by area.
It is a sovereign state in the Middle East.  It is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
They are the largest Arab nations in the world, so I assume it is in the Middle East, Africa, and Asia.
Well, I'm not sure about that, but I know the Kingdom of the United States was established in the early 19th century.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the third largest country and is bordered by Egypt, Morocco and Greece.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's in the Saudi Arabian Arab states.
I don't know, but I know that it is the second-largest country in the world.
The united states.  The country is the second-largest country in the world. 
I'm not sure but they are a sovereign nation that is located in the southeastern region of the world.
I am not sure. But I know that the Emirates have been around since the 15th century.
The United States.  It is also the third most sparsely populated country in the United States
I don't know exactly, but the country is located in the Saudi Arabia.
Yes, they are a sovereign state located in the southern region of the world.
Yes, it is located in the saudi arabian archipelago. 
Yes it is.  It is a sovereign state in the southern hemisphere
I think so.  The United States is the third-largest country in the world.
I am not sure but I do know that the Emirates are a sovereign entity.
yes, it is a sovereign state in the southeastern region of the world
Yes, the country is located in the Saudi Arabian Sea.  I have never been to either of them.
It's a small island in the Mediterranean sea.  It's very small.
I am not sure, but I know that there is a place in Saudi Arabia that is known for its rich history.
I am not sure, but I know that they are the largest country in the world and have over 3.4 million citizens.
Well, the UAE is one of the largest and most sparsely populated countries in the world.
It is a country in the southeastern region of Europe. I am sure there are many different places in the world.
The main one is the capital and the largest city in the country.  It's very diverse.
I am not sure but it is the largest state in the world and has the highest unemployment rate.
He's in March.  He's a very famous American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I am not sure but he was born in 1984.  He was a great baseball player.
She was a famous fashion designer and a beauty queen.    I was very surprised.
Yes, he was a prominent French man and was the CEO of Napoleon Bonapartete.
I'm not sure, but it was very popular. She was a very popular actress and singer and songwriter.
I don't know who he was. I know he is one of the most influential people ever though.
I am not sure but he was born in 1974 and died in 1981. 
I'm not sure. I know it was founded in Seattle, Washington in 1894.
I am not sure, but they have a headquarters in Bentonville, Arkansas.
I'm not sure but the only thing I know is that Amazon's headquarters is in Seattle, Washington.
I don't know but I know that it is the largest employer in the world. It is huge!
He was born on March 2, 1985 and is a member of the American rock & roll hall of fame.
I am not sure, but I know it was in the late 1800s. It was a very long war. 
I don't know. But I know that there are more than seventy different Ramadans in the world.
I don't know but I know they're a Christian group that's based in the southern region of the united states.
I don't know, but they are in the middle east, so I assume they're christian.
I don't know, but I do know that Ramadan is the largest Christian religion in the world!
It's a Christian denomination. They celebrated Christmas in March of the United States.
It is the third-largest city in the United States and has a population of over 3.5 million people.
I am not sure but it is the third-largest in the US by area and the 4th-most densely populated.
Alaska, it's the 3rd most sparsely populated in the U.S.
I am not sure, but I know that Alaska has a population of about 3.5 million
I don't know but I know that it's the 4th smallest in the US. 
The city of Alaska is the most densely populated of the 50 states in the USA.
I have no idea, but I do know that she was nominated for the Oscar for Best Actress in the United States.
Brad pitts is a very famous actor, she is one of the best actresses of all time.
Brad Pitt Patt is one of the best actors in the world! He's been in so many great movies.
Brad Pitt Pitt is an American actress and singer-songwriter
Brad pitts is one of my favorite actors! I like her because she was a child actress and singer.
Well angela Jolie has won several awards and won three Academy Awards.
No, I don't think I've seen any of her movies. Do you like Brad Pitt?
No, I'm not a big fan of Brad Pitts movies.  I prefer comedies.
Brad Pitt Pitt and Angelina Jolie were great in the 1980s
Brad Pitts and Angelina Jolie starred in The Lesbian Division of the United States.
Italy was the first country to be ruled by the ruling of the world in the 20th century.
Italian is the ruler of Italy. He was the commander of the Italy's government.
I don't know, but I'm sure it was a very important figure for the Italian government.
Kesha is an American singer and songwriter, she has a pretty popular name.
Her name is Kesha, but she is a very popular singer and songwriter.
He was the owner of the franchise. He also played baseball for the NY Yankee.
Mickey Mantle was born in 1903, so a little over 20 years ago.
He was born in 1958, but he played for the New York Yankee.
Mickie Mantle played for them in the 1960s. She was born in 1977.
It's an American state in the United States.  I have been there a few times.  It's a nice city.
Obama Obama is the president of the United States.  He is also the first American president. 
I'm not sure but he was the president of the United States.  I think it was George Bush.
I'm not sure. But I know that he was president of the U.S.  
I am not sure but the first president of the United States was Abdullah Jean R. Kennedy.
I think it was a guy who did it, but he didn't know what he was doing.
I don't know, but they were trying to get rid of Fiji for some reason. It is very hard to believe.
I am not sure, but I know Africa is a sovereign state in the Atlantic Ocean.
I am not sure but I know that it is the third-largest state in Africa
I'm not sure, but I do know that Africa is one of the largest and most sparsely populated countries in the world.
The Atlantic Sea is a bordered ocean between the Gulf of America and the Atlantic Ocean, and the Caribbean.
I don't remember, but I do know that the word "job" was originally a Latin word meaning "little armoured one"
It's the southeastern region of the world, in the Atlantic Ocean.
It's the third-largest continent in the world. It's pretty cool. 
I'm not really sure, but the area is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic ocean, and the Pacific Ocean.
I am not sure but I do know that the government was formed in 1888. 
I'm not sure but he was the president of South Africa. He also held the title of the United States in the 1980s.
That's an interesting question.  I know it was Michael Jackson, but I'm not sure who was.  He was president of South Africa.
He's a good quarterback for the New York Giants! He's also one of the top ten quarterbacks in the NFL.
They're a little bit older than me, but they're still married to a young lady. 
I don't recall the details of that, but it was a while ago. It was a long time ago. 
Her name is Megara.  I'm really excited for her because she is such a beautiful woman.
I'm not sure, but I know that she is a very famous singer and songwriter. I know she is very talented.
Julian is a great American actress who was born in Honolulu, Hawaii and raised on a farm.
She is one of the most influential women in the world.  She is a very talented woman.
Julie Hough is a famous American actress, singer, and songwriter.
Her name is Megan.  She was born and raised in New York.  I was so excited!
Juliane Hough is an American singer, songwriter and producer.
Juliane Hough was a famous English fashion designer. She was born in 1984. 
Juliane Hough is a famous singer and songwriter and singer.
She's an American singer and songwriter.  I don't know who is the patent owner.
I'm not really sure, but she was a pretty good singer.  She was born on December 18, 1989.
I don't know, but he was a great guitarist.  He is also one of the most influential musicians of all time.
he was an american singer and songwriter, he was inducted into the national news in 2011
He was a pale, dehydrated, and malnutritional disorder
He died of the flu. He was so sick. He had an epileptic attack. 
I'm not sure but he was the best actor ever.  His death was a surprise to me.
He died in a car accident. I was so devastated. I can't believe he did so.
He was a great actor and actor. He was the lead vocalist in the movie The Godfather.
It was a car accident.  He was a great driver.  I was really upset. 
I'm not sure.  He was born in 1969 so he must have been around a while.
He was born on July 4th, 1943. He was the greatest artist of all time.
Prince Royce was born in 1978 and was born on August 30, 1983
I am not sure, it was in Alabama.  I think it was a little older.
I'm not exactly sure but I know that the city is the most populous metropolitan area within the state.
Michelsonson Albert Award winner, an American singer and songwriter.
Harry Potter is an American fantasy fiction film. He was born on August 1873.
Marlie Monroe was an American singer and songwriter who died in 1994.
Marlie Monroe was a famous actress, singer, songwriter and singer.
Marl Monroe is an American singer, songwriter, producer and actor.
Marilyn Monroe, a woman named Elizabeth Bennett, was an American actress and songwriter
Marilyn Monroe is an American singer and songwriter. I love her!
Marilyn Monroe, the American singer and songwriter and author. 
She won the Grammy Award for "Before I Was There".  I thought she was going to win.
I believe it is an orbit that orbit around the earth and is a tidal bore.
Michael Jordan is an American singer and songwriter. He was born in 1963.
Barbra mcLintock is an american singer, songwriter, actress, and musician.
He was an American rapper, singer, actor, and dancer. He's a legend.
He's an American singer, actor, and author. He's been around for a while.
Gustavino Diaz is an Italian rapper and singer. He's been around awhile.
Gustavin Diaz was an Italian rapper and songwriter.
No, I'm not familiar with Gustavos. What's his name?   
He was born on August 30, 1961!  He is a great player.
It's a small country in the middle.  It's the third largest in the world by area.
I'm not sure, but I know that they are a small island in the Caribbean.
I don't recall his name, but he's an amazing actor, director, producer, screenwriter, and producer.
She died on August 29, 1995.  She was a good actress and comedian.
John Deerer's death was in 1963. He was a great man.  
I'm not sure but the Major League Baseball League is one of the oldest professional basketball teams in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that they were the ones that brought the area to Europe. 
She was 15 years older.  She was a great dancer and actress.  
I'm not sure but I do know it's the longest mountains in the world.  
I'm not sure, but I know it was in the Caribbean.  It's been a long time since I've been there.
Lebrons was born on March 28, 1991 in Birmingham, England.
I believe he was born in 1997. He's one of the best players on the league.
He was born on August 21, 1985.  That's a long time ago.
She was a famous American singer, songwriter, dancer, and actress.
I don't know but the prophet Mohammed was the father of the Pope of England.
Her name is Megus, she's my best friend, but she's also in college.
I don't know. I have not heard of it.  What is her name?  
I'm not sure, but I know he's a great driver.  He's also the youngest of 5.
I'm not too sure, but I do know that they have the highest average household income in Canada.
Lady Gaga. She's a pretty famous singer. I don't know how many people know her though.
I don't know. But it is a very famous singer/songwriter.
He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor. I think he had a great time
It's the Atlantic, and it is the second-largest ocean in the world.
The Atlantic is my favorite ocean, but the other is the Gulf of Mexico. 
He's an American singer, songwriter, producer, and actor! He is very popular.
He's a singer. He's been around a while! He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
He is a great singer, songwriter and actor. I love his voice. He is very talented.
Billie Joel wrote "Billy Jelly" and "Billie Holland" in the 1970s.
Billie Jelly Joel is a singer, songwriter, and producer
Ronnie and Hermione were in the United States. They are still going strong!
James Bond was a famous actor from the 1960s, but he's been around a long time.
The ford mustang!  I am so excited to see what it looks like!  
Yes, he did get the Bachelor's. He's a very good teacher. 
It is a comedy. I love Jim Carreys, but he is so overrated.
He was an American actor, but I don't remember his name.  He was born and raised in the Philadelphia.
It was a romantic comedy.   Jim Carrey is a great actor.  He was also a good actor.
I have not seen it, but I do know he was an American actor and director. 
I am not sure when it was invented, but it's been around since 1962.
Alexander Mansas was the first major city in the U.S. in 1893.
Alexander the Great is the city of Alexander Mount O'Louis, Mississippi.
The city was founded in 1881. It was the largest city in Europe until 1894.
His name is Megan Gandhi, he was born in India. He's been around for a long time.
I don't know, I just know that he was a very prominent rapper.
Maha Gadhi Joshi. He is an American rapper, actor and TV star.
I am not sure but they have been in the U.S since the early 20th century!
I believe the first arrives in the 18th century, but I don't remember the exact date.
I'm not sure, but I do know it is the 3rd-largest state in the United States.
I'm not exactly sure but the state capital is Memphis, Tennessee.
It is a country located in Africa. It's a small island nation in the Atlantic Ocean.
It was in 2004.  It was the first presidential election in the U.S.
He was elected for President of the United States in January of 1961.  He was a great politician.
I'm not sure but it was his first presidential run in the US.  He was a good one.
She died in 1983.  I was sad.  She was such a great person.
Yeah, it was a long time ago, but I remember that. He was an American singer and songwriter.
She was born on August 29, 1948. She's been around a really long time.
The capital of Syria is Bahamas, but it is the second-largest city of Syrup.
It's called Dearborn, Syria. It's a big city in the Midwest.
I'm not sure but it was the one who had the highest gpa in the world and was the best.
It was in the late 1970s, but it was the last time we drafted him.
He was the quarterback for the Chicago Bears.  He played for them in the Nfl.
The Packers drafted Aaron Rodgers in the early 1980s!  He is a great quarterback.
They are an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, record producers, and producer.
I'm not sure but he is the American singer, songwriter, producer, actor and dancer.
I don't think I've ever heard of them. I know he was born in 1957. 
I don't remember his name, but I do know that he is the most successful male actor of all time.
I believe in the late 1800's. I know he was the ruler of the United States.
It was founded in 1853.  It was a small colonial possession. 
I am not sure. He has a new job and he is in the military. I am so excited!
It was on August 29, 1993. I am not sure if they will let it go.
He is an American singer and songwriter.  He was born and raised in New York.
He joined the US in the 1960s and became the first president of the U.S.
I'm not sure, but it must be the first ever man in the solar eclipse
The Republic of Serbia is the second least populated country in Serbian county.
Brad is an American actor. He was born in New York.  Do you like him?
Brad pitts is a great actor. He was also a great comedian. Do you like brad?
I am not sure but I know the award was awarded for the most prestigious award in the world.
I don't know, but I do know that he was the founder of the company of Barnerick.
It is the largest in Africa, with the second-largest population in the world.
The capital of Bahra, which is called Bahrain, is one of the most populated major cities in the world.
Bahrain is a city in the Gulf of Aqaba and the city is the most populous city in Bahra.
I'm not sure, but it's the 3rd most populous city in Bahrain.
Bahrain is the largest city in the country, but its also the second biggest in the world.
I am not sure but it is one of the most populous cities in the US. 
I'm not too sure but it is one of the most populous cities in the world.
I'm not sure but I know it is the longest river in the world.  It is very important to have access to fresh water.
It's a river in the Atlantic Ocean, it runs through the Pacific Ocean
It's a little river in the middle of nowhere. It's pretty neat looking.  
The longest, it is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. 
I'm not sure but I know that it is in the southeastern region of the US
The Mississippi River, it is the longest and most powerful river in the world.
I'm going to Hawaii. I'm really excited. I have never been before. 
The longest is the Mississippi river.  It goes through Memphis.
I'm not sure, but I know it's one of the most densely populated rivers in the US
He is a great American singer-songwriter. He was born on August 1894
He is a great American singer and songwriter. He was born in 1962.
Yes, it is a river in Africa.  That is a long time ago.  I am not sure how long it has been there.
It was born in 1973.   It was a small town in the United States.
He was born in 1903 and died in 1953. It was a long time ago.
He died on December 22, 2017.  He was a great President of the United States.
I don't recall, but I do remember that he was an American singer and songwriter.
He is an American singer, songwriter, and actor.  He was a great singer!
Arthur died in August 30, 2005. He was a great man. 
He died in 1973. He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
It was Jean Jett. She was the winner of the Democratic Party in 1972.
I'm not sure but I do know the Democratic Party has been a party for a while.
I don't know but he had the highest GPA in the state of Georgia. I am not sure what he did.
I believe Jefferson Jean-Manuel Mitchell.  He was a great candidate. 
I don't know but he was one of the most prominent and influential politicians of all time in the US.
Her name is Elvis Presley and she's a famous singer and songwriter.
Her name is Sara and she's very pretty. I'm sure she's adorable. 
Her name is Megan Kelly. She is a great dancer and a singer!
Her name was Lady. She's my best friend. She was a great dancer.
I don't remember, but she's a pretty good dancer.  I was surprised.
Her name was Lindsey. She was a very good actress. I liked her in the movies.
Annie Hopkins starr is one of the greatest actors of all time.
I'm not sure. I've heard that it's a mountainous climb, though. 
I don't know but it's in the southeasternmost state in the US.
I'm not sure.   But I do know that Jesus was the only Son of God. 
The first man who walked on earth was Mileena, she was the youngest of the three brothers.
I'm not sure, but it's interesting to think that the term "walker" has been around for a while.
Shakepeare was one of the most well known authors of the 20th century.
Shakepeare was one of the most influential people in the world. He is one of many influential writers.
I am not sure but he seems to be very successful.  He is the CEO of the World Traditional Conference.
Jackie Jose is a great American singer-songwriter from Chicago.  He was a great guitarist.
It is the capital of ohio.  It's the capital and largest city.  I love it! 
No he was born and raised in Dallas, TX and was born in 1979
He is an American singer and songwriter. He's also a singer. 
My cousin is a famous singer and songwriter. He has won several awards.
Anglesey is the capital of the state of New York.  It has the highest population of any major city in the US.
I'm not sure.  But the Clinton Clinton was the president.  He was also a member of the Senate.
Kevin Rudolf was born on August 1894, he was born a little older than I was.
I don't know but I do know that he was born in Pennsylvania.
I don't know, but it was launched in the late 1960's. It was a very exciting time.
Colombian, it's a sovereign country in the Caribbean Sea.
Columbia, in the southeastern region of the US. It's beautiful there.
I don't know but I know that Russia is the largest military in Europe by area. Do you know who did?
I don't know who that was, but they were the first to join Russia in WWII.
Duke Ellton is an American rapper, songwriter, and producer, he's a pretty good one.
Duke Ellton is an American rapper. I don't know if he was a great one.
His name is Peter Pan, he's from Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania
No, I don't remember his name but he is a famous American rapper from Dallas.
I don't remember his name, but he was born on June 2, 1973.
shihuahdi was a very large island in the middle of nowhere in the pacific
I am not sure but it was made in 1994.  That's a long time ago!
The movie is coming out on December 28, 2011.  I can't wait to see it.
I am not sure. But I know it was the highest rated movie in the United States. 
It's coming out on May 20, 2017. It's been a while since I saw it, but it's still a good movie.
I'm not sure, but I did see that it came out on December 29, 2011.
The leader of the team is Bartolomeo Cristofori.  He was the leader and he is the CEO.
He died on August 21, 1958. I was so upset. He is my favorite actor.
He was an American author. He died in 1968.  He was a great author.
I think he was in Pennsylvania. I am not sure what city he was from.
It is a small island in the Caribbean. It is located near the Mediterranean Sea.
I'm not sure, but it would seem to be the largest military force in the world. 
He was killed at the end of the year on August 21, 1948.  I was really sad.
I don't know, but he was an excellent actor. He was a great Director of the Academy of Pictures.
I am not sure but I do know that it is one of the largest and most important river and lakes in the world.
Its a sovereign country located in the Atlantic ocean, Im not sure of the exact location.
I'm not sure, but I know it's one of the three major states.   
The Republic of Africa, and you? It is a sovereign country located in the southeastern Africa.
I think he was born around 1983.  It's hard to believe he was so young!
I think it is Michael Jackson, he was a pro quarterback for the Atlanta Atlanta Georgia.
The largest metropolitan area is Thailand. But I would say the most populated is Manhattan.
Phoebe Buffy is the American actor, singer, and songwriter.
I don't remember the name but it was a long time ago.  She was a great dancer.
Phoebe Buffalo is an American singer, guitarist, and comedian.
I'm not sure, but I do know that he is an American politician, and he was a great president.
It is on June 30, 2016.  It will be a long day.  I can't believe Obama has been in office since January.
I'm not sure, but it was a long time ago. She was a great dancer, too.
It is on a lake in North Carolina. I was surprised that they didn't find it
I'm not sure, but it is a small body of salt water.  It's a little scary.
It is on the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean!  I have been there and love it!
I'm not sure. But it is in the Caribbean Sea.  It is very beautiful.
It's in Cuba, it's on the Gulf of Mexico. It's really beautiful there.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the river is very high in the water.
Mary was a great mother. She was a nurse and a great mom.  I was so happy that she did that for me.
Estonia, it's the second-largest country in the European Union, and is located in the Atlantic Ocean.
A football quarterback for the University of Michigan.  I am sure you have heard of him.
Selena was released in 1994. She is a great singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure, it's been so many years since I've seen her, I'm sure it was a long time ago.
The Great Depression was a major economic and financial crisis in the United States. It was the largest in the world.
I don't know, but it was a huge shock to see it happen in the United States.
My dad was the president of the United States. He was the CEO of the Department of America. 
She was born in the U.S. and she was born on the west coast of the Mississippi.
I'm not sure but I do know that there are more than 2 million residents in the US
She was in the movie "She's a great actress, singer, songwriter, and actress.
She's a pretty good actress and singer. I've never seen any of her other movies. 
She's a great actress and singer. She also plays in the show "The Biggest Lady".
I have never seen any of her movies.  I know she was an American actress in the 1980s.
I have not seen it yet. I know its a great film though. Have you seen it?
Yes, she was a great actress in the 1990s.  Her voice was incredible.
I don't know, I've not seen it, but she has been in a lot of good movies!
I love him! I have been wanting to see "The Notebook", but haven't had a chance. 
I think I saw it. It was a really good one, but I haven't seen it yet.
I think she's in a couple of good ones. She's been in some of the best ones.
I'm not sure but I know that the first one ever climbed it was in 1896.  That's crazy!
I'm not really sure, but I know he climbed Mount McKinley in 1858.
I have no clue. I am not sure. I do know that he died in 2007.
I am not sure but he is one of the best players in the NBA. He was born in 1946.
K2 is the highest mountain in Africa.  I am not sure about Everest, but I would love to go.
I am not sure when she was born but she was the first female to be in the US.
I'm not sure but I know that California is the 3rd-largest state in the US. 
I'm not sure but I know that New Jersey is the third-largest state.
I don't know but it is the 4th smallest of the 50 United States by area.
It was German. It was the second-largest country in the world. I was shocked!
I am not sure. It is a small island in the Mediterranean sea.
I don't know but they speak it fluently.  I know they are from Sweden.
I am not sure what language it is.  I am going to try and find a new language to learn.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's one of the oldest languages in the world.
The only thing I can say is english, it is the most common language in the world.
The language I was speaking is in Sweden but I'm not sure what language is it.
I am not sure but I have been looking into it. It is a diesel engine. 
He died on August 28, 1997 at age 24.  It was such a shock to see him die, I couldn't believe it.
I don't know but I know Manchester United is the best team in the world. I think I would say Man Utd.
I'm not really sure but I know Manchester United is one of the biggest football teams in the world
I am not sure, but I know Leeds United played for Manchester United in the United States.
The United National Federation of Association Football has played for Manchester United, United, and United.
I'm not sure but I know the Manchester United United is an English club based in New York City
I'm not sure, but I know Manchester United is one of the most popular teams in the world!
I don't remember the date, but it was in 1989. I think it was a long time ago. I can't believe it was that long ago.
George Orwell was a great author of the 1934 novel "The Sense and Sensibility"
George Orwell was the author of a crime novel.  I was so mad at him for that.
George Orwell is my favorite author of all time. He was born on June 30, 1948
George Orwell was a famous American author, author and author.  He was also an author.
His name was Roger Penrose.  I think she is a very good author.
George Orwell was the author of 1983's dystopian novels. I love his books.
George Orwell was a famous American author, a novelist and author.  He was also an author, screenwriter, and producer.
George Orwell was a famous author.  I don't know how he did it but he had some great stories.
George Orwell was a famous author of Joseph Heller. He was born in London.
I don't know. He was an author of 1937 novels, so he must have been a great author.
No, he was the coach of the Toronto Raptors. I'm a big fan of his work.
Alabama is the only state in the southeastern region of the US that borders Alabamas and Georgia.
Yes, Alabama is the third-largest state in the southeastern region of the United States.
I am not sure but it is the most populous of all 50 states. That's a lot!
Yes and Alabama is the only state that is bordered by Georgia and Mississippi. 
Nick Cannon, he is an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
Nick Cannon is an American singer, songwriter, and actor. Do you like his work?
I'm not sure, but I do know that Tennessee is one of the 50-most populous states in the US.
I don't know exactly but I know it is the largest state in the southeast.
Tennessee is the capital and most populous city in the state of Georgia
Tennessee, the capital of the state, is in the southeastern region of the United States.
Tennessee is a state in the southeastern region of the United States. I'm from the Eastern part.
The state capital, Tennessee is in the southeastern region of the state
I don't really remember but I do know that they are the 2nd-largest state in Tennessee.
I am not sure but I do know that Tennessee is the 4th largest state in the state.
Tennessee is a state located in the southern region of the US.  
I'm not sure but I do know they are the only state that borders the west. Do you like Tennessee?
Tennessee! It's the third-largest state in the US. It's also the 4th-most densely populated.
I am not really sure, but I know the state capital is in Kansas, Mississippi.
The captain is Bartolomeo Cristofori, and he's the leader of the team of Southeast Asia.
Shah Jahan was an American actor, singer, and dancer.   I'm glad he was able to make a comeback.
She was a famous singer, songwriter, and producer.  She was very talented.
He's an American rapper, and he was born and raised in Honolulu.
He was a great rapper. He was born on June 30, 1984.
He was an American singer and songwriter. He was born in New York City.
He was a former president of the United States. He was also a member of the Democrat Party.
He was a former president of the U.S. and the president of Pennsylvania.
I am not sure, but he is a very successful man. He was born and raised in the United States.
He was born on June 30, 1954.  He was also a great driver.
He was a great man, but I'm glad he was able to make it to the end of the year.
I'm not sure but I've always wanted to go to Hawaii. I heard it's the only US state that's bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
Wilson Wilton, Michigan. It is in a suburban area in the United States.
He died in 1984. He was a terrible person. He killed so many innocent people.
Yes, I am a member of the United States Department of Defense and the President of the U.S
I don't know.  I'm not sure if she is my daughters name.  
Her name is Lindsey.  I was so happy to see her!  She's my world!
Norway is in the northern hemisphere, but I don't know much about Sweden.
I'm not exactly sure but I do know it is one of the oldest continuous states in the world!
Sweden. It's the second-largest country in the European Union. 
It is a country in the European Union, in the North Atlantic ocean and the Caribbean.
I think it was in August.  It was so hard to believe it was so close to his birthday.
I'm not sure. But I do know Louis Xiv died in 2008. He was a good actor.
I don't know, but it is very old. He was born on August 30, 1974.
I'm not sure but the first movie of Lady Grey was released in December of 1968.
She was born and raised in New York City in 1978. She's a great actress.
She is a very good actress. She was born and raised in New York City.  
She's a great actress and singer! She's been on the show "Jeopardy."
I think she was Queen Elizabeth Barton.  She was a Queen of England and was the ruler of France.
I'm not really sure who that is, but she is one of the most important leaders in the world.
I'm not sure. I just know Kobe's name was Kobe Bryant. 
It was a novel by William Dickens.  I was so excited to read it.
I think it was Barbara Barer. She is so cute.  I love her.
I believe it was in Brazil and Germany.  It was a great match.  Japan was great. 
A very famous rapper, he is a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
He is the greatest American singer and songwriter of all time. He was born and raised in New York.
John booth got married on June 30, 1993 and he has been married for over 20 years.
John Wilke is a famous singer and songwriter. He was born in 1957.
He is from New York. He is a very good American singer and songwriter!
I am not sure of the exact number of people, but it has the highest population of any state in the US.
yes he is. he is an american singer and songwriter and record producer
I believe it was in the 1990s.  I'm not sure when he was born.
He was born on December 30, 1997. I'm really sad now. I miss him.
I believe it's 1968. I was so sad when he died, but I knew he would be in a better place.
He was born in 1985, and he was born on August 21, 1987
It was a year ago.  It was really hard on him.  He was in his early twentieties.
I'm not sure when Babbage was born, but he is the greatest of all time!
I don't know but his name was Babbage.  I was so upset about it.
I'm not sure but the first war was in 1845, so that would be quite a long time ago!
I am not sure but I know that they were one of the first major colonies in the world. 
It was the capital and most populous city in the state of Georgia.  
I am not sure but the United States was the second-largest US state and the 4th least populous in the US.
The United States was the third smallest country in the US, behind the U.S. and Canada, so it's hard to say.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the most powerful and influential in the world.
I think so. He is the 45th president of the United States.  He is a very successful person.
I'm not sure. But I do know that the british president is a great candidate.
I am not sure, but the current british president is Donald Trinney. I think he is a great president.
Yes, he was a very important president of the United States.  He was one of the most influential presidents of all time.
I'm not really sure, but I do know that China has the highest metropolitan area.
It's hip hop. I love that kind of music. It's so different from what I'm used to.
It's an indie music genre. It's a lot of fun.  What do you like to do for fun?
It's a pop/rock/road rock song.  It's pretty good. 
I am not sure but I do know that the Africa was one of the largest and most sparsely populated countries in Africa.
I am not sure, but I will tell you it is the most popular musician in Africa.
He grew up in Arkansas. I think he moved to the states when he was 18.
Reginea Carter is a public school in North Carolina.  It's a private one. 
It's a tiny island in the Pacific Ocean.  I have never been to Hawaii before, but I would love to.
I'm not sure, but it's the third most densely populated in the US.
I'm not sure but I know it is the largest and most densely populated state in the contiguous US.
I'm not sure, but it is the largest state in the U.S. by land area.
Hawaii is actually the second most sparsely populated of the U.S.
I don't know, but I think it was "Baby" by Jeremy Clarkson.
James Phelps is one of the greatest Olympic athletes of all time. He is the most decorated swimmer in the world.
James Phelps is the greatest swimmer ever, he won the 200 meter dash.
Justin Bieber is a Canadian singer and songwriter. He has been singing since 2009.
I don't remember. But I do know that Justin Bieber is a Canadian singer, actor, and record producer.
It's the Missouri-Kentucky River.  I've been to it a few times.  It's beautiful.
Obama was elected in the United States in 2001, he is the current U.S. president.
I'm not sure but I do know that it's the smallest state in the US. 
Martin Luther King Jr.  She was a great American author.  I love her!
The University of Michigan. It was the best school I've had in my life. 
It's in a small town called Northern Italy. It's been a long time since I've visited.
Nadia Comanci was an Italian fashion design school located in Italy.
The Great Lake, New Hampshire and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
The novel by Joseph Hellberg was published in 1823. It was a long time ago.
I don't know, but I know she was a great actress.  I love her.
The director of the movie is Richard Rose. He is a great actor! 
I don't know but I do know she's a great American singer and songwriter
She's a very talented actress, she's been in a lot of musicals.
She was 57 and she was in her late 30's. It's a shame that she died.
I'm not exactly sure, but I do know that he was born on March 28, 2009. That's a long time ago!
I don't know, but his name is Kyle and he's a singer, songwriter and actor.
Jackie went to University of Tennessee, but I'm not really sure what college she went to.
he died in 1997. he was born and raised in hawaii. he had a heart attack.
He drowned in water and drown in a lake.  I was so upset about it.
She is an american actress who was born on August 30, 1984.
I am not sure but i know she was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii
She is an American singer-songwriter, actor, and dancer!
It's a Christian denomination. I'm not sure what it's called though. I think it's just a different type of religion.
The water that touches them are the ocean, river, lakes, rivers, etc
I think they are the ones that can be found on every continent except Antarctica!
I don't know.  She is an American singer, songwriter, and dancer, though.
It's called "New Zealand". It's the second most sparsely populated country in North America.
The New Zealand River is a river in the North Atlantic Ocean.  It is beautiful!
New Zealand is a Nordic island country in the Atlantic Ocean. I love it!
They are the largest, most densely populated island chain in New Zealand. 
I'm not sure, but I know they have some of the largest river systems in the world!
The river is called River Kelley.  It is the largest river in the world.  
New Zealand's is located in the Atlantic Ocean.  The river is beautiful.
New Zealand is a country in the northern region of the United States. Its the largest and most populous.
He was president of the United States and died on August 7, 1963. He was a very good father.
I'm not sure when he died but I do know that his mother was a great mother. 
It is a very small town in the United States that is located in the southernmost state of Georgia.
I'm not sure when it was released but he is one of the most popular singers of all time
St Maria Grett was born in Italy.  Do you know her?  
She was born in 1985 and was born on August 30, 1973.
I am not sure but he is the best player of all time.  He was the best at his position in the league.
He plays for the New York Jets. He's a great player and a great goalie.
The Atlantic Ocean, which is bordered by the Atlantic and the Chesapeake Bay.
I'm not sure but I know Iceland is in the Northern Atlantic Ocean and I would like to see it.
I am not sure but I do not know where the border is but it is the longest border in the world.
It's a Nordic island in the Atlantic Ocean.  I've never been, but I've always wanted to.
Jay-Z is an American singer, songwriter, producer, author, and actor. He is very talented.
Jay-Z released his second album in 1997. He's had a lot of great success!
I don't know, but he was born and raised in Honolulu. He was also a rapper.
Jay-Z was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and actor.
No, I'm not sure. It is the third-largest country in the world.
I don't know the capital, but it's a small town in the Caribbean. 
I'm not sure but he was born in 1968 so he must have been pretty good.
I am not sure what instruments he played, but I know he is one of the best guitarists of all time.
I'm not sure but it's a wooden string instrument that is really hard to play. 
He was a pianoist and vocalist.  I think he played in a few other bands as well.
He was a pianoist for a living.  He was really talented.  
I'm not sure but it was the Indian Basketball Championship in 2003.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the Indians were the first team to win.
The captain is Bartolomeo Cristofori. He's the captain.
The first captain was James Fisher, he had a long career. He was also the coach of the Indian Ocean.
Mickey mouse mouse is my favorite character. I love him! He is a mouse mouse. What about you?
Mickey Mouse is a very famous mouse. He was born and raised in Dearborn Michigan.
Yes. I think it's a big deal. It's the second-largest country in the world.
Yes, they are separating them for a political, cultural, and economic reason.   
South Korea is a small island nation in the Atlantic Ocean, and it is bordered with China and Japan.
South Korea is the largest country in the world. It's the largest and most sparsely populated.
It is the capital, and is the most populous city in China. It is located in the River Thailand.
The border is in China and the border is bordered by the Arctic Sea.
George Lopez is his real name. He's been dating for over 15 years now. 
I don't know who that is, but I do know he is a famous singer and songwriter.
Jason Carmans plays a great singer. He is also a songwriter.
I'm not sure but I remember he was a pretty good actor, he played in the TV show "The Factor".
George Lope was a famous singer and songwriter.  Who is your favorite?
His real name is Jason. He is an American actress. He was born in 1973.
She was a professional dancer.  She was really good.  It was a shame she died.
I think she was a woman from New York City. She lived in Manhattan. 
I don't know but he was born in 1958 and died in 1977.  
I'm not sure. I know he was a professional athlete, though I don't know who he married.
He was drafted in 1962. He has been a great quarterback for them. 
I'm not sure, but I know they are the oldest franchise of the NFL in the NFL.
The Cowboys are a American professional football quarterback for the Dallas Texas Dallars.
It was in the early 1960s. He played for the Dallas Gurls and won three AFC championships.
The Cowboys signed him in 2003. He's been a quarterback for over 20 years
It was the year he was drafted by the Dallas Cowboys.  I'm not too sure when he started though.
I don't really know when he joined but he's the quarterback of the Dallas Cowboys. 
I don't recall the movie, but it was a romance movie that came out in 2007.
I am not sure what is it called but it is a romantic comedy. I have watched it a few times.
She played in the movie Psycho. It was a great movie. She was a pretty good actress.
I am not sure, but I have been trying to find out. I have no idea what was wrong with my car.
I'm not sure but I know it's the second largest country in the world.  I think it's Canada, right?
I think Montana is the biggest border in the US and the second smallest in the U.S.
I am not sure but it is very close to Canada and New York. I know that Montana is the third-largest state in the US.
I think he's Canadian. I'm not too sure about the Canadian government. Do you know anything about him?
I don't know, but I know he is a Canadian politician and he was elected as the Prime Minister of Canada.
He is the Prime of Canada. He was a member of the federal government of the province of Alaska.
I think so, but I don't remember his name. Do you know his real name? 
Yes, he is the Canadian Prince of New York. He is a very successful politician.
I am not sure. I am sure he was a nice man. He was the CEO of the federal government of Canada.
I don't know but the Atlantic Ocean is a great lake, it is the third-largest in the world.
I'm not sure but it is one of the most populous in the United States. 
I'm not sure but I know it is the second-largest state in the United States.
John Quincy Adams, the American president of the United States, was an American politician.
I don't remember but he's one of the most influential people in the history of America.
I don't know.  I do know that John Quincy was an American politician and a TV personality.  Have you heard of him?
I don't know who was, but I am sure he was the most powerful man in the world.
I believe he was born in New York, but I'm not sure where. He was a famous author.
Alot of people say it is the only province in North America that is bordered by Canada.
It is a bear. It is really cool. I have always wanted to go to Alaska.
Alberta, Canada, is the capital. It's the only province in Canada. I've never visited.
I don't think it is the most populous state.  It's the 3rd-largest state in the US.
I'm not sure, but it is a state in the southeastern United States.
It's the largest state in the southeastern United States. I live right by the Gulf of Mexico.
I am not sure, but I know that Okekekee is the largest and most sparsely populated state in the US.
I believe she was in the 1980's, but I'm not sure when she was born.  She was a great actress.
I don't know but he's one of the most influential and successful politicians of all time. He was a great president.
He served in the Air Force and was the commander of the Airforce. He was also a US senior citizen.
I'm not sure but he was the first US president to be elected in the U.S.
He plays a guitar, he has been playing since the 1960s, but hasn't picked it up yet.
Han-Barbera!  It means "little armoured one" in Spanish!
Hannie was named Hanna-Barbera, and then she became Hanna and Juliet.
They were both named after my favorite band, Nirvana! They're a great band!
Hanna is my favorite name and it is short for Hanna-Barbera.  She was my favorite character growing up.
Hanns. He was a great driver. He passed away a few months ago and we had to take a bus to get to work.
I don't recall.  But I know they were very smart!  I was impressed. 
His name is Jennifers Nettle. He's a really talented singer and songwriter.
she is a singer and songwriter for a local pop punk band.  
His name is Jenifer Nettles. He's a pretty big guy! What about you?
I am not sure but she is an American singer, songwriter and producer.
She was born and raised in New York. She is the best singer and songwriter in the history of the United States.
It started in 1753. It ended with the war between Germany and Austria. I am not sure when the last time it ended.
It started when the US was in the middle of the Civil War, I think it ended in the 1960s.
I'm not sure but I think she is pretty popular. She's a pretty good dancer too.
Obama Obama was president of the United States in 2001.  I think it was in 2009
Obama Obama was a US president of the United States.  He was elected on June 20, 2005.
Yes she does, she is one of the best soccer players in the world.  She is the best
I'm not really into video games. I don't have a lot of time to play them.
I'm not sure but I know it's the longest river in the world.  
I don't know, but I know that it is the longest river in the United States
I do not know, but I do know there is a river called the River of the Appalachian Northeast.
I am not sure but I know it has the longest contiguous coastline in the world
The river of Washington is a river in the eastern portion of the state of Washington.
The river of the state of Oregon is a state located in the southeastern part of the United States.
It is the Greater Pacific Northwestern United States and the Atlantic Ocean.
It is a river in Oregon.  It runs through the state of Maine and New Hampshire.
Anna Nigole was an anna smith who was an American singer and songwriter.
He was born in 1943. He was a great comedian. He died in 1968.
I am not sure but they have a lot of hits.  The first one was in 2009.
Douglas Fernan was the lead actor in King of Queens. He played the role of Peter Pan.
He is Drew, he is a real estate agent. His name is Douglas.
Douglas Adams.  He was a great actor and comedian and actor.  
I'm not sure, but I know Douglas was an actor in the show "The Big Brother".
I don't know, but I do know that Doug is an American comedian. Do you like him?
I don't remember his name. But I know he is one of the best-selling music artists in the US.
I am not sure, but he is a very famous American poet and songwriter.
I believe he was from New Jersey. I know he is an american singer, songwriter, and actor.
Wilson was born and raised in Pennsylvania, and he was the youngest of four brothers.
He was born in 1893 so he was around a long time. He was an amazing man.
Yes, it is my favorite song by Ellie Gould. Do you like her music?
I would say that is a great question.  I would have to agree with you.  Who is your favorite actor?
I think so. It's hard to say because I'm not sure I have a favorite actor.
I'd have to say Leonardo DiCaprio. He was so good at acting and singing.
I would have to say that Leonardo DiCaprio was probably the best actor of all time, he was so talented.
I think I'd have to say Christopher Walke. He is one of the greatest actresses of all time.
Yes, I think so. I love how they are considered one of the most influential actors in the world.
The best actor is Leonardo DiCaprio. He is an American actor.
I would have to say Jodhi May is my favorite actor. What is yours?  
I think I would have to say Leonardo DiCaprio. I think he was a great actress.
I don't know about that, but I do know that the actor was nominated for a grammy award.
The best actor is Leonardo DiVinci, he is a great actor and director.
It's a horror movie with Sam Elliot. I haven't seen it yet but I hear it's good.
It is an American epic romance film.  I have not seen it yet but I know it is pretty good.
Sam Elliot is in the Godfather, he's a great actor!  What's your favorite movie?
Sam Elliot's The Wizard of the Lizards.  I haven't seen it yet. 
I am not sure but it was so good.  Borh is an American actor and songwriter and actor.
Borh was the best actor ever, he was a great comedian.  He was also an actor.
I love Borh Roses! He was born and raised in Birmingham England.
Sam Samantha is one of my favorite actors. I love his voice and how he is a great dancer.
Adamam is Joseph, and I have a son.  I'm so proud of him.
The names of Adam and Eve, they are my favorite singers and song writers.
I'm an only child. I don't have any brothers or sisters.  Do you have siblings?
adam is joseph, and eeve was jose. adam was adam
I am not sure but it is the third-largest nation in the world by area.
Yes, it is.  It is the third-largest country in the world.  
No, but it's been a long time since I seen it. It came out in 1977.
it was released in 1976 by Lucas.  I was so excited when it came out!
New York City is the most populous city in the United States.  It is also the most densely populated.
No, I live outside of Manhattan, New York City.  It is the capital and most densely populated city in the United States.
Yes, I am going to visit there this summer. I have never been, but it is the most populous city in the US.
New York City, the most populous city in the United States and the second-largest city in New York.
New York City, New York, New Jersey, is the most populous city in New York.
The Yucatans are the largest island chain in central America.  Do you know much about them?
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's a major metropolitan area in the United States.
I'm not sure, but it's a beautiful place. It's also in the Pacific Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico.
It's a lake in the south of the Mississippi.  It's very pretty.
It extends out to the Mediterranean Sea. It's beautiful! 
It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea in the Pacific Ocean.
I'm not sure. But it's the most densely populated city in China. 
The capital is Bahamas, and it's one of the most densely populated cities in North Korea.
Obama is the youngest of 4.  He was born in Pennsylvania.  I have never seen him before.
Obama is the oldest of five. He's also the most prominent business man in the world
Michael Jackson is a legend. He was an American singer-songwriter and actor.
He was a great actor and songwriter. He was the best of all time. 
He was a very popular artist and songwriter and dancer. He was very talented.
He was a very talented artist. He was the founder of Michael Jackson's company and was also a child actor.
He was an American singer, songwriter, actor, producer, and television actor.
Michael Jackson is one of the best artists of all time, he was born in 1953.
He was the most influential actor and songwriter of the 19th century.  He was also a great dancer.
He used to be an actor, singer, and dancer. I think he was a great actor. 
Michael Jackson is an American musician, actor, producer, and actor.  He is very talented.
He was an American singer, actor, and songwriter who was also a dancer.
Michael Jackson was an American singer and songwriter and actor.  He was also a producer.
He was the best singer and songwriter of all time. His real name is Michael Jackson.
Michael Jackson is one of the greatest musicians of all time, he was an American actor and musician
Michael Jackson is a great American artist, he was born in Birmingham, England.
Michaelange Jackson was an American singer, songwriter, and actor. I love his voice!
I don't really know but I know he was an iconic American singer and songwriter
I don't really have a specific reason, but I know he was a great performer. 
He was one of the greatest artists of all time. His career spanned over 50 decades.
Michael Jackson was an American singer, songwriter, and record producer. 
Michael Jackson was born in 1883!  He was one of the greatest artists of all time.
I'm not really sure. He was an American singer/songwriter. 
He was a great actor, actor and dancer! He's one of the most influential actors of all time.
Michael Jackson was born in 1948.  I don't know how old he was.
I think he was the biggest inspiration for Michael Jackson's childhood. He was a great actor and singer.
He was an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, and producer.
He was an American singer/actor. He was a very popular actor and songwriter, too. 
He was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and actor.  I was just a kid. 
Michael Jackson is an American singer, actor, and songwriter. He was a great artist.
He's an American artist, he was a famous artist, singer, and songwriter.
He was an American singer-songwriter and producer, and actor. He was also a member of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
he was one of the most influential artists of all time.  he was a pioneer of rock and roll.
He was a great actor and singer.  His career spanned decades.  It was a long time ago.
I believe it is because he was an accomplished actor, singer, and songwriter
I'm not sure but he was a great actor and singer. He was also a great dancer and songwriter.
I am not sure but he was the most influential actor and songwriter of all time.
He was a great actor and singer! He was the best-selling actor of all time!
I don't know, but I do know he was a great actor in movies and television.
Yes, he was born in 1881 and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I think so, he was one of the most influential people in the entertainment industry.  He was a huge influence.
I believe so, but it was a long time ago. He was born in 1962.
Colorado is the 3rd largest state in the united states, but the second smallest state.
She was my mother's biological mother and father.  They raised me by my grandparents.  I was so happy to see her.
She was an American actress, singer, songwriter and producer. I was so happy for them!
I don't think I have ever heard of it, but it sounds like it would be fun to play.  Do they play well?
Owen Hart was the oldest and most famous actor in the 20th century. He was a great actor.
I don't know but he is one of the best characters in the series. He has won six awards for his role.
I don't know, but I know that he is one of the best. He's also a great actor.
He is from New Orleans, but he was born in Pennsylvania.
The team was founded in Liverpool in 1911 by Bartolomeo Cristi.
I'm not sure but the Liverpool FCC was founded in 1960.  
A manager of Liverpool, who was the manager of the team.  He was a great manager.
I don't know but it was a long time ago.  They were in the second league.
Yes they were a team from Liverpool. They were one of the oldest teams in the world.
Yes they were a professional football club founded in Liverpool in the late 19th century and they won the championship.
I'm not sure, but it was founded in 1881. I know that's a long time ago!
It was Arsenal. He was the manager of Liverpool.  It was a long time ago.
His name is Abdullah. He was the first Muslim man in the Arabs. 
His name is Joseph. He is from the United States. He was a great dad.
I don't recall her name, but he did have a lot of money in the bank account.
I think he was a genius. He was also a very successful author of science fiction.
He was born in 1978, he was the youngest.  He was a good driver.
He was born on August 2, 1947. He was a great dancer.
I'm not entirely sure, but I know that Detroit is a major city in Michigan!
I'm not sure, I know Lisa is an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, and actress.
It is the iphone code for a small island in the middle of nowhere in the gulf of mexico.
I don't know but I do know that it's a small town in Canada.  It's not big.
It was in 1778.  I am sure it was a very long time ago. 
It was founded on August 2, 1948 in Bavaria. I don't remember the exact date.
I'm not sure, I don't remember the exact date, but I know that the date of the rooseph is estimated to be in the 20th century.
I'm not sure.  He was the CEO of the Russian Soviet Union.
He became the leader in the Soviet Union in 1898. He was the ruling of the United States.
No. The movie was released in 2009 and it was directed by Jodhi May.
No, he's just a regular actor. I don't think I've seen any of his other films.
I think so! I haven't seen it yet, but I know it's been on the list for a while!
I have never seen it, but I know it's a movie about her. She is so cute.
No, I don't remember the name of the film. I know that it is a romantic comedy.
The Fantastic Four and The Godfather. I think it's so much better.
The movie "The Note of the Line," which came out in 2009.  That was a great movie.
Ohara was one of the best and most successful actors in the history of Hollywood.
I am not sure but it was the last movie they made.  I am sure they are great.
I am not sure but it was a great movie and it made me really sad to see it.
I am not sure but I do know that O'ha is one of the best American actors of all time
I am not sure but I know they were nominated for Best Actor in the US in 2009
I don't remember the name but I know they were a big hit. I was shocked. 
I am not sure, but i know he was born in 1958 and was born on October 1985.
I'm not sure but I know that was a good one.  I liked the old Star Wars trilogy too.
No, he's just playing for the University of Tennessee.  I'm not sure how long he'll play for them.
He has won 5 Super Bowl appearances and is considered one of the greatest quarterback of all time.
I am not sure, but I do know that there is no age limit to climbing mt. Everest, which is the highest mountain in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that the Republic is located on the Pacific Ocean. 
I'm not sure but i know that it is located on the Gulf of Mexico. 
It's the U.S.  It's a small country in the southeastern part.
That's a good question. I don't remember exactly but I do know that there are over 3,000 residents in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's the third-largest country in Africa!
The United States.  It's a federal republic that is the second-largest country in the world by area.
I am not sure but I do know that Fred Perry is a singer, songwriter, and actor.
The capital and largest city is Sydney. It's the capital and most populous city of Australia.
I don't know, but I do know that they speak it in France, Italy and Spain.
He was the champion of the world title of the World Series.  He was a legend!
He's from Dearborn, Michigan. He's been around a while.  What about you?
Obama is a very prominent politician in the United States. He is very influential.
He graduated from the University of Tennessee, he was a really good student.
He went to the University of Michigan. It was a very prestigious school.
He went to UFC. He was drafted by the University of Memphis.
He went to Princeton University. I didn't know he was a big fan of the team.
Edward Eye was born in the United States, I think it was in New York. 
Edward John Eeyre was born in Dearborn, Michigan, and he was born on March 1883.
John Edward Eye was born in the United States, but he was born and raised in New York.
Edward John was born in Dearborn, Michigan!  He was a great driver.
I'm not sure, but it's the second-largest river in the world.
She was a singer, songwriter and singer. She's a pretty good singer too
I'm not sure, but I know it is the largest state in the United States.  It is a beautiful place.
I think it has been Leonardo DiCaprio.  I think he is the best.
I would have to say Leonardo DiCaprio. He's the greatest actor and songwriter of all time.
I'm not sure, but I do know that Michelle Williams won an Academy Award in 2009.
The greatest actor was Richard Gerelle. I don't know who is the only one.
I think so. I can't believe he was the only singer and songwriter.
It was the U.S. government of the Philippines and the government of Japan.
That is a good question.  Who did the RWanda Genocide belonged to?
The U.S. has been in many wars, but the US is only the 3rd largest country in the world.
He was born in 1878. He was also a member of the American Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
It was in 1997. It's been a long time since I watched it, but it was pretty good.
I'm not sure when it was first but I know it was invented in 1845 in Waco, Texas.
I don't know about that but I do know that it is the third-largest city in the US
I'm not sure but I think it is the mississippi gulf of mexico
I'm not sure but I know that it is the third-largest state in the USA
I believe it was on March 2, 1983. I don't remember what year that was.
I'm not sure but I know it's in the southeastern region of North America.
I think it was The Godfather.  It was a great one.  I think I liked it better than the other ones.
The first one was "Billboard" but it wasn't the first one to win. 
I'm not sure but it seems to be New York.  I was thinking of moving to Maine though.
I don't know, but the second least populated state is Mississippi. It's a little smaller than that.
No, but they are the smallest. They are also the second-largest in the world!
It's a mascott that is a professional basketball team located in Tallahassee.
I don't know. But I know they are a professional basketball team in Minnesota. 
The mascots name is the University of Tallahassee University.  They are very well known in the US.
It is the University of Tennessee, which is in the state capital of the United States.
It's a college football team in Michigan, but I don't know if it's the St. John's University.
I am not sure but I know that he is one of the biggest CEO's in the world.
I don't really remember the name, but I do know he was a great American singer and songwriter
The President of the US.  He is the 45th president of the U.S. 
I'm not sure but I know that it was the first president of America to be elected. 
Obama is the 45th president of the United States.  He was elected in 2001.  
Obama is the 45th President of the United States. I think he's pretty good at his job.
I'm not sure. It was a long time ago. I do know that the John Deerer was one of the greatest deer hunters of all time.
He was born in New York, but he's been playing in the United States since he was 15.
I believe the United States. The US is the third-largest country in Europe. 
It is the United States, but it's actually the third-most densely populated in the world.
Obama was the President. He was also the CEO of the U.S. government of America
Obama.  He was also the president of the United States of America.  It was a long battle.
The president of the U.S. was a former president of America and was elected in 1962.
I am not sure, but the Bot Swan is a Swedish leader in Bavaria.
I don't know. But I do know he is an American multinational businessman. 
No. It is a small island in the Caribbean Sea. I am not sure if they're the leader.
A river of water that runs through the land of the ocean.  It is beautiful.
I am not sure when the marriage was officially recognized. But he was a great actor.
I am not sure but he died in 1959. He was a great leader of the United States.
I am not sure but I can tell you that they were married to the American singer and songwriter, Billie Jean.
I am not sure but I do know that they were very important in WWII.   
He was in the 20th century, and he had a heart attack. He was a great actor.
I'm not sure, but he was the president of the United States of America and also the president.
I'm not sure who was the secretary, but I know he was president of the U.S.
I don't know what you're talking about? Is it the president of the united states?
I don't know.  But he is a great American businessman.  He is the president of the United States.
I am not sure, but I do know it was a major political and social event in France and the UK.
I'm not sure but I know that the French revolution was a very important part of the economy.
I believe it was the government of England. It's a shame that the French Revolution didn't come about in the 20th century.
I think so. I have never been there. I'm not sure if it is the most populous city in the state.
I have never been to that area, but I know it's the 4th-largest state in the US.
Rhode Island is the capital of the state of New England, so it must be pretty big.
I have not been to Rhode Island yet, but I have heard it is one of the most populous cities in the US.
I am not sure. I know that they are still owned by Molson-Barbados though.
The French captain is the leader. He is the Captain of Paris, France. 
I'm not sure, I'm from the south so I don't know. But I know there are a lot of cities in Maryland.
I am not really sure but they must be really big because it is one of the most populous cities in the US.
I'm not sure but I know it is one of the top 10 cities in the United States.
I'm actually not sure what you mean, but I know that it's the 3rd-largest city in the United States.
The city has a population of 8,673.  It is a major city in Maryland.
The capital is Montpelier, but I don't know the exact city. But there is a lot of great restaurants there.
I don't know. But I do know that they're the most populous city in the state.
I don't know, but I know that Maryland is the largest city in the US with a population of 9,700.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's the 8th least populated of the states, so I'm sure there's a lot.
I think it is the Maryland Capital Regions, which is in the southeastern region of the United States.
Yes, he won the $1000.  I'm so happy I won the lottery!
I'm not too sure, but I know he's been around a while since he was born.
The state capital, Pennsylvania is the largest city in the state of New York.
I'm not sure, but it is the most populous state and the third most densely populated in the US.
I don't know. But I know that the metropolitan area is the 3rd largest city in the U.S.
I'm not sure but they are the 8th-largest by area in the US.
I think it's the seat of the Pacific Ocean, but I don't remember exactly.
I'm not sure about that but it's the largest metropolitan area in the United States.
I'm not sure but they are the 3rd-largest state in the United States.
The city of Washington, is the largest city in the state of Washington.  It is the seat of the Pacific Ocean.
The city is called Pensacola, which is the second-largest city in the state of Washington.
I'm not sure. But it is one of the most populated cities in the state of Washington.
The US, I am a big fan of football and I am rooting for Germany. What about you?
I'm not sure, but the team was very good.  I was rooting for them.
It was held in the U.S. in the stadium of Cincinnati, Illinois
It's in Alabama, but I don't know if it's that high.  I'm not sure what the state's tax rate is.
Florida is the third-largest state in the US and the third largest in the southeast.
I'm not sure but I know Michigan is one of the most populous state in the united states
Florida is the southeasternmost state in the United States. It is the 3rd smallest by area
Florida is in the southeastern region of the United States. It is very hot here
Florida, Georgia, Mississippi, Missouri.  They are the 3rd-largest state by area.
I'm not sure, but it is a state in the southeastern region of the united states in the United States.
I don't know, but he was an American rapper. I think he was pretty good.
My favorite team is the Washington Capitals, but I was rooting for them.  They were one of the original teams in the NHL.
I think it was the Washington Capitals.  I was really impressed by their accomplishments.
She was 5 years old.  She was a great woman.  We had a great time together.
I don't remember but it was a long time ago. I know it's been a while.
It was a long time ago. The first time I saw it in person was in 1898. It was the biggest mountain in the world.
It was a week after I was born. I was so shocked. I thought he was going to leave me.
I have no idea, but I do know that it was the longest and most devastating event that occurred in the world.
I don't know, but it was a major destination in the Caribbean. 
I think it was in the early 1900's. It was a long time ago, though. 
I don't know exactly but it seems like it was a long time ago.  I remember that was back in the day.
I don't know, but I know it was Leonardo DiCapella.
I don't remember but she won the Golden Globe award and received the Academy Award for Best Actress.
I don't know. But I know she is a very good actress.  She won the Oscar for Best Actress.
The youngest is Jodhi May, but she was born on March 25, 1948.
That was Leonardo DiCaprio. He was a very good actor. 
That's a good question! I think I'm going to guess Madeleine Sharapov. 
I think it was Leonardo DiCaprio. He was a great actor.
She was also the youngest of three of them and she was also an accomplished actress.
I'm not sure but she is one of the most important women in the world.  She has been in a very powerful position for a long time.
The first man was Abdullah and he was the first of the three sons. 
They are a sovereign country in the United States, and I am so proud of them!
I'm not sure, but I know that it was the Washington Wizards.   
I don't remember but they have been around since 1983.  They are the oldest NBA team.
I think it's the Earth. It's the second-largest of the planets in our world.
It is the 3rd-most sparsely populated of all countries in the world.  I am not sure what level it is.
I'm not sure, but she has been around since she was 18.  I know it's been around for a while.
I'm not sure, but it was the last war between the US and Germany. It was in 1845.
I think it was the first war between the US and the United Kingdom. I think that's when we were fighting.
I'm not sure, but I think it's Daniel Day-Lewis. She's pretty great.
She is a great actress, she is also a singer and songwriter, and actress.
I'm not sure but he was the 45th President of the United States.  I know he was a great president.
Kristen Stewart was in a few movies. She was a great actor and singer.
She was in a couple of romantic comedies.  She also did a great job in Prison.
I think she was in a few.  She's a great singer and songwriter
She is an American singer-songwriter. She started out as just a singer and songwriters.
Kristen Stewart has been in a couple of roles.  She's an American actress.
She was in the movie "The Prison Blind" and was nominated for a Golden Girls award.
She was an american singer, songwriter, dancer and actress.
I'm not sure but she is one of my favorite actors. Her real name is Kyle Gass and she was born in 1989.
I am not sure but I do know that she was a great actress and dancer.
I don't think I have seen any of her movies. I think she did a great job.
She was a famous actress, singer, dancer, and songwriter.
She was a great actress in the 1990 movie Cinderella and she was in a few of the best movies.
It was the day of the week.  I was very excited to see it happen!  It was a great day!
The first cup was held in 1976.  It was a small event held in the town of Dearborn, Michigan.
I'm not sure but I'm sure it's Mexico. I know that it's the 3rd largest country in the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know there are only seven million people in the US.
Yes. I am not sure why but it is a sovereign state in the U.S.
I am not sure but I do know that there are only 2.8 million people in the USA.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is a sovereign state in the Americas.
No, I'm not sure. I was just watching a documentary about California and the California Raiders.
I am not sure, but I know that the Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the most extensive mountain range.
I think it's the Appalachian Mountains. It is the tallest mountain in the US.
It is the Grand Tetons, and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the largest.
I'm not sure, but I know it was founded in 1962.  It's been around a long time.
The Atlantic Ocean is one of my favorites.  It's so pretty.  
They were in the National Football Conference in 1845.  It's a long time ago now.
I'm not sure, but I know they are one of the most popular bands of all time!
Samantha. She's an American singer and songwriter. She started singing in a church as a child.
He died on August 21, 1989. He was one of the greatest quarterbacks ever.
Columbia is a federal and state in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't know but I do know that it is the 3rd-largest in the world.
I'm not sure, but it's very large! I think the Kansas River is the longest in Russia.
Yes, it was a horror film.  I thought it was going to be scary.  It was a comedy.
I'm not sure but I know that the Indian Ocean is bordered by Arabia and China.
I'm not really sure but I know that India is one of the most important and most influential countries in the world.
Yes, she is. She's my favorite singer and songwriter. I love her.
He was the ruler of the Troyana empire in 1957. He was one of the most powerful people in the world.
I don't know but it was a long time ago.  I remember that it was in the United States during the Civil War.
I'm not sure, but I know it started as a war between the United States and Ireland.
I think it was around 1959 when the king died.  I'm not sure when it was the last time I saw her.
I am not sure when they were married. But I do know that they were inducted into the United States in 1963.
I don't know. But I do know that Cuba is one of the oldest Cuban nations.
I am not sure what year he was elected, but he has been a great president since June of 1953
Fidel Castro was a Cuban ruler and CEO in Cuba
He was a former U.S. President of the United States.  I don't remember the exact date but it was a long time ago.
He's a former Vetteran and he's been in the U.S since 1948.
I don't know, but I do know the holidays were celebrated in the United States.
I am not really sure but they are in the northern hendrix region. 
I am not sure but I know the King Abdullah is the ruler of Bosnian-Herez.
He's the president of Bosnica, which is the capital and most populous city.
Drek Hough is an American singer. He's a great artist and songwriter.
Derek Hough is an American rapper and actor. I have a few friends who are big fans of him.
She's an American singer, songwriter, and actress. I love her!
He is an american rapper. He's been in the top 20 for a while.
She was a little older than I was. I don't remember the exact age, but she was pretty young.
She was 4. It was a beautiful time, but I didn't realize how long she was married.
She got married at the 2010 anniversary. I can't believe that was a long time ago!
I'm not sure but it was the best basketball season ever for the lakers, Kobe Bryant.
I believe it was in the late 1960s.  He was the youngest of 4.
Yes, it is an English novel that was written in the 1930s. Have you read it?
I have not read it but I do know that he was one of the greatest novels of all time.
I don't remember but I know he was an English singer and songwriter. Do you know of him?
Yes.  I was so mad at her.  She just wanted to get rid of him!
The Giza Pyramids were first built in July of 1962. 
It was built in 1979 in Bethlehem, Georgia.  I'm not sure when exactly it was built.
I am not sure what it is exactly but I know its the third-largest island chain in the world
He is one of the greatest rappers of all time. He was born on August 21, 1964.
I don't remember, but he was the coach of the school and he was also the coach.
I am not sure, but the manager has been around since 1903. It was founded by Louis Cardinals.
I don't know but they were a very successful team in the early 19th century.  They were one of the oldest franchises in the league
I'm not really sure, but the manager of the NY Yankees is the owner of the team and he is the CEO.
I'm not really sure, but they were one of the oldest franchises in the MLB.  I think they were established in 1903.
Matthew Prokup is an American actor and singer. I don't know much about him, but he's pretty good.
The King of Thailadelphia.  It's the oldest continuous monarchy in the world.
It is Brian. He is a very tall man and has been in the world for over 30 years.
Obama Obama, the US president and the United Kingdom. He was the ruler of the country.
I think it was justin timberlake. He is a singer, songwriter, and producer.
I am not sure but I do know he is a Canadian singer. I am sure he has a great father.
I think it started in the late 1950s. I think the power went out on around 1903.
It started in 1894, but it was a very long time ago.  It was very scary.
I'm not too sure, but he was born and raised in New York City, New York.
He was born in 1974, he was a singer, songwriter and producer.
He is a singer, songwriter, producer and record producer. He is quite the talented singer.
Italian.  I've been studying for it for years, but have never been able to speak it fluently.
Nope, I was just thinking of that. I think I would be able to see the stars.
I don't know. She was so young, I didn't think she would ever see them. 
I'm not sure. I just know he was in a car accident and had to go to the hospital
He was the president of the United States in 1953. That was a long time ago.
I think in the early 1950s.  He was also elected President of the United States.
It was a presidential run in 1943. I'm not sure when he was elected.
I don't remember the exact numbers, but it is the second-largest country in Canada.
I don't know. I know they are one of the oldest franchises in the world, though.
The U.S. president?   The United States is the 4th-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure, but I can tell you that Obama was the US president of the United States
I'm not sure, but I know that he is a very successful person. Do you know?
That was Obama. He is the 45th president of America. He also served as the President of the United States.
I don't remember, but I do know that it was Obama.  He was a great President.
Yes, it is very important in the United States.  It is the world's largest and most influential government in the world.
Obama was the 45th president of the United States. He was elected in 1945. He is one of the greatest.
I'm not sure but he is the 45th president of the united states. I'm sure he has a lot of experience.
His name was Jacob. He was born in New York City.  He lived in Manhattan and his mom was a nurse.
His name was Bonnie.  It was a very long time ago.  I don't know if I can remember his name.
I don't know who he was but he was a prominent business man and a very good president.
I am not sure but I do know he was the president of America. He was a Republican.
I am not sure but they were very successful. They were a great business man and a good family man.
They were a small businessman in Jackson, Tennessee. He passed away last month.
Jackson is the 45th president of the United States and was appointed as president of America on June 21, 1945.
President Jackson is my favorite president of the United States.  He is a great president of America.
Jackson Russell was a famous English author and was also the founder of the US.
My mom is a lawyer and my dad was a cop, so I was always around him. 
I believe it was Michael Jackson.  He was the most famous baseball player in the world.
Yes! He was drafted in 2010! He played for the Atlanta Braves! I was so excited.
I don't remember but he was really good at hitting the ball. He was a great baseball player.
I think it was William Jackson. He played for the Chicago Blackhawks.  
I don't know but I know it was the last black MLB player to make it to the World Series!
I don't know but I do know that he's considered one of the greatest baseball players to ever play.
He was born on August 29, 1958. He was a great driver.
Blake griffen is a great team, he is the quarterback for the Atlanta Braves
Blake Griffon is an American professional basketball player for Atlanta, Georgia, Mississippi, and Memphis.
I'm not really sure, but I know that it was the second largest country in the world in the 20th century
Her name is Katheryn Elizabeth. She's a beauty queen. I'm sure she's so beautiful.
Nicole is my favorite kid name. It is a very popular name in the US. 
Nickole, it's the name of a fictional character from the Disney Renaissance.
Nicole is her name, she's a beauty queen and I can't wait to meet her!
I am not really sure, I know that they are the largest river in the world.  Do you know?
He was an alcoholic and was killed by a drunk driver.  It was a long time ago though.
I think it was the AFC Championship. I was so happy to see him win!
The largest religion is the Hindu.  I am not sure how many followers are.
He's an American football quarterback for the Washington Capitals.  He was the quarterback of the Washington Division.
Vera Lynn, she was a singer from California.  She is a great singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Vera Lynn. She's a great actress and singer. Do you like her?
He was a businessman.  He was also a lawyer.  I don't know much about him.
I'm not sure but he was a great president. His wife and I met at a museum.
They were an American singer-songwriter. They were born in New York.
Lindon Johnson was the founder of the University of Pennsylvania.
I am not sure, but I am very excited for it, he is a great politician.
It was the president of the United States.  It was a big decision.  I was very impressed.
It was the Washington Capitals. They won the first game of the season in the US.
That's a great question.  I think it might be the President of India, or the Supreme Court.
The current Supreme Court is the highest court in the world. Do you think the current one is?
I don't remember but I do know he was the greatest American football quarterback of all time.
It's the capital and most densely populated in Australia.  It's a beautiful place.
It is a federal state in the USA that is in the southeastern portion of the United States.
Adelaid is the capital.  It is located on the Gulf of Mexico.
It's the capital city of Adela. It's in the southeastern United States.
I don't know, but I know he's very talented.  He was the first American singer, songwriter, and producer.
I think in the late 19th century when the Detroit government took over, I'm not sure when it was.
He was on August 2, 1943.  He was a real asshole. 
The invasions occurred in the late 19th century, but I do not know when it was. But the first one was in the Netherlands.
He was 6ft tall. He was a genius. I don't know if he was taller.
Leonardio Vinci was 6 foot tall and he was an engineer. He was a genetically gifted man.
He was 5ft tall.  He was also a great scientist.  What do you think?
I'm not sure but it was a pretty popular one. She was nominated for five Academy Awards in the US.
Ginger rocks are one of the most common ginger flavored candles around the world.
I think so, but I don't know if I've met him before. He seems like a nice guy.
It's "Taylor Swift," which is my favorite song of hers.  
I don't remember, but it was one of Taylor Swift's top hits. It's a shame she was so young.
Taylor Swift is an American singer. I like her songs. She was born in Pennsylvania.
Yes.  He was born in 1853.  It was a very long time ago.
I'm sorry to hear about that.  Did you know that the name is derived from the Latin word for the iq?
I'm not sure when he passed, but he was born in the United States.  He died on April 2, 1985.
I'm not sure when he passed, but he was one of the best in the history of the 20th century!
I'm not sure when he died, but he was an important figure in the 20th century. 
I don't know but they were the founders of the Iq in the 1980s.
It is a country in the southeastern region of the Gulf of August.
Eli Manning went to the University of Tennessee.  I'm not sure where he went though.
I'm not sure but he was born in Bethlehem, England.  He was a great man.
I'm not sure who was, but the first one to be recognized was Abraham.
He was the son of Abraham, I believe.  He was born and raised in Bethlehem, I think.
I'm not sure, but he was a very popular one. He had over a hundred million followers worldwide.
I am not exactly sure but I know that Jesus was the son of Abraham and was born on March 26, 1948.
I am not sure but I do know that he is regarded as one of the greatest Muslim leaders of all times.
I don't know.  But I do know that he was a very promising person.  I know he had a lot of faith in Jesus.
I am not sure but I do know he was one of the greatest prophetics in the world
I'm not sure. But I know that Muhama was the first Islamic monarchy in the world
I don't know, but I do know that he was born in the United States. He was a prominent figure in the Middle East.
I think it was Jacob. I didn't know his real name was James.   
Prince Williams was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and dancer.
Prince William, he was an American singer and songwriter.  He was a great artist!
I'm not sure, she was born and raised in New York City and she's been dead for a long time.
Prince Rogers is my favorite singer and songwriter of all time! Do you like music?
I am not sure but the first African-American to play in the NBA was in 2001
The first African-American was born in the United States in the early 1900s
I am not sure of the longest but i do know that the 3rd largest river in the world is the Chesapeake Bay
I don't remember, but it seems to be the Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico.
I don't know what you're referring to, but I know he was a prominent rapper.
Napolean Bonaparts, he was French. He was the ruler of France.
I'm not sure but he was the youngest of three brothers so he must have had a good head on his shoulders.
I'm not really sure, but it was a long time ago, but he was a very good dancer.
I'm not sure, but it's in the middle of the Mississippi River.
I'm not entirely sure. I just know that the land area is very densely populated.
It's a mountainous region of the U.S. that is bordered by the Atlantic ocean, the Mississippi, and the Gulf of Mexico.
She is the American singer and songwriter. I love her! She is so talented!
She is an American actress and singer-songwriter.  I am not sure why she is so popular.
I don't know, but I know that she is a singer-songwriter.
He is the current US President of the United States. He is a good actor and singer as well.
she's an american singer, songwriter and actor who was born on 1978
It is actually in the Appalachian Northern National Scenic Trail.
I believe it's the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  It's in Maine.
I'm not sure but I'm sure it's somewhere in the Appalachian Northeast.
Janet Jackson was born in 1963 and she's a great actress and singer
Janet Jacson was born in 1943 in Birmingham England. 
He's retired, but it was a while ago. He was one of the most successful baseball players in the league.
I'm not sure, but it was very nice of him to take a break from the house.
I am not sure, but I do know that he was a great wife and a great husband.
Harriet Tubmins was a very famous American singer, songwriter and dancer. He was also an actor.
She is an American singer, songwriter, dancer and producer. I have been watching her since I was a kid.
Harriet was an American poet who died in the 1930's. Her death was a shock.
She is an American singer and dancer.  She is a pretty popular singer, songwriter, and actress.
I don't know. But I know it was a long time ago. I was so upset when it happened.
I am not sure, but I think he was born in 1949. I know he was a great actor.
He was born on July 1891. He is an American basketball player for the Chicago Packers.
I'm not sure, but the Kingdom was established on June 30, 1845.  That's a long time ago!
It's a small island in Southern Italy.  I have always wanted to go there.
It began in India and Greece, but was influenced by other religions.
It started in the Indian subcontinent.  I think it started in India.  
They are a small island country in the Caribbean Sea.  I have a lot of friends there.
The Louisianiana Senators are the ones who are elected in Louisville, Mississippi.
Louisianas, Mississippi, and Tallahassee. I'm not sure who is though.
I'm not too sure but I do know that Louisiana is the 4th largest state in population.
Louisana is the senior of Louisiana.  It is one of the oldest state in the United States.
I don't know. I know they are a state located in the southeastern region of the USA
Louisianasiana is one of the largest state in the southeastern region of the United States
Las Vegas.  It is also the most densely populated city in the state.
I'm not sure, but it's the 3rd most populous city in the state of Mississippis.
I believe it was the US. I'm not sure but it was a very long time ago.
He was born in the United States.  I was so surprised.  He's been around for a while.
Yes, it was an English columbian colonial possession. It was a small island country in the Caribbean.
I don't remember. But I do know he was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
He was born on December 30, 1984. I can't believe he's so young!
The Godfather.  It was such a great movie.  He was also a member of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
I believe it was The Godfather. He was a great actor and director.  
Patrick Stewart was in "Let's Getaway", and it was so good!
Patrick Stewart was in The Godfather 2 and Halloween is coming up!
Halle Berry was in The Godfather.  He was so good in it.
Patrick Stewart was in the movie "The Founder" and Hall of Fame was the highest grossing movie of all time.
I think it was the Apollo Space Shuttle.  That's pretty neat!
The first time we went to space was in 1977. I don't know what the first was.
I'm not sure, but there are several.  I've been to the Rockies National Park and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
The chain is called Publix. They are one of the most popular chain in the world.
It's the Rocky Mountains.  The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is one of my favorites.
I don't know of any, but it would be the Appalachian National Scenic Trail
The Appalachian Mountains.  The largest mountain is Mount Katahdin, and the second-largest mountain in South America.
I'm not sure, but it is in the Caribbean Sea in Southeast Asia.
I'm not sure but the Appalachian National Scenic Monumental National Park is one of the highest mountain in South America.
It is a state that is a US state that's located in the United States and Canada.
I don't know, but it must be Hitler.  I think he was a pretty big fan of Hitler.
It's a small island in the Caribbean. I was thinking of visiting it.
I am not really sure but I know it's the second-largest country in the European Union.
I am not sure but I know that it is the longest continent in the world and it covers the Atlantic Ocean.
Three continents: Africa, the Atlantic, and the Gulf of Mexico. 
The Atlantic Ocean is the only continent that separates the Gulf of Mexico and Atlantic. 
I don't know exactly but they are all bordered by the Atlantic, and the Gulf of Mexico.
The Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic Ocean and the Pacific. It's beautiful
The Atlantic, the Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic Sea, and the Caribbean.
It's the Atlantic Sea. It is the second largest continent in the world. It's also the third most sparsely populated.
The Mediterrean Sea is a sea in the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
I am not sure but I know the sea is the only continent that is not covered by the Atlantic Ocean.
It's the Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico, and I've only been there once. I can't wait to go again.
There are three major continents.  The Atlantic, Greece, and the Atlantic.
I'm not sure but the area is bordered by Greece, Spain, Italy and Bermuda.
The Gulf of Mexico, Arkansas, and Alaska.  They are all very cold!
Selena Gomez was a singer. She was a great actor and songwriter.
Gwen is an American singer, songwriter, actress, and singer. I'm not sure who plays her.
I am very sorry to hear that. She was a great American historical figure who died on August 18 1845.
She died in August of 1963. I think she was a wonderful person. 
I am not sure but they have been inhabited by Spanish in the 15th century. 
I have been to Costa Rica, but I don't think I've been to Columbia yet.
columbian border is a sovereign bordered country in the united states and canada
I don't know, but it's a sovereign state in the southeastern region of the United states.
No, I'm not sure if it's Costa Rica. It's a Spanish columbia.
I'm not sure but I do know that Mexico is the third largest country in the U.S.
The US president of the United States, Donald J. Kennedy, and the United Kingdom.
I am not sure. But the U.S. Army is the largest army in the world.
I am not sure. But I know that the president of the US was a general of the United States.
I'm not sure, but I know the US president was a US president in the United States during the Civil War.
Obama Obama was the president of the United States.  He also served as president of Vietnam.
His name is Jacob. He's a good guy, but he's kind of a weirdo.
Her name is Jenny. I'm not too sure how she came up with it. 
It is a British Columbian monarchy, it is a very old one though. 
He was a great man, but he was also one of the greatest political leaders. He served as the President of the United States.
I'm not sure, but he was born in 1948. He was a great American rapper
I don't know but he was born on August 1886! He was very young!
I'm not sure, but I do know that he was a great actor and director. He died in 1977.
I'm not sure, but it was a while since he was the 45th president in the US.
It is Bavaria. It is the most populous metropolitan area in the world.
she is a singer/songwriter, singer, and producer.  
She is a singer, and has won several grammy awards for her vocals.
She is an american singer and dancer and songwriter from hollywood
Hilary Duffs is a British singer, songwriter, and producer
I'm not sure, but I know it is the highest mountain in the solar system. 
I don't know.  But the hotter the better.  I love the beach.
The capital is Savut Creek, which is located on the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the smallest and most populous city in Europe
I am from Siberia. The capital is Siberian capital, Sibera. Have you ever been?
It's the capital of Siberian. It's also the smallest city in the world.
It's a country in the southeastern region of the U.S. that's where I'm located.
He is the 45th president of America. He's also the 45rd President of the United States.
It is located in the southeastern region of the U.S. and Canada
I don't remember but it was a long time ago.  The Republic of Latin America was established in the 19th century.
She attended a private school. She was the coach of the university of Kentucky University.
I'm not sure, but he was the coach of the Chicago Blackhawks and won three Super Bowl appearances.
Paul Bryant was a former president of the NCAA. He was also the coach for the University of North Carolina.
He was on the Carson Wentz team. He was also a great coach. 
He was the coach of the University I was at.  I was so excited to see him!
I don't remember, but he did win the National Basketball Championship.
He played at the university of Pennsylvania. I didn't realize he was drafted by the Atlanta Georgia.
Her name is Dorothyn Elizabeth. She's a great dancer.
She's an american singer and songwriter. She was born in the US.
I am not sure but I know that its one of the top public universities in the world.
Delware state is located in the southeastern region of the united states in the lower pennsyvania
I am not sure but I do know that Delaware University is a research university in the United States
Bernard de Galvet was the CEO of the federal government and was appointed as president.
I am not sure, but he was the president of the United States. It was a while ago.
I am not sure. But I do know he has been elected for over 30 years. He is a good candidate.
He was an Italian business man and was the ruler of Spartanica. He was very good.
He was born on June 28, 1989! That's a long time ago for him.
She is from England, and she is an English singer, songwriter and actress.
He was a great actor in The Notebook, which came out in 2012. He's been around a long time.
The Shawshank Redemption, it is one of my favorite movies.   What is yours?
I don't think he's in a lot, but I know that he's one of the most successful singers of all time.
He is an American singer-songwriter. I think he was in some good stuff too.
he was the lead role in the last of the mohicans, he played a great character
I'm not sure what he was in, but I know that he was born and raised in Dallas, TX.
He was in The Notebook, and he is a pretty good actor.  He was a great child actor as well.
Thomas Thompsons is a great actor! He was born on August 25, 1984.
I think he was in the Forest Gump.  He was great in that movie.
I am not sure but I know that the first one was launched in 1976!  That is a long time ago!
He is an american poet, singer, songwriter, and actor. 
I'm not too sure. But I do know that she's a singer and songwriter.
Sean Conner was the star.  He was also in some other roles, but not the main character.
robin he was the king of england and he was also the ruler of france 
I am not sure but he was very successful.  He won the Prince of the Thieves award in 1994.
Elvis Presley was an American rapper and producer.  He was a great singer.
Elvis Presley was an American record producer for Lady Gaga.   
It was called The Book of Souls.  I thought it was an indie band but it was a pop punk band.
I'm not sure, but he was elected in 1981. He was also a member of the Democratic Party.
He is a good actor!  He is an American singer, songwriter and actor
It is the third largest country in the world, but it is very sparsely populated.
I'm not sure, but I do know that India is the largest country in the world. 
I am not sure. I know that indian people are the third-largest in the world
Yes, it is a country located in the northern hemisphere. 
Carl Jung is an American singer, songwriter, actor, director, and producer.
She graduated from a school in Bentonville Arkansas.  I'm so excited!
Jack Black was in "The Wizard of the Lost" which came out in 1997.
Jack Black was a great actor!  He played the role of Jack Black in The Wizard of Lamborghinis.
He was in The Avengers and the X-Men movie.  It was so good.
Jack Black was an American rapper, he was in The Number of the Beast.
Jack Black was a great actor in The Father of Scots.  He was a really great actor.
He was an American actor and dancer.  He was also a singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.
I think it was The Avengers, but I don't remember. It was a great movie though!
Jack Black was one of the most successful and successful actors in the history of Hollywood.
Jack Black was an American rapper and actor.  His real name is Richard Bachman.
Jack Black was a great actor and actor. I think he is one of the most famous and influential.
Jack Black is a great actor, but he was also a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Jack Black is a good actor, he is also an actor. He has been in a lot of movies.
Jack Black is an American actor and actor, he starred in a lot of roles in movies.
He was an american actor and dancer.  I think he was a good actor too.
I'm not sure, but he was a great actor in The Wizard of the Lambs!
I am not sure but he is a great actor. He was born in 1974 and starred in Jack Black in 1983.
He was a German Shepherd.  I love him.  He was the most loyal, obedient dog in the world.
I don't know, but I do know that they were the ones that were the first nations to be ruled.
I am not sure but I know that the United States has the longest of all the countries in the world
I'm not sure, but the US is a great country.  It was founded in 1883.
It was in Babylon, Arabia and the Kingdom of Saudi Arabs.
A former chairman of the University of Michigan. He is a very good chairman.
It was James Holden, he was the president of the University of Kansas University.
I'm not sure but he's a former chairman of the United States. He's been in office a long time.
I don't know, but I know his death was in 1996. He was a great driver.
I am not really sure, but the first deer was founded in 1883. 
George Bush was the Secretary of the United States.  He is one of the most important people in the world.
I'm not sure but I know he was a very successful businessman. He was also one of the best-selling businessmen of all time.
I'm not sure but I do know they are the largest private sector of the United States.
I don't remember but I know it was in the United States during the Civil War. 
I made it in a museum in New York City.  I'm so proud of it.
I don't remember. It was in theaters. I think it was a horror movie.
It was in the UK. It was a really good movie. It came out in 1972.
It was a comedy. It's a great movie! I love comedies.   
I think it was at a local theater. I don't remember the name, but it was a really long time ago.
Marley's The Wizard of the Lambs. I was so happy when it came out because it was my favorite.
It was in the United States and it was a big deal. I was so excited to see it.
I was at the movies theater I went to. It was really fun and I enjoyed it.
Obama was the 45th president of the U.S.  It was a long time ago, though.
Obama was the president of the United States.  I was surprised to see how well he did.
He is a professional basketball player, he is 23 years old. He is one of the greatest players in the NBA
Lebron James James is 32. He was drafted to Memphis Tennessee in 2007
He's a professional basketball star.  He was born in Akron, Ohio. 
I don't remember his name, I know he was in a lot of colleges though.
It became the capital of the United States in 1853.  That's a long time ago!
Trenton, the capital of New York, was established in 1891 as the capital.
It is the oldest continuous state. I have never been to the new jersey capital.
I'm not sure but it's the capital of the world, and it's in the New York metropolitan area.
I believe it was founded in 1873.  It's been around for a while.
I don't know but I do know that the US has been the most influential country since 1845.
I'm not sure, but I know that the president is the ruler of the country. He is the CEO of the United States
I'm not sure but I know the first one was released in 1997.  Do you like Twilight?
I don't know what you mean, but I do know it is a romantic comedy.
Third volume is called "Twilight".  It's a romance novel written by Joseph Heller.
No, it was written by Joseph Heller.  It's one of my favorite books.  I like that it's set in the past.
I'm not sure, but he was born on October 1948.  I'm sure he wrote a lot.
It's a collection of short stories written by James Fenimore Cooper.  I haven't read it myself.
The first book was written by Joseph Heller in the early 19th century.  I loved it
It is a play by Joseph Lincoln. I have a hard time remembering it. 
I think he is, but I don't know if he is a farmer or an artist.  
I am not sure.  I do know that he was born in Birmingham, Texas
I believe it was Gene Roddenberry. He was born in 1942, but he was the founder of the United States.
I don't remember who was first, but I know that the first person ever to win at the Olympics was Michael Jackson.
I don't know, but I know he was the first American actor to play the guitar. 
I am not sure but I do know that it is the third-largest country by area.
Her name is Mileena. She's very beautiful. She is very tall and has a long curly hair.
The first ever landed on Mars was in 1962. The first one was founded in 1873.
I don't know but I do know that they were sent to the United States by the Spanish colonists in the 16th century.
I am not sure but I do know that the first space craft was launched in 1853
The first space voyage to mars was in the 1960s and it was a long time ago
I'm not sure but I do know that it was first sent to Mars back in 1960.
The first one was on August 30th, 2017.  It was a long time ago.
Major Jamison went to a private school, I don't remember the exact school.  I think it was a private one.
Mae C Jemison is a French teacher.  She was a very popular one in the US. 
His name was Patrick Henry, he was a famous comedian, actor, and actor!
Patrick Hendrix is a Scottish comedian, he is known for being funny.
Patrick Henry is a great actor. He was in a show called "The Voice."
Patrick Henry is a great actor and comedian, he was born in 1948.
His name is Drew. He is also an actor. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
Patrick heeys is an American rapper and actor.  He's a very famous actor, actor, and singer.
He was an only child, so I guess he was the youngest of 5 brothers and sisters.
He has two brothers and sisters. They're older, but we were all really close.
Janice Joplin was the greatest singer of all time.  She was born in New York.
I am not sure, but she's been around for a long time. She was an actress, singer, and songwriter.
Johnny is a great name. It was his first wife and he was a great husband. 
He was a famous rapper. He had been in the business for a few decades. 
Yes, it is the third-largest country in the European union, but the second smallest.
I think it's called Bavaria. It's also located in the Atlantic ocean.
The border to France is the Atlantic Ocean. I have never been to either of those.
Portugal is a great place to visit.  I have always wanted to go there.  Have you ever been?
Yes!  I have been to the capital of Portugal, France!  It's a beautiful city!
Dolores Huerta is the Spanish translator. I think it was in the 1800's
Dolores Huerta is the American fashion designer. She was born in 1907.
I'm not sure, but he was a good president of America.  He was the first president of the United States.
I'm not really sure but he did die in 1883. He was an American politician.
He died in 1983. He was born in 1948 and he was a member of the United States.
I'm not sure, but I think it was in 1845.  That would be a long time ago.
The US president Abraham Lincoln died in 1962, he was a great president
I don't know but I know the president was shot in August of 1952.
I don't remember but I do know Julia Roberts is in several of the best romantic comedies.
George Clooney is an American actor, singer, songwriter and producer.
Julia Roberts is one of the most famous actresses of all time! She was in a movie called "Pride and Prejudice".
I don't know but it was a romantic comedy starring Julia Roberts.
That is a great one! I love George clooney, he is such a great actor! 
George Clooney was the greatest of all time.  He was a great actor and director.
No, it was a romantic comedy starring Madeleine Stowe. She was so cute!
I don't know but Julia Roberts is a very famous actress.  Her first movie was released in 1997.
I don't know but he was one of the most powerful Italian leaders in the history of Italy.
I don't know. But it was a hit song by the American rock band The Beatles.
I'm not really sure, but the first world war was held in 1962 in the U.S.
It was during the Civil War. The American war was fought between the United Kingdom and France.
The US was one of the few countries that participated in a war between Germany and the United States.
I'm not sure, but it was a very long war between the United States and Germany. 
I'm not sure who he was, but he was the founder of the American company. 
Elvis was an american singer, songwriter, record producer and producer.
I don't know, but I know that the Earth is the third-largest in size.
There is no definitive answer, but I know that there are more than seventy planets in the world.
I don't know, but I know there are more than seventy different planets in the world.
Well, I'm not sure. But it's not just the smallest planet in our solar system, which is pretty cool.
I don't remember, but I do know that they are the third-largest terrestrial planets in the solar system.
I am not sure but I do know that the planets have been around since the 19th century
The earth, it's the smallest and the furthest in the solar system. 
I'm not sure, but the size of the earth is about the size and shape of the planet
It's a planet in the Sun.  It is the third-largest of the solar eagle, but the second smallest.
Well, I'm not sure if you're referring to the size of the earth, but the planet itself is smaller.
I'm not sure but the earth's atmospheric water contains a lot of water.
I don't know, but I can tell you that it's the smallest planet in the solar eclipse.
He was born on June 30, 2009.  I can't believe he turned 21 in December of 2009!
I think he was born in August 30, 2009. I am sure he will be fine.
I don't know but I know his real name is Luke.  He's a great artist.
I have three brothers, and one sister. They all live in different countries. I don't see them much.
His name is Jay, he is a singer, songwriter, producer, and actor
Yes, he is a singer, songwriter and actor.  I have a brother, sister, sister.
They are an American singer, songwriter and actor. They've been together since they were 14.
I don't know but I do know that is one of the most densely populated cities in the US.
I'm not sure, but I do know that he's the 45th President of America, and he's been in office since 1945.
I don't know, but I do know that he was a very prominent man.  He also was the CEO of JFK.
I'm not sure, but he is a prominent businessman. He was elected in 2001.
I'm not sure, but I can tell you it wasn't a president, it was a woman who shot JFK.
I believe it was the president of the U.S. but I'm not sure when he was killed.
That is a great question. I do not know but I know that it is a sovereign state located in the Atlantic Ocean.
No, I don't think I have ever been there. I have never been to any country other than North America.
I don't know, but I do know that it's one of the seventh-largest countries in the world.
I am actually not sure but I know that the country is a sovereign state in the United States
John Adams is a great American singer, songwriter, and actor.  He's done so many amazing things.
She's a singer and songwriter. She was born and raised in Pittsburgh.
She is an American singer, songwriter, and producer. She's been around a lot!
she was an American singer and songwriter who was born and raised in california.
I think it was Mick Jagger, I can't remember the name though. I think he was a great actor.
I am not sure but I do know he was the main protagonist of The Indiana Jones.
It was Nicole Bale, and he is one of the best actors of all time.
I'm not sure, but he was the main guy who made the movie "The Godfather".
I don't really know, but I know that she is one of the greatest actors of all time.
She's an American singer, songwriter, producer, and singer.  I love her
Diana Ross is a Scottish singer, he was born in Scotland.
He's an American singer and songwriter, but he's also a singer.
she was a great dancer, singer, songwriter, producer, and singer
she was a singer for dianna ross, she was an american singer and songwriter.
I'm not really sure. I know she is a singer, songwriter, and producer.
She was an American singer and songwriter. She was born in 1981.
Diana Ross is one of the greatest artists of all time. She was born in 1973!
I don't know, but she is an English singer, songwriter, and actress.
Marlon Brando is such a great actor! He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I'm not sure, but I know the Mexican government was one of the first rulers of Mexico in the Americas.
She was a singer, songwriter, singer.  She was very talented.
The city of Rhode Island, New York. It's also the smallest in the US.
I believe it is Maine, New Hampshire, New York, Vermont, Massachusetts, and Connecticut.
I'm not sure but I know it is the 3rd most populous urban area in the US
It's from the Caribbean and the Dominican Republic.  It is so beautiful.
It is a mix of indian and african heritage. It's very beautiful.
I don't know, but it is the third-largest country in Africa by area.
It is an African-American, and they have a lot of makeup in Africa.
It is a mix of Northern Africa and the Middle East. I have no idea where it came from.
I'm not sure but it's a small island nation in the Caribbean. It's pretty small and is in the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure, but it is the largest and highest population in Africa.  It is the second smallest in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that they have a large diversity in the Middle East, Asia and Africa.
I don't know, but I know they were the first country in Africa to be colonized.
I'm not sure. But I know that there are a lot of indigenous people there.
I'm not sure what they are called, but they were originally from the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but there are some in Africa as well as the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but they are in the Caribbean region.  It's a very small island in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.
It is a small island country in the Caribbean. They are very close to the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure but it is the third-largest city in India. I think it is a little overpopulated.
Yes, she was a very popular singer and songwriter.  It was her second album in 2009.
Marilyn Monroe is an American singer and songwriter who was born in the United States and was raised in New York.
Marilyn Monroe was a famous actress, singer, and songwriter.
I'm not sure, but Louisianas were the first to purchase it. I know it was a long time ago.
I think it was the president of the United States. It was a big purchase for my company.
I don't know, but the Louisianiana president was a former president. He was a good man.
I don't remember the exact date, but it was in the late 1800's.  I'm sure it's a long time ago now.
He was a Republican who was elected for president in the US.  I don't know who was the secretary.
Her name is Rico. It's a Spanish name. It means "little pride".
I have no idea who Julia Alvarez is.  I do like her.
He was a renaissance man who lived in the 1800s, and he was an English colonist.
Renne was a lawyer and a dancer. I think she was pretty good too.
It was a translation job, but they didn't speak english very well. It was difficult for me to understand
Elvis Wife was the wife of the Renaissance. She was a great wife.
I'm not sure. I know that he was born on August 30, 1985.
I believe the census was in the late 1960s and 1970s in Bangladeshi.
I don't know but I do know that it was the president of the United States of America.
It is the president of the United States. I am so happy I got to see him again.
I'm not really sure, but I know that he was the president of America for a long time
Obama Obama, he is the 45th president.  He's been president since January 20, 1994.
Obama Obama was the president of the United States. He was the most influential president of our country.
I'm not quite sure, but I know the US has been the leader in the US since 1945.
Obama.  I was so shocked!  I thought he was the president of the United States.
I have no idea.  She is a great mom and I am so happy to see her.
Her names are Megan and Jacob. We are going to Disneyland this year and I am really looking forward to it.
They are the ones that are named after the American actress Katheryn Elizabeth Hudson.
They are names are Jacob and Bonnie.  Do you have a favorite? 
Hinduism and Jainism.  I'm not a big fan of either.  He was born and raised in New York City.
I'm not sure, but I do know the team had a tough time.  I know they played well though.
I am not sure who was, but he was the best player on the team in the world. 
It was Bartolomeo Cristofori, he's one of the best players in the history of soccer.
Michael Jackson is one of the biggest and most famous artists of the time. He's a legend.
Michael Jackson is a legend. He was one of the best selling artists of his time. 
I'm not entirely sure but I do know that it is the largest of the seeds of the Americas.
Billie Ray Cirus is a former American singer, songwriter and actor.
Billie Jean was an American singer, songwriter, and producer. 
I am not sure.  But he had a good life.  He was a great president.
It is the Atlantic Sea.  I love the ocean and I love to surf.
It's called the Chesapeake Bay. It is a great lake.  Do you have any?
No, he's still around. I just wish he was still around, he was the best.
I don't know when it died? I know it was a big hit in the United States.
I'm not sure but I know that the area has the highest amount of lakes and rivers in the world.
It is the largest state in the U.S and it is in the southern tip of North Carolina
I'm not sure about that, but I do know that the state is a bordered state to the west.
Yes, I'm from Texas.  It's a great place for fishing, hiking, and camping.
It is the third largest state by area in the United States and the 8th largest in the USA.
The water is very large, and it is the 3rd-largest state in the US.
The Mississippi and the Gulf of Mexico are the two major cities in the US.
I am not sure, but I know it is in the southwestern region of the United States
The Mississippi, the Gulf of Mexico, and the Atlantic ocean are the biggest.
They are the 4th-largest state in the USA and are in the southeastern region of the United States.
The two major regions of Texas are Los Angeles and Austin, and the Dallas area.
There are two major rivers, the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean. 
I am not sure, but I do know that the U.S. is a Navy branch of the Army.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's not as small as a regular sized one.  It's the smallest one in the Solar System.
The smallest one is Mercury.  It's the second smallest of the three.
The smallest is the Sun's eighth largest, it is the third smallest of the three largest.
The capital of Illinois is in the Mississippi River near Spring Mountains.
I'm not sure, but I know she was a very famous woman.  Her debut album was released in June of 1997.
I'm not sure. I do know that he was a good actor. Do you have any favorites?
He played in the Godfather. He's a great actor. He was also a great dancer
I think he was in The Godfather.  He was a good actor.  I love Christopher Plummer.
I'm not sure, but I know he is one of the greatest actors of all time.
I don't know who that is, but I do know he is one of my favorite actors. 
I don't know the details. But I know he was one of the greatest actors and musicians in the history.
I am not sure, but it was a great movie.  The first one was released in 1977.
I'm not really sure, but the word "jocaster" was first recorded in the 10th century!
No, but it was nominated for Best Actor Award for Best Picture. 
I would have to say he was a great actor, but not as good as Michael Mann.
Marlon has won a ton of awards, but he was the best actor in the history of the 1960s.
Marlon Brandon was an American actor and songwriter. I love him so much. 
I am not really sure, but I know that it is the 3rd-most populated state in the U.S.
Wendy Williams, an American singer, songwriter, actor, dancer, and producer.
I'm not sure but I do know the Pacific Ocean is the most southern Atlantic Ocean in the world.
The Atlantic is a bordering island, the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic.
No. But I have never been. I have been to the United States, which is located on the Atlantic ocean.
He went to the University of Michigan. He studied Business management and English.
I don't know but I know that was one of the original three presidents of the United States.
I am not sure, but I do know that it has been a great president since June of 1945.
She was an English singer and songwriter.  She was a great artist too!
I believe it was Bon Scott. He was the first to be nominated for an Academy Award.
He was a great actor.  He had a lot of success.  I think he was nominated for an Academy Award.
He played the super smash bros game. He was the best. I love mario.
I don't remember his name but he was a great actor in The Little Mermaid and Super Mario Bros.
She had a heart attack.  I'm sure she was very happy to see me.  It was her anniversary.
I'm not sure but the Mariners are one of the oldest franchises in the world
It was founded in 1903 by a Scottish physicist Alex Radiguezn
He was a member of the Washington Capitals for the Seattle Seattle Mariners.
He moved to the US in 2008.  He's been in the Mariners since 1997.
She won the grammys in 1986. I am not sure when it was the last time she won the award.
I'm not sure, but I know she is the most influential singer of all time.
She was the first female singer to be nominated for an academy award in 2009.
She was born in 1994 and was an american singer and songwriter. 
I'm not sure but he was nominated for the awards for best actress of the year.
No, but she is my favorite singer.  She was born in 1972 and has won six Grammy awards.
Yes, she's a singer, songwriter, and actress.  She was born and raised in Hawaii.
I don't know much about her but I know that her real name is Katheryn Elanie Hendrix.
Yes she is my favorite singer.  Do you like her?  She's a great singer and songwriter.
I think she's been in a few of her albums.  Her debut album was released in 1997.
She's 5 years old. I was so shocked. She's been around since the 60's.
The Lion King, which was released in 1976. It was my favorite disney animated movie.
It's a folk music style.  I've been playing it since I was a child and I'm trying to get back into it.
Mason music is a type of rock music that originated in the 1960s in the United Kingdom
Mason Musso is an American rock band formed in Los Angeles, County in 1989
Mason Musso is a folk-road rock band from New York City. They're a pretty good band.
I don't really know, but I know that it was founded in 1948. 
I'm not sure, but Africa is the 3rd-largest country. That is a big one!
I'm not entirely sure. But I do know that they had the longest continuous government in the US.
It was the Democratic party in the United States.  I am not sure about that though. 
He was drafted in 2009, he's been playing professional hockey since he was 14. 
Her name was Laurent.  It was a shortened version of Laure. 
I am not sure but the president of the US is not a member of the united states.
He was the general of the Air Force, and he was a general for the United States Air Force.
Louis Armstrong is a great American singer and songwriter!  He's also the founder of the American Rock and Roll Hall of Fame!
The name Louis Armstrong was his father.  He died in 1984.
I'm not too sure, but she had a pretty good attitude and a good sense of self-discipation.
I am not sure but I think he was a male police officer. I am sure that was scary.
She was from a small town in New York. I was so nervous when she came out. I didn't know she was a female officer.
no.  he died in 1983.  I was so sad about it.  He was so talented.
He has been a Republican since January 1945. I'm not sure when he changed his faith though. 
He was a former president of the U.S., and was elected in the US in 2001.
She was a singer, songwriter and dancer. She had a huge career.
She's a great American singer, songwriter, dancer, and actor.
The Battle of the Freemans? I think it's in 1876. It was a very long time ago.
The British Prime Minister. It was a long time ago, but it still makes me feel old.
I don't recall when he was born, but he was a very good actor and songwriter.
No, I have no idea who that is.  He was an actor, singer, and producer, but I don't know much about him.
He was born on August 1893. He's the best American singer of all time.
He was born in 1974.  I am sure he is a great driver.  Do you like him?
I'm not sure, but I know he was born on August 29, 1954. He is a great actor.
I would have to say San francisco. It's a great place to live in the most populous metropolitan area in the world.
He was a former American singer-songwriter, songwriters, and actor. He was pretty good.
Karl Benz is a German automaker that was founded in 1911.  
Turkey has a large border with Argentina, Bengal, Greece, and Egypt.
Yes! They are the second largest country in the world! Do you know anything about Turkey?
I don't know but I know they are a very large island nation in the Middle East.
I don't know but Turkey is the largest country in the middle east and is the third-largest country in Africa.
It is a country in the southeastern region of North America and bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
Yes, Turkey is the capital and largest city in the country. It is also the largest state in the world.
Yes, Turkey is the third-largest country in the European Union and the third most sparsely populated in the world.
Turkey is one of the largest and most sparsely populated countries in the world.
The Turkish Republic is a sovereign country located in the Southern United States. 
I am not sure about Turkey but I do know that Turkey is the largest country in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that Turkey is located in Saudi Arabia. 
I don't know, but I am not sure. But Turkey is the third-largest country in the EU.
The Turkey is a sovereign state in the southeastern region of the U.S.
Turkey is a sovereign nation in the middle east and north america. It is also a member of the united states.
I don't know but I do know that Turkey is the second most sparsely populated of all nations, and the third-largest country by area.
I'm not sure, but I do know that Turkey is a member of the Republic of Arkansas.
I think Turkey is a sovereign country that is located in the southeastern portion of the US.
They are the second largest country in the world and the third most sparsely populated country in europe.
Turkey is located in the Southeastern portion of Asia, and is a sovereign state
Turkey is located in the Republic of Arkansas and it is the largest country in the world
Turkey and Greece are the two most populous country in the world. 
Turkey is a sovereign state in the southeastern region of the world.
I'm not sure, but I know Turkey is located in the middle east and it is a sovereign state in the southeastern region of the world.
Yes, Turkey is the second-largest country in the Middle East.  
I'm not sure when he was born, but he was raised in Pennsylvania
Yes it was.  She is a very good woman.  I was so excited to see her.
I am not sure when it was born, but it was a small island in the Caribbean. 
It's a birthday in the UK that celebrates the anniversary of the birth of Jesus.
Obama was the 45th president of the United States. He was a prominent business man and he also had an office in Chicago.
I'm not sure, but he was the president of the U.S. in 2001. He's done a great job.
I'm not sure what he did for a job but he was a real estate agent. 
His heart attack. It was a long time ago, but it was a shock to see him.
I'm not sure, but the rice in Japan is the largest rice production in the world.
India is known for rice, but I don't know where the other country is from. 
It's a city in the state of Nashville. It's the capital of the state.
I'm not sure. But I do know that it is the most populous city in Egypt. 
I think it is the 8th largest in the world by area and the third-most densely populated city in the US.
I don't know but it is the most densely populated major city in Egypt.
I don't know exactly but I know it is the most sparsely populated city in the world!
I'm not sure but I know he was a prophethetor and was the son of Jesus.
No, but he was a prominent rapper. I don't think he was married. 
Her name is Bella. I'm not sure if she is a real name, but she has a lot of friends.
The first one, it's a romantic drama. I can't believe it came out in 2011.
It was the movie "Radioactive" which came out in 2009.  I was so disappointed.
The first one is Edward James O'Light. He's my favorite character.  Do you like the first one?
I don't remember the first one, but it was a great movie! It came out in 1977
It was called "The Victorian of the Fall" and it was a great movie.
I think it was The Number of the Beast. I think that's one of the first.
James bond was the first movie ever made. He was born and raised in Honolulu and was an actor.
I'm not sure what was his first Bond movie, but he was the main character in the series.
I believe he was born in 1962 and was the first President of the United Kingdom.
He was a famous actor.  He was born in 1964, he was a great actor.
He was an American rapper, he was a big influence in hip hop and rap music!
He was a great actor, he was also a singer, songwriter, and producer.
He was a former UFC Championship wrestler.  He was also the youngest of 5.
His name is William Tatum.  He was born in 1887.  I have always been a fan of him.
He is William Tatum. He was born in the Philippines and moved to the US in 1974.
William Taft was a famous baseball player who played for the Washington Capitals. 
William Taft is a Scottish rapper. He was born in the 1960s.
I think it was Albert Einstien.  It's crazy that he died so young!
I'm not sure but I do know that it's the 3rd most sparsely populated country in the world.
No.  I have never been to Greenland, but it looks like a beautiful place.  It is a country in the North Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure but I do know that it's the smallest state in the world with only 2.4 million people.
I'm not sure, but I'm pretty sure its a small island in the Caribbean.
The album "The Number of the Beast" was released in 1997.  It was a big hit.
I'm not sure, but I'm glad I didn't get in trouble. I was in a bad mood.
She was a great American actress and singer and songwriter!  I loved her so much!
Louis Braille died on August 30 1993. It was a very long time ago.
Louis Braille died in 1953. I am not sure if he was alive, though.
Obama Obama is the 45th president of Illinois.  I am not sure who did, but I am sure it was Obama.
I am not sure but I do know Obama is the 45th president of the united states. 
Obama Obama. He is the 45th president in Illinois. He was appointed on January 20, 2017.
The Lion King was my favorite disney animated film ever.  It was released in 1997.
Yes! It was released in 1963.  Do you have any favorite disney movies?
I'm not sure, but they released their first studio album "Under The Bridge", which was released in 1997.
He's a famous American rapper, I don't know what word he's referring to, but his real name is Ronn Weasley.
It is the name of a country in the Northern Atlantic Ocean.  It is located in the Far Eastern United States.
Her name was Taylor, she was an actress and songwriter. I was so happy to see her again.
I'm not sure but he was born in 1985! He's a great actor and comedian!
He won the Mr. Olympic Golden Girl Award for Best Actors in the 1980s.
It was first produced in 1953 by the Ford Mustang. It was also produced by General Motors.
I'm not sure but I know that he was the CEO of Teslas. 
The Washington Redskins are the oldest franchise in the NFL. They have been around since 1933
The youngest are the Washington Redskins.  They are the oldest franchise in the NFL.
I don't know but I know that it is the Washington Redskins.  Do you?
I'm not really sure but I'm a fan of the Washington Redskins. Do you like football?
Obama was elected president of the United States.  He was elected in 1962 and became the president of Pennsylvania.
Whitney Houston is an American singer and songwriter from Houstan, Mississippi.
She is an american singer and songwriter. She was born in 1983.
She's a singer, songwriter, and actress. I think she's very talented.
She was the mother of the American singer, songwriter and producer, record producer.
I have never heard of them, but I know they are a sports brand.  Are they good?
No, I don't think that's what I meant. It was a female athletes box. I was just surprised.
I have no idea what it is. Is it any of the athletes in the US that are in the Olympics?
I have no idea what that is, but I do know that women athletes are usually very competitive.
He was 38 years old. He was a great driver. He passed away in 1987.
I believe he was born in 1984, so he was a great American singer and songwriter
I'm not sure, but he was a great driver.  He was also a champion driver in the late 1960s.
I don't know, but he was a great driver. I was really sad when I saw him in person.
I'm not sure but I know that Africa has the longest and most densely populated areas of the world.
I am not sure of the longest but I can tell you that Africa is one of the most diverse countries in Africa.
He was a great actor.  He was an American actor, singer, songwriters, and producer.
The mountains of the Appalachian Northern National Scenic Trail.
There are some that are named after the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
It's the Appalachian National Scenic Trail, and it's beautiful.
The mountains are called the Grand Canyon and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail!
St. Lucia, Mississippi, and Georgia. I've never been there but it looks like a beautiful place.
No, I don't think I've ever been there.  It's a mountainous region in the southern United States.
I think it was the Seattle Seattle Sounders.  I was rooting for them!
My favorite team of all time is the Seattle Seattle seahawks! What about you?
He died in 1978. He was an English singer, songwriter, actor, and actor. 
Tanyas is an American singer, songwriter, actor!  She's very talented.  Do you have any kids?
She is an American singer. She was born in New York City. She's a very talented artist.
Tanya is a great name. She's a good mom and she is a good dad.
John Deere is a Scottish deer, who is a member of the Anglo-Scottish army.
Tom Holland is a great actor.  He is also in The Forest Gump.  I love that movie.
I don't know but I do know Meg Ryan and Jerry played in The Godfather.
I think Meg Ryan Reynolds was the main character.  He was a great actor.
I'm not sure, but I do know that they were married for a while. I know Micheal Jackson and Lisa Mirella have been together for a long time.
I'm not sure, but it was a long day at work and I was really sad when I got home.
I'm not sure, but it's in the middle of the Mississippi, Tennessee, and Alabama.
I am not sure but the name "St. Lucia" means "Lucia in Spanish" 
I don't remember but I do know that he was born in August 1893.
The pyromids of Giza were actually the first ones to be built in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that Jesus was the savior of all the world.
I'm not quite sure, but I do know that he was a prominent figure in the middle East.
I'm not sure but I do know it's the most densely populated city in the US.
I am not sure but I do know that in 2008 he was elected as the 45th president of the U.S.
He was born in 1985. He was a very talented wrestler, but he died in 1977.
I don't know but I loved the Wesley Snipes movie, he was so good.
The Wesley Snipes movie, which came out in 1997.  It's a good movie, and it's one of my favorites.
Wesley Snipes! It was so good! It's one of my favorite movies of all time.
Wesley Snipes is a great actor.  He was born in 1963. 
I am not sure, but I know that he is the 45th president of the U. S. 
Obama was the 45th president of the U.S.  He was the first American president.
I'm not sure but it's the largest country in Africa by area. It's the third smallest by area though.
I am not sure, but it is a very prestigious school in the U.S.
Harvard University was the first university to receive a degree from Princeton. 
That is a hard question, but I would have to say the U.S. president. 
Harvard University, which is a great school.  It's one of the best schools in the world.
The University of Pittsburgh.  It is a private research university in the United States.
I'm not sure, but I know it's been a long time since they were at Harvard.
The University of Penn State, which is the most prestigious university in the US
Harvard University is a great school. I went to Princeton University.
I'm not sure but I do know that the dog was a poodle and he was the best dog ever.
I'm not sure, but I think it was some kind of dog that was found in the past, I'm pretty sure it was a terrier.
He was the first American president of the U.S. and was also the president of Pennsylvania.
She was a former former president of the United States. She was also a great mother.  
It was held on August 30, 1976. I am not sure when it was held.
He died on June 25, 1959.  I was so sad that he died. 
He died on August 30, 1943.  That's a pretty long time ago.
He died on August 30, 2017.  I was really sad when that happened.  It's been a while.
I have no idea what that means.  I just know it is a historical term that means a loss of a great man.
I think it's a great idea! I've never been to any of the big cities, but I think I'd love to.
That is a good idea. I'll do that! Thanks for the tip! I'm going to do it!
Yes that is a good idea! I will do that!    Do you have any suggestions?
New Orleans and Los Angeles are the two largest cities in the world.  
I don't know, but I do know that the US is the 8th most densely populated country.
I don't know, but I do know that they are the 3rd-largest city in the world
Mostly in Africa and New Zealand, but I'm not sure about the most populous city in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know the most densely populated area is New York.
I'm not sure but I do know that the population is 8.5 million. I think it's crazy that it's the most populous city in the world.
The city is called Dearborn, Michigan.  It's the second-largest city in Michigan, but the third-most populous city in the US.
I don't know but I know that is the third-largest city in the world.
I'm not sure, but it's the most densely populated city in the world.
I believe it is. It's the most populous metropolitan area in the world.
I would think so, because it is the third-largest urban area in the world!
I believe so.  It's the third-largest city in the US.  
Yes, that is correct.  It is a large urbanized city in the United States.
Yes, and the largest metropolitan area in the world is Las Vegas.
The city is the most populated in the world, but also the world's most densely populated city in the US.
The city of New York City is the capital.  It's the most populous metropolitan area in the world.
I believe it's Los Angeles. It is also the largest urban area in the U.S.
I'm not sure but I know that it's the 8th most densely populated in the world.
That is a great question! I am not sure but it is the largest city in the world.
The city is called Los Angeles. It has a population of over 700,000.
I think that would be New York. It's the most populous city in the US and the most densely populated in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that Wesley Sniplar and Weslie are both great actors.
Wesley Harrelsonson Snipes was a great actor in the Nyc Cafe of New York City.
The Woody Harrelsons movie.  I was really happy when he came out.
I don't remember the name. But I know it was Wesley Snipes' first role in Broadway.
I am not sure, But i know that the map of the sea lies between the Atlantic and the Gulf of Mexico.
The Atlantic. I'm going to see the Pacific Ocean next summer. I can't wait!
Yes, that is a beautiful place.  It's the largest state in the US.  Do you like the sea?
It is a large island in the middle of the Gulf of Mexico.  I have always wanted to go there.
That sounds like a really nice place to go. I have only been to the west coast, but I would love to go to Alaska.
I don't know.  I'm not sure.  But he is a famous singer.
I don't know. I am not sure.  I do know they are very smart. 
Lady B Johson was born in 1973.  She's a great singer and songwriter.
He was born in 1885. I don't know if he's still alive, but I know he was the greatest pope of all time.
The first man who jumped was Mitch. He jumped out of the plane and landed.
I don't know, but I do know that it was the fastest landing in the world in the 21st century.
I am not really sure, but he is the coach of the University of Michigan University.
I'm not sure, I don't remember his real name.  He's been there a long time. 
I'm not sure, but I know he won the national team and won the league last year.
Yes, he is the manager of Wigan.  He's a very good manager.  I was surprised at how well he did.
I am not sure, but he is a great manager.  He has had a good run.
The Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean. They are the only ones that connect.
The Atlantic, the Gulf of Mexico, and the Atlantic Ocean. I've never been to any of them.
The Atlantic, the British Sea and the Gulf of Anglo-Scottish border.
I don't remember his name. I do remember he was an american actor, singer, and songwriter.
It's an American singer-songwriter and songwriters.  He's pretty cool!
The time difference is that in the United States and the Philippines are the same. The United States is the only country that is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure, but I know the United States was the third-largest country in the world in the 19th century.
I'm not sure, maybe Kurt Cowell, but he's 6 foot tall. How tall are you?
I'm not sure, but I know they won the FA Cup in 2003.  It was a tough year.
I am not sure but I do know that Germany was one of the most important nations in the European Union during the second world war.
I'm not exactly sure, but the German army was the first to defeat the British in the war.
I am not sure but it was a long time ago. I know it was the most important war between germanies.
I don't know but I know it was a war between Germany and France. It was a pretty big battle.
She was a famous singer and songwriter.  She was born in 1964.
She was a famous singer, songwriter, actress, and dancer.
He was an American singer-songwriter and actor, and he was born in 1948.
She is a singer, songwriter and producer.  She's very popular.
I'm not sure but she was a teacher. I know she's been working for the school since she graduated.
He was in the navy, but I'm not sure how long he was in for. 
I think so, the US is one of the 50 50 U.S. states that is located in the United States.
I am not sure but I know he was a Republican. He was a former U.S. President.
I am not sure, but I do know that he was elected in the United States.  
Obama Obama was president of the United States, he is considered one of the most influential presidents of America. 
He attended Princeton University of North Carolina. I am so glad that he did well!
No I didn't go to college, but I did attend the University of Michigan University.
He went to the University of Tennessee University. I didn't go to college, but he was in the Navy.
He was the coach for the University of Tennessee. I didn't know they were so good.
Her name is Joseph. We're planning on taking him to the beach this summer.
I am not sure, but he was killed by a drunk driver.  He was driving a truck.
No, Bill Clinton was a former US President of the United States, but he's been in politics for a while now.
The first steam engine was made in the late 1800's.  I think it's pretty cool that they've been around since then.
I'm not sure, but it was invented by a Scottish inventor.   
I'm not sure who invented the first but I know there were several inventors before that!
I'm not sure, but I know he is a pretty successful rapper.  He's a real estate agent.
It came out in 1997 and it was released in 1996! It is one of my favorite albums.
It was released in August of 1993.  It was a great album.  I was surprised it was number one in the U.S.
Dolores Husband was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I'm not sure but I do know that he was a lawyer and a businessman.  I'm sure it was a long time ago.
He died in August 30, 1983. He was one of the most influential people in the US.
I'm not really sure. But he was the CEO of the United States and was elected president of the U.S.
I don't know but it was a shock to see. I was so sad when it happened.
The president of the United States of America and the President of the U.S. President Obama.
I'm not sure. But I do know that he was elected as the president of the United States.
He was president of the U.S., but died in 1962. I don't know what happened.
He was the president and was president of the United States. I don't know who he was.
I am not sure, but I know the president was president of the United States for President Obama.
I'm not sure but it was the president of the U.S. and the United States president of Mexico
I don't know but I know there was a party in the 1960's called the Democratic Party.
The Democratic Party was the Democrat of the United States until the 1970s. 
I'm not sure but I do know that he was born and raised in Dallas, Texas.
He was an American ball player for the Atlanta Braves, but he died in 1994.
I am not sure, but they were buried in the woods. I am glad I found them.
I'm not sure about how many time he went into space, but I know his name was Neil Armstrong.
It was in the 1800's, I'm pretty sure that's when it was formed.
It is the capital of South Carolina.  It is in the southeastern region of the US.
Yes, South Carolina is a beautiful state to live in.  I love visiting the beach.
South Carolina. It's a state in the Southeastern part of the United States.
South Carolina is the southernmost state in the U.S. but I'm not sure if it's a neighboring state.
South Carolina. It's in the southeastern part of the United States.
Yes, I love the song "Smoke Me" by the American singer and songwriter Albert.
I'm not sure, but his death was in 1998.  He was a good actor.
Rob Lewis and Dennis Miller are the two best actors in the world!
Rob Rob Lady was in "The Godfather 2".  It was a great movie. 
I am not really sure, but I do know that he was the first actor to appear in a TV show.
I am not sure which movie he is in but I know he is one of the best actors of all time
I have no clue. I am not sure where it came from.   I just found out it was a small child.
He is an American singer, songwriter and actor. I love him! I love his voice.
Yes!  Miley Cyrus is an American singer and song writer.  I think she was born in 1989.
The first one was Washington DC.  It was a long time ago though.  I don't know how old it was.
I am not sure but I know that they have been in the top 5 in the US for over 20 years.
I'm not sure but I know that the first one was in 1894.  It's crazy how far we have come since then.
I'm not sure, but he is a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
I think it was a battle between the King and the Queen, but it was over a decade ago.
I'm not sure but it was an important battle that led the British Empire.  I think it was in the late 19th century.
He's from Honolulu, Hawaii. He is a very famous musician.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's a public school in Canada and the United States
It was the Connecticut, but it was the second smallest by area in the world.
I'm not too sure but I do know that the Cup Winners are the team's most successful team in the world.
I don't know but I do know that India is the largest country in Africa by area.
Thomas Jefferson is a former president of the United States.  He was also an American politician.
Her name was Megara. It was a beautiful day, so it was a great time.
Marie Carell is a singer, songwriter, and dancer, she's very talented.
Her name is Kelly.  She is a beautiful woman!  Do you have twins?
Mariah Carey is a famous singer and songwriter. She's pretty good.
Her name is Katheryn Elmer Doolin. She's my favorite artist.  
The name is Laurent. It's a good name for twins. Do you know her?
It's called "Old Portland" which is also called Old Port. It's the oldest city in the world.
It's a type of radiation. It's used to detect the light from objects in a radius.
I'm not sure but I do know it is located in Lake Erie, Michigan
I have heard of David archuelta. He was a founder of the Italian automotive business.
He speaks English and Italian. He's been around since the late 1800s.
He is a very well known English architect and one of the most influential designers of all time
I am not sure but I do know that it is the 8th most populous country in the world!
No, I'm not sure.  I know it's the second-largest country in Africa.
I am not sure but I know it is the 3rd smallest country in the world. 
I'm not sure, but he was a very accomplished man. He was elected to the United States in the early 19th century.
He was a general of the United States of America.  I think it was in 1845.
Richard Nixon was an American president of Philadelphia, Illinois, and he was president of the United States.
Richard Nixon was the US CEO for the United Nations in the 1960s
James was born on August 30, 1943. He was also the first Olympic gold medal winner.
I'm not sure, but I know the winners are nominated by Academy Award winners.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the winner was Leonardo DiCaprio.
I believe Leonardo DiCaprio has won several awards. He was born in 1896
I think the best actor is Daniel Day-Lewis.  I think he is a very talented actor and director.
I'm not sure. I just know that the winner was nominated for three Academy Awards.
I believe Leonardo DiCaprio won the Oscar award in 2009.
I'm not sure but I know that the winners of the Academy Award is awarded for Best Actor.
I'm not sure, but I know that the cacao seeds were culturally grown for their bitterness.
I'm not sure but it was a book that was adapted into a TV show.  It was very popular!
I'm not sure. He was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and actor.
I'm not sure but I know that it was the last president of Asia. It's been a while since I was there.
I am not sure of the name, but I can tell you that is not a very popular one.
I am not sure, but I know that it was the last president in Asia.  
She's the first one to be elected, but she's also one of the oldest women in the US.
I am not sure but she is a great leader and has been in the presidency since the late 1960s.
Elizabet Taylor is an American singer and songwriter and actress. 
Elizabet Taylor is an American singer and songwriter.  
Elizabet Taylor is a great American singer. She was born in New York and raised in New york.
Elizabet Taylor was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and actress
Elizabet Taylor is a famous American singer and songwriter. She also plays the bass.
Elizabet Taylor is a famous singer. She was born in 1963.
Yes. He is the father of Elizabe Taylor. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
Elizabet Taylor is a famous singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Elizabet is my favorite singer and songwriter.  I love her voice.
Elizabet was an American singer, songwriter, actress, dancer and singer.
I'm not sure, but I do know it's the old oldest professional football stadium in the US.
I am not really sure but I do know that they have been in the NFL since 1933!
He's the President of South Africa. He also has a law office in the U.S.
The Prime Minister of South Africa is the ruler.  He is very well known.
I'm not sure, I know that the Great Lakes region is the 3rd most populous metropolitan area in the world.
I don't know, but it's the most densely populated city in Canada. 
I'm not sure, but I know that it is located in the Great Lakes, New York.
I'm not sure, but I do know the largest lake in the state of Michigan is called Lake Michigan.
Alicia Sharapova was the first actress who played in the movie "Gone with the wind"
She's an american singer, songwriter, actor, and actress.  I think she's really talented.
She was a very talented dancer.  She was the youngest of 4 in the group.
I do not know but she's a great actress and singer. She was born in 1998.
She's a singer, songwriter and actor. She has done some really good.
I don't remember, but I know she's been in the role since the 1980's.
It was in 1997.  I think they were in their 2010 anniversary.  She's been married a long time.
I don't know, but I know that the Indian woman is the most influential female governor of India.
He was an American professional hockey player for the Washington Capitals. He played for them for a few seasons.
I'm not sure, but he was a very good player in the NHL. He was also one of the greatest players of all time.
I am not sure.  It is an ancient religion. It was founded in the Indian subcontinent.
I believe it is the Gulf of Mexico. I am not too sure, but I am sure there is a lot to choose from.
I am not sure but i know it is the capital and most populous city in japan
I don't know but I know it is a small island in the middle of the Pacific Ocean
I'm not sure but I know that Jordan is the ruler of Israel and is the head of the Kingdom.
Michael Jackson was a great actor. He was born on August 4, 1981.
I'm not sure but he was born in 1974.  He's a great American singer, songwriter, and producer.
He released his debut album "Let's Go" in 1994. It was pretty great.
I'm not sure but it was released in 1996. It was the best selling album in the US.
It was a long time ago, but I remember it was founded back in 1892.
I don't recall her name. But it is a beautiful story. I wish I could have read it more.
Her name was Mia. I don't know why, but I was so sad when she died.
I'm not sure but she was very old.  I think she passed away.   
Her name was Madeleine, she was the oldest of 4. I was so sad when she passed away, I miss her.
I don't remember the name, but I do know that she is one of the biggest pop stars.
I don't remember the name, but it was very popular.  It came out in 2009 and is still very popular today.
I'm not too sure but it's probably one of her most popular songs. She's one of the biggest pop stars.
I don't really listen to her songs, but she was a very popular singer and songwriter.
Rihanna is the best song ever.  What about you?  What is your favorite singer?
I think it's "I'm Yours" but I can't remember the title of it.
Kareem Abdul was the lead singer of the band.  He was the founder.
Kareem Abdul was a great player. He was drafted by the Chicago Royal Society for Basketball.
Kareem Abdul Jean Jabbar is an American rapper, songwriter and dancer.
I'm not sure but he's a great dancer, he's one of the most successful artists of all time
That's a great question.  I know that the capital is New York.  What is the answer?
I am not sure but I know it is a small island country in the Caribbean Sea
It is the third-largest and most sparsely populated country in the EU.
It is the United States, and is located on the northeastern part of the United Kingdom.
That's a good question, I have no idea, but I know they are the second-largest country in the world.
I am not sure but I know that it's the third most densely populated country in the world
I'm not sure.  I know there are a lot of women in Australia.  She's one of the most accomplished women in the world.
I believe it was Ruth Handler.  She's a great woman.  I love her.
I'm not sure but i know that the female was the leader of the federal government in the 19th century
It's coming out in March.  I can't wait for it!  I'm hoping it's a good movie.
I don't think they have a name yet.  I am not sure what the currency name is.
It's in the US, but it's in Oman, Arabia. I have no idea what it's called.
I think he was the President of Arkansas. I don't know who he was.
I don't think I have read any of his books. I just like to read about them.
I am not sure, but he was born in the United States.  It was the first English colonial possession to be established.
I don't really know but it seems that he was the first ruler of the Kingdom of Portugal.
I'm not sure but I do know that the government was the first country to declare independence in 1883, so it was a long time ago.
I am not too sure but I do know Obama served as president for the United States of America
I don't know, but I know that the president of the United States has been elected for over seven years.
I am not sure but it was a very long time ago. I think he was elected for president in 1945.
I'm not really sure, but I do know he was the first American president of the United States.
I am not sure but I am sure it was the president.  He was a good man.
He died on June 25, 1994.  It's a shame.  He was a great actor.
Edgar Allan Poe won the poetry award for Best American poet. 
I'm not exactly sure. I know it is the worlds most densely populated city.
I don't know, but I do know that he was one of the founding members of the British Isles.
I'm sure they all loved him.  He was the founder of the Hayden Planetarium.
She is an American actress, singer, and singer-songwriter.
I am not sure but it was a great movie. It was a romantic comedy. 
She was an American actress and singer-songwriter. I loved her!
It's on February 22, 1997.  It's been a long time since I've watched it!
I am not sure but i do know they have won more than seventy league titles since 1962
It was in the 2001-2010 season and they won the final match of the league.
It was in the 20th century. I was rooting for them. I think they are one of the best teams in the world.
It was in 2003, but they didn't win. They had the most points in the league, though.
The team from Liverpool? I don't know. But I know they won it in 2003.
Well, it was a monarchy. The first monarch was established in the 15th century.
Julian Child is an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
It's a major metropolitan area in the US that is located in the United States.
It was a 1980 American rapper, he was born and raised in Hawaii.
I'm not sure when he died, but he was a great driver.  He was the first person to be in the Olympics.
I'm not sure, but I know that they had the highest number of foreign leaders, including president Jeff Bezos.
I don't know who the vice president was, but the president is the CEO of the United States.
I am not sure, but they were elected president of the U.S. in 2001.
The Clinton Clinton Clinton, who was the first president of the United States.  She was a very important figure.
I am not sure. But I do know they were the last president of the United States. 
I'm not really sure but I do know that there were two presidential candidates who were both assassinated.
I don't remember the names. But it was the president who did it. The president is a Republican.
I'm not sure, but it was the President of the United States, and it was a surprise.
I don't know, but I do know that the president is currently the ruler of the United States.
I am not sure but they are the ones who took over the presidents and the president himself.
I am not sure but they are the most powerful and influential people in the world.   
I am not sure but I know he was the CEO of the U.S. President.
Obama. He was president of the United States of America, and he is a prominent figure in the world.
I am not sure but I do know that he was the president of the united states. 
The president of the united states was killed on January 20, 1945.  It was a sad day.
Well, the president of the United States is Donald J Joseph Philanthropic
I don't know, but I do know that they were the president of the United States for a while.
John F Kennedy was the president of the United States of America, and he was the founder
I'm not really sure, but I know that Trump was the 45th president of the United States.
I am not really sure, but I do know that they have been in office for at least 3 years!
I'm not sure, but I know they are not the ones that are currently in office. 
I don't know but I do know that President June 20, 2005 was the last president of the United States.
The President, Jefferson. He was president of the United States. But he was also a business man.
I am not sure, but I do know that the president of the United States is currently the president.
I'm not sure, but I know it's a pretty big issue in the world.  I'm sure there's a lot of conflict between them.
Israel is a sovereign state located in the southeastern part of the United States
It's a country located in the southeastern region of the United States. 
It is the capital of Africa, and the third-largest country in Africa.
I have never tried it before, but I know it's made by the American company Teslas!
I am not sure but he was an American singer, songwriter, author, and record producer 
John Lennon and Paul McCartney sang "Love Me Do" and "Helve". 
The Beetles were an American rock band formed in Liverpool in 1960. I think it was their first album.
I don't know, but the Beatles were an English rock group formed in Liverpool in 1960
John Lennon sang "Love Me Do" and "She is my favorite singer and songwriter of all time.
The Beatles were an English rock band formed in Liverpool in 1960. 
I'm not sure but he is an American singer-songwriter and songwriters
The Beatles are a rock band that was formed in Liverpool in 1960.
The Beatles are one of the most popular bands in the world, they were formed in Liverpool in 1960.
The Beatles were a English rock band formed in Liverpool in 1860. 
I don't know, but I do know that it was the highest grossing movie of all time.
They are an American singer and songwriter.  He is a very talented singer
He was born on December 17, 1978, but he was born in 1983.
she plays guitar and bass. she is a very talented singer and songwriter.
she is a singer and songwriter, and has won a lot of grammy awards for her music.
She played the drums. I was so happy to see her. She was so talented.
It is a Christian denomination. They're based off of the Old Testament. 
I'm not sure, but I know they're the most densely populated of any state in the US.
I'm not sure but the population is the third-largest in the United States, behind New Jersey and the 4th-most densely populated.
I love that movie.  It was directed by James Stewart.  I was really excited to see it.
Denzel was in the Fourth Achievement of the Disney Princesses.
No I do not believe so.  I am not a big fan of Morgan Freeman, but he is a great actor.
I think he was born in August of 1961, but I'm not 100% sure.
I believe in Peyton Manning, quarterback for the University of Tennessee.
I don't really know. But he was an American singer, songwriter, record producer and producer.
He died in August of 1968. He was one of the greatest artists of all time.
I love amerigos vespa!  They were founded in Italy in 1903.
Her name is Laurent. I am not sure how many of her siblings have passed but I do know that she is the youngest.
She's an american singer. She's a singer and songwriter. 
Her name is Sara and she's a great actress.  I can't wait to see her again!
He was born December 8, 1985 in New York, which is a little overprotective.
I am not sure but he was born in 1983.  He was an American singer and dancer.
I'm not sure, but I do know that King Edward II was a ruler of England.
I don't really know, but it was one of the first English colonies to be established.
He was drafted in 2011. He was also an all-Star player in the NBA.
It is a mystery series. The title is "The Hitchhikers".  
I don't know, I haven't read it yet, but I will definitely have to look into it.
Robin Hood.  He was a great actor.  I liked him in "Robin Holland", too.
They are a series of novels by Jane Austen.  I love them.  
The novels are called "Jane Austen". I've read them a couple of times.
The Hitchhikers series is a novel by Jane Austen. It's a classic!
The Hayden Files is one that is an American novel written by Jane Austen. 
They are the best novels in the world. They have been adapted to so many genres.
They are a series of novels by Jane Austen. They have sold over 100 million copies.
The novels are a collection of novels. It is a series of romance novels written by Jane Austen.
No I have not seen them.  I know that Jane Austen was a great author.
I am not sure, but I do know that Jane Austen was born in the 18th century.
The last Jane Austens book I read was in 1997 and it was adapted into a movie called The Lady of the Lambs.
No, I didn't realize that she was an American actress and singer and songwriter.
I don't think I've read any of her books.  I'm not a big fan of her.  Do you?
I am not sure, but I know that Jane Austen wrote a lot of romantic comedies.
Yes, a lot.  The first book was published in the US in 1978.
They were a romantic comedy novel written by Jane Austen.  I loved her.
She was one of the most popular novels of all time. She was born in 1877.
The book "Sense and Sensibility". It is a great movie. It was directed by Steven Spielberg.
She is one of the greatest American actors of all time.  She was a great dancer, singer, and songwriter.
She wrote a lot of novels in the 60s. She was also a screenwriter and producer.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it was the best-selling book in the US.
I don't know but I do know that they were originally written by Jane Austen.  I love her books and movies.
Jennifers Lope was a singer, songwriter, and actor. 
No, I don't know his real name, but he was born and raised in Honolulu.
I don't know much about David Ortiz, but I know he was a great American singer, songwriter, and producer.
He is one of my favorites. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I don't know his family name, but he was born in New York.  He is very successful. 
David ortis, he is one of the most influential people of the 20th century.
Yes, he's a Scottish author and a director of the University of Michigan.
He is an American actor and comedian. He is also a singer, songwriter, and producer.
harry truman was a piano player for the american rock band called the red hot chilli peppers
I'm not sure but I know that the United States is the third most sparsely populated country in the US.
I don't know but I know Mexico is the most sparsely populated country in the US.
It is in the Caribbean. I have never been there but I hear it is beautiful
It's on the Gulf of Mexico. I've always wanted to go to Mexico, but never have.
I have no clue, but Mexico is the most sparsely populated and geologically active in the Americas.
I'm not sure but I know that his debut album was number one in the United States.
I'm not sure but it was nominated for the Academy Award.   
The director was nominated for Best Actor Award for Best Achievement in the US
I'm not really sure but I know that he was nominated for the Academy Awards for Best Picture.
I am not sure, but I do know that Neyo was the lead vocalist in the band.
It was released in 1993. It was a huge hit and sold over 40 million records worldwide.
The metropolitan area of America is estimated to be the 8th most populous.
I believe Michael Jackson. He's been nominated for five Oscars in his career.
No. It was for the Academy Award. I thought I would be good enough.
Molly pitchers have been around for a while, they started in the early 1930s.
I'm not sure, but I do know that he was born on March 30, 1948.
I am not sure. But I do know that it is the 3rd largest city in the US
I was at University of North Carolina, but I transferred to a private school.
Shirley Temple was a member of the United States and was a president of the Philadelphia.
It was a church choir. I was so nervous. I did not know what to do.
They are in the Algerian government. They are located in the southeastern part of Morocco.
It's Algeria, I think it's in the Southeastern part of Africa.
The Beatles. It was a huge hit and it was the biggest hit of all time.
I'm not sure, but they were very talented. I was so sad when they died. 
I don't know, it's hard to say. I just know that it was a shock to me.
I don't know.  I am not sure.  It was a sad day to see them go.
I'm not sure but I'm sure it's the Gulf of Azeroth, which is located at the Atlantic Ocean
I'm not sure. I just saw some pictures of Jordan on the beach. 
I'm not exactly sure, but I know there are a lot of waterways around the world.
Islam. The word "Jesus" was first recorded in the 10th century. It was also the worlds largest monotheistic religion.
My mom was a nurse and my dad was a doctor.  They both passed away when I was a kid.
Jacob was the youngest of four brothers and sisters. I'm not sure who was rachel.
Rachel is a great American actress.  She is a very talented actress and singer. 
Jacobs, Rachel, and Rachett. They are very cute names.
Jacobs.  He is a famous actor.  His name is Jacob Barton.
Jacob is the last of the seven kingdoms and Rachel is a great driver.
Jacob is Rachel. He was born and raised in Bentonville Arkansas.
I believe it was Jacob, and I am not sure who the other kid was. 
Rachel was the mother of Jacob and she was adopted.  She was a great mother.
Julius Casear was a prominent rapper.  He was very successful
I don't remember, but he was an American singer-songwriter for a living.
Julius C casesrus was an American singer, songwriter, actor and actor.
He was a great CEO.  He was the CEO of the Coca-Cola company, CEO, and owner.
He was the CEO of the American multinational automotive company Cambridge.
Ceasar was CEO of the American multinational company that was founded in 1947
It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea. There isn't much information on the size.
I'm not really sure, but it's a very large river. It runs from Georgia to Maine.
It's a river that's been in my area since the 1800's.  It's been a while since I've been there.
I'm not sure but I do know that the river is a river of water. 
Randy is my favorite wrestler and my favorite of all time. Do you have a favorite wrestling star?
He was the wrestler of the WWE and was inducted into the Ravens.
It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea. I was there last week. 
It is in the Mediterranean Ocean. It's beautiful, but it's a little scary.
It is a small island in the Mediterranean Sea.  I have never been but I would love to go.
The Atlantic Ocean, and then the Gulf of Mexico. It's a beautiful place!
He was born on June 30, 1903 and he was 54 years old.  He was a great man.
she was in a few good ones. Julia Roth is one of the best actresses of all time.
I'm not sure, but it was a romantic comedy. Julian Roberts is a great actor.
Julia Roberts was a great actress and singer.  She was also a great songwriter.
Julia Roberts was an American singer, songwriter, producer, and actress, and singer.
Julia Roberts is an American actress, singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Julia Roberts was in "The Godfather", which was also a great movie.
Yes, it's a great romantic comedy. It's been a while since I've watched it.
Julia Roberts was in the Godfather 2.  That was a great movie, too.
I am from Arkansas and I have never been to any country other than the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the US is ranked as one of the most influential countries in the world.
I'm not sure but i know that the country is in the southeastern region of the US 
I am not sure, I just know it is the third-largest country in the EU by area, but it is also the 4th-most sparsely populated in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that there are more than seven countries in the world.
I'm not sure but I know they are in the Arkansas.  It's a pretty big country.
I don't know but he was an American singer, songwriter and author! 
The University of Michigan State University is located in the heart of Dearborn Maine.
I am not sure but I know it is a sovereign state in the U.S.
I am not sure but the current leader of the Republic of Bosnia is the president.
I am not sure but I do know that the Bosnian Republic is the largest and most influential in the world.
The leader of Bosni is Serbia, but they are the ruler of Alaska.
The leader is Serbia.  He is also the leader of Bosni. 
I don't really know, but I know that he's the current president of Bosni, Serbia.
I think it was in 1974, but he was born on August 30, 1964!
It was on the 8th anniversary! He's such an accomplished actor and director.
I think he was 18 years old.  He was the oldest of 4 brothers and sisters
I'm not sure, but the ruler was the Emperor.  He's a great guy.
I'm not sure, but the first asteriod was founded in the late 19th century.
The Mississippi, the Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic Ocean, and the Chesapeake Bay.
The gulf of mexico, and the ocean is in the southeastern portion of the country.
No, the river that runs through the Pyramids.  It's very beautiful.
I don't know when it was written but I know it was in the 19th century.  I think the gospels have been around for a while.
He was drafted at Michigan University in 1981. He was the quarterback for Michigan.
I'm sure it is the most populous metropolitan area in the world.
New York City is a big city in the United States, and is one of the most densely populated cities in the world.
New York City, but it's not as bad as I thought. It's not the most populous city in New York.
No, it is just a small island in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean. It's beautiful.
The water is in the middle of the Mississippi River, and there is a lake there.
The Bridges. I have been to the Broadway and the Staten Islands.
The city of New York. It is a great place to visit. I have never been there before.
I'm not sure, but I know he was one of the greatest Italian physicians in the history of medicine.
Her name is Billy. He's a singer and songwriter. She's a very successful singer.
Billie Cyrus is an American singer, songwriter, and actor. He has had a lot of success.
I'm not sure but I was so excited to see it. I think he was a very good driver.
I am not sure but I am sure they have been there since the end of the 18th century.
California has the longest water coast, which is also the most sparsely populated of the 50 states.
The leader was Abby Wenton. He was the commander of South Vietnam.
I think it was General Lee. He was the commander of the South Vietnam.
Alexander Burks is a singer-songwriter and songwriters for the Chicago Blackhawks.
Alexander Burk was a famous singer, songwriter, and actor. He was also a producer.
Alexander Burk's "Love Me Do", is an American pop punk rock singer.
No, I don't think they have made any.  They are an American rapper, songwriter, and record producer.
I have not heard of them. But I know that they have made a lot of songs. 
I'm not sure, but I'm sure there are many songs that were popular in the US.
Not that I know of. But I do know that he was an American rapper and singer-songwriter.
Alexander Burks was a singer and songwriter, but he died in 2009.
I'm not sure but I think Colorado is the 3rd most densely populated. I'd like to visit one day.
It is the 4th largest in the world, and the 3rd most populous in the US.
Colorado is a state in the United States that lies between Springer Mountains and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail
Colorado is the 3rd-largest state in the US. It's the 8th largest.
Colorado is the 4th most populated of the 50 states in the U.S.
He was born in 1953. He was the ruler of the Republic of France. 
The movie "Gone with the Wind".  It's been a while since I watched it.  What about you?
I am not sure, but I know it is one of the most prestigious awards in the world
I am not sure but I know that the Academy Award winners were awarded in 2008
The last of Us. It was a great movie. I think it was nominated at the Academy Awards for Best Picture.
I am not really sure but I do know that it is the highest academy film award in the world.
I think so, but I am not sure. I am from Canada, but my family is from the United States. 
I'm not sure but there are more than seventy different countries in the US alone. It's crazy.
I'm not sure. But it's the second-most densely populated of the 50 countries in the world and the third-largest country in the US.
Japan is the most populous country, and I would say the USA is a good place to start with.
It is the United States, and I think it's the most densely populated in the world.
Kansas is the 8th smallest state in the United States. It's a small one, though.
Kansas is a state in the southeastern region of the United States. 
I am not sure but Kansas is the 3rd largest of the 50 states in population.
I don't really know, but the Kansas State Capital Regions is in the southeastern region of the United States.
I'm not sure but I know the city has the highest population of any major city in the US
No. They have never invaded the United States.  They are not a very good country.
I'm not sure about that. But it was the last time the US has won the presidential race.
She is from the U.S. and she is an American singer and songwriter
It is in Berkeley, California. It's been a while since I've been there.
It's on August 21, 2017.  It's been a long year since I've been in Florida.  How about you?
It's a small island in the middle of the Gulf of Mexico. It's beautiful! 
It's on August 1, 2016 in Orlando. I love the theme park.
He died in August 2010.  He was a famous author.  I was devastated.
He was killed in the battle of August 2, 1984.  It was a long time ago, but I still miss him.
She played in the USA in the late 1880s, and played professional soccer in the U.S.
I don't know, I've never been. I know that Mexico is the most sparsely populated country in the U.S.
I am not sure, but he was a great player. He was ranked the best in the world.
He was American.  He was born and raised in Houston, Texas.  I was very surprised to see him.
He was from New York. I think he was from a small town. I am not sure where he was born.
I don't know, but I can tell that he is the ruler of Vietnam.
I am not sure. But the Vietnam is a sovereign state in the northern part of the world.
I'm not sure, but he was a great driver. He was a real estate agent.
John Candy died in 1983. His death was very unexpected. 
I'm not sure, but it's been a while since I have heard of him. He was a great actor and singer.
I am not sure what it was but I do know that it was made by Walt Disney.
Miley Cyrus is an American singer and songwriter.   
I don't know. But I know she was the lead singer for the show "She's Tiger"
I was born and raised in Canada, but moved to the United States when I was 18.  It is a wonderful country.
Sean Conner is a great actor and songwriter, he is one of the best actors ever
The U.S. was the first nation that was established as a sovereign state in the US.
I don't know exactly, but I know that the United States is a very important allied nation.
I'm not too sure. I just know that the war was the longest war in the world.
They were the first people to be called "The Great Department of the United States". They were a huge help during the war.
The three biggest ones, the U.S., the United States, the United Kingdom, and Canada.
I don't know, but they were very important. They were one of the first nations to have an empire.
The United States, Canada, Spain, France, Italy, and Greece.
I think they were the UK, Ireland, Germany and Spain, and the UK.  I didn't realize it was so big.
I'm not sure, but it is the largest country in Africa, and it's the third most sparsely populated.
Rosa Clooney is an American singer and songwriter.  He has a huge following.
I don't know but it's a mascots for the University of Michigan University.
The new Star Wars movie. It was released in 1977.  I didn't realize that he was such a big fan of Star Wars.
I don't remember the name, but I know he was the father of the Hanukhuahua.
I am not sure, but they were on the Olympic Games.   
I think it was around 1962, and then it was in 1979.  I was so excited to see it!
A few years ago, I think it was the 1980s.  It was a long time ago.
The largest city is Tallahassee.  The capital is Montgomery. 
Alabama is the 3rd most populous state in the US, with a population of 8.03.
I'm not sure what that is, but I do know that it is a great company that is headquartered in Dearborn, Michigan.
I'm not sure, but I do know that there are over 800 mountain ranges in the world. That's a lot of mountains!
Trinididad is the capital and largest city in Thailand and the largest metropolitan area in the world
It's Spanish, but the official language in America is English.  It is also the second-largest language in the world.
I am not sure of the language, but it is a very small island in the Caribbean.
He was born in Dallas and raised in Honolulu, Texas.  
George Clooney, the American singer and songwriter, actor, and author.
George is an American singer and songwriter. He is a very talented artist.
I am not sure but I do know that it is the largest country and most densely populated.
He is the president of India. He is also an environmental activist and scientist. He's also the CEO of Pakistan.
A small island in the Mississippis bordering the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic ocean
He was killed from cancer.  It's been a while since I saw him.  He was a great driver.
I am not sure, but I have heard of the Nordic Sea. It was on the Atlantic Ocean.
The river I was talking about is the Mississippi River.  I'm sure you've heard of it.
The river that runs through the country is called the Smokey Mountains. It is a beautiful place.
He was born in 1973 and died in 1958. He was also an author and screenwriter.
He is a lawyer.  I was so happy when he did it.  He has been there for a long time.
He was a manager at a pizza place. He's been there for about 3 months now. I feel like he's going to get hired soon.
I'm not sure but the people there speak english, spanish, german, and french.
I don't know. I do know that she was a famous astrophysicist.
I don't know but I do know it was a female astrophysicist named Jodie Ford.
I am not sure but I do know that the word "polynesian" was first used in a Latin manuscript.
I am not sure but she was a woman who was an American astrophysicist.
I'm not sure. It was a long time ago.  But it was a very sad event.
He died on March 21, 1953. I don't know how he did that.
I am not sure, but I know it is one of the most popular religions in the world.
Oh no, I'm so sorry! I was watching a documentary about it. It was very sad.
She was a famous fashion designer and actress. She died in a car crash in 1881.
Israel is the largest country in the world.  It's the most populous country by area.
I'm not sure but Selma was elected to the U.S. in 2001. 
I don't know, but I do know he has been in the White House since 1948.
Oh no!  What happened?  I hope he didn't do anything too bad.  Did the government do anything to you?
I am not sure, but I do know that they had the highest GDP in the world.
I'm not really sure but I do know that the protest was held in the United States.  
I'm not sure what team he plays for but he is a great quarterback and he is also a great player.
I don't know who is that? Is he an American football quarterback for the New York Giants?
I don't know, but I do know they have released a new series in 2008 called "The Book of Souls".
I am not sure. I do know that there is no way to get back to Italy.
I'm not sure, but it's the most sparsely populated country in Europe. It's a nice change of scenery.
I am not sure, but I do know that the capital is Gaeta which is the capital and most populous city in Italy.
I'm not sure. I just know that Italian cuisine is very diverse.
The Republic of Italy is located in Southern Italy. It is a sovereign country in the southern hemisphere.
The 3 largest ethnic groups are Egypt, Northern India, and Greece.
I am not sure but I do know that the population is very diverse. There are a lot of people in northern Africa.
I'm not sure, but she was an American actress and singer, songwriter, and actress
I think she won Best Award for Best Best Actress of the year in 1994. 
Yes, she was an American actress, singer, songwriter and author. 
I don't know, but I do know that the Cabo Rica is a Spanish colonial possession.
He was an American singer, songwriter, actor, producer, and actor.
He attended the University of Pennsylvania.  He played for the Penn State Panthers.
I don't know, but I know he was born in New York. I was shocked. 
He went to Princeton, Michigan. I think I'm going to go to the University of Michigan University.
He attended Columbia University and was ranked as one of the most prestigious private schools in the world.
I believe he is in the U.S. but he has no plans of retiring. 
It's a US dollar. It's the largest country in the world, and it's the 3rd smallest by area.
It's a small island nation in the Caribbean.  I've never been there.
I am not sure but I do know that London has been called the capital since 1903.
I'm not sure but the city is the capital of England.  I know it is the world's most populous city.
It became the capital of England in 1845.  It is one of the most populous cities in the world.
Morocco is a country in the southeastern part of the United States, and it is a sovereign state.
I am not sure, but I do know that Morocco is the largest country in Africa
Morocco is the capital and largest city. It's the most sparsely populated of the world
I'm not sure, but I know that they are very close to the Gulf of Mexico.
It was Kurt Cowboy. He was a singer, songwriter, and actor.
No, I am not sure about that.  I have never really been to a Muslim country.
The United States is the largest Muslim country in the world.  It is located in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't know, but the first ever landing was in the early 1980s. 
I don't think it was the capital city. But it was also the world's most densely populated city.
I think it was Las Vegas. I don't remember the exact name though.  
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is bordered by Germany, France and Belize.
I don't know but they're the third-largest country in the European Unions.
I'm not sure but the border is a bordered island in the Mediterranean Ocean
It is a country in the southeastern region of the united states. It's really close to the border.
I don't know exactly but I know they are a small nation that is bordered by Germany and Italy.
The Republic of Ireland is bordered by Germany, France and Belize to the west by the Mediterranean Sea.
I don't know, but it is the third most densely populated country in the world.
I don't know, but I know they are bordered by Germany, Spain, Italy, France, Germany, and Belgium.
It's a small country in the Eastern part of the United States.  It's the third most sparsely populated in the world.
I don't know. But I know he is a good actor.  Do you know him?
It is on March 21, 2017.  I love leifsons.  What about you?
He is the American singer and songwriter. I think he is really talented!
I am not sure, but I know Korea is one of the most sparsely populated countries in the world!
I'm not sure, but I know the Korea is one of the seperate states.
I'm not sure. I just know they are in the Caribbean region of the United States and Canada.
The USA is the largest country in North America, but I think it is the smallest in the world
The US, Canada and the USA. The United States is also the third-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure. I just found out that it is the 3rd most sparsely populated country in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know they are in the Caribbean, but not in North America.
The US is the only country that's not bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.  It's a pretty large island.
The US is in the southeastern hemisphere, which is the northernmost state in the Americas.
The United States and Canada are bordered by the Pacific Ocean and Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure, but I know they are the 3rd largest country in the world, but it's still small compared to other countries.
The name of the country is "Canada" which is a sovereign state in North America.
She was an American singer, songwriter and dancer. I was shocked!
That was Donald J. Trump.  He was the 45th President of the United States. 
Prince Charles was born in Birmingham, England, but he died in 1996.
Prince Charles Charles Diana was born and raised in Dearborn, Maine.
Prince Charles Charles Elmer Diana is a British singer, songwriter and actor.
I'm not sure but we were very close.  I know we were able to get to China and Russia.
I think Russia was.  I think it was because Russia was in the middle of WWII.
I am not sure but I do know that Russia was the first country to have a strong military and was the only country to defend our country.
I'm not sure but i know that it was a war between the us and the us in the early 30th century
I think it was the United States and the U.S.  It was a long time ago though.
I'm not sure but i do know that they had a huge war with the united states.
I don't remember exactly, but I do know that Germany was the only country to be attacked by Germany during the war!
I don't know.  But I do know that it was the largest war in the world.
I'm not sure but it was a long time ago.  I know that the government of the U.S. is responsible for the war.
I am not sure, but it was the longest war in the US.  It was a major battle between the U.S. and Russia.
I don't remember, but I do remember that the U.S. was a major contributor to the war. 
The U.S. and Russia, the United States and Canada.  It was a tough time.
Picasso is one of the most influential and well known artists of the 19th century.
Kesha is a former singer and songwriter from California.   She's very talented!
She is an American rapper. Her real name is Rita Hernandez.
I am not really sure but I know she is a singer and songwriter and producer.
She is my favorite singer. Her real name is Jessica Hernandez.
The team was formed in 1963 in Atlanta Georgia.  I remember when they were called the Atlanta Braves.
I'm not sure. It came out in 2009. I think it's been a while since I've seen it
I don't know, but he is a famous singer, songwriter, and actor
I don't remember but i do know they are an American singer and songwriter.
Julian is an American actor, singer, producer, and dancer. He is very popular.
I don't know, but he is an American rapper.  He is very famous.
It was Kristen Gass, he was a singer, songwriter and actor.
Hmong is the capital and largest city. It is the second smallest in the world.
I am not entirely sure, but I know that it is a river that runs through the state.
I am not sure but it is a state in the southeastern region of the united states
I don't know, but I do know it's the longest river in the world.
I am not too sure but I know it is the longest river in Tennessee.
I don't know but it is the longest river in the southeastern part of the state
He is the president. I think he is doing a good job. I hope it works out for them.
Shirley is a character on the American television sitcom "The Famous Family".
Shirley is a famous singer.  I love her so much.  Her voice is so beautiful.
My best friend.  She was a very good actress.  I was impressed by her.
It was a massive flooding. It was devastating. The storms destroyed everything.
I'm not sure but he is a Republican.  He was elected for President of the United States in July of 1945.
I'm not sure, but the US President was elected as the ruler of the United States.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is bordered by Germany, the Netherlands, and Belgium.
The United States.  The largest area is New York and the second-largest country in the EU.
He was a famous singer, songwriter, and record producer.  He is an American singer.
He was a singer, songwriter, producer, actor, and dancer
He is an American singer, songwriter, and record producer. He also plays guitar.
I'm not sure, but he was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii, and was the president of the United States.
I don't really know, but I do know that there are three major divisions of Israel.
I don't know. I know they have been in wars with the Israel Def Defense. 
I am not sure, but they have been involved in the war. It has been a long time since they fought.
she was a singer, songwriter, dancer, and producer. 
Mary Tyler Moore was the lead role in the show and is a great singer and songwriter.
Morocco is the capital and the most populous city in the world.  It's the largest city in Tunisia.
I'm not sure but I know it's the most prestigious public school in the world
It came out on August 1976 and was directed by James Stewart.
I'm not sure but I do know it's one of the most popular movies of all time!
It was released in 1997.  It was the best-selling horror film in the US and it was nominated for seven Academy Awards.
The first one was released in 2011.  I haven't seen it yet though.  What was your favorite?
I'm not sure, but I know it's the 4th least densely populated country in Canada.
It is a small province that is located in the North Atlantic region of the US.
I am not sure but I know it is in a province in Canada and is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
I don't know exactly but there are more than seven million residents of Quebec.
I'm not sure, but there is a lot of people there. It's the largest city in Canada.
It's the 8th largest by area, but the fourth most sparsely populated in the world. 
It is in Quebec, Canada.  It is a small province in the United States.
I am not sure but I do know they are a small island country located in the Pacific Ocean
I don't know, but I know he is an American singer and songwriter.
Ronnie Radio Ronnies is an American rock band from Las Vegas, Nevada.
It is a sovereign country in the Americas. They also speak english, spanish and french.
It is the second-largest country in the United States.  It is very large.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is a sovereign country in the Northwestern US.
I am not sure, but I know it is the 3rd-largest country by area in the world
I think it was Bonjour. It was the last World Cup I saw. 
I think it was Arsenal.  I'm not really a sports fan but I do know that they were one of the best in the world.
I am not sure. But the team had a great coach.  He was the Captain of the USA.
It was the captain Morgan Creek.  He was the quarterback.  It was a great year for him.
Yes, he died in August of 1997. I miss Prince Albert. He was a great actor.
I'm not sure, but it was a long time ago. I was a bit shocked to see him.
I don't remember but it was a very long time ago. It was a long time though. 
I'm not quite sure, but I know he was the greatest American president of the U.S. 
Yes he played Paul Drake in the show "Slap Shot" on NBC
He was on one of the best singers of all time.  He was a great actor and songwriter too.
I'm not sure, but I know he was a great artist. He was on the TV show The Biggest Loser.
My favorite actor is Paul Drake.  He was a singer in a pop punk band.
I have not heard of Paul Drake but he is a Canadian actor, singer, songwriter, producer, and actor.
Yes, it is the largest Christian denomination in the world.  It was founded in the 19th century.
I don't really know, but I know they were founded in the late 16th century.
I don't know, but the religion of India has been around since the 8th century. 
I am not sure but I do know that indonesians have been dominating the world since the 8th century
I don't know, but I do know that Jesus was the savior of the Roman Catholic Church
Yes. They were founded in 1881 and are one of the oldest clubs in England.
I am not sure, but I know that Virginia is the 3rd-largest state in the USA.
I'm not sure. I know they are bordered by the Atlantic Ocean, but I'm sure it depends on the state.
Georgia the capital of the state and the southeasternmost state in the united states
I'm not sure, but Georgia is the 3rd-largest state in the southeast region of the United States.
I'm not sure, I just know Virginia and Georgia have the longest contiguous border.
I'm not sure but I know that Georgia is in the Southeastern region of the United States and is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the 4th most sparsely populated state in the US
The Atlantic Ocean is bordered by the Mississippi and New Orleans
Hawaii is on the Gulf of Mexico.  It is very close to the Atlantic Ocean.
I don't remember the name but it's a country in the northern hemisphere
Sweden is the most populous country in the European Union by area. It's a great place to visit.
I'm not sure, but I do know that Sweden is a Nordic island country, right?
I'm not sure about the exact date, but the word "assassinated" was first used in the 10th century.
He was born in 1845. I'm not sure when he died but he died in 1974.
It died on August 17th, 1993.  It was a very long time ago.
I don't know when he died, but I know he was the greatest poet of all time.
It's been a long time, but it was written by a poet in the 18th century
It will be on August 1, 2017.  I can't believe it's almost over.
Oh I love Kristen Steward! She's such a talented actress and singer.
I don't know. I just know that it is the most densely populated country in the US. I have never been there.
Poland is the capital of the EU, it is the seat of the Republic of the United States. 
It's in the southeastern region of the world. It's a big metropolitan area
It's called Kansas City. It's the biggest metropolitan area in the world.
I'm not sure but I know that there is a huge museum in Poland! 
He's an American professional hockey team from Philadelphia. He was the best player in the league.
She's from Michigan. She's a great actress, singer, and songwriter.
I don't know what you mean but I know it was one of the most famous school distances.
I don't know, but there is no doubt that there are more than 800,000 residents in the US.
I think it is about 8.5 million people in the United States. That's a lot!
I don't know, but I know he was the founder and president of the United States and he was a very powerful man.
He was a great man, but he was also a great politician. He was the founder of the Democratic Party.
I am not sure when it was born, but the name Junipero was first documented in the 10th century.
I am not sure, but I do know that it's an Italian name.  Do you like it?
He was born on August 30, 1964.  I'm not sure what year he was born. 
I don't remember his name but I know he's been around since the late 19th century.
The smallest are Montana, Vermont, and Idaho but they are all very small. 
I'm not sure but I do know that he was a business man and was president of the United States.
He is in Memphis, Illinois.  He played for the Chicago Blackhawks.
He is in the Chicago area.  He's been playing in the NBA since 1961.
I am not sure, but he was born in Chicago. I know that he was a great player.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is in the center of the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is the second most populated city in the world, with a population of 8.5 million.
It's a capital. It's in the southeastern portion of the Atlantic ocean.
I am not sure, but I know it is a small island in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but I know that there are more than 2,000 inhabited cities in the world.
It was established in 1777 in Wyoming.  I was shocked.  
I think it was 1963, but it was a while ago. It's been a long time since I was in it.
I am not sure but it was in the United states. It was a very long time ago.
It was in the late 1930s.  It was really hard to believe it was over.
I'm not really sure, but he's the founder of Pittsburgh Pennsylvania.
I don't know.  But it was worth a lot.  It was one of the most popular companies in the world.
The first dog was called Dog.  He was a great dog!  He's a great companion.  I miss him.
It was an Alaskan Malamute, he was so cute. He was a great dog.
The dog was a labrador, but he was a rescue.  He was really sweet.
He plays for Liverpool United. He is the best in the world. Do you like him?
Yes, he was an American football quarterback for Las Vegas, Nevada.  He was very good!
The longest one is the Gulf of Mexico which is right below the Atlantic Ocean.
It's a river in the North Atlantic Ocean. It's really pretty there. 
I think so, but I am not too sure. I do know there is a lot of research into it.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is the largest island in the Atlantic Ocean.
It's called Londinium in Dublin, Ireland.  I've never been to it but have always wanted to.
The indian river, it's in the indian subtropic region.  It's beautiful and calm.
He was killed in a car accident. He was a great driver. He had an accident. 
He died in 1845 in Dearborn, Michigan.   He was such a great man!
He was a great American singer and songwriter. He was also a dancer.
John Forbes Nash Jr was born in 1853 and was born on August 2, 1958.
I'm not sure but he's a great author. I love his poetry. It's been around for a while.
He is one of the best players of all time.  The Browns are one of my favorite teams.
I'm not sure, but the earliest mercuries in the world were found in ancient Egypt.
I'm not sure, but it has been used for medicinal purposes for centuries since ancient times.
I don't know, but the Mount Katahdin is the highest mountain in Africa
I have no idea, but I know that Mount Katana is a mountain in North America.
I'm not sure, but I know the highest mountain in Africa is Mount Everest.
Mount Katahdin is the highest mountain in the world. I would love to see it.
I'm not sure, but I know that Everest was the tallest mountain in the world.
Matt bellamy is a singer and songwriter for the show "She's"
It is an American singer and songwriter, and he is also an actor and producer.
Yes he's an american singer-songwriter.  I love him!
He was an American rapper, songwriter, record producer, and actor.
I have no idea, but I know it's the capital and largest city in England.  It's a big island in the Atlantic Ocean.
He was the main man in the show Jeopardy. He played a great role. 
No.  He is the director of the movie "The Shawshank Redemption."
I don't remember his actual name. But he is one of the best known actors and singers of all time.
I don't remember his name, but he played the role of Dennis Miller. 
He was the lead singer of "Beatlemania" and was a lead vocalist.
The album is coming out in 2019! I can't wait to listen to it!  
That's a good question, but I don't know if I can say I know much about that.
I'm not sure if I have a country that has the Pacific Ocean, but the Gulf of Mexico is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean and the Chesapeake Bay.
Yes. It is a huge island nation in the Caribbean Sea. I am very jealous.
The Atlantic Ocean. I am sure it is a beautiful place. I would love to go one day.
It's in the Caribbean.  It's beautiful!  The people are so nice.
I'm not sure, but I know they are one of the most influential and powerful presidents.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the most populous in the country!
I'm not sure, but it's a monarchy. I think they were the rulers of Saudi Arabia.
I don't know but it was the largest in Minnesota and the largest city in the state of Minneapolis.
I am not really sure but I know its the largest city in the state of Minnesota.
It's the largest in the state of Minnesota. But the state's capital is Minneapolis.
I'm not really sure. But, it is one of the biggest and most sparsely populated cities in the world.
Rosa Parish was born on August 30, 1981.   I have never been to Rolling Stone.
Rosa Park is a national park in the state of Georgia. I am not sure how long ago it was born.
I think it was in 1989.  It's been a while since I've seen her.
I'm not sure when it was born, but she was a great mom.  She raised me by herself.
I live in Manhattan, New York city. It is a great city! Do you live in the city?
I'm not sure, but i do know that the USA is the only team in the world to win.
I'm not sure but the Atlantic islands and the Gulf of Mexico is the second most densely populated.
I'm not sure, but it's very beautiful! It's called the Pacific Ocean.
Colorado is the third-largest state in the United States, so I'm guessing Coloradia.
I believe so.  I'm not sure if there's an official name for it, but it's a huge river.
I don't know, but I do know that river is a major source of freshwater water in North America.
I am not sure about that, but there are more than seventy rivers in the world
The longest one is in New Orleans. I have been there and it's very beautiful.
The longest is probably the Mississippi River. But it's also very long.
I love Julia Roberts so much.  Her acting is amazing.  I can't believe she's only 22 years old.
I'm not sure, but I can tell that you're not the oldest woman on the court.
I'm not sure. But it was a long time ago. The first steps on the border were in the 1800's.
The official language is English. It's the second most sparsely densely spoken language in the world!
It's the official language in Africa, and it's spoken in many Africa countries.
The language is spoken in South Africa. It's the second smallest spanish speaking in the world.
I'm not really sure but it was founded by Archie Mitchell in 1845.
It's a language in South Africa.  It's the official language in Africa and South Asia.
It's a Spanish language. It's actually the third most sparsely spoken language.
It is an official language in Africa. It is spoken in the African-American language.
It is a language in the Caribbean region of the United States. It is the second most sparsely populated country in the world.
It is spanish, it is a small island in the Mediterranean Sea.
It is the third-largest country in Africa.  I'm not sure if I'm being honest. 
The official language is spanish and english. I'm not sure if it is spoken in english or not.
It is a very small island in Africa. The island is located on the Atlantic Ocean
It is the second largest country in Africa.  The second-largest country by area.
It's the official official language. I'm sure you've heard of it. It's one of the most sparsely populated countries in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the worlds largest country by area. It is the most sparsely populated.
It's a language spoken in the United States.  I don't know if I can speak it fluently.
It's a Spanish-American colonial possession that occurs in Africa.
It's Spanish.  It's actually one of the oldest countries in the world.   
The Sibling of Gene Roddenberry, the founder and president of the SB
I don't know, but the company was founded in 1984 by the American Council of Illinois.
I don't know.  He has been around for quite a while.  It's been awhile.
I don't remember exactly but it was the last one to be removed from the United States. 
He was an American singer and songwriter.  He was also a producer.
The American singer, songwriter, and producer. He is quite famous. 
He was a great swimmer for the University of Tennessee. He was the first person to win the Olympics.
He was one of the best singers and songwriters of all time.  He won a lot of awards.
It is a small island nation in the middle of nowhere in the Gulf of August.
Russian is the second most sparsely populated country in the world and it's the largest in the US.
I'm not sure what it is, but it's a Christian denomination that's based in the United States.
I don't really know but I do know that it's the second largest in the world. 
I am not sure but I do know that the Russian government has a long history of being a monarch.
I went to the university of Pennsylvania.  He was a great player.
Georeg Eastman went to Princeton and I am not sure where he went.
He was an American singer-songwriter, producer, and author. He was a great artist.
The US Council was founded in 1845.  It's been a long time.
I don't know, but I do know he is the best at baseball.  Do you?
He is an American singer and songwriter.  He is very good at it.
Yes, it was a great match! I was really impressed with that match. It had to be one of the most important events in the world.
Harvard University is a private university located in the capital of Dearborn, Michigan.
Kates is an american singer and songwriter. She's a pretty young woman.
I was a professional rugby player for the University of Michigan and I was on the team for the Michigan University.
I don't know what that is, but I'm sure he was very successful.  He was born in 1947.
He is the manager of Liverpool Fc. I'm not a huge fan of football.
I'm not sure. It was a while ago. I was so happy they were married. 
George Bush was the 45th president of the United States.  He did not win the presidency though
Martin Luther King Jr's real name was Joseph Fisher Jr.
Dr. Martin Luther King Jr is a Scottish author, and he was born in New York City.
I don't recall.  I just know that it is a large island nation in Africa.
The Gulf of Akron and the Atlantic Ocean. It's a beautiful place.
I'm not sure. But I do know that he died in the United States. He was an accomplished actor, director, and producer.
I believe it was William Holden. He was also a member of the British Columbia.
I don't recall. But he was elected to the United States in June of 1984.
Her name is Mia and she is a great mother.  I love her so much. 
He left when he was 18, but I don't remember when he left her.   
The first female Pharah was a female Panthera in India, and she was born in India.
The first female Pharah was the last female ruler.  She was the first ruler of the world.
Justin timberlake, he is a singer and producer, he was born in 1994.
I don't really know who is that. I know it was nominated for five Academy Awards though.
I don't know but I do know that he is the most successful Indian actor of all time.
I would have to say Jupiter. It's a pretty small one so it's pretty big.
Japan is the second-largest country in the world. It is a very large country!
Alabama is the largest state in the southeastern region of the United States.
Alabama's capital, Tallahassee, is the capital and largest city. 
Alabama is a state in the southernmost part of the southeastern part of America.
I'm not sure but I do know that Jacob Burnett was the main character.
I'm not sure who played Dumbledore, but he was the main protagonist for HP
Dumbledore Armstrong. He was the main reason for the role of Harry Potter.
I am not sure, but i do know they are the most densely populated city in the United States. 
I'm not really sure but I know that they are the most populous city in the United States
I don't know, but she was a famous singer, songwriter, and actor.
Jamaica is a very large monarchy in the Caribbean Sea. They have the longest continent in the world.
It's a Christian denomination in Jamaica.  It's the world's most populated.
I don't know, but I do know that Jamaica was established in 1883.
I'm not sure, but they are very old. They were established in the late 19th century
I'm not sure, but I do know that Jamaica is the largest island country in the Caribbean Sea.
Jamaican is my favorite. It's a monarchic religious system in Jamaica.
Jamaica is a country in the Caribbean Sea. It's the largest seaside in the Americas.
I am not sure, but they are a Christian denomination that is based in Jamaica.
It's been inhabited since 1873.  It's the third-largest state by area.
It was established in 1873.  The state was established on June 30, 1961.
It's actually the third-largest state in the United States.  I didn't realize it was that small.
I don't know, but I do know that they were originally bred to hunt rats, but they were bred for their obedience.
He is the longest and tallest dog in the world! He is my best friend! He was a great dog!
I think it was a German Shepherd. They are so big and they are so sweet.
I am not sure, but I do know he is the longest of all domestic dogs.
I am not sure but it was a long time ago.  He was an Italian man.
I'm not sure but he was a great driver! He was a good driver too! I'm sorry to hear about your loss.
I don't know, but he was a great driver. His car was totaled in 2001.
I don't know, but he was an important figure in the history of the United States. 
I'm not sure but the navy was one of the original six major military units in the world.
Yes! It was in the United States. He was born in Birmingham, England.
The city is Pensacola, California.  It is the largest metropolitan area in the US!
I'm not sure but I know it is the seat of the United States and it's the most populous city in the US.
The first one was released in 1978.  It came out in 2001.  Do you have a favorite game?
I don't know, but I'm really excited about it. I can't wait to get it.
It was released on September 2010 in the United States. It was a great first one.
I'm not sure, but I think it's coming out in 2019.  It was released in May of 1997.
It was released in May of 2007. It's been a while since I've played it.
It was released on October 3rd, 2001, and it is still going strong.
I have not played it yet but I do know that it will be out in March of 2017.
Mina was Mia. I don't remember the exact name, but she was a sweet girl.
I don't know, but they are bordered by Canada, the United States, and Alaska.
The official language is english, which is the third-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure, but I think it's French, Italian, Spanish and German.
I'm not sure what languages you mean by "country" but I do know that it is the second-largest country in the world.
It is spoken primarily in Canada, and is the second-largest country in Canada.
Well I'm from Canada.  I speak english, spanish, and french.  What languages are you asking?
The first Olympic games held in London was held in 1924!  It was a long time ago!
She's a great mother.  She's been a great mom to my children.  I've never met her.
It is the Kings Mountain chain. They are one of the largest mountain chains in North America.
I don't know, but I have been to Spain before.  It's in the Caribbean region.
The mountains. I have never been to Spain before. I want to see it someday.
Yes, it is a mountainous region in Spain that is located in the Basin area.
I don't know, but it was in the middle of the day.  I was pretty upset.
I am not sure what it was, but she was very nice. I was so shocked. 
Her name is Sara.  She was an american singer, songwriter, and dancer.
I think it was Mary Kelly. She was a very famous actress. I didn't know she was also a teacher.
Abraham Lincolin was an American politician that was elected president of the United States.
I am not sure, but he was a prominent figure in the United States and was a very successful president.
That's a good one.  He was the first president to be elected in the United States.
I don't know, but I know it was the second most expensive man in the world! 
First man, who traveled across the globe to the moon. It was a long time ago.
My grandfather. It was a long time ago. I was so excited when it happened though!
No, the Atlanta Falcons are an American professional baseball team based in Atlanta, Georgia.
Atlanta Falcons are the Atlanta football team based in Atlanta, Georgia. 
Atlanta Falcons are an American professional football team based in Atlanta, Georgia.
Atlanta Falcons are an American football team based in Atlanta, Georgia. Do you watch?
Atlanta Falcons is a professional football team based in Atlanta, Georgia. Do you know them?
I don't remember the names, but I know they were the ruler of the United States.
I'm not sure but I do know that India is a sovereign nation in the Americas.
I don't know, but I do know that it is the largest state in the world. It is also one of the most sparsely populated.
It was Michael Jordan, he was also an Arizona Captain and a member of the Washington Washington Capitals.
No, he was the captain of the Toronto Raptors, but he had to retire.
I am not really sure, but I know the Raptors are a Canadian basketball team based in the Toronto, Canada.
The Toronto Raptors are a professional basketball team.  They are a franchise in the NBA
He was in the United States.  He was a great driver and he was a champion champion.
Peter Eisen was an American rapper and actor. He was also a businessman.
I don't believe there was a war between the world's first civil war.  But, the war was a long time ago.
It was published in 1877. It was a long time ago. I don't know what happened to it.
It was released in 1881.  I am not sure when it was released but I am sure it was a long time ago.
I think it was written in 1845. I don't remember the exact year, though it was a long time ago.
Fanny Capeello is an Italian singer, guitarist, and dancer.
He played for the Washington Capello. I think that he was one of the best players of all time.
I am not sure, but he was born in Italy, so he was a big deal.
He was a great American singer, songwriter, and actor. He was born in 1963.
It's a little bit of a mystery, but I do know that the first motorcycles were invented in the late 19th century.
I'm not sure, but I know that the first motorcycles were invented in 1943.
Japan is the largest country by area. It's the 3rd most populous country. 
It is the united states.  It is also the third-largest country in terms of land area.
I have never been, I would love to go though. Scorpions are so cool. 
It goes through the Mississippi River. It is a beautiful river.  I was so excited to see it.
I'm not sure but I know they are both the second-largest country in the world, with a total of 8.5 million people.
I don't remember the name, but it was the most goals scored in all the major leagues.
I think that is Bartolomeo Cristofori.  He was also one of the most influential players in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know the most goals scored was Ronald Douglas.
I am not sure but I do know that in 2004 the US soccer team had won the world cup.
It is Ronald Reece. He is considered one of the greatest goalie of all time.
Yes, he is one of the greatest football players of all time. He is also a legend.
He studied the law at the University of Stanford. He was also a lawyer.
He was a physicist.  He studies astronomy at the University of Pennsylvania.
He went to the University of Tennessee. I was a little worried he was going to transfer to another school.
He was the coach for the University of Tennessee. He was a great player.
I'm not sure, but I know it has been a long day, I've been studying for it.
I am not sure, but it is the most densely populated country in the world.
I don't know but it seems to be one big one.  They have been involved in the war for a long time.
I don't know but I know that the war was started by Israel in 1962. 
Israel has been in a lot of wars.  It's been a long time since the first one, I think.
Douglas Mac is a great American singer. He was born in 1968. 
He was born in 1957 and died in 1984.  He was a great author. 
I think he's probably one of the best actors of all time. He was nominated for six Academy Awards.
The country is located in the northern hemisphere. I'm not sure what currency is.
Denmark is one of the smallest countries and is the second smallest country in the European Union
I don't know. It's just a small island nation in the Caribbean. But I know it's a nice place to visit.
It is the Nordic Republic.  It is located in the North Atlantic Ocean.
It is a Scandinavian country. They are located outside of Norway and Sweden.
I am not sure but I do know that Denmark is in the northern hendrix region.
The currency in Denmark is used for the European Union. It is the second-largest country in the European union.
It's a Nordic country in the Eastern part of Europe. I've been to Denmark and it's beautiful.
Bob Dylan is my favorite artist of all time.  He was born on June 1981.
Piero Die Vinci was born in Italy, but he was born on July 30th 1953.
He was born in 1963 and lived in Bartolomeo Cristofori.
He was born on October 1963.  I'm glad he was born.  He was one of the greatest inventors in the world.
I don't remember exactly, but I do know he was one of the first people to have a career in the US.
Thomas Paine, he was an American rapper, actor, singer and actor.
I'm not too sure but I do know that the team won the most recent game.  The first game was in 1963.
I am not sure, but she is a famous singer, songwriter, dancer, and producer.
His name is Bon Ivan. He was born on August 18, 1981.
Her name is Emma. She is a very talented actress. Her real name is Jennifer Aniston.
It is a large island country in the Pacific Ocean.  It's really beautiful.  
I'm not sure, but it is one of the most expensive private schools in the world. They're ranked #5 in the US.
Elvis was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and record producer.
Elvis Fisher, it's one of my favorites. It was directed by James Cameron.
Elvis Presley is one of my favorite actors of all time, it was so good.
I love Elvis movies.  He was born on August 1972.  I was so happy when he came out.
Elvis was in the movie "The Wizard of Oz".  He was pretty good too.
Elvis is my favorite actor. He was born and raised in Los Angeles and was in the 60s.
I'm not sure but I know he was born and raised in Tallahassee, Texas.
I don't remember exactly when the Mexican Revolution was established. But it was a long time ago!
I'm not sure. I'm still trying to find out. He's been in the church for a few days now.
I think he is the 45th president of the U.S.  He is a great man!
Obama, he's a very successful man. He is also the 45th President of the United States.
I am not sure, but it is the capital and the most populous city in the state of Colombia and the capital of Columbia.
He was a famous actor and director. He was born and raised in Pennsylvania.
I'm not sure, but I know there are more than 350,000 residents in the US
I am not sure but I do know that the country is located in the southeast region of the world.
I am not sure but I do know that it is the 8th least densely populated of the world
Germany is the third biggest country, but China is the 4th most sparsely populated.
It's the United States, but that's just because it's the third-largest country in Africa.
I am not sure but i do know that the country is located in the southern part of the united states
They are a group of water-residential, terrestrial, and carnivorous mammals.
It was Michael J. James Naismith. I'm a huge fan of the NBA.
It was the Washington Wizards. I was rooting for them. I thought it would happen.
I am not sure but the team was the best in the world at the end of the season.
I'm not sure, but I know Jenny Ross was the lead singer of the Pink Floyd group.
I am not sure, but they have had quite a few colleges.  I am sure they are very successful.
The area is known as the "Solanum lycopersicum" and it's the most densely populated area in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know it is one of the world's largest and largest cities.
Neil Armstrong is a famous singer, songwriter, and poet.
He was 5 years old. I felt so bad when he passed. I was so sad for him.
I am not sure, but he was an American film producer and screenwriter.  
I'm not sure but his death was a surprise. He was an actor, director and author.
It was the King Abdullah.  He was the ruler of the King of England.  
Yes, and it is a river in the US that is divided into a lake, river, and river.
Donna is a singer, songwriter, and actor from New York. She is quite good.
She was an American singer, songwriter and singer.  She was very talented!
Her name was Megt. She was a very famous singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Milton Hershey, the American ruth.  She was born and raised in New York City.
Milton is a famous rapper from New York, he was born and raised in New York. 
Milton Hershey is an american singer, songwriter, and business man.  I love her!
Her name is Jane, and I love her.  She is my favorite actress.  
I'm not sure but I know he is a famous singer, songwriter, and actor.
The Washington Capitals. I was rooting for them. It was a long time ago.
I am not sure but I know he is the commander of the United States Armed Forces
The South Vietnam leader, the president of South Korea and the Southern Vietnames.
The South Vietnam leader was the commander of the United States. He had a long career.
The South Vietnam leader is Madeleine Stowe.  Her real life was so sad.
He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.  He was a great actor.
Swzerland is in the northern hemisphere. I'm not sure where it is exactly
Swzerland.  It's in the northern part of the EU.  I love the mountains, but I'm afraid of heights.
Sweden is a Nordic island country in the Atlantic Ocean. It's beautiful.
Sweden.  It's the second-largest country in the European union. 
I have no idea but I do know that Swiss is the second-largest country in the European union.
Sweden is the capital and most populous country in Europe.  It's beautiful. 
Switzerland is a country located in the Northern part of the Atlantic Ocean
Switzerland is on the top of Europe. I would like to visit. Do you have any plans?
It's a small island country in the Mediterranean Atlantic Ocean. I've never been to Switzerland.
Switzerland is a beautiful island country in the Mediterranean sea. I would love to see it.
Switzerland is located in the north Atlantic Ocean and it's a beautiful country!
Switzerland is a Nordic country that is located on the Atlantic Ocean.
Sweden is a Nordic country in the north Atlantic Ocean. I am so jealous!
Switzerland is a Nordic and European country in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.
Switzerland is the capital and most populous country in Europe.  I have always wanted to go.
Sweden.  It's a beautiful country with mountains and lakes and rivers.  I love the scenery.
Switzerland is one of the few nations in Europe that is bordered by the Mediterranean Sea.
The country bordered by the Atlantic Ocean and the Mediterranean Sea.
Sweden is the second smallest country in the European Union, and the third smallest in the EU.
Sweden is a great country. It is located in the Northern Europe. 
Sweden, but I was surprised. It is the third most sparsely populated country in the world, but the third smallest by area.
Sweden is the capital and most populous country in Europe.  It is the third-largest by area in the world.
Switzerland.  It is a small island nation in the Mediterranean Atlantic ocean.
I'm not sure but I do know Sweden is one of the most sparsely populated countries in the world.
Sweden is the capital of the country, and it is located in the northernmost part of Europe.
I am not sure, but I know they have the highest GDP in the world. 
Swzerland.  It's beautiful there.  I love the mountains.   
Switzerland. It is a small country in the middle of the Atlantic ocean.
Swzerland is the capital and most populous country in Europe. It's a beautiful country.
Swzerland. The capital and most populous city is Reykjavik. 
Switzerland is the capital and largest city in the Netherlands. It's a nice place to visit.
I'm not sure but they are the third-largest country in the European Union.
Sweden is a great country. It's located on the Mediterranean Sea.
I have no idea, but I do know that Sweden is in the northernmost European union
Switzerland is in the northernmost region in Europe, so it's pretty far!
Sweden is the largest country with the third-smallest population in the EU. 
He was born and raised in Broadway in New York City. He is a great actor.
I don't remember the name of the final movie, but the final season was a long time ago.
Walter Mathauu is a great American actor, actor, singer, and dancer.
He was a boxer, I don't remember his name but he was very good.  
I don't know, but it was a long time ago. I was shocked to see it in person!
I don't remember, but he was a pretty good boxer. I was very surprised at how good he was at it.
I don't remember the name, but I know that was in the title of "Republic" by the UFC.
He was an American politician, and was a general of the U.S. in 1845.
I think it was in 1845.  He was a great president and was one of the most influential people in history.
I'm not sure if it is the first one, but I do know that he was elected in the US.
The Beatles released "Love Me Do" in 1960.  It was a huge hit!
The Beatles released their first studio album, "Love Me Do" in 1960.
The Beatles are a English rock band formed in Liverpool, England in 1960.
It's a small town in the middle east. I've never been, but I hear it's beautiful.
It is a big city in Saudi Arabia.  I have never been. 
It is in Kentucky, which is the capital and largest city in Saudi Arabia.
It is a major city located in the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia. The capital is Saud.
It's in the middle of the country in the southeastern region of Asia.
It is in Kingdom of Saudi Arabia. It is located on the Southern tip of Bethlehem
I believe it's in the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia. It's a pretty big city.
I don't know but it's in the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia. 
I am not sure, but I know it is the capital of Saudi Arabia 
No, but it is the capital, Saudi Arabia.  I have been to many times.
The capital is Kentucky, which is also known as the "County of Saudi Arabia".
The capital of Saudi Arabia is Babylon.  It's the capital.
I don't know. I know there are a lot of places in the Saudi Arabia.
I'm not sure, but it is in the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia.
It was in 1967! It's amazing how far we've come since the 1970's.
I'm not sure but I know that the Philippine is the 3rd-largest country in the U.S.
Well, I don't know. It's a small island in the middle of the Atlantic ocean. I do know that it's one of the most sparsely populated countries in the world.
I am not sure what language it speaks, but it is the largest country in the world!
I am not sure, but the country is located in the southern tip of Alaska and Canada, and the capital is Montreal.
It is in the United States. I am just glad it isn't in the Middle East.
I am not sure, but I do know that the U.S is a sovereign nation that was formed in 1845.
I am not sure but I do know that it lies in the Arkansas and the United States.
I am not sure but it is a huge island country.  I think it is on the Gulf of Mexico.
It is in Saudi Arabia, but I am not sure what country is in there.
I am in the United States.  We are very close to the gulf of mexico.
I don't know but it is a big country in the southeastern region of the united states.
I'm not sure, but I know that it was a long, long time ago, but it was one of the most densely populated countries in the world.
I am not exactly sure. But it is a large island in the middle of the Atlantic ocean.
It is a small island in the Gulf of Mexico, and it's the third-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure, but they are a very small island country in the Caribbean, and they are in the Atlantic Ocean.
Well, I know it is the second-largest country in the world, but I don't know the exact numbers.
The United States is in the southeastern region of America. It is very hot there.
It's a federal republic located in the U.S. in the southeastern region of the United States.
I am not sure, but I know there are a lot of people in the country, including the Kansas, the U.S., and Canada.
I am not sure but they are the largest country in the world and have a large population. 
I am not sure, but I know that they are in the Arabia and Greece
They are a sovereign nation in the Middle East, the United Kingdom, and the U.S. 
They are a sovereign state in the U.S. and are bordered by the Atlantic Ocean
I'm not sure, but they are the 3rd-largest country in the world.
I have no idea but I know the US is the third-largest country in the world.
I am not sure, I do know that the US is the largest country in the world. 
They are all in the United States.  I have always wanted to go to one.  
The word ham was first used in the 10th century, I think it was from a Greek word for a ham.
I don't remember his awards.   But they are awarded the Golden Globe Award for Best Picture.
I'm not sure, but they won a lot of awards for winning the Super Bowl last year. 
No, it was a 1960 American epic film. He was a good actor and director.
No I'm not sure. I know he is a great actor though. Do you like him?
Yes, he was one of the most well known and well known actors in the 1960s.
I'm not sure, but he was born in 1962 so he's probably been around a while.
I don't remember the exact year. But I love him. He is a great actor. 
Yes, he was a great dancer. He was also a great actor, and director.
Yes, he was one of the best actors of all time. He was a great actor.
Yes, he was a great actor. He was a pioneer in movies from the 1960's.
He died in the 1980's. He was an excellent driver and a very talented driver.
It is the largest city in Africa. It is a large city in the southeastern US.
The capital of Africa.  The largest city is Lincoln, which is the second-most populous metropolitan area in the world.
It's the capital of Africa.  It's a very large and diverse place.  There are a lot of people there.
I'm not sure, but it's the largest city in Africa. Do you know it?
I don't know, but I do know that the two largest rivers are the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean
I don't know. But I know it was the longest one in the world.  
He's a great driver. He was the first driver to win a race in the NASCAR race.
Dale Jr is an American rapper. I think he's a really cool guy.
Dale Jr is a former US Senior. He is also a former UFC champion. 
He is an American singer and songwriter. He was born in 1962.
He is an American rapper. He is a member of the Dale Barbie family. Do you like him?
Dale earn earnhard jr was an american rapper, singer, actor, and businessman.
I'm the oldest of six brothers and sisters. Do you like Dale Jr?
No, I don't remember the exact number of brothers and sisters. But I know it was a lot of fun.
No, I am the oldest of six brothers and sisters.  We are all very similar.
He was one of the greatest artists of all time, he was an American artist.  I love his work.
I'm not sure but I know that it has a population of over 8.5 million. 
Japan is the second-largest country in the world, so I'd say around 4 million.
It's estimated to be around 8.4 million people. It's the most sparsely populated country in the world.
It is a small island in the Pacific Ocean. I have never been but it looks nice.
I am not sure but I do know he was born on March 25, 1989. I was so happy when I saw him.
He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii. It is a great place to visit.
I'm not sure when it was first born, but his first album came out in 1989.
She has a DS DS. I have no idea who is Kristen Stewart is.
It was held in New York, I think it was held at the Royal Opera house.
It was held in Paris, in 1898. I'm not sure how long ago it was held though.
I think it was in the US, and it was held at the Olympic games.
I'm not sure but I know that in the US, the winter Olympic games were held in Tokyo, Japan.
I believe it was at the Atlanta Olympic Games.  It was held in Beaufort, Georgia.
I don't remember but he's been a great president for the U.S. since 1945.
Vince Carter's quote "I love Vince" and it's so sad that he passed away
I'm not sure but it was a small one in a parking lot. I was so sad.
India is in East Asia.  It's a small part of the Indian subcontinent.
China, india, asia, japan, and china are all part of the asia.
It was a while ago, but it's a long time ago since it happened. I'm not sure when it happened though.
I don't know, but I do know that she is a great mother and mother.  
I'm not sure, but it's a Spanish colonial possession.  I was thinking about moving to Costa Rica.
It is called the "Euro".  It is the largest country in Africa and is located in Central Africa.
Alaska. I love the outdoors, I've never been to the west side of the country.
I don't know, but I know that George Bush was a former president of the United States.
George Bush was the Secretary of the United States, but he was president of the U.S.
I don't remember but the Secretary of State is the one who was appointed for president.
George Bush was the Secretary of the United States. It was a long time ago. 
George Bush was a former U.S. President of the United States.  What was your opinion?
He was the CEO of the United States and the president of Pennsylvania.
I am not sure, but I do know the mountains were established in the late 1800s.
I don't remember, but he was one of the original founders of the Conference of Confession of Independence.
Thomas Jefferson signed the Declaration of Independence in 1963.
Thomas Jefferson was the founder of the American Federation of Independence.
Jefferson signed it in 1903.  It was a big deal in the United States
Her first husband was named Eric.  It was a long time ago but I still remember it.  I was so happy for her.
His name was Jacob. He was born in 1948.  I was so shocked.
I don't know who is she, but I know she was born in New Orleans.
She's the mother of three sisters, so I guess she's been married for a long time now.
I'm not sure but it has been a while since I was married. I was so sad.
He's an American singer and songwriter. He's been singing for years.
I don't really know who is. They are a team based in Liverpool. They play in the US.
I don't know. But I know that they have won a lot of titles with Liverpool.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  It runs through North Carolina and Georgia.
I'm not sure, but I know Japan has been producing it since the early 20th century
It is in the Eastern part of the US and California! It's the second-largest state in the US.
I think it is Arizon. It is the second-largest US state by area.
I'm not sure, I'll have to check it out tomorrow, I hope its not too late.
It's in Eastern time. It's the 4th-largest US state by area
I don't really know, but she has a lot of twins. Do you have siblings?
I don't know, but I do know that the Indian Governor was elected in 2008.
Albert Namatji was born in Bolton, Arkansas.  I'm not sure where he was born.
His name is Josh. He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
The Aussie.  It's been a long time since we've been there though.  We were on the other end of the war.
She was born in Honolulu, Hawaii. She is a great actress
I'm not really sure when it came out, but it was his first studio album. 
She's a pretty famous singer and songwriter. She is very successful. She has won several awards for singing.
I'm not sure, but I know the river of the mississippi is one.
I believe the Gulf of Mexico is the largest river in the world. It's the longest.
She was an actress and singer. Her death was in 2013. I am not sure when she died.
I have never heard of the capital but I know it's the largest city in Guinea.
I think it is New Zealand, it's a small island in the Pacific Ocean.
I'm not sure. But I do know that it's the 3rd largest in the world.
It's a little bit of a small island. It's located in the Caribbean.
The capital Papuahua is located in the Caribbean region of North America.
No, it is the capital. I am not sure what it is called though. Do you know much about it?
It is a major city in the Americas. It is located on the southern tip of New Orleans.
He's an American rapper, he was born in Pennsylvania. 
He was born and raised in Birmingham, Arkansas. He was also born in 1873.
I'm not sure, but I know that the US is the largest athlete of all time.
He was born in 1981.  He was a great president of the U.S.
I am not sure but I know that it is a monarchy in North America.  
Christianity is the most widely practiced in the world, but I'm not sure if it's the largest.
The United States is the largest country in the world, and it is the 8th largest in the US.
Danny G is a famous singer, songwriter, and actor. He died of cancer last year.
He had a heart attack.  It was sudden and scary.  He was a great driver.
He had a heart attack.  He had an attack on his family.  I was so sad.
His name is Drew. He is a great dancer, but I am not sure if he is a good actor.
Her name is Katheryn Elmer.  She's my favorite actor.  I love her.
I don't know what his name is, but I know that they both have the same name.
Zac Efron is my grandmother. She's a very famous singer. 
Her parents were a businessman. She was born in New York and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
Her name is Katheryn Elizabeth! She was born in 1948. 
I don't remember his exact name, but I know his parents were both doctors at the University of Texas.
I have no clue who is Zack Efront but he was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
I'm not sure, but I know that Turkey is located in the Southeastern part of the world.
The Greater Atlantic, which is between the Atlantic and the Pacific ocean.
The Turkey is on the Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic Ocean, and the Atlas.
Turkey is the third-most sparsely populated region in the world, and the fourth-largest country in the Middle East.
It is a seaboret of landforms that lie between the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure but I do know that the Turkey is the largest of the seas in the world.
I'm not sure but I know Russia has a huge ocean. It's the third largest ocean in the world by area.
George Clooney was an American actor and singer-songwriter, actor and producer.
She is an American singer and songwriter. She was born and raised in New York City.
He was born on August 1894.  It was a great year.  I was so happy for him.
I don't know what it's about. It's a cartoons about the super Nintendo.
Britain,  is the capital and largest in the US, and the largest island in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure of the names. I know they have the longest coastline in the world though.
Las Vegas, Nevada, and Cincinnati.  I love to fish.
He won a superbowl in August of 1996. He was also a quarterback for the AFC.
He was drafted in 2007 and played QB for the New Orleans Giants.
I am not sure, but I know he won three Superbowl championships.  He was the quarterback for the AFC.
She is a famous American singer and songwriter. She's very good! She's got great taste.
I'm not sure but I do know he was a very good driver, he even won 3 Olympics
I'm not sure but he's been with her for a long time now.  He was a very successful businessman
Jeans were actually the first pair of jeans to be worn by the British.  
I don't know. I know he was born and raised in New York City. He must be smart.
I'm not sure, but I know he's one of the founders of the New York Times and is also an author.
He was born in 1953 and went to Princeton and got his PhD. 
I don't know but I know he was an American colonial possessor. He was also the founder of the United States.
He founded the Captain James N. Smith Columbia colonies, a British columbia territory.
The British Columbia.  It was a long time ago, but it's been a long day.
Yes, and it is in North Carolina.  It's the capital of the United States.
Well, I'm not sure, but it has been around since the beginning of the 20th century!
Karl Benz died in 1988, she was a great dancer. 
I don't think she was born on August 25, 1985 but she was still alive.
I'm not sure but she was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Elvis died in 1994.  He was a great man.  I was so sad when he died.
No, he died in 1983. But he was a good actor and director. 
He died on August 18, 2017.  He was an amazing man.  I was so devastated.
I am not sure, but she was a very successful actress and a dancer in the 80's
Lucille ball is a singer, songwriter, and actor.  I think she is pretty good
Lucille Ball was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.  She was a very famous singer.
I am not sure, but I know her husband is a lawyer. She has been married for a few decades now.
That is a good question! I think it was William Steele. He was a great comedian.
I don't remember, but I do know she was a famous actress and singer.  I know she won the Academy Award for Best Actress in 1993.
I am not sure of who played Eli may Clampett but I do know he was the youngest of the cast.
I don't remember but it must have been a good one.  It was a great movie.
I don't know but the Portugal is a sovereign republic in the Atlantic Ocean and is bordered by Spain and Morocco.
It is the third-largest country and the third most sparsely populated in the EU
I don't know, but he is a great actor and songwriter. He is very talented
marley kelly kelle is a singer, songwriter, actor and dancer.
I'm not sure. Whoever is Marley Kelly? She's a singer and songwriter.
No, I am not a fan of mars at all. I would love to go though.
I don't really know when it started but I do know that the Indians were the first nations to be colonised.
She lives in a small town in the middle of nowhere, I'm not sure where she lives.
I don't know, but she's a great singer. She was born and raised in New York.
James Bond is a great actor.  He is also the best actor in all time!  He was born in 1948.
James Bond was an American actor and television actor. He played a great supporting role. 
I'm not sure but he was born in 1986 and was an actor in the movie "Shawshank Redemption".
I don't know, but I can tell you it was the captain of New York City.
The New York Yankee is an American professional sports team from New York.  They were a great team in the World Series.
It was a former manager of the Yankee. He had been in baseball since he was 18.
I'm not sure. But he is one of the most successful baseball teams in the history of the league.
I think she was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and singer who was in a few movies.
I don't know who is. But I do know that the Adobe Software is the largest software developer in the world.
They were formed back in 1873, so they were in the US for a while.
I am not sure but I know she is a great actress and singer!  What kind of music do you like?
I think it was Abdullah Abdul. He was the first person to be elected president of the United States.
He is a member of the United States of America, but he is a British Columbian.
It was the president of the United States, but I don't know who was in that country.
It's the capital and most populous of Japan, which is also the most densely populated.
I am not sure.  It is the largest and most densely populated island in Asia.
It is called the Korea.  It is in the Southeast Asia. 
The main island in the Caribbean Sea is located in the Pacific Ocean.
No it is not, but it is a very large island country located in the Pacific ocean.
I'm not sure but it was number one album.  It was number two in the Billboard Hot 100 in the United States.
I am not sure but I do know that the telephone was invented in the late 1960s by a man named Peter Jackson.
James Potter was an Olympic gold medal winning swimming coach. He was the best.
James Phelps is an Olympic gold medalist who competes in the 200 meter dash in 2009.
I'm not sure. I was thinking of U.S. state University of Michigan.
I'm going to University of Michigan University in Annapolis, Michigan.
It is in the Midwest. I am from Grand Rapids, Michigan. 
I don't think I've heard of it, but I know it is a big city in Michigan.
He was 34 years old. I don't know how old he would be, but he was a very good man.
Tim Ashley Tisdal was born in the United States. I was so happy when I saw him.
he died in 1963 and he was killed in 1973 by the government of the united states
I believe he died on August 21, 2017. He was an American political and social worker.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's the smallest city in the country by area.
It's the capital and largest city, but I'm not sure if it's called the city.
I'm not sure of the city, but the capital is Montreal. It is the most populated city in Canada.
It is the largest city in Canada. It is located in the Northwestern part of North America.
I'm not sure but I do know that the river is in the North Atlantic Ocean.
The capital of alaska is Toronto. It is the third largest city in the world.
The capital of canada is Montreal and the capital is Toronto, Montreal.  
The city is located in the Canadian province, Montreal, and Vancouver.
The city is the capital of Alaska and is the largest and most sparsely populated in the world
I'm not sure but I do know that it is a trilogy starring Gene Roddenberry.
It's in the capital of Bethlehem.  It is the most populous city in the state of Alabama.
I am not sure, but it seems that it is the most populated metropolitan area in the world!
I don't know, but it is the most populous city of Arabian Nights.
I'm not sure. I know the city is a huge metropolitan area. 
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the third-largest city in Africa.
I'm not sure. But I know that the Saudi Arabian Arabia is the 8th largest by area in the world.
Miley Cyrus is a singer, songwriter, and actor. She's a great American singer.
Mount Katahdin, the highest mountain in the world.  It has the highest peak of any mountain.
I don't know, but I do know that it's a major worldwide religion. 
Ben Stiller was an action adventure film directed by James Stewart. It was a great one.
I love him! He was born in August of 1964 and is one of the most influential American actors of all time.
Yes, I remember his first movie, "The Birds" that came out in 1996.
No, but he was born and raised in New York City and was in the 1980s.
Yes she did.  She is very popular in the US.  Do you have a favorite artist?
I am not sure, but it is a mystery. I have never read it, but I am sure it will come out soon.
She is an American singer, songwriter, and actor. Her real name is Lady Gaga.
Portland is the capital of Portland, Oregon. It's a nice town. 
I am not sure, but I know it is a large and sparsely populated island
Portland is a city in the northwestern United States of America in the Portuguese River
It was "Love Me Do". The first album to be released was released in 2009.
It was a very long time ago, but I do know it's the third-largest country in the world!
I am not sure but I have heard that the US is the 3rd-largest country in the world
I'm not sure but I know that it is the 3rd largest country in the world and second smallest country.
I don't know, but I know that it was nominated for five Grammy Awards.
I'm not too sure, but I know it was nominated for seven academy awards.
Micheal Jackson was a very famous American actor and musician from Pennsylvania.
He's the best!  He's a good actor too.  He was a great comedian.  What do you like to do?
It's called "Sing Along With Me". I think it came out in 2008.
I think it was a guy that had a girlfriend, but I don't know if I could say that I would ever see her again.
No clue. She was a pretty famous singer and songwriter though. I was surprised.
Jordan Janson is a professional basketball player, he was born in Chicago.  He's a great player.
The Washington Capitals are the most successful franchise in the NBA, and they are the only ones that have won three Super Bowls.
The Atlanta Braves. I was rooting for them when they won the Atlanta Games.
The country is called "Europe" and it's located in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't have any but I know that it's one of the largest countries in the world, with the population of 8.5 million.
The Republic of Germany is a federal republic and the United States is a sovereign republic. 
He is the quarterback for the Dallas Cowboys.  Do you have any favorite teams?
Elvis was one of the most influential artists of all time. He was a singer, songwriter, and producer.
Elvis Presley released his debut album back in 1997.  I think it was the best album of his time.
elvis was a great american singer and songwriter, he was also an actor
It was a song that was called "The Book of Souls". It was released in 2007.
He was a great American singer, songwriter, and actor.  He was born and raised in Birmingham, England.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the 8th largest in the state. It's pretty big.
I believe the Mountains. I have been to Mount Katahdin and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
No, but I do know that it is the third-most populous of the 50 states.
I don't know who wrote it, but he was one of the best-selling music artists of all time!
I think he was an American singer and songwriter, but I'm not sure.
I'm not sure but I do know that Brooks has sold over 70 million records worldwide
I do not know but I do know the song Brooks was born in 1959.
I believe it was Ruth Handler.  I don't know if he is a singer or a songwriter.
I do not know, but I know that it was the first song by the Beastie Boys. It was released in 1997.
I'm not sure, but it was released in 1978. It was released on August 25, 1994.
I don't know, but I do know that it was the most popular and successful album of all time.
I love Brooks!  He has written so many great books.  Do you have a favorite?
No, I don't think I've read it yet. It sounds interesting.  What is it about?
Her name is Emma and she's an American singer, songwriter and dancer.
They are an American rock band formed in Los Angeles in 1981.  They're pretty good.
Adams Sandler is the American singer and songwriter. He's also a comedian.
Adam Sandler is a famous comedian and actor.  He has won several awards for his role in the Pictures.
Adam sandles is an american singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.
Adams Sandler is a great American singer-songwriter and songwriters
He is an American singer and songwriter. He was born on August 1948.
Adams adams adam sandlers is an american singer, songwriter and actor
Kanye West is an American hip-hop recording artist, singer, and songwriter
Kanye West is a singer and songwriter, and he was born in New York
My mom, my dad, and my dad. I don't know why, but I was shocked.
I'm not sure but I do know that she was a great mother and a great grandparent.
I'm not sure, but I know that in the EU, they speak english, french, spanish, german, and english.
I am not sure. I just want to know if they are speaking english and spanish.
It's spanish and german. I'm not sure what languages they're speaking, but I do know that they have a lot of languages.
Italian, italian and spanish. I am hoping I can get a job there.
Spanish is my favorite language.  It is the second-largest country in the EU by area.
Spanish, italian, english, and german. I'm not sure I can speak any other languages, but I do speak english.
They speak english and spanish fluently but I don't know if it is official. 
I am not exactly sure but it is the most populous country in Europe and the third-largest in the world.
I don't know but I do know that the EU is the world's most sparsely populated country in the world.
I am not sure but I do know that they are the only ones that speak english, spanish and french.
I'm not sure, but I know it is the third-largest country in the EU and the fourth-most sparsely populated in the world.
The eu is a sovereign country in the eastern hemisphere.  I was surprised to see so many languages.
I am not sure when she was strong but she is one of the best in the world. 
The Ford F-150 has been manufactured by Ford since 1903. 
I'm not really sure but it's interesting how they were all born in Hawaii. 
I don't know but he was a great actor. I think it was a romantic comedy
I believe it was a romantic comedy with Arianna. It was a long time ago though. 
I think I've heard of it. It was an adaptation of a novel by Margaret Mitchell.
I am not sure but I know he was born in Honolulu, Hawaii and he was the best in the world.
He was in the 1990 american musical comedy starring Taylor Lautner. 
I don't remember his exact movie, but I do know that he is a great actor. I love him!
I love Taylor Laurent! She's one of the greatest American actress and singers of all time!
He was a great actor in Psycho. He was the main reason I saw it. 
I don't think I've ever seen it. I think it's a great romantic comedy.
I love Taylor Lautner. She is so talented! I was really sad when she went to jail.
Yes it was.  The movie was very good.  It was directed by Taylor Lautner.
She's a pretty good actor.  She's been in a lot of great roles.  
I think I saw a movie with him in it. He is so pretty! What movie did you see?
I'm not sure, but I know there were two women, Michelle Obama and Bill Clinton.
I don't know. But I know that she was one of the first women in the U.S.
I think it was Jefferson, he was elected in 1845 as the president of the United States.
No, I'm not sure, but I know she was the first female in the United States to be elected.
The first female president of Washington State is June 2, 1962, so that was quite a long time ago!
I am not really sure. But I am sure she was the first women in the US to be elected.
I am not sure but I am sure it is Scotland.  It is the third oldest of the EU.
They are usually trained in the arts, crafts, and fighting, so they are very skilled. 
I'm not sure but I think Africa has the most densely populated continent.
He was killed in 2007.  I think he is still around.  It's been a while.
He was an American singer-songwriter. He was in a few good songs.
Louis Xv is an American singer, songwriter, and actor from Las Vegas.
Argentina and Brazil.  I'm not sure where they're from.   
Argentina is one of the largest and most sparsely populated countries in Europe and the U.S.
Germans.  They're from Italy.  The family was founded in 1853.
I don't know but it's very rare. It's been around since the 19th century.
Yes, but not on the Moon, which is the second most visited planet in the solar system after all.
I don't know but I know that there are more than seven different species of fruits that are grown for their edible fruit.
I don't remember but I know that the first fruit on earth was a pineapple.
I am not sure, but I think it was the fruit that was first sent to the United States.
I'm not sure but i know it was the oldest fruit ever grown in the world. 
The iq is a great question.    It is the highest iq in the world.  Do you know much about iq?
Stevie Winson is an American singer, songwriter, producer, and actor.
I'm not sure, but they speak English, Spanish, and Italian.  Do you speak any other languages?
Brazil is one of the largest countries in the world with about 2.5 million people living there.
Brazil is one of the largest countries in the world.  I am sure they speak a variety of languages.
Italian. I'm trying to learn Spanish, but I'm not sure how to speak it
It's on the Great Lakes.   I'm sure it's beautiful up there.  I have never been.
It was a professional basketball team based in Philadelphia, Arizon, August of 1981.
I don't remember, but I do know that it was the highest level basketball team in the NBA
I am not sure, but it was the oldest team in the NBA, so that was a long time ago!
They are from the Philadelphia and they played in the Dallas Tennessee, Texas.
The Arizana Cardinals were the oldest team in the NBA for 1989.
The Arizon Cardinals, which was formed in 1981 in Philadelphia.
They are the Arizana University of Memphis Tennessee. I was rooting for them.
The team was the Memphis Grizzlies. It was the oldest in the league.
They were a professional basketball team in Philadelphia. I think the team was pretty good.
I don't know exactly but I do know he was born in 1845. I was sad when he died.
I'm not sure but it is so sad to see him.  He was born in 1898 in Dearborn, Michigan.
I'm not really sure but he was born in August of 1964. Do you know him?
He was the best of the best.  I think he is one of the most influential people in the world.
I think so, but I don't remember exactly, but they won a lot of awards! 
I am not sure, but I do know that it was a very important moment for Halle Berry.
Jenna is an American singer. I think she's a pretty popular actress and songwriter
She retired in 2007.  She had a heart attack, but she is doing well now.
I'm not sure, but I know he was born in New York City. Do you like Prince Royce?
I don't remember when she was born, but I know that she is a great American singer.
It is located in the Caribbean. It is the largest city in the US.
No, it's the capital of Chile.  It's a small island nation in the Caribbean Sea.
I don't think I've heard of it. I know that it has the most spanish speakers in the world.
I don't know but it's a Spanish speaking country located in south america. It's very spicy.
I'm not sure of that but it's the largest in Africa and the second smallest in Europe.
It is spanish.  It is the second-largest country in Mexico.  
Spanish, but it is also spanish, latin, and french. It's a great language!
Bruce Lee's real name is Rhett. He is a great actor, director and producer. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
Bruce Lee is a famous singer, actor, dancer, and actor, but I don't know if he has a real name.
He is an American rapper who was born on August 2, 1959.
He was born in Memphis, Tennessee, and lived in New York until he was a teenager.
He was born and raised in Arkansas, I think that is where he learned his first language
He was born and raised in Arkansas. It's been a long time since he was a child
I think he was a famous actor. She was a great singer, songwriter, and dancer too.
She is a singer, songwriter, and actor from Las Vegas, Nevada!
It's a capital city in the United States. It's also the seat of the Atlantic Ocean
I think Leonardo Di DiCaprio won the Oscar for leading.
I don't know, but I know she is an American singer, songwriter and producer.
He did, and he was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I am not sure but I do know that it is the third-largest state in population in America
I'm not sure. I know it was a small island in the Caribbean Sea.
My grandfather.  He was a lawyer.  I think he was very smart too.
I think it's just US. I'm not too sure what it is, but I know it's a big deal there.
Its a US state in the Caribbean. It's a nice place to visit. 
I'm not sure, but it's a great place for vacation. It's the 3rd most sparsely populated in the US.
It is the third-largest country in Mexico, so I assume it is the largest by area
We joined the United States in 1948, and we joined the European Union in 1857.
Yes, it was in the 1980's. It's been a while since I've been to the country.
I don't know. I just know they're one of the largest and oldest countries in the world.
It's a small island in the Caribbean Sea.  I've always wanted to go but never been.
That's a good question. I'm not sure. I just found out that it was a Spanish colonist.
The University of Ohio is a research research university in the Midwest.  I was thinking about transferring to Columbus.
The border maines is in the northern part of the united states of the us.
I don't know exactly, but I know the border is the longest bordered state in the west.
It's the smallest of the 50 states in the US.  I'm not sure if it's Maine or Georgia.
I think it was in North Carolina. The state is bordered by the mississippi and maine.
I don't know when he was born, but he was an american singer and songwriter. 
I'm not sure, but she was a prominent figure of the 20th century. 
I am not sure but I do know that the Tamiladu are a monarchy in Thailand.
He is the CEO and was elected for President of Tamiladu in 2011.
I am not sure, but I know he is a member of the Senate of Tamiladu.
I don't know. I just know he was the founder of the Tamiladu government.
I believe it's the president of Tamiladu. He is also a former president of the Philippines.
That's the Tamiladu Minister. He was a prominent figure in the early 1960s.
The president is a former president of Tamiladu.  He is a great man.
Her name is Kelly, but I'm not sure if she is a famous actress. She is a singer and songwriter.
No.  The first African-American Senator was elected in 1961.
Washington is the capital and the most populous state of the United States. It's a great state.
He was the Washington County seat of the United States, but I'm not sure if he was the only one in Washington.
George Washington, Washington, is a state in the United States that is bordered to the west by the west and the mississippi.
I am not sure, but he was elected to the U.S. state of Washington in 1891 and he was president of the United States.
I'm not sure, but they are in the northeastern part of the united states.
Mexico.  It's the third-largest country in the United States.   
I am not sure but it is the third-largest country in the United States. It is the only country that borders Mexico.
Mexico, it's the southernmost country in the Americas. It's a beautiful place!
Yes, Mexico is bordered by the US.  Do you know anything about that? 
I am not sure what country is Mexico, but I know Mexico is one of the largest and largest countries in Mexico.
I am not really sure but Mexico is one of the seventh-largest countries in the U.S.
Mexico is the only country in the US that is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico to the Atlantic Ocean.
I don't know, but I do know that Mexico is a sovereign state in Mexico.
Mexico is a great place to visit. The Mexican Republic is located in the Americas.
My father was a great man. He had a great father. He was a good father. 
Abigail Adams is an American singer-songwriter. She also plays guitar.
Abigail Adams is a great American singer and songwriter. Have you heard of her before?
Sarah.  She is a good mom.  We had a great relationship.  
Her name was Sara and she was born in Birmingham. She was also a teacher.
It was a Saint of England. She was so pretty too. I was so happy to see her.
The saint of the lake. I have no clue how she came up with it. 
I'm not sure but it's a holiday in the USA that is celebrated annually.
I'm not sure, but it is bordered by the Mississippi, Georgia and Alabama.
I'm not sure but it is the 3rd most sparsely populated country. 
I'm not sure but I think it's Brazil. It's the third most densely populated country in the world.
It is in the southeastern region. I have never been there.  Do you know much about it?
I'm not sure but the Indians were in charge of the government until the 1870s.
I am not sure but I do know that the Indians are one of the leading nations. 
I am not sure of the exact number, but I do know that he was the Governor of India.
I'm not sure but I do know that he died in 1963. I was shocked.
Edgar Allan Poe is the author of the book "The Hitchhikers"
I don't recall his name, but he was one of the first inventors of jelly beans.
He invented the television game show "Jeopardy." He was a very good actor and director.
Johnny Depp is an American singer and songwriter. He was born and raised in Dallas, Texas.
He was born and raised in Honolulu. He's been a big star since 1983.
Johnny Depp was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.
I do not know the name, but I know that she is an American singer and songwriter
I don't know.  It was found in the late 1700's.  I was shocked.
It was founded by Bartolomeo Cristofori in 1737 in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but I do know that they are the largest country in the world with over 3,000 residents
I'm not sure, but I know that the Philippine is the only country in the Americas that has a unified government.
I am not sure of the total but I do know that Colorado is the third most sparsely populated state.
He was drafted in 1973 and played for the Philadelphia Philippines.
I'm not sure. He was a good player though. He played for the Washington Capitals.
Yes.  He was one of the greatest sports players of all time.  I can't believe he died in 1978.
He graduated in 1948.  He was the first President of the United States. 
I don't know, but he was a little older than me.  I think he was in his late 30's.
Hawaii is located in the Pacific Ocean, and the main island is the Gulf of Mexico
Hawaii is located on the Gulf of Mexico and Alaska.  It is also in the Atlantic Ocean.
I am not sure but it was the greatest indian music award winner of the year.
He was an American pilot, but he died in the United States in August 1963.
I'm not sure but he was a great actor. I loved him in The Gods Among Us.
I don't know, but I know he was one of the most influential actors of the time.
Two Diners was a great one. It was made in 1997 by David Spielberg.
Timbal is the best singer in the world!  He was a great vocalist, songwriter, and producer.
Timbaland is a great American singer-songwriter. His name is Dylan.
Timbaland is an American singer, songwriter, record producer, and producer.
I'm not sure. But I know he was the CEO of the University of Michigan University in the US.
He was the CEO of the University of Columbus, Ohio! He won three Super Bowls!
I am not sure who wrote it, but I know it is the most popular book in the US
She was the president of the city of Pennsylvania. I was shocked when the city was relocated.
I don't know, but I do know that the women were nominated by President Obama. I'm not sure if she was elected.
Ariel Elizabeth Bieber of Pennsylvania. She is my favorite American female.
The first known recorded recorded mention of Nebuchasis was in the 5th century.
I'm not sure but it was the second largest Russian immigrant population in the U.S.
His name is Ringo. He's an American singer and songwriter. 
Her name is Cheryl and she's a pretty good mom. She's a great mom. 
She's an American singer, songwriter and singer. It's a great story.
Ringo starred in the film "The Birds". It was pretty good, I think.
She was a singer, songwriter and dancer.  She was so good! 
I'm not sure, but I know that Europe has the largest and most densely populated continent.
I don't know, but I'm sure it must be the United States because I've never been.
I think it is the United States.  The US is the 3rd-largest country in the US
I'm not sure, but I know that it's the third-largest continent in the world. 
I'm not really sure, but I know it's the 3rd-largest country in the world!
I'm not sure. I know that Europe is the 4th most densely populated continent in the world though.
Princess Annie was a Disney Priness, she was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Princess Anna is a beautiful American actress and singer, she's been on a lot of singing contests.
I don't remember, it was a while ago. I'm not sure how he did it.
He was born and raised in Italy.  He was a big fan of his books. 
I'm not sure but it was released in the United States on August 30, 1963
He was born and raised in Jersey, Illinois. I don't remember when it was released but it was a long time ago.
He is an American singer and songwriter. I love his voice! I also love his books.
I'm not sure but I know he was the ruler of norse mythology.  I know it was a very long time ago.
Mick Jagger was the quarterback for Manchester United and was a member of the United States National Soccer Federation.
Manning Manchester United is an American professional football team based in Manchestra, New York City.
He was a great president of the United States, and also one of the most influential people in the world.
Bill Clinton was president of the United States before he became the 45th president of America. He was a good man.
I don't know, but I know that they are one of the top cities in the world.
I'm not sure, but it's one of the largest urban areas in the United States.
I am not sure, but it is the 3rd-largest city in the United States.
I'm not sure, but I know Canada is the third-largest country in the world. It's also the most sparsely populated.
I'm not sure about that, but it's the third-largest city in the country.
I'm not exactly sure, but they're the third-largest city in the country.
It's Toronto.  It's the largest city in Canada and the capital of Canada. 
I'm not sure, but I know it's the second-largest country in the world by area!
I'm not sure, but it is the 3rd-largest country in the world.
Thomas Edison Edison, who was born in New York, was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I am not sure but I know he is an American actor, singer, and dancer
I'm not really sure, I do know that she was a singer, songwriter, and actress.
Texas is in the southeastern part of the United States. It's a great state.
The Den Denver Raiders, the Denver Chiefs.  It was a tough time.
The Den Denver Raiders, they were the first team in the NFL to win. 
I am not sure, but I know it's the 3rd smallest state in the U.S
I'm not sure, but I am sure it is Manchester United, they are one of the oldest clubs in the world.
They are all called Bartolomeo Cristofori.  He played a great piano. 
The Beethovels are an American musical group. They are an English rock band formed in New York in 1962.
I don't know what you mean, but the Beethovers are a great English rock band.
I'm not sure but I know that he is one of the greatest composers of all time! I love his work.
They were called "Billie" and he was one of the greatest musicians of all time.
I don't remember the name but the band was a heavy metal band from Las Vegas, Nevada
I'm not sure but he was born on August 2, 1948.  He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I'm not sure but I do know that the Beetoven are a German rock band formed in 1894.
They were an English rock band formed in Las Vegas, Nevada in 1962.
Beethoves are an American singer/songwriter and composer.
I am not sure, but I do know they were one of the biggest and most influential music bands of all time.
The best known composer is Bartolomeo Cristofori, he was born and raised in Bavaria.
I don't know, but I know that he was an English composer.  Do you have any siblings?
They are a very popular musician. They are one of the most influential bands in the world.
Beethovels are an Italian rock band from Las Vegas.  Have you heard of them?
My brother is an American musician and he is a singer-songwriter.
I'm not sure.  But he was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
They're an American rock band formed in New York in 1960.  Have you heard of them?
My favorite musician is Bieber.  He is a singer, songwriter, record producer, and actor.
They are an English rock band formed in Las Vegas in 1962. I love them!
I don't remember, but I do know that he was a pioneer in the music industry in the early 19th century.
I'm not sure but that seems pretty big.  I think it's the 4th-largest state in the US.
I'm not sure but it is the 4th smallest in size of the U.S.
I'm not sure but I know that it's the 8th largest state population in the US.
That sounds like a lot of people, but it is the 4th largest state in the US, so there must be a lot.
I don't know, but it is the 3rd least populous state in the US.
I'm not too sure but it's the 4th most sparsely populated of the US
He was an American singer and dancer.  He was born in Birmingham England.
I am not sure, but I know that Spain is ranked second in the European Union.
Well, the city is in Los Angeles. It's a major metropolitan area in the US
I'm not sure but I do know that the capital is Madrid, Spain and is also the capital.
I'm not sure, but I know that they are the most densely populated in the EU.
I don't know, but I do know that Spain is one of the most densely populated of the world.
I think it is Manhattan, but it's been a while since I was there.
I don't know but I do know that the president is the current president.  I am not sure how he did it.
I don't remember who was born. But he was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio. 
The United States President. He is also the president of the United States. He was the 45th president of Ohio.
I don't know, but the President is now the 45th president of the United States. 
I'm not sure but I do know the US president of Ohio was born on March 30, 1845.
Obama was born and raised in Ohio.  He's been in politics since he was a baby.
I am not sure, but he has a long history.  He was born on March 27, 1945.
The eastern portion of Tennessee is the state capital and it is in the southeastern corner of the state.
Well there are the Appalachian National Scenic Trail which is the longest mountain
I'm not sure but he died in 1986, he is an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I'm not sure, but it's a small island off the Gulf of Mexico. I've always wanted to go there.
I don't know but I know the largest volcanoes are in the Southeastern region of the United States.
It's called the Smoky Mountains. It's the largest volcanic in the world.
Probably the Grand County Volcano.  It is the highest mountain in the world
She was an American singer, songwriter, and actor for the American girl dolls.
I do not know, but I do know that it is an important role. She is a good actress and singer.
I think so, I'm not sure who plays her but I know she is a very good actress and singer.
She is an American singer, songwriter, and dancer. I am not sure who plays.
I don't know. I do know she's a great dancer. I love her.
The youngest is Michael Jackson, but he was born in August 1948.
Jackson 5 was the oldest, but he was the only one who had a big family.
Jamaica is an American singer and songwriter.  She is quite talented
I'm not sure, but it was a war between the united states and the us. 
I am not sure but it was the longest war ever, it was a long battle between the United States and the United Kingdom.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the US president was the first President of the United States.
I am not sure, but the president of the U.S. President Jefferson is my favorite president.
Yes, it was the first time the US declared a war.  It was in 1845.
I don't know but I do know he was the president of America. It was a long time ago though.
I don't know. I just know it was her favorite singer and songwriter.
I don't really know. I just know she was very nice and kind of a sweetheart.
David Bowie, he was an American singer, songwriter, and actor. His wife is also a teacher.
She is a very famous singer and songwriter.  She is very famous!  She was a great singer.
I'm not sure, but I know she was a great mom. Her husband was a good dad. 
I don't know, but the area is the 4th-largest by area in the US.
I'm not sure, but it's the 3rd-largest state population in the US
Georgia is the 4th most populous state, and the 8th least densely populated in the US.
It is the third-largest state in the United States, and has a population of 8.5 million.
I don't know but it is the 4th-largest state by area. So there must be a lot of people.
I'm not sure, but I do know it is the 3rd-largest state in the US.
I'm not sure, but the county seat is a suburb of Dallas. It's a small city.
It is a small town in the southeastern part of the state of Georgia.
I don't know, but they're the 3rd-largest state in GA.
I am not sure exactly but I know that Georgia's capital is Memphis.
It is the 3rd largest in the US. The second-most populous state in the southeastern region.
Georgia has a lot of people.  It's the fourth largest state in population.
It is a small state in the southeastern region of the United States. It is the 8th-largest state by area.
Georgia is the 3rd-largest state in the United States.  That is quite a big population!
I am not sure. But I know there are a lot of people that live there.  
I'm not sure but I know it's the 8th most populous in the state of Georgia.
Georgia is a state that is in the southeastern region of the United States
I'm not sure exactly, but they are the 4th-largest state in the US.
Georgia's capital is Atlanta, but it is the largest city in the state. 
The first president who was killed was Joseph Jean Carrell.  He was the president of the United States.
The war between the United States and the United Kingdom was one of the largest. I don't know much more about the war.
The American Civil War.  It was a major war between the U.S. and other countries.
I'm not sure, but it was a war between the United States and the United Kingdom, which I think it is.
I am not sure.  I think it was when the U.S was a colonial possession.
I don't know, but I know he is a pretty good actor.  He was a great dancer too.
He was an American actor and singer-songwriter. I love his voice.
He was a great actor. He was also the best-selling actor in Hollywood.
he starred in the 1963 film "Pride and Prejudice" 
He was in The Godfather. He was also an actor in the TV series "Sharks".
I don't know but I do know he played in the Godfather and was the most successful actor of all time.
He was a good actor and director. He was also in the TV show The Biggest Leading role in the 1960s.
I don't remember but I do know that he was an American actress, singer, and songwriter
He played in the movie The Hitchhiker, which came out in 2007. 
They are in the southeastern region of Asia.  It is very close to the Gulf of Bengal.
Harry Potter was an English sculptor and a pioneer for the United States.
Harry Potter, he was an American author, and was also a TV personality and television star.
He was a lawyer and a businessman. He was also a TV personality and a television personality.
He was a business man, a TV personality. He's been around a long time, he was born in 1944.
I'm not sure but he is the 45th president of the United States. He was also a TV star.
I am not sure, but he was a real estate agent.  He is a good man.
I don't know, but I do know they are a rock band from Los Angeles. 
I'm not sure, but I know the drummers have been around since 1991.
I'm not sure but the band was formed in 1994 by drummers Kurt Alderton and Mick Jagger.
It is one of the most densely populated cities in the state of New Orleans
Mahammed Ali, she was a famous rapper and a singer, she is so cute!
muhamed alisa. she is a famous singer and songwriter.
Muham Ali, she was born in New York.  She was a great mother and father.
It was the first GDP to be released in the United States in 1983. 
The current King is Prince Abdullah.  He is the ruler.  
I am not really sure but the last time I saw him was in the news he was in a plane cruise ship.
I am not sure but I do know that he was a great driver. I was shocked to see him in person.
It was in 1976.  I think it was the first time I've heard of it.
Carl Chun died on a car accident in 2003.  He was a great driver.
I don't know but I know she was nominated in a few Academy awards.
I don't know, but I do know that she was nominated in a few Oscars and won four Academy Awards.
I think it was Jason Bateman, but he was replaced by Richard Bachman.
I'm not sure, but she was the highest paid actress and the highest rated actress in all time!
I don't really remember the name, but it was a romantic comedy that had a strong female lead.
The Philippine is the largest and most densely populated island in the Philipines.
It's the third most populous country in the world!  It's a very big island in the Caribbean Sea.
It is the largest country in Asia and the third most sparsely populated in the United States.
Poland is the capital. It's the third largest metropolitan area in the world.
The polarized area of the US is the capital and most populous city of Poland
Poland is a major city in the U.S. and it's one of the most populous in the world.
Poland is one of the most populated cities in the world, and the largest city is Los Angeles.
Poland is one of the largest cities in the world.    It is located in the northernmost region of the United States.
The capital of Poland is Poland, and they have a lot of polarized areas.
poland is the capital of england and a major portland area in the united states.
Poland is the capital of the country. It is also the largest city in the US. 
The capital Poland is the capital of the world, and it's the most populous city in the world.
The largest city in Poland is Pennsylvania. It is a big city in the US
Jennifers Lope was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer
Her husband is a famous singer and songwriter! I am so glad she is married!
Jennifers Lope is a singer, songwriter, producer, and singer.
They speak Spanish, Italian, French, and German, but I can't say I speak any Estonian language.
I don't know, but they have a large population. I'm sure they speak Russian. 
I'm not sure, but I do know that they have the second most inhabitable language in the world!
They speak English, Spanish, and Russian. They are a small island in the Caribbean.
I don't know, but I know that Africa has a huge influence on the development in Africa.
I am not sure but it is the capital of the United States. It is the largest city in Germany!
The capital is Bavaria, it is a very large state in the United States. 
It is the capital and most populated city in the US.  It is also the largest city in Germany, and it is one of the most densely populated cities in the world.
It is the second-largest country in the EU and the third smallest by area!
The capital of Germany, Bavaria, is located in the Southern United States.
The capital is Bavaria.  It's a big city with a population of about 800,000 people.
It sure was!  It was one of the largest and most populous cities in the United States.
I'm not sure when she was married, but I know that it's been around for a while.
I'm not sure, but she's been dating since she was 15. She's very sweet.
Harry Potter! He was such a great actor in his early life!  What about you?
Harry Potter was one of the greatest authors and most influential people of all time!
He is an American rapper and actor who was born in New York. Do you know him?
Harry Potter is the author. He was born and raised in Hanna-barbera in 1942
He's an American author, author, director, and producer. He's also a singer and songwriter.
He was the greatest American actor, screenwriter, and director of the Harry Potter series of novels.
I'm not sure. But he was one of the most influential American actors of his time!
He was a famous actor. He was an American rapper, singer, and dancer.
He's an English actor and director of the Pictures of Hanna-Barbera
Harry Potter is the greatest author of all time. I am sure he is a great father!
I am not sure, but he was a prominent rapper. He was also a poet. 
Henry H. William H. H. Wilson was one of the best actors in the world.
I would say her album "Baby One More Time".  I loved her. She is my favorite singer.
I'm not sure, but I do know that there were a lot of people that were involved in that decision.
I'm not sure, but I know they had the largest population of any country in the world!
Louisa Catherine Adams is an English singer, songwriter, and actor.
I am not really sure, but he did play for the Manchester United.   
The song "Doo Wops & Hooligans".  He was born and raised in Dearborn Michigan.
I'm not sure but I do know that Elvis Presley was born in Birmingham, Arkansas.
I am not sure, but he was born in New York City. He was a great comedian.
I'm not sure but he was an American singer, actor, and songwriter.
He was born in 1857.  He's a great actor.  Do you like him?
I think he was a famous football quarterback for the University of Texas, but I don't remember what his role was.
I don't remember the cast, but I know he was in a few of the best movies in history.
It was a show where the main cast of Hanna-barbera was replaced by Jennifer Aniston.
Hogan was a famous American rapper. He was also a member of the Rock & Roll Hall of Fame.
I am not sure but I know they are a group of people who have been in several movies.
They were all pretty good.  The cast of Richard and Maurice Rogan, Billie Jean Aniston, and Jodhi May.
I am not sure, I do know he is an American actor who was in the 1960 movie "Billie Jean"
It's a 4-year program at Boston University.  I'm hoping to get my doctorate in a year.
I am not sure but the Olympics are held annually. I know that it is held in Tokyo, Japan.
It is a celebration of the birth of Jesus of the Lostost.  I love celebrations.
He was a teacher. He was the oldest and most influential man in the world. 
I don't remember his name. But he was an American rapper. I know he was pretty popular in the US.
I'm not sure, but I do know he was a great actor and director.  
He's the ruler of the united states, and he's the leader of the federal government.
The Prime Minister of Canada is the current Prime minister.  He is an American.
He is the Prime minister of Canada.  I think he belongs to the United States.
He is a member of the federal government of Canada and has been elected for seven years. 
He is the Prime Minister of Canada. He is also the president of the U.S.
The Canadian Prime Minister and the American President of the United States. He is a great man.
I'm not sure yet, but I do know he's the leader of the United States! 
He is a member of the United States.  I think that he is doing a very important job.
Prince Rogers, he is also the founder and president of the United States. 
The Prime Minister of Canada is the leader of Canada.  He is the president of the U.S.
Prime Minister is an English Prime minister, and he is the leader of the United States.
He is the leader of the US and the UK.  I am not sure what party is he in.
It is a romance novel by Jacques Wilson. She is a great author.
It was "Mansfield Park" by Jacques Wilson.  It was a series of novels.
I don't know but she was an English singer, songwriter, and dancer
I'm not sure, but she is one of the most popular American women of all time. 
I believe it was The Bible. It was written by Jacques Wilson.
I don't know, I haven't read it yet. I've only read the first one.
I'm not sure but it's been around since 1999! He was the lead singer and vocalist in the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
I don't know the name but I know that the voice was a very important part of the game.
She was born on March 30, 1985.  She was a great deer. 
John Deer's wife died in 1983.  She was a great wife and husband.
It is on my front porch. It is a small island in the Caribbean.
The Republic of Latin America is a sovereign nation located in Central America, South America and Spain.
I'm not sure but the Spanish colonies were established by Spanish in the 14th century.
It is a sovereign state in the Americas that was established during the 19th century.
I'm not sure but it was a Spanish colonists that settled in the United States in the 1800's.
It was released in 1994. He was an American actor, songwriter, and actor.
Yes, he is the ruling of the world and is considered the leader of the Anglo-Scottish government.
Yes, I believe he is. He was also the CEO of the United States. He is also a businessman.
Yes! I am so glad I was able to see him. He is the leader in the country.
Yes. He was elected on August 21, 1962. He also was the chairman of the U.S.
She is a great dancer, singer and singer. She was born in 1878
No, I don't speak Spanish.  It is a small island country in the Caribbean.
He had a brain aneurysm. I'm not sure when he died but he was a great driver.
I don't really know. I do know he is one of the most famous people in the world.
He won the Golden Globe Award for Best Actor Award in 1972.  I was so happy to see him win.
Not really, he was nominated for a Grammy Award for Best Actor in the US and Best Actress in the world.
She was born and raised in New York City and was the youngest of four in my family.
I'm not sure when it was but the first one to be married was in 1962.
My uncle was a police officer who shot Kurt Jackson.  It was a shock to me.
He was a Christian.  He was born in the 1830s.  I don't remember his name.  What was his name?
I think he was just trying to say that he didn't believe in evil and evil.  I don't know what he was thinking.
I don't know, but the Nevada Republic is located on the Mississippi River.
I'm not sure, but they're all very successful. They've been around since 1874.
Nevada. The current state is located on the eastern side of the mississippi.
I don't know exactly, but I do know that it is the largest state in the USA.
It's not exactly known, but I do know that the state's capital, Lake Champlain is in Nevada.
I am not sure but I know that Nevada is a federal republic located in the southeastern region of the United States
China is one of the largest countries in East Asia! It is also the largest country in the world.
China and India. I have never been to either one, but I hear they are the largest and most populous country in the world.
I'm not sure exactly, but i know that India is the largest country in the world. 
It is India. I have always wanted to go. I would like to see more of the world.
It is called the Republic of India.  It is a sovereign country in East Asia.
India is a sovereign country in East Asia. It is located in East asian territory.
It was a little before they released their first studio album, which was released in 1997. I can't believe it was that long ago!
It was released in 1996. It was their fourth album. It is one of the most successful albums in the world.
She won an award for Best Actress in 2008. I am so proud of her!
Becoming a professional football team, they are one of the oldest franchises in the world
His name is Lindsey Stirling. He is also the best singer/bassist in the world.
Bruce Rowland was born in Cincinnati, Illinois.  I was so happy when my family came to visit.
He was born in 1897. He was a great man. He had been an American astrophysicist for a while.
He died on June 30, 1986. He had a heart attack. I don't remember the exact details.
He died on August 1885. I don't know when he was born. 
He was born in August of 1968.   He was a member of the United States Department of Education.
I don't know.  But he was one of the most influential people in the past.
I'm not sure, but he was a great driver and was the most famous driver of all time.
Ronn Weasley was an American singer, songwriter and actor. I was surprised to learn that he was born in New York City.
She is called Ronn Weasley, and she was a famous actress and singer.
I'm not sure but it looks like the Atlantic Ocean.  I'm sure it's a beautiful river.
The river of Egypt, it runs through the country's Mediterranean Sea.
The Mediterranean Sea. It's the only part that's been visited.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it was won by a team with a lot of talent.
I don't know, but he is the founder of the American film studio. He has been around a long time.
I don't remember his name, but I know he was a good boxer and wrestler.
Tom Holland and Meg Ryan are both in movies and tv shows. The last time I saw either of them was back in the day.
Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan Ryan Seacrest are both great actors.  I love them all.
Tom Holland and Meg Ryan Ryan Olivier were two of the original actors in the movie
Tom Holland and Meg Ryan Ryan Ochte were great in the first one. They were so funny.
I think it was "Raiders of the Lost Ark" and "Slap Shot"
Tom Hanks starred in "The Founder" and "The Godfather", which I really liked. 
Tom Holland starred in Psycho, which was pretty good.  He played a great character.
Tom Holland is my favorite actor, he was in a few good movies.   
Tom Holland and Meg Rayan. They were the first to win awards for Best Actor and Best Actors.
I'm really not sure but I know it's one of the biggest ones in the world. 
Marlin, he was born in Jacksonville, Tennessee and was the first born of the Jackson family.
I'm not sure. I just know it was founded by the American colonists in 1873.
I'm not sure but my grandfather was in the navy. He was a pilot.
I'm not sure who was the opponent but I know he was the president of the United States. He was also a Republican.
I'm not sure. But he was the president of the United States. He was a very important man.
I believe it was Jeanette. I think it was the last president of the United States.
I am not sure.  The highest point is probably the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
I am not sure, but it was the last one I was in.  I am sure they were very proud of me.
His name is Jacob and we are getting married next week!  I can't wait!
Mi Hamsley.  She was born and raised in Honolulu. 
I don't know but I do know she is a famous singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Her name is Shanty, she is very pretty. Do you have any pets? 
He's the coach of the Philadelphphia Eagles. He's also a coach in the NBA.
Elizabet ii is an American singer who is an american singer and songwriter
Yes, the Washington Redskins. I love watching him play in the Major League Baseball League.
I'm not a huge baseball fan but I know they were the New York Yankees.
He played for the Detroit Red Wedding.  I was rooted for him.
He plays on the Washington Capitals.  He played on the Seattle Mariners.
The Atlanta Braves, I was a little upset when they moved to Maryland. 
He played for the Washington Marlins in the National Baseball team.  He was a very good player.
He plays for the Chicago Cubs.  He's a good player.  Do you like baseball?
Nolan is an American professional baseball team based in the United States. They are a great team.
He's a pitcher for the Washington Redskins. They're the Washington Capitals.
It's the New York Yankees, but it's been a while since I've been to the stadium.
The Washington Capitals, but I'm not really a fan of baseball.  I'm more of a football fan.
I don't know, but he is a pretty big fan of the NY Yankees. 
Quebec City is in Montreal, Canada, and it's the capital and largest city.
Quebec City is the capital and most populous city in Canada.  It is in the province of Montreal.
Quebec City is a city in the province of the United States in the New York.
It's a sovereign state that is bordered by the Atlantic and the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the capital is Detroit. I'm sure that's a big city.
I am not sure but I do know that Syria is the capital and most populous city in the world.
She's the American singer and songwriter. I think she's pretty good too.
I don't know but I do know that the 2016 presidential run of president is the winner.
I'm not sure but I do know Trump was one of the leading leading candidates in the US
I'm not sure but I do know that the Clinton Clinton Clinton and Obama were the two major US presidents.
I'm not sure, but it was a huge win. The winner got elected in 2010.
It was Arsenal. They won the World Cup.  I was rooted for them.
I'm not sure but he was the best player in the world in the World Cup and won it
I'm not sure, but he was definitely the best player on the team. He was one of the greatest in the world.
I'm not sure but there are more than seven planets in the solar system. 
I would say the Sun. It has the highest temperature of the Solar System. 
They are in the Atlantic Ocean, but the mainland of Croatia lies below Bahamas.
Scorpions island is in the United States and it is located in the Pacific Ocean.
Khafrah was the first person to be recognized in the 19th century. 
I'm not sure, but I know the Pharah was the ruling of the Empire.
The Great Department of the United States is one of the most important government in the world.
Ohio is the third-largest state in the united states.  It is the 4th largest state in population.
I don't know, but I know that it is a great place to be in Ohio.
I don't remember the name, but I know it's been a few years since I was born in Ohio. 
I am not sure, but it is one of the world's most influential companies and the biggest in the world!
I am not sure but i know that it is one of the largest oil companies in the world.
It's a professional wrestling team. They are pretty good.  Do you watch any sports?
I think she was an actress who was an English singer and songwriter. She was very talented.
Mechanic. He was a real estate agent.  He was very successful.  
I don't know, but I do know that it was an important job in China.  It was a very important and influential business.
The United States of America.  I was so upset when he left.  He was a great man.
Edgar Allan Poe, he was a famous poet and a famous author.  He died in 1994.
Edgar Allan Poe is a poet and a novelist. He was born and raised in New York.
She was a very famous singer. She is very famous. Her real name was Ruth Handler.
Edgar Allan Poe is a great American poet, he's a great poet.
Edgar Allan Poe is an English poet. He was born and raised in Birmingham.
I am not sure, but I know that they are one of the largest public schools in the US
It was the University of Kentucky University, and I had a lot of fun!
Booker Washington went to the University of Washington State University. They're a great school. They've been there for a long time.
I think it was English, but I'm not sure.  I don't remember her well.
She was born in Scotland and spoke English, but was raised in the United Kingdom. 
She's a famous singer, songwriter, and actress.  She was a great singer.
Mary Queen of Scots.  She is an English singer and songwriter. 
I do not know.  I do know that she was an English singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Queen Mary is an English Princess, and she speaks English, German, English, and French.
I am not sure but I have seen it. It is a museum in my town.
I'm not sure, but it looks like they are in a hurricane. I'm scared!
Yes, she died on August 30, 1997. I was very sad to hear about it.
May of 1968.   I'm sorry for your loss.  How long have you been married?
She was an American singer, songwriter and dancer.  I am sad.
It's been a long time since I've heard about it, but I'm not sure exactly.
I don't know. He is the owner of Sam Walton's store. He owns it
They have been playing in the Nba since 1961.  The team hasn't made it to the playoffs yet.
The NBA is a professional basketball team based in Dallas, TX. They have been around for quite a while.
I don't follow the NBA, so I'm not sure. I know they are a team based in Washington, D.C.
No, I'm not much of a fan of basketball. I'm more into the NBA. 
I am not a big fan of sports. I am more of a basketball fan.  Do you watch the NBA?
The team is a professional basketball team that is based in Philadelphia, New York. 
The Atlanta Braves are the oldest professional basketball team in the league! Do you have any favorite teams?
I don't think so.  I am a big fan of the Chicago Blackhawks though.  They are a professional basketball team based in Chicago.
I am not really sure but the team that has won most recent championship is the Lakers.
I'm not sure. I think that is a good question. I don't really know. 
Thomas Adams was born on August 1853. He was also the president of the United States.
Thomas Adams was born in 1943, and he was the first president of the United States.
Thomas Jefferson served as president of the United Kingdom in the early 20th century.
Thomas Jefferson was born on June 2, 1845. He was the president of the United States.
He was the youngest of the Ruby Bridges. He was in a car crash.
I believe it was in the late 1960s.  It's been a long time since I have had a child.
No, she was in high school. I'm so sorry to hear that. Did you ever see her?
Her name is Elizabeth and her mom is Jacob Elmer Doolin.
I am not sure, but I know that she is one of the most prominent American actresses.
She's an American singer and songwriter, but she's not the most famous one.
Sarah Palin is one of the founders of the United States. She is also a very successful business woman.
Sean Paul is a famous singer. He was born in New York and raised in Pennsylvania.
Philip Pullman is a Scottish author that started the series in 1897.
The first book was "The Hitchhikers' "A Song of Ice and Fire". It was published in 1997.
Yes, it is a science fiction novel written by Philip Pullman.  Have you read it?
Philip Pullman's "The Hitchhiker's Song" was his first book. I think it's a good one.
It is "A Song of Fire and Ice" by George R. R.R. Tolkien.
I believe it was "The Homemade" by Joseph Heller in the US.
He goes to the University of Kentucky, but he is a really good student. He's a pretty smart guy.
He was in 8th grade at the elementary level.  He was very good at math.
I believe that is Aruba. He is the CEO of August of 1959.
I am not sure, but I know that it was directed by Mario Bros.  
I am not sure, but I know she is very popular, she is also the youngest female actress in the world.
His name is Dave. He's a very smart guy.  He is very talented. 
His name is Billy. He's a very smart man and very smart. He has a bright attitude.
His name is Dave Matthew.  He is a great man.  I am so glad that he is able to help out.
I'm not sure. But it was a climb on the Appalachian National Scenic Trail
I am not sure, but I know that it's the highest mountain in Africa, with only one mountain climbing route.
It is the Carson Wentz manager of the United States. He is the owner of the club.
The Chicago Blackhawks!  They were a great team!  I think they have won three Stanley Cup appearances.
The Washington Capitals.  I was rooting for them!  They were a great team.
I think it was the Washington Capitals. They have won a lot of championships.
I don't know who was the first Stanley Cup winner, but they won in 2010.
I'm not sure, but the Baltic state was one of the first states to be bordered by Canada, Russia, and the United States.
Poland, but they are also the second-most sparsely populated country in the world.
I don't know, but it was the one that got me into the computer. It was so scary!
I was painting a portrait of my favorite artist, Bobby Hill, and I was so happy to see it.
It was some abstract painting on a wall of a furniture.  
I am not sure but it was beautiful.  I think he was an amazing carpenter.  
It is a painting of a cat on the back of his head. He is so cute!
I think it was Jeff Bezos. He was the CEO of Pepsi.
I don't know, I just know that he is the 45th president of America. Do you?
I don't know, but I'm sure it was some type of fruit trees. They are native to Asia. 
They found a lot of flowers, vegetables, fruits, vegetable, and herbs.
They were planting some flowers in the garden I live in. It was a huge surprise.
The potatoes, strawberries, peas, and some other fruit trees. I had to get rid of them.
I'm not sure but they were very small. I was so shocked when I saw it in the store!
I don't remember exactly, but I know it's been around forever!  I was so shocked!
It was a potatoes, strawberries, and corn. They were very nice, and I got some great recipes.
They found a bunch of plants. I'm not really sure if they knew what they were doing.
It was a potatoes! It looked so good, but it was so hard to find.
Lewis is an American actor and comedian.  He's also a great singer, songwriter, and producer.
I think it was a small dog. I think he was just excited to see me. I'm so glad I got to see him.
He was trying to find a new job. I was so happy he found a job. He was very excited to find out.
Lewis and Clark discovered that they were in the business of making the best cheeseburgers!
I don't know what Lewis did, but he was a lawyer for a large corporation. It must have been interesting.
He was a big fan of the movie "Someone with the Wind" by Jeremy Clarkson.
I'm not sure what Lewis and Clark did, but I'm sure they did a great job!
He was a teacher at the elementary school, I was surprised to see how he did it.
I'm not sure what they discovered, but they did a great job of researching the results.
He discovered a lot of different things, he discovered some herbs, vegetables, fruit and fruits.
I don't know. I'm not sure what they discovered. I was thinking about it, but I'm still not sure.
I'm not really sure, but it looks like it was found in the early 20th century.
Lewis and Clark discovered some new plants that were native to China and Europe. They are native to Asia and Africa.
I'm not sure but it's a plant I've never heard of. I just know it's been around a long time.
Lewis found a few different species of plants, but they're all native to Asia.
I don't think I've ever heard of Lewis. What did you do for a living?
Lewis and Clark discovered a plant in the forest in New Orleans.  It was a wild plant.
Lewis was a great man.  He found a lot about plants that were native to North America.
They found a bunch of herbs and vegetables.  I was so surprised and surprised. 
They found some of the most common plants that are native to Asia.  I was really impressed with them!
Lewis and Clark discovered the potatoes that were native to the Americas. 
I'm not sure but they were very valuable, they were used for their medicinal purposes.
Lewis is one of the most famous and influential plants in the world, he discovered the lewi tree.
I'm not sure. But it is a good one. They are native to Asia. 
I am not sure, but they were able to find a lot of new plants and vegetables.
Lewis and Clark discovered that they were the first species to be discovered in Europe. 
Lewis was the founder of the company, and was a very important plant for the company.
I would say Asia, but there is so many. I'm not sure what is the most populous country in the world.
The most populous continent is Antarctica and the most densely populated one is Africa and Asia.
I think it was "The Notebook" by J. Rowling.  I read it a couple of times and it was really good.
I'm not sure but he was born in 1959 so he has had a lot of practice.
I don't know but I know that the country is located in the Atlantic Ocean.
The Republic of Ireland is the largest in the EU. It is the third-largest country.
I don't know, but I know it's the fourth least populated country in Europe.
The EU is the third-largest country in Europe and second largest in the world by area.
I am not sure but I know that it is a sovereign state in the United States.
I'm not really sure, but I know that it's the third-largest island country in Europe.
I am not sure where exactly but the country is in the Caribbean and I have been to Brazil before.
April 30, 1948. He was born in 1981.   
I'm not sure but I do know that the first book was released in the US in 1937
It was June 29, 1947.  I am not sure how long ago he was born.
Voldemort's birthday was on June 21st, 1972.  I was shocked!
I'm not sure but I do know that he was born and raised in the United States.  He is also an American singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure. She was born in the United States. She's an American singer and songwriter.
He was born in the US. I was surprised because he was born on August 21, 1948.
First Ford came out in 1972, and it's crazy to think it's been around since then!
I am not sure, but they are the most populous in Europe, the US, and the U.S
I don't know who did it, but it's a very famous story. It's been around a while.
I don't know who first discovered radons, but I do know that they are a type of radiation that has been around since the 1960s.
He died in 1894.  It was a long time ago.  I was sad when it happened.
The Beyonce, she is the greatest singer and songwriter in the world.
Bartolomeo Cristofori is the best. He was the best player on the team and the best in the world.
I think I remember Kyle Busch, Ronald, and Jeremy Clarkson.
I don't know, but I do know that they played for Manchester United United in the United States, which is interesting.
I'm not sure but I know that Manchester United is the oldest club in Europe.
I'm not too sure but I know Barcelona is one of the most successful club players in the world
They are Bartolomeo Cristofori and Die Barton, they are very good
I am not sure, but Manchester United has been playing for quite some time.   
I don't know but I know Manchester united was one of the best players in the world.
I am not really sure but Manchester United played with Barcelona and Bartolomeo Cristofori.
I'm not sure, but I do know Manchester United has won three World Series Championships.
I'm not sure but they are the best.  Manchester United is my favorite team!
I don't remember but I know the Manchester United United is one of the most famous teams in the world.
I'm not sure, but he was born in August of 1949. He was an amazing artist
I'm not sure but they were one of the first major European nations to join in the war.
I'm not sure, but the French government was a major force during the Civil War. 
They were the ruling force in Italy and then they became the second-largest military entity in the world.
I have no idea, but it is a pretty old name.  I was thinking it was a little older.
I don't know but it is the world record holder of gold at the Olympics.
Yes, I think it is the smallest. It is also located in Mexico and Central Mexico.
It is a mountain in the Caribbean. I would love to visit the Rockies one day.
No, I don't think so.  I think he is still around.  He has been around since 1962.
Victoria Bautistas is a professional baseball player. He is the lead singer of the team.
They live in my apartment building and I have no idea what they are doing.  It is very loud and I hate it.
Libya's neighbors are a large city in the United States and they are very nice people!
I don't know, he has no idea. It's been going on for a long time now.
I don't know.  He's a pretty old man.  I've never met him.
They are a very nice family. They have lived in my family for a very long time. 
My neighbor is a lawyer. He's very nice and helpful. I don't know if I should confront him about it.
She's a great neighbor. I don't know if I want to bother her about it but if I did I probably would.
I am not sure. I am trying to figure out.  I have been trying to get out and talk to her.
I'm not really sure. I just got out of the house. It's been a while since I've seen him.
She is my neighbor. She is a good person.  She is always nice to me. 
I'm not sure. I don't think he's very tall, but he is a pretty good dancer.
I'm not sure, but he was the first US president of the United States. He was a very successful politician.
I think he's 5 foot tall.  He is the first US senior citizen to be president of the U.S.
I am not sure but I do know that there is a state called Portland, Oregon
I'm not sure but I know that Oregon is the 4th largest state in US.
I am not sure. But I do know that the album was number one in the United States.
It was an unprovoked war between the Germans and the Apollo-Scottish army.
I don't know, I was just watching the news.  I was thinking about the winner though.
The first one was in 1963, but it ended in August of 1967.
I am not sure but it was his birthday. He was an American singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure but it was a German automaker that founded Audi.  
No, he was the CEO of Audi and he founded the company.  He was very successful!
I am not sure.  I have not heard of her yet.  What is her name?
It was Jeff Bezos. I was so excited when they found him. He was a great driver and founder of Audi.
Miley Rolling Stone is an American singer and songwriter. He is pretty good.
I don't know, but I know that Miley is the American singer, songwriter, producer, and record producer.
Miley Riggs is an American singer-songwriter. He was born and raised in Los Angeles
Miley is an American singer and songwriter for the American pop record label.
Jason Scott Lee is a great actor! He was born and raised in New York City, which is why he's so famous.
I am not sure but it is the most prestigious school in the state of New York.
I am not sure but I know it is in the state capital of North Carolina.  I know that is where it is located.
The University of North Carolina! It's located in the southeastern state of the United States.
The Pope of Pope. He was also the founder of The Pyramid in Bethlehem.
The Great Pyramids were the tallest structure in the world for sure! I can't believe it was over 600 years ago!
I don't know, but it was one of the most expensive constructed structures in history.
I'm not sure, but I know that the building has been around for a very long time. 
The Tennessee state in the southeastern region of the United States. 
I think Tennessee, but I'm not sure. I know there's a lot going on in that area.
I'm not sure. I was just trying to find out. I'm sure she was adopted by her biological family.
I'm not sure about that, but I do know that he was elected as President of The U.S. in 1945.
He was a great American politician. He served as the President of the U.S. and was president of the United States.
It is in the Caribbean Sea.  It's a beautiful place.  I love it there!
The U.S. I'm not sure but I do know it is the largest and most sparsely populated country in the world.
A bishman is someone who was elected to the Roman Empire. He is a great man.
It's called Sydney, and it's the most populous city in the country. 
I'm not sure, but it was the first time he was elected. He had been in office for 8 years.
I'm not sure but I know he was the 45th president of the united states in 2009
Obama is a former US president of the United States. He is also the 45th president in the US.
I'm not sure, but she was a very good actress and singer. It was a great year for her.
I'm not sure, but it was in 1988. It's hard to believe she was so young.
I don't remember. I think he was an English singer, songwriter, and actor.
Her name is Mia and we are going to the movies.  I have been wanting to see her since we were little.
She was my mother. I had to call her to see what she was doing. I felt so bad for her.
I'm not sure what you mean. She's my mom. She was a mother of two.
Mom Terena.  She's a wonderful mother.  I miss her so much. 
Her name was Joseph.  I don't know what I'd do to her if I didn't know she was dead.
He attended Columbia University, but he didn't get accepted. He was accepted to Harvard though.
Eminem was the best rapper of all time! He's been around since 1981!
I don't know but she was a very popular figure in the US during the 1960's.
Its in the mountains of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. 
The earliest recorded documentation of Hindu culture dates back to the 10th century
They were born in 1974.  He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
Yes. I was born in 1954 and I was the youngest in my family. 
I'm not sure, but it's been a long time since I've heard of her. She was born in the United States
I don't remember, but she was very attractive. She was also a great dancer and singer. 
Yes, it was in a hurricane.  The whole area was devastated.  I am so sorry to hear that.
New Zealand is a great place to visit.  It's located on the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure, but I know that it is the fourth-largest country in the US.
New Zealand!  It's the third-largest country in the world. 
i think joseph heller was the strongest. he was also one of the best in the world
I think it was the Arnold Arthur Cardinals, he is the greatest athlete of all time.
I'm not sure, but I know that he has won more than 100 games.  He is also one of the most decorated athletes in the world.
Frank Lucas is an American singer-songwriter, actor, producer and actor.
she was an american singer and songwriter, she was in a few bands. 
My grandmother. She died when I was very young. She was a good mother. I miss her.
I have never been to Nevada but I know it is the 3rd-most populated state in the US.
It's the 3rd-largest city in Nevada, so it's pretty big
I'm not sure, but I know that there are over 80000 residents in Nevada.
It is a major city in the southeastern region of the united States. 
I'm not sure but I do know that it is one of the most sparsely populated and densely populous cities in the US.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the 8th-largest city in Nevada.
I'm not too sure but the SNES was the first console to be released in the US.
Prince Royce June 30, 1985. It was a great year for him!
I don't remember, but the first Indian Prime minister was elected on August 1, 1945.
I am not sure who is but I do know the first Indian Prime Minister is the ruler of India.
It's the 3rd-largest state in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't really know, but I think it is the 3rd smallest by population and the second-largest in the world.
I am not sure of the number but I know that Russia is the 3rd largest state in the world
They're the second-largest city in the world.  The second-most sparsely populated city.
They are the largest in the world by area and they have the second-largest population.
I'm not sure, but it's one of the largest cities in the US and the third largest in the world.
The capital is Memphis and the largest city in Russia is Kyoto. 
I'm not sure, but they are the third-largest state in the U.S.
Russia is the third largest country in the world, and the fourth smallest in the US.
The largest is Bangladeshi, and the second-most populous in the world
I would love to visit the 3rd largest metropolitan area in the world, but I'm not sure how big it is.
I am not sure. But it is the third most densely populated in the world.
The third largest city in russian is dallas.  Do you know anything about russians?
They're all over the world, but the biggest are Memphis, Kyokok, and Vietnam.
I am not sure but I do know that Russia is the only US country that is bordered by China and the United States.
I'm not sure but it was the third-largest metropolitan area in the US by population.
I'm not sure, but they have the most densely populated of any city in the world.
The capital, Oregon is the largest and most populous metropolitan area in the world.
I am not sure but the 3rd most populous city in the world is Munich
The capital is Detroit, Michigan.  It is the largest city in the US.  I have never been there.
I don't know the exact numbers but they are a big metropolitan area in the US.
I am not sure but I do know it is in the US.  It is in Los Angeles, California.
Yes!  He's been in quite a few.  He was a good actor in The Godfather.
I'm not sure what he was in, but I do know he was born and raised in Birmingham.
He is an American singer-songwriter, actor and dancer. He's been in a few good ones.
He has been in a lot.  He was born in New York.  What movies have you seen?
He has been in a few good ones, but I think he is best known for his role in The Godfather.
I don't know if he has, but he is an amazing actor. He was born in 1949.
I don't know, but I know he's a great actor. He's been in a couple of big roles.
He was a good actor, but not as good as Jeremy Clarkson was.
He has been in a few.  He was in "The Foundation", and "The Number of the Beast".
Yes, I think he has been in a lot of movies.  His real name is Richard Gerella.
No, I don't remember.  I know he was in "Slap Shot" though.
I think he was in the Godfather movie.  I loved him in the first one.
He was in "The Godfather" which came out in 1977. He did a great job.
He was in The Godfather.  He was a great actor.  It was a classic.
Yes he was, he was great in the 1986 film "The Number of the Beast"
He was in "Jump Street".  He was pretty good in it.  I think he is one of the best actors of all time.
He was in The Godfather, which is one of the biggest American actors ever! 
I don't remember the name of it, but I know he starred in a few good roles. He was a great actor.
He was in a comedy movie.  He was also in the show "The Voice".
He was an actor in the movie "Let's Go" that came out in 2009.
John bon bon bonn jovine was a great actor and songwriter in the 1970s
John Bon John was an American singer and songwriter, actor, producer, and author.
I don't think I have seen any of his movies, but he is a great actor. I like his voice.
John bon bon bon john jovi is an American rapper and actor. Have you seen him?
I don't know about movies, but he is a great actor.  He has been in a lot of movies.
He was an actor, singer, songwriter, and dancer in several roles.
He played in some great movies like "Love Me Do" and "Slap Shot".
John Bon jovis was born and raised in New York City.  Do you like him?
John bon bon bon jovine starred in a variety of roles. I have never seen any of his movies.
He is one of the best singers in the history of rock and roll. He is also a great actor.
I haven't played it yet, but I have been wanting to.  Have you heard of it?
Southwest is in the southeastern part of the United States, and it is very hot there. 
She is the best-selling female singer of all time!  She was a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
The Atlanta Falcons were formed in 1962 in Tallahassee, Georgia
The Atlanta Falcons were founded in 1962 by Bobby Jean King.
Atlanta Falcons are the current Atlanta football team in the southeastern United States
The Atlanta Falcons are a professional football team located in the Atlanta area in Atlanta
They are the Atlanta Falcons, a professional basketball team based in Atlanta, Georgia.
The Atlanta Falcons are the Atlanta team based in Atlanta, Georgia.
They are the Atlanta Falcons, they were founded in Atlanta, Georgia in 1962.
The Atlanta Falcons are one of the oldest franchises in the league.  They were founded in 1962.
They are the Atlanta Falcons.  They are a professional baseball team in Atlanta.
Atlanta Falcons is the oldest franchise in the NFL. They were formed in 1961.
Atlanta Falcons are the Atlanta United States professional team based in Atlanta, Georgia
Atlanta is a football team based in Atlanta, Georgia.  I have been watching them since they were in the Atlanta Falcons.
Atlanta Falcons are the Atlanta Atlanta Galcons. They are the oldest franchise in the league.
Atlanta Falcons are an american professional football team from Atlanta, Georgia.
Atlanta Falcons are a professional football team based in Atlanta. I am a big football fan.
No, I'm not familiar with the Atlanta Falcons.  What is that?  I know they are a professional football team based in Atlanta, Georgia.
I have a favorite team. The Atlanta Falcons are a professional football team based in Atlanta.
Atlanta Falcons are a professional basketball team from Atlanta, Georgia.  
No. I don't know much about them. But I do know that they are the oldest franchise in the NFL.
Atlanta Falcons were a professional American football team founded in Atlanta, Georgia.
Jack Black was a 1996 American film starred in a theater in Las Vegas, Nevada.
They were the Washington Capitals. It was the last time I saw them.  I was so upset.
I think it was the Indiana Raja.  It was nominated in the Academy Award.  Did you see it?
Justin timberlake, he was born in toronto. I think he was just a baby when he was 14.
He was born in Vancouver, Canada.  He moved to Canada in 2009.  I was so excited to see him.
Justin timberlake.  He is a Canadian singer and songwriter.  I have not heard of him before.
I'm not exactly sure, but I do know that his first album was released in 2009.
Justin bienn Bieber is a Canadian singer and songwriter. Do you like him?
Justin Bieber is an american singer, songwriter, and record producer born in 1997.
Yes, he was born in New York City.  He was born on August 21, 1989
I don't know, but he was an American actor and actor for the Disney Renaissance.
I'm not sure, but he was the CEO of the United States.  He was a great man.
It's the capital of New Zealand and it is the largest city in the United States.
New Zealand is the capital and largest city in the country.  It's also the largest in the world.
Paul and Munro was in "Slap Shot." It was a classic. 
I dont know what you mean, but I know that the film was nominated for five Academy Awards.
The Grammy Award winner was Mick Jagger and Richard Simon.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail. The highest mountain in North America. I love it.
It is in Southern Italy, and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
It's a mountain range.  It is a mountain ranging from the Appalachian National Scenic Trail to Maine.
I'm not exactly sure but I think it is a mountain in the southeastern region.
It's the Atlantic Ocean.  I've never been to Italy but want to go.  
I'm not exactly sure, but I know Switzerland is bordered by France.
I'm not sure, but it is a federal republic and is bordered on the gulf of mexico and the pacific ocean.
I don't know, but I know that they had the highest GDP of any other Spanish colonies.
I'm not sure, but I know it was a Spanish colonial possession in the 1500's, and it was one of the oldest in the world.
I am not sure, but I am sure there are a lot since they're one of the 50 U.S. states.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is the most sparsely populated state in the USA.
I don't know but I do know that the Nevada mountains are the highest mountain in the world.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail, which is the longest mountain in North America
I think it is the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. It's a long distance hiking trail.
Portugal is a beautiful place.  It's a river that connects the country to Spain.
I am not sure, but I do know it is a river that flows along the coast.
Portugal is one of the most beautiful cities in the world. It is located on the northwestern tip of Spain.
I am not sure but I know it is one of the largest rivers in Europe.  
The one that runs through the Mediterranean Sea is called the "River of the Chesapeake Bay".
The Atlantic Ocean.  It is one of the three major rivers in the world!
I'm not sure, but it's a river that flows in the Mediterranean Sea.
The river that runs through the Atlantic.  I'm not sure if it is a river or lake, though.
Portugal, It is one of the seventh-largest river in the world.
Portugal!  It is a beautiful river.  It's one of the most sparsely populated cities in the world.
I think Africa is the most populous.  But there are more than seventy different regions in the world.
He was a member of the U.S. Air Force and was a general of the Army.
I am not sure but the women that were the first African-American women to win a Nobel Prize.
I am not sure but it was the greatest literary award winning winning of all time!
He died in 1997, he was an American singer, actor, and producer and songwriter.
I am not sure but I know they are a sovereign country in the European Union.
The EU is in the European Union, and I have never been but it is the third largest country in the EU.
I'm not sure but I do know that they have the most sparsely populated of European countries.
I am not sure. I am from the USA, and I live in Canada.  I have always wanted to go to Europe.
I am not sure, but it was a small island in the Caribbean Sea.
The EU is located in the Republic of Ireland and the United States.  I'm not sure which countries are located there.
The EU is the European country located in the southern part of the Atlantic ocean.
I'm from Ireland, but I've been to Europe a few times and I love it!
The EU is one country located in Europe. It is the largest country in the European union.
I'm not sure but the country is the third-most sparsely populated country in the world!
I'm not sure.  I don't think I can say that I'm a member of the EU though.
Yes. They are an English rock band from Las Vegas, Nevada, I think.
Yes, I'm a member of the European Federation of the US. I was just talking about it.
I'm a member of the Euro, but I'm not sure if I'm going to join them. I don't know much about them.
Yes, my friend, I am a member of the European Union.  Do you know any?
I am not sure but it is a small island country in the Caribbean.  
Yes, I'm one of the members of the European Union.  Do you know anyone from there?
I'm not sure.  I just know that it was one of the largest countries in Europe.
I am from the United States, but my family is from eu. Do you know of them?
Yes, they're a member of the European Union, I think that's what I meant.
I don't know when it died but I do know he was an avid gardeners.
I'm not sure, but he was born in 1984.  He is a great actor and dancer.
I'm not sure, but I do know it is Canada's largest country in the country. Do you know?
The Queen Elizabeth Barton is the Prime Minister and the CEO of Canada.
Anakin Skywalker is the most famous of all time.   He was born in 1989.
I'm not sure. I think it was around the 1980's. I don't know when he was born.
Tenacious D is a hip hop group.  They're from New York City. 
I'm not sure, but Alaska is in the top 50 in the U.S.
New Jersey and Alaska.  I have never been to either.  What state are you from?
It was a major battle between the US and China.  It was in the late 20th century.
I'm not sure about the second largest but I know that the US is the third-largest country in Europe
I'm not sure but it is the third-largest country in Europe and the second-lastest in the world.
I'm not sure, but I do know it's the 3rd most populous state in the US
I am not sure. But I know he was the greatest actor in the history of the 1990 film "Tom Holland".
He was born in 1988. He's an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
He's dead in August 30, 2017.  He's been a great American singer and songwriter.
Georges Bizet died in August of 1978. He was born in 1874.
He was born in the late 1980s.  He was the greatest rapper of all time.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the most southernmost state in the U.S. 
They are all lake.  The ones that are on the eastern tip of the Mississippi.
The Grand Canyon is the largest and most populated lake in New Mexico.  
I don't remember the names, but I know that it's in Las Vegas.  The largest lake is Lake Champlain.
New orleans is my favorite place for lakes. It is located in Los Angeles.
It was on the front of the house. It was really scary, but I was able to see it.
Kate Midleton was born on March 1983 in Los Angeles. I think she was born in Hawaii.
I am not too sure, but she was the head of the University of Kentucky University
I am not sure of that.  But I do know that she was born and raised in the Philadelphia.
I think it was William Shatner. He was the captain for the New York Yankees.
I don't know. But the first one was in 1976. It was a long time ago.
I don't know but I know he was the first one to land on the moon. He was a very accomplished man.
The first human to ever land on the moon was March 39, 1968. I can't believe it was that long ago!
I don't know, but he was the founder of the Space Astrophysics
She was born in 1854. She was a great poet and songwriter.
Yes it is a state in the southeastern United States. Have you ever been?
Yes, he was a great Captain Smith.  He was one of the most famous and influential people of all time.
The Washington Capitals, they are the team that has won the Stanley Cup. They are a great team.
The director of "Blindian" was nominated for an Academy Award.
I think the first Indian Oscar winner was Leonardo Di DiCheli.
I'm not sure who was, but I do know that they won the Olympics in 2008.
I think it was the Beauty and the Beast.  I loved it!  The Beast was my favorite.
Disney was founded in 1937. I don't know when it was first though. 
No I'm not sure if it was the first one but it was a great movie! I can't believe it was made by Walt Disney.
I am not entirely sure but I do know that there are some mountains in the eastern part of the world.
It is in the mountains of Spain, I think it is the longest mountain in Europe
The mountains in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail, it's the longest one in the world.
I don't think I've ever been but I know that they're one of the most influential and powerful in the US.
I don't know, but I know that the New York Times was the most influential newspaper in the United States.
New York City, New York, is one of the most populous cities in New York.
New York City has been described as the most influential city in the US and the most populous in the world.
The sixth president of the United States.  I'm a big fan of the president Obama.  He is one of the most influential people in the world.
New York City, a major center for finance, entertainment, finances, commerce and sports.
Yes, I'm sure they are from New York. I don't know much about them though.
New York State is the capital and the most densely populated state in the US. 
New York State is the capital of the United States.  Did you know that?  It's a great big city.
I'm not sure, but I know that the US president has been the US President since 1945.
The New York State is the most populous state in the United States, and was founded on June 2, 1945.
Yes, but I am not sure what you mean?  I am sure it was a very long time ago.
Yes, the first president was John Gilbert in 1853.  He was elected president of the United States.
Yes, and the United States is the most densely populated country in the US. 
I think it was called "Misty Mountain Mountains." They were formed in Los Angeles, California.
Virginia State is the Governor, but it's still a long time ago.
Christianity is the largest and most popular. It is also one of the oldest major religions in the world.
I'm not too sure, but I do know that the church has been around since the Roman empire.
I don't know but I know it is very influential.  I think it is the world's most influential religion.
I believe it is Christianity, but I am not 100% sure. I do know that the US is the largest and most sparsely populated country in the world.
I don't know but there are over 2.3 million followers in the US, so there should be a lot!
I don't know but they were the first major religions to be established in the US in the 19th century.
I am not sure about the USA but I do know that Jesus is the Son of the Messiah.
I am not really sure.  I just know that there are a variety of religions.  
Yes, they are all in Nigerian.  I have always wanted to go to Nigreia, but I have never been.
No, just one. I was surprised to see that she was able to get the position. 
I think all minis are, but I don't know if it's a big one. 
No, it is a private island in Saudi Arabia. It is a nice place.
Yes, but they're in the UK. I've never been to Nigera, but I hear it's a nice place.
I believe so, but I have no idea what to do. I'm so anxious about it.
No, I'm not sure what I'm doing. I just got a promotion. I am not sure if it is a big deal.
No, they're all in Africa, but I've heard of some of the Northern Africa.
I am not sure, but they are all over Africa. I am so scared to leave.
I'm not sure, but I know that the Minister is a Senior of the United States.
I'm not sure about that, but they are the highest ranking of the ministers in Africa.
I'm not sure but I know the United States is the third-most populous country in the world. 
Yes, but it is very small. It is the third largest of the united states. 
It was held in Brazil.  It was a lot of fun.  The winners won.  I was so happy.
The world cup was held in Brazil.  It was a great event.  I watched all the games and watched all of them.
She was an American actor, singer, dancer, actress, and singer.
It was a battle between the King and Army.  It was pretty intense.  I was so nervous.
I'm not sure. But I'm pretty sure he was married a few times before he got married.
I'm not sure, but I do know he was an American rapper from New York.
I'm not sure, but it was the annual anniversary of the United States of America.
It was in 1962 when he was a young man.  I don't remember when it ended.
I am not sure, but I know that there are a lot of small cities in the country.
I'm not sure, but I know they are the third most populous city in the United States.
Yes, but it is also the second-largest metropolitan area in America.
I don't know, but I do know that it has the highest population of any major city in US
They are Billy and Bert. I love Bert, but they're all grown up now.
I don't remember, but I know he was born in the United States. He was a famous actor.
The names of the children are Jacob and Bonne. Do you know them? 
Typically they are called Cobbs, but there are a few others I can remember.
I don't remember his name, but I know that he is very smart and very talented.
His full name was Bert and he was a great driver.  I was very surprised when he did that.
His name was Josh.  He was a great player and a great coach.  I wish he would still play!
Her name was Megus.  She was a very good dancer too.  I was so happy for her.
Typically they were names that weren't used on television, like on the internet. 
Typically they were named "Bella" and "Cheryl". It was a cute name.
Ty Cob was his favorite, he was a great driver. He was also a great athlete.
I don't know, but I know that he was a very good one.  I'm just glad he didn't die.
Ty Cob is a famous American singer and songwriter.  I don't remember the name, but I know he was a great singer.
I think it was Megus.  He was very nice.  I don't have to worry about him anymore.
I'm not sure, but I think they were all very good. They were a very good team.
Her name is Jennifer and she was born and raised on Honolulu, Hawaii, and was raised by my grandparents.
Typically, it was just Cobb.  He was a great driver.  I was impressed.
I don't remember, but they were a lot of names. It was a very long time ago.
Her name was Meganne, she was born on June 2, 1978.
I am not sure, but I know they are a very famous singer-songwriter and songwriters.
His name is Joseph and he's the youngest, but he's a very good driver. 
I don't know, but they're a very popular family show.  I know he won the Mississippi State Basketball Championship last year.
Ty Cob is the youngest of the two, and they are a little older than I am.
Ty Ty Cob is a famous American singer and songwriter, he is also a great artist, actor and singer.
Ty Cob is a famous comedian.  He was born in 1974.  
He was 34. I thought he might have been younger than me. I'm not sure what he was thinking.
He was the ruler of the Kingdom of Aragon in the late 18th century. He was a very influential man.
I don't know, but I know that it's the most successful movie of all time. 
I don't know, but it's interesting that he did not appear in the witch potter movies.
It was called "Speaker of the Lambs" and it was directed by Jodhi May. 
He played in the series "Harry Potter" which was released in 1994.  I think he was a pretty good actor.
I don't know but he was in the Hitchhikers movie "Harry Potter".
He was in the Harry Potter trilogy, which was released in June 30, 1997
He did a movie called "Harry Potter" in the 19th century. It was a very good movie!
They were just the names.  I was so upset when I saw them.  They were so upset. 
The Washington Capitals.  I was so happy to see him finally get back into it!
The Washington Washington Capitals won.  I was so happy.  They were a great team.
The Washington Capitals.  I am a big fan of the Washington Dolphins.  
I'm not sure, but I do know that the Cavaliers are one of the original franchises in the NBA.
The Washington Capitals won the first NBA game of the year.  They were very good.
I don't know, but it is the highest grossing film in the world.   I am sure you will get a good one.
It was a 2009 American epic film starred Daniel Day-Lewis and Jodhi May
I'm not sure, but the film won the Academy Award for Best Picture. 
The Godfather. I think I saw it a couple of years ago. It was a great film.
I don't know, but the film was nominated at the Academy Award. 
I don't remember the name of it. But I remember the film was nominated by the Academy Award for Best Picture.
I don't remember the exact film, but the movie was nominated by a lot of awards.
I'm not sure but the first film was nominated by the Academy Award in 2008.
I don't remember. But I do know that the best picture ever was nominated by the Academy Award.
The Godfather, it was so good. I can't believe they won so many awards
The Pictures. It was nominated by the Academy Award in 2009.
It was The Notebook and it came out in 2009.  It was nominated by Academy Award Awards for Best Picture.
I don't know, but it was nominated by Academy Award Awards for Best Picture.
I am really not sure, but I know the film was nominated by the Academy Award for Best Picture.
I believe it was The Notebook, but it came out in 2009.  It was a great film.
The Godfather is a good movie. It is based on a novel by Joseph Heller.
The Godfather, it was a great movie.  It was nominated in 2009.
The Godfather is my favorite.  It's a good movie.  What about you?
The Godfather was one of the best movies in the history of Hitchhikers.
I don't remember but it's one of my favorites. I was really happy when it came out.
It's a romantic comedy. I haven't seen it yet. I'm hoping it's good.
The Godfather. I am really excited for it! I can't wait to see it!
I am not sure, but I know that it is going to be a great movie. It was nominated by the Academy Award for Best Picture.
I am not sure, but I do know that it was the best film ever made.  
It was The Godfather, I think I saw it in theaters when I was younger
I don't know but I do know it's a big deal.  It won Best Pictures awards for Best Director.
I am not sure but it was the best film of all time. It was nominated twice.
I don't remember, but I do know that it was nominated by the Academy of Picture
I don't know but I know it was nominated at the Emmy Awards in 2006
I believe it is The Godfather and it is the most influential film ever made in the world.
The Godfather was my favorite. It came out in the United States in May of 1997.
I believe it was the Oscar win for Best Picture. That's a good year for a great movie.
I'm not sure but I know that the Academy Awards were held in 2007, which is impressive.
I'm not exactly sure, but I do know that the film had a box office in New York and the studio had a huge budget.
I don't remember exactly, but I do know that the movie "The Notebook" was nominated in the Best Best Picture Achievement in the United States.
He died last year on October 21, 2017.  He was a very good friend.
The language is in the Philippine. It is the largest and most sparsely populated country in Africa.
It is spanish.  It is a sovereign country in the southern part of the united states.
It's a Spanish-American language.  It's also the third-largest country by land area.
Philippine is the largest country in the world. The capital is Manhattan.
I don't think it's officially celebrated yet, but it's been a while since I've had to celebrate.
It is the 4th day of the week.  We are going to a wedding.  I cannot wait.
It is the day after Thanksgiving. I can not wait for it to be here. 
Thomas Jefferson was born in 1873. His death was in 1853.
Thomas Jefferson died on August 28, 1994.  He was a great American author.
Thomas Jefferson was an American actor who was born and raised in Pennsylvania.
Thomas Jefferson died on August 29, 1903.  He was an American actor, director, and producer.
Thomas Jefferson was born and raised in New York City. He was an American rapper and actor.
Thomas Jefferson is an American American author. He was born in 1847.
Thomas Jefferson is a great American American poet and songwriter.  I don't know when he died.
Thomas Jefferson died on August 29, 1954. It was a long time ago.
Thomas Jefferson was born in 1873, so he was a great man!
Thomas Jefferson died in 1873. I don't really remember when it happened though
Thomas Jefferson died in 1974.  He was also a great man.
Thomas Jefferson is an American poet, and he died in 1953.
Thomas Jefferson died on June 28, 1904. It was a long time ago.
Thomas Jefferson died in 1872.  He was a good man. 
Thomas Jefferson was born in 1962. It was a long time ago.
Thomas Jefferson is one of the best American rappers of all time. He was born in 1883.
I think they died on June 30th, 1963.  It was a long time ago.
It was in 1978.  He was a great driver.  His wife was a nurturing mother to his children.
I think it was around 1968. I can't remember when it was so sudden though. 
He died a few years ago.  He was a great father.  I was sad when he passed.
I am not sure but I do know that he was an important person in America and the United States.
I'm not sure but it was a long time ago.  I think they were all grown up and he was just a kid.
Jefferson died on August 21, 2007 in a car accident. I was so shocked.
It was a long time ago, but he was a great father. He was a good father.
I'm not sure which one but I know that it is the most populous city in Australia.
Brazil, it's located in the Caribbean. I've never been there.
I have no idea but I do know that the Republic of Argentina was established in 1845.
Argentina. It is the capital, and the most populated in the US. 
I'm not sure but I know he's been on the show since 1998.  I know that's a long time.
George Eastman, it was a long time ago but it was in the early 19th century.
The main character was Jacob Price and he was also a wizard of the wizards.
The first American female astrophysicist named Ruth Handler in 1853. 
I don't know.   But I do know that the term "female" was first used in the late 19th century.
I'm not exactly sure but it was a war between the U.S. and the UK.
Israel is in the middle of a war. It was a long time ago though. I don't remember exactly how it happened.
They got it for winning Best Actor awards.  I was so happy for her. 
My favorite team was the Washington Washington Redskins, but I'm a big Washington fan. 
No, but it is the first Super Bowl ever.  I was so proud of them.
I'm not sure, but I know it's been a while since I was there. The winner was Michael Jackson.
I'm not really sure. I know there were some winners of the Super Bowl though!
I'm not sure but the winners were the best quarterback and the best in the world.
I am not sure but I know that it was a great moment in the history of the superbowl.
I don't know but I do know that in 1961, the Washington Redskins were the last team to win.
It is the Greater Atlantic. The Atlantic is the highest point in the Atlantic Ocean.
I'm not sure, but it was on a TV show called "Berie Dawn"
I think it was "Love Me Do" but I don't remember. I think they were in the show for a while.
Yes, she is an indie singer and songwriter.  It was a great experience.
I'm not sure, but I know she is a singer and songwriter. What's your favorite?
The capital is Atlanta, Georgia and the capital is Munich. It's the largest city in the state.
I'm not sure. But he was a good actor. He died on June 30, 1957.
I believe it was the United States, but I am not sure. He was raised in the United Kingdom.
I'm not sure what country he was born in, but he was the head of the church in England. He was the Pope of England.
I'm not sure what country it was born in but I know that the pope was born and raised in Panama.
Pope Benid, the Pope of England, was a member of the Choir.
He was born in the US. He was also the head of the Roman Catholic Church. 
It is a species of the narrow-wavelength carnivore.  
I am not sure but they are a group of elongated, carnivorous mammals that are not terrestrial
Yes! He's a singer, songwriter, and producer. He's pretty talented.
John Cena was an American wrestler. He was also a champion wrestler in the U.S. in 1993.
I don't remember his name but he is the wrestling champion. He's also a champion.
John Cena is a former wrestler, he was born in the United States. I love him!
He's a professional wrestler. I'm not too much of a fan of wrestling myself.
Her name is Emma.  She was born in New York and raised in Honolulu.
Hanna and Jacob. I think they're very good parents. Do you know them?
She is an American singer-songwriter, songwritter, and actor.
Emily Bronte is an American actress, singer, and songwriter.
Emily Bronte has written a lot of poems. She's also one of the most influential poetry writers of all time.
George Bush Jr is a US senior citizen.  He was the president of Yale.
No. George Bush Bush was a former president of the U.S. and he was a Republican.
Julia Roberts was a singer and songwriter from the Chicago area.
Mickey mouse is an American singer, songwriter, actor, singer and dancer
That was Johnny G.  He's been the CEO of the U.S. since 1948.
I don't know but I do know that the first time we flew out of town was in 2003.
Yes, he's been a great governor since he was elected in 2009. I'm so glad he's doing well.
It's a US company that is headquartered in Seattle, Wyoming. I'm sure they have a lot of places to visit.
I am not sure but they are the largest retailer in the world and I know they are a hugely successful company
I don't know, but I know they operates in Seattle, WA.  
It's a US based company based in Las Vegas, Nevada.  I'm excited!
I have no idea but I do know that it is headquartered in Seattle Washington.
I don't know but I do know that it is headquartered in Seattle, Wyoming, Canada.
I'm not sure, but I know that it was founded in Seattle, Wyoming. It's pretty big.
I'm not sure, but I know they are headquartered in Seattle. I'm sure that is why it's so popular.
He attended a university in Pennsylvania, Penn State, and U of Maryland.
He is the 45th president of the United States, and he is the president of America and the U.S.
No, he's not the president of the United States, I don't know why I didn't mention that.
I'm not sure. But I know it was the most prestigious of all time!
The Mountains of Asia, the Appalachian National Scenic Trail
I'm not sure, but I do know that there is a large mountain range in Asia.
Europe is the second-largest country in Asia. I would say that's a good question!
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is a long-hair mountain in the eastern part of Asia.
It's a mountain range in the western asian archipelago of the Pacific Ocean
Yes.  It is a mountainous region of Europe.  Do you know anything about it?
I think it was George Orwell. He was an important man in the history of American democracy.
No, but I know that the U.S president is the 45th president in the United States. 
I'm not sure but it's interesting how the US president is still the ruler of the world
I am not sure but the president was appointed by the president. I am sure he is a great president.
He was a prominent rapper and was inducted into the United States in 2010. He was one of the greatest rappers of all time.
He was killed by a drunk driver in a car accident. I was so upset when he died.
He had an attack. He was a great driver and he was very good in his life. 
I'm not sure, but I know it is the third most populous state in the US! 
I'm not sure, but I'm from Georgia and I know it's very sparsely populated.
Georgia is the 3rd largest state in the United States, but the least population in the southeastern region.
I'm not sure but it was a long time ago. I think he was born in June of 1944.
He's a former president of the united states. He's been around since 1983.
I'm not sure but I do know he's one of the founders of the world. 
I don't know, but it is very large. It's the third-largest country in the world.
Jim Craig went to the University of Michigan.  He is a great actor. 
His name is David. He was born on August 1981. He's been around a long time.
David Pelzer was a great American rapper and singer.  He was very good at singing.
It's an island in the Atlantic Ocean. It's a bit of a long island.
I believe Jeff Bezos did. He is one of the founders of Illinois.
I don't know, but I do know that the first female pilot was named Katheryn El Elmer Doolin.
It's a river in the Caribbean, but not in Budapest.
I think I am not sure. I do remember that it was the most decorated sport in the world though.
I don't know, but I do know the best team in the world is the Australians.
Dr. James Luther was a great American actor and author. He was also a great author.
I am not quite sure, but I do know he is considered one of the greatest political leaders in the world.
I am not sure who killed her, but it seems to be a crime in the US. 
Muhahammad was the name of my grandparents. I'm not sure why he decided to name her that name.
Her name is Sara, she's from the US and she's a beauty queen.
I'm sorry. Her name is Julia. She was born in Arkansas.
Douglas, he is the founder of the show "Doctor Who".  He is the CEO of NASA.
I'm not sure but I think the state capital is Memphis, Indiana. It's the largest in the world.
I am not sure but I know he is a great singer and songwriter. 
I am not sure but it was a surprise.  It was the last time I saw him.
I'm not sure when it started, it was in the early 1900's.  I think it started in the 1930's.
She is an American singer, songwriter, dancer and actress. She has been around for a while.
He's my favorite actor. He was born in 1983 and died in 1994. He's a good actor.
That's a good question. It was one of the most sparsely populated countries in the world back then.
Mariah Carey is an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Mariah Carey is an american singer who is an actress and songwriter
Mariah was my favorite singer and songwriter of all time!  She's been around since 1978.
Mariah was a famous singer and songwriter.  She is a pretty popular singer.
Portugal is the capital of the country, so it's a pretty big river! 
Portugal is the capital of the country in the northwestern part of Spain.  It's a small river.
Portugal, they are the capital of Spain. I have never visited it before.
I don't know but I do know that the river is the longest river in the world
The Gulf of Mexico is where I am from.  It has a lot to do with the water. 
I don't know, but I do know that it's very beautiful! I'm sure it's beautiful.
I'm not sure, but I know that the Mediteran sea is the largest river in Europe.
It's a small island off the Gulf of Mexico. It is a nice place to visit.
I'm not sure. But it's been a few days since I've been to the beach. 
It is the Greek river that runs through Italy. I am not sure if that is what you are talking about.
I am not sure but I am sure he will win. He is the 45th president of Ohio
The governor of Ohio was a former governor, but he was replaced by President Obama in 2001.
Ohio is a state in the Ohio United States. I don't know much about the governor though.
I am not really sure, but I do know that he was the 45th president of Ohio.
Yes, she was born on June 2, 1998!  That is such a long time ago!
I don't know but it was a very long time ago, she was a pretty good actress.
I think it was Leonardo DiCaprio. She's been a star in so many films.
That's a good question.  I'm not sure.  She was a good actress though.
I think it was Jennifer Aniston. She was a great actress. 
I'm not sure, but it must be Michelle Williams.  She was also a great dancer.
The first time they came, it was in 1777. It was a very long time ago.
I'm not sure, but I know he was born on March 30, 1981.
I don't know, but I do know that the world has a lot of Africa and Asia.
The US and the US are the 2nd least densely populated continent in the world
Africa is the only continent I can think of.  It's very hard to choose. 
No, I'm not sure.  I don't know if I'm the only one who is living in it.
I don't remember, but it's the smallest continent in the world and is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
The winner is Leo. He was the best player at the Oscar Games.
My favorite actor is Leonardo DiCaprio. He was the best actor of all time.
The winner of the 2008 Oscar was Michael Jackson.  That was the win.
I think it was Motley Crue, but I'm not sure who was the winner
My favorite actor was Leonardo DiCaprio. I was so happy to see him.
I'm not exactly sure. I do know that she's an American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
It is in the capital, Bethlehem, Egypt, which has the highest population of any city in the world.
Daniel Radcliff was the lead vocalist of the band, and he died in 1997.
It is the second largest country in India.  It's the largest and most sparsely populated country in the world.
It is a language in India that is spoken in the sub-continent of the Americas.
I'm not sure but they're the only ones with a majority of Indian subcontinent.
The official language is English.  It is very popular.  There are more than seventy languages in India.
Yes, he was married to Elvis Presley.  I'm so happy for him.  Do you think he'll get married again?
She is an American actress, singer, and songwriter.  I have never heard of her.
The largest one is Kansas.  It's the third-largest by area.
It was the 4th-largest country in the world, so I would assume that is a lot.
The Appalachians are the tallest mountains in the world, but they're not as tall.
I don't know, but he is the most decorated swimmer in the Olympics.
Jimmy Duggar is an American comedian, he was born and raised in New York.
I don't know but i know she is a great actress, singer, songwriter, producer
It's not the largest, but I do know its the most densely populated city in Europe.
I don't think that is the birthplace of Bryan Donahue. I know he was born in 1973.
Bryan Donahue was born in Bentonville. It's the capital of the state of Arkansas.
Brady Brady is an American quarterback, quarterback and quarterback for the New England team, I think I know him.
I'm not sure but I know that he is a quarterback for the NY Giants!
Jan Brandy is an American football quarterback for the New York Giants. 
Jan Brady was an American quarterback who was the quarterback for the New England football team.
Brady Janne is a great American football quarterback, who is also a quarterback.
Brady Brady was a quarterback and quarterback for the quarterback of the New England.
Brady Brady is an American Football quarterback, and he is the quarterback for the New York Giants.
Brady is the quarterback for the New England quarterback, I don't know who plays him.
She is an American singer, songwriter, and author.  She's pretty famous.
I think she is a great singer and songwriter. I love how she is able to sing.
I'm not sure, but I know that he is a singer-songwriter
Drake is a singer-songwriter.  I love him!  He's also a producer.
I don't know. But I do know he was a singer and songwriter.
Drake is one of the best actors of all time. He is also the most successful actor in the world!
I think Mindy Rowling, she is a very popular actress. Do you like her?
Selena Gomez is an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
The album by Selena Gomez was released in 1994. She is very talented!
Selenas was one of the first albums to be released. It was released in 2009.
I love Salena Gomez, she is a singer and songwriter. 
Selena Gomez was an American singer/songwriter and producer, she is a great singer.
She was born in 1983! I was a little surprised at how old she was. 
She was married to Micheal Jackson in 1963, she was also a great actor!
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail.  It's a long, long distance mountain.
He was drafted in 1978 and he was in the quarterback position in the NFL.
I'm not sure, but I know that the Emirates are the oldest English team.
He was an architect.  His father was a lawyer, but he died in 1948.
I'm not sure but I know it is the 4th-most populated state in the United States.
I'm not sure but I do know that it's the most densely populated of the United States.
I have never been to New York.  I would love to though, I heard it's very nice.
It's in the Appalachian National Scenic Trail, and it's a beautiful lake in the mountains.
It's a big lake in New York. It's called the Manhattan Island.
He was an American singer and songwriter. He was born in Jackson, Illinois.
Michael Jackson was the founder of the University of Pittsford, Illinois.
He was a famous American singer, songwriter, and actor.  He was very successful.
He was an American singer and songwriter, actor, and producer.  He was a very talented actor.
He was a great American singer and songwriter.  He was in a lot of bands.
Yes, I went on a cruise and it was beautiful. I was so happy I went.
No, I've never been to a Mars, but I know that it is one of the oldest and most sparsely populated countries in the world.
I have never been there, but I know it's a place in the middle east. Have you?
I have never been to Mars, but I've always wanted to! It's a beautiful place. 
Arkansas is the 21st most sparsely populated, but it is the second least densely populous state in the US.
Arkansansas was founded in 1845 by the Mississippi State. 
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is in the Northern Italy.
I am not sure what mountain it is but it is a mountain range. It is the highest mountain on the eastern side of Italy.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the highest mountain in France. It is very high.
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is one of the highest mountain ranges in the world, so I'm not sure.
I'm not sure, but I know it is the third-largest country in the world!
I think so, the highest point is in Paris, France, I'm not sure what that's.
I would like to visit the country of France. It is the capital and largest city in Europe.
I'm not sure but it is in the south of the country in the Atlantic Ocean!
I'm not entirely sure, but I'm sure it's somewhere in Paris. It's a huge tourist attraction.
It's the capital and most populous city of Paris, France. It's in the southern tip of the country.
New Zealand!  It's the second-most densely populated country in the world!
I'm not sure, but it's the second most densely populated city in the U.S.
I am not too sure but it was a great match. I was very impressed by their performance!
I think it was Argentina.  I was rooting for them because they were the only team that did it.
I am not sure but I know he was born and raised in England, so I would have to be there.
Ozzy Ozbourn was the lead singer of the Beatles. He was an English singer.
Ozzy was a singer, songwriter, producer, record producer and actor.
He was an English singer and songwriter.  He was also a producer.
It was a man named James Bond.  He died in August of 1997.
The first US citizen was Joseph Heller. He was also a former president of the U.S.
I believe it was last year in March.  He was also in the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
Elvis Presley was born and raised in Las Vegas. He was also a singer.
I don't know but it sounds like he's a great artist! What concert was it?
That is a good question.  I do not know the team that won.   Do you like it?
I am not really sure but I do know they had a very good team.  They won the World Cup.
I think it was the Arkansas Rugby World Cup.  I was rooting for that team.
He was born in 1983. I believe he was born and raised in Birmingham.
His name is Josh, he's a singer and songwriter. He's pretty great. 
He is the American rapper and actor who was born and raised in Houston, Texas
I'm not sure but I know that it was hosted by the hosting team of the United States.
He died in August of 1989.  I was really sad when he died.
I believe it was Bartolomeo Cristofori! He was a great leader!
The leader was Barton, he was a great leader for England and the United Kingdom.
I'm not sure. I don't know who Tamel J J Mann is, but it sounds like he is.
Tamela Mann is a great American singer, songwriter, dancer, actor, and producer.
Hans Cristian is a Scottish sci fi author who was born in 1874
They are a fictional novel written by Hans Christian Andersen.  They are very popular and popular.
They are a series of novels written by Hans Christian Andersen.  I love his work.
Hans Christian Andersen is one of the most influential English novelists of all time.
They are books written by Hitchhikers.  He was a famous author.  
I'm not sure, but I do know that the US was the only country who had the highest immigration rate during the 19th century.
I'm not sure, but he was an American singer and songwriter.  I think he was a great actor.
I don't really know, but it is the third-largest city in the United States.
I'm not sure. But it is the most populous of all the cities in the U.S.
I'm not sure but it is the most densely populated major city in Europe. 
I'm not sure but I do know it's in the southern tip of Manhattan, New York, Brooklyn, and Staten Island.
I'm not sure but I've heard that it is in a large metropolitan area in the US.
The river that flows along the Gulf of Mexico is called River Tigers.
Harvard is a public school in the US. It is the second-largest private school in Canada.
Well, it is the most prestigious research school in the United States, and the largest public university in the world.
Russia is the third-largest country in the world and the fourth smallest country.
Yes, but I don't know what you mean by that.  Are you referring to the sovereign state?
Yes.  The country is in the southeastern part of Asia.  I am so glad I have never been there.
I'm not sure. But I do know that Russia is the only country that is not spoken in the United States.
Action film. It has been a while since I saw it but it was a really good one.
Mariah Carey is a great American singer.  She was a great singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Mariah Kelly is an American singer and songwriter. She is also a singer.
Mariah Carey. She's a very good mother. I'm so proud of her.
I'm not familiar with Maria Caryes. Is she an actress or singer?
Mariah Carey is a singer, songwriter, producer, and actress
I don't know, but he played a pretty good game. He played for the United States.
The captain is Bchas. He is the leader of the team and the captian of the national team.
I don't know. But I do know the team is the most important team in the world.
He is the captain of the team of France.  He is a great player.  Do you like soccer?
I am not sure, but I know he was a good actor and director of the Harry Potter series.
Harry truman is the best actor of all time, I love how he is a great actor.
He's a famous singer-songwriter.  He's been around a long time.
He was an American rapper from New York City.  He was a very popular one.
I'm not sure but I do know that Miami Dolphins won the Superbowl in 1966.
Yes, he was born in 1959. He was also a professional astrophysicist.
No, but I would love to go.  It would be cool to see what it would look like.
I don't know, but it must be James Cameron.  He was born in 1948.
Haylie Duff is an american actress who was born in 1961.
It's a language in the US that is a very old language. It has been around since 1845.
Michael Angaro was an american actor and singer, actor, dancer, and author
Michael Angarano is a great actor! He has won a lot of awards and has won many awards.
Michael Angarano is a great actor.  He played the part in The Godfather.
He was an American actor, actor, singer, and songwriter. He was also a dancer.
He is the lead singer and songwriter for the American rock band The Beatles
Michaelangeangeo is an American actor and singer. He has a lot to look forward to.
Michael Angaran is an American actor. He's a big fan of his work. 
The Godfather 2, but I don't know if I should watch it because I have no interest in Michael Angarano.
Michaelangeangeange is one of the most famous people in Hollywood, I like him!
I don't really watch many movies, but I know he's a great actor, and director.
I don't know, but I do know he is the lead vocalist for the movie "Slap Shot".
Yes, I've seen a few of his movies. I like his role in "The Godfather".
I have never seen it. I know it's one of the most popular movies of all time.
He's been in a lot of movies. He was also an actor in the show "Doctor Who"
He's a great actor.  I think he's the best of all time.  Have you seen any of his films?
He's in a few, but I haven't seen any of his movies yet.  Do you know much about him?
I have never seen any Michael Angarano in a movie. I do like his role in The Godfather.
I have seen some of his films.  He is a great actor.  Have you seen any of his?
I haven't seen it yet, but I heard it was really good!  Have you seen it?
Yes.  He is one of the most famous actors in the world.  Do you like him?
Yes! He played an American actor, singer, and songwriter.  He was also a producer and director.
Yes, it's been a while since I've seen it. I've been meaning to see it though.
I think he was in the Godfather. But I'm not sure what film he was starring in though.
He starred in "Slap Shot" and then he was in "The Godfather".
I believe she starred in the Godfather.  She is a great actress. 
He starred in Psycho, The Godfather 2, and the Birds.
I'm not sure but he was in a lot of films. I think he was a good actor.
He starred in "The Godfather" and then he was in "Strange Things" in 2003.
He starred in "Sharknado," but I haven't seen it yet. It was a great movie!
He starred in a couple of movies, but I'm not sure which ones, but he was a pretty famous actor.
I think I saw it in The Godfather. He was a great actor and director. 
He starred in Psycho. He was pretty good. I think he did a great job.
He starred in the Godfather. He is a great actor, and was one of the most popular actors in Hollywood.
He was in a few of the films, like "The Godfather" and some others.
Michaelangeangeo was an American actor, director, actor, and producer. He was also a screenwriter.
Michaelangeangeo is one of my favorite actors, and he played in The Wizard of Oz
Michaelangeangeange is the lead role in the Godfather. He was a great actor!
He was in a lot of films, like The Godfather and the Fantastic Four
Michael Angarano was the lead vocalist in "Slap Shot" and was a great actor.
I don't know, but he was an excellent actor. He was in so many great ones!
He was in the first one of the great American actors to play in the 1960s.
He was in the film "Lady Liar".  It was really good.  He was also a great Director.
He was in a few. He played in "The Godfather."  What about you?
He played in "The Four Dawns" in the 1960 film "Shawshank Redemption".
He is an American actor and singer-songwriter.  He was in "Mike Angarano"
I am not sure about that but he is the lead actor in The Video Games.
He's a good actor. He was born and raised in Los Angeles, California, which is where I live.
Michael Angaran stars in a lot of movies. He is one of the biggest stars.
He was an American actor and singer and songwriter.  He was born in 1959.
Yes, I think he was in The Godfather. He is one of the best actors of all time.
Yes, it was in "The Gods Among Us".  I think he is a great actor.
I believe he starred on "The Godfather", which came out in 1978.
He was the lead role in "Lovecraft" which is a historical action adventure film.
He starred on a comedy drama starring Michael Angarano. I like him.
Yes, I love Michael Angarano! He was born in 1973 and starred on Broadway in New York City.
He was in the Godfather 2, but I haven't seen it yet. He was pretty cool.
Michael Angarano was in the original "Science Fiction" in the 80's.
He was in a few good movies.  He was a great actor.  The movie "The Godfather".
Michaelangelo was the best actor ever, he was so great in the Godfather. 
I don't know but I do know he's been in some of the best superhero movies of the past.
Michael Angarano starred in "The Godfather".  He was also in the first one in the 80s.
He is in many.  He is the lead singer of the group.  Have you ever heard of him?
He was an American actor in a lot of movies.  He was a great actor.  
he is one of the best actors of all time, he's also a great comedian!
I don't know, but he was the lead actor for the movie "Sharknado".
Michael Angaro was in "The Godfather" which is an American epic epic drama film
The longest one is the Mississippi River.  It's the largest river.
Yes. I am sure you have heard of it. It goes all the way to the Pacific Ocean.
I'm not sure about that but it is a long island river. It is the longest in the world.
I think it's the Mississippi gulf of Mexico. It's the longest.
The longest one in the world is the Greater Smoky Mountains in North Carolina.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the longest of all rivers in the world
It is the Atlantic Ocean.  I have never been but have always wanted to go.
It is the third-largest state in the United States. I'm from the Midwest.
It's the Appalachian Mountains in the Appalsachian National Scenic Trail.
I am so sorry to hear that.  I know it's hard to believe that it happened. 
That is awful. It must have been so devastating. I hope it wasn't too hard to find the place.
The fire was in Bentonville Arkansas. It was so scary and scary!
I don't remember the name. He was a big fan of the show "The Biggest Loser" though.
She was a famous singer.  She was also a great dancer and songwriter.
I'm not sure but I know that the Aztacs established an empire in 1845.
I think you might be thinking of Africa.  It's the 3rd most sparsely populated Africa in the world.
I am not sure but it is a small island nation in the Caribbean Sea.
Jackie Ropins University. He played for the University of North Carolina.
I would have to say Ireland.  It is also the third smallest by area in the European Union.
I'm not sure but I do know that it is a small island country in Africa. 
I don't remember his name, but he was one of the best players at that time. 
I don't remember his name but I do know that he was an American rapper and producer
I'm not sure but she's been nominated for five awards. That's impressive. 
Settlers first came from the Anglo-Saxon and then they moved to the united states in 1845.
I'm not sure, but I do know it had to be a long time ago since it was founded in 1881.
It was in 1987. I was so excited for him. I think he is really talented.
He's an English wrestler. He was a champion of the United States in the late 1980s.
He is! He's a professional wrestler from New York City. He's been wrestling for years.
Randy Orton is an American professional wrestler. He was born on October 17, 1972.
It was a large amount of supplies from Japan. It was one of the first major battles in the war.
South Korea is one of my favorite countries to visit.  I think it is a really interesting place.
I'm not sure but I do know he is an American singer-songwriter.
He went to the college of Penn State University in Pennsylvania. He was a pretty smart guy.
I am not sure, but I do know that David Bieber has been involved in the United States since 1991.
He is the biological father of Diana Ross. He is my favorite singer.
I'm not sure but I know they were one of the largest and highest rated cities in the US for a while.
He was born in 1974, so it was quite a while. I guess he was born and raised in Hawaii.
He was born on June 30, 1985. It's crazy how far he has been going.
I am not sure but he did win the National Basketball Championship at his age.
It was released in 1997. It was the first of his movies to reach number one in the United States.
I don't know.  I am so sorry to hear that.  How are you feeling?
I'm not exactly sure but I know it is the 3rd smallest city in the state of Michigan.
I'm not sure, but it's the capital and most densely populated of the U.S.
I don't know but I know the first one was launched by March 2, 1969
Colorado is in the United States.  I have been there and it is beautiful and beautiful.
I'm not sure, but he was nominated for five Academy Awards for Best Actors in the world in 2009.
Yes, it is an Academy Award for Best Actor Award. He was nominated for the Best Actors award.
I think it was William Holden. He was a great actor. I think he won the Academy Award for Best Actor.
It is the capital of South Carolina, which is located in the Cumberland River.
I don't know but it's a very long time ago. But it's amazing that it's been going back to the Neolithic times.
I'm not really sure who the first person was. I think it must have been a very smart person.
The first person to be sent to the moon was a man named Charles Alderton, in the late 1960s.
I'm not sure of who the first one was but the first time I heard about it, it was a long time ago.
The United States.  The US is the 4th largest country by land mass.  It is also the 3rd-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure when the President retired, but I do know that Trump was the 45th President. That is quite a long time ago.
He is a great author, and one of the most influential and influential authors of the 20th century.
I don't know. I know he is the best-selling English singer ever. 
I'm not sure. I know he was an amazing dancer though. He was also a singer, songwriter, and actor.
Harry Truman was the head of the company, and the founder of the federal government. 
Her name was Jessie.  She had a hard time pronunciation.  I thought she was just being silly.
I'm not really sure but the Indian and Pakistan are the only two teams that have won the World Series.
I'm not sure, but I do know the Indian players have been around for over a century.
I am not sure but i know that the team was ranked number one in the Indian subcontinent.
I'm not really sure, but I know that Indian and Pakistan played in the Indian subcontinent
I don't know, but it's a great sport. I'm glad it's been around since the 19th century.
I'm not really sure, but I know that India and Pakistan played against China in the early 20th century, so they must have been pretty good.
I'm not sure but it seems to be the Bangladeshi Baseball Championship.
Well I am not sure, but I know they have been playing crickets all over the world.
I'm not sure but he's been playing crickets since the 1980s.  He was really good at it.
India, Pakistan, India and Bhutan are the only countries that played baseball in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know they were playing in India.  They are the largest and most successful team in the world.
I don't think I have heard of them, but I know that India and Pakistan have played a lot of baseball.
I believe it was the British Columbia team. They played in the Olympics.
I don't know, but I know that he was the most successful cricketer player of all time
It was the Indian subcontinent, but I think it was Bangladeshi.
I am not sure but I know India is one of the most dominant countries in the world.
I don't know, but I know India is the most populous country in the world. It must have been hard.
i don't know but it is a popular sport. it is the second most played sport in the world.
I'm not sure but Canada is the third-largest country in the world by area and the fourth-lowest by area.
Louis Joullet was a famous comedian. He is an American comedian and singer.
I am not sure but I know that the state has been in the US since 1845. It has been a long time.
He was in the Nfl.  He was a quarterback for the Washington Redskins.
I don't really know. I know he won the Nobel Prize in the 1980s though. 
I'm not sure who was the winner, but I can tell you that the US won it!
I'm not too sure, but it is a sovereign country in the southeast region of the world
I think it's the island called Kyakhstan, which is the largest island in the world.
He was born in 1828. He was one of the greatest presidents in the history of the United States.
I'm not sure when he was born but he was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the laws were originally written by a woman named Elizabeth Benton.
I am not sure but I do know that Florida is the most populous state in the United States.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is the 3rd-largest county in the southeastern US.
It's the most populous city in Scotland. It is also the second-largest city in the UK.
Scotland is the third-largest city in the English Isle! I would love to see it one day.
At the Olympics. I was surprised. They are one of the best bands in the world.  
She lives in the town of Buffalo, New York. I live right outside of town.
I am not sure but I know that he was a great author.  He is one of the biggest authors of all time.
Mickle Jacson was the first man to do it. He was also a great driver.
That's a good question, I think they have to be the Queen Elizabeth I don't know. 
I am not sure who the four political parties are, but they do have a large amount of money.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the largest cities are Atlanta, Georgia, and Memphis.
Yes they are the largest metropolitan area in Georgia and the most densely populated state
I don't know, but it's the 3rd most populous state in the southeastern region of the United States.
I don't know, but it's the largest metropolitan area in the world!
I'm not exactly sure but the first woman to be elected was the ruler of the state of Kerala.
The novel "Shawshank Redemption".   It's a great one.
I don't know, but the religion of Buddhism was first documented in the 10th century.
I don't know but I do know that the actress is a dancer and singer.
I think it is Daniel Day-Lewis, but I'm not sure he's in any of the sequences.
That's a great question.  He was a pretty big part of the show "Jeopardy."
I do not know, but he was a pretty good actor. He was a good actor and director too.
I am not sure of the largest, but I know it is the 3rd-largest island in the world
I am not sure but I do know it is the largest of the seas in the world. 
Well the main island is in the Caribbean.  I have never been.  What island would that be?
Probably the Greece. They are the second-largest country in the Euro.
I'm not sure, but he was the coach of the University of Kansas University
I don't know, but I know he's been a coach for the University of North Carolina
He was a coach of the University of Michigan, Michigan State, and a professional baseball player.
I am not sure but he was a coach of the Chicago Bears.  He was a good coach.
He was a coach in the University of North Carolina. I was surprised to see him.
Bryant was a high school coach in Florida. He was the coach of the Atlanta Georgia football team.
He was at the University of North Carolina. It was a long day and he was exhausted.
Bryant Coach was the coach of the University of Michigan. He is a great coach.
Colorado is the only state that is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico.  It's a nice change of scenery.
I'm not sure but I know that it's one of the longest river in the world.
Colorado is a beautiful state.  It's actually the 3rd most sparsely populated state in the US.
It is on the west end of the Mississippi. I have not been to Colorado yet.
Colorado is the second most populous state in the United States, and the 4th most densely populated.
Colorado is the third-largest state in the United States.  It is a nice change of scenery.
I am not sure but it was a great event. It was hosted by EuroBasket.
It was the University of North Carolina.  I am not a huge fan of Barbara Jordan.
Barbara Jordan was born in Chicago. She was the greatest ball player of all time.
She played at the University of North Carolina and was a champion. I was so happy to see her.
The University of Kansas City. It's been a while since I've been to school.
I don't know, I haven't watched it yet. I'll have to check it out.
Yes he was a great actor. He was a member of Madeleine Stowe, a British actress and singer.
It was a musical. I love musicals. It's my favorite. Steven is my favorite actor
I don't remember what it was but it was pretty good. He did a good job. 
Steven Spielberg, he is an american actor and singer, actor, and producer.
Steven Spielberg was in the Godfather 37 times.  He is a legend. 
He's a great actor! He's also a great singer, songwriter and dancer.
Steven Spielberg, the best actor.  He was also a great actor in The Godfather.
Steven Spielberg played in The Godfather, the greatest action movie ever made. 
New York is the capital!  It is located in the northeastern portion of the United States
New York City is a large metropolitan area in the southeastern region of the US
Georgia University of Alabama. I'm so excited!  I've never been to college before.
Georgia, it is in the Caribbean region in the Atlantic Ocean.
She's an American singer and songwriter. She's a singer as well.
Brittany Spears, a singer and songwriter. She is quite the inspiration.
I'm not sure but he was born in 1973. That's a long time ago.
He was born in Honolulu, Hawaii. It was a long day.
I don't know, but I do know she was a very important figure in the early 19th century.
I'm not sure, but he was the best in the world.  He won five awards for Best Actor of the year.
He won the Mr. Awards for Best Picture. He was also a great actor.
He has won three Grammy awards, two Awards, and two Emmy Awards
He won the NBC Best Actors award for Best Actor in the United States.
He won the Emmy Award for Best Science Award!  It was a great year!
I'm not really sure, but they are a large river in the Caribbean, which is the longest in the world.
He was a member of the King Arthur Convention and he had a membership of the Anglo-Scottish military.
Obama. He was a former president of the United States. He had won three consecutive presidential candidates.
I think it was the U.S. Arkansas. I don't know if Obama is the best president.
Humphrodavid Dave is a great American singer and songwriter.
Humphre was one of the most influential people of the early 19th century. He was one if the greatest of all time.
He's a singer, songwriter, producer, and author.  I love him!
It's the capital of Louisianas and it's a major metropolitan area.
The city is called Lake Champlain, which is located in the southeastern region of the United States.
Arthur Doyle died in 1997. He was an American actor, singer, and songwriter who died in 1983.
The last time I saw him was in the movie "Slap Shot" in 2009.
He died in the United States in the year of 1974. He was a great actor.
Yes, I was so happy to see him win. He won a few awards for his performance.
It is in Bentonville Arkansas. Its pretty big in the US. 
It's in the city of Brenham, Arkansas. It's pretty big, and it's the largest city in the state.
I am not sure but it was established in 1845. It was a small colonial possession
He was born in 1977. He's the oldest of four brothers and sisters.
He was an American singer and songwriter. He was born in 1983.
Yes, it was.  I'm not surprised that she's been around a while since she released her debut album.
I believe it was George Orwell, he was a prominent figure in the U.S.
I'm not sure but he was elected to be the 45th president in the United States. 
He was the president of the University of Michigan.  It was the highest ranked public school in the US.
I am not sure but it is the most prestigious school in the world. It has been around since 1845.
It is a small island in the Mediterranean Sea, so it is very peaceful.
I don't know. It is in the southeastern region of the U.S.
It's in the United States. I've been to Germany before. It's a beautiful country.
I don't know but they are a great country.  It's a great place to visit.
The country is located in Bavaria. It is very close to where I am.
It's a country that's bordered to Germany and Austrailia. I'm so excited!
It's a small town in the southeastern US. It's really beautiful. 
It's the United States. It's a great country.  I have been there a few times, but I don't speak any German.
The country is bordered by Germany, Italy, France, Germany, Belgia, and Spain.
Yes, and it's not just in the country, it's in the southeastern region.
I'm not sure, but I've heard it's the most populous in the EU.
I am from a neighboring country in Germany.  I am not sure I would want to move there.
Yes, I am from there.  The country's capital is Bavaria.  I have been there many times.
No, I'm not from the US, but I've been to Germany and it's the third most sparsely populated country in Europe.
No, but I would love to visit. I've always dreamed of going to the UK.
No, I'm from the USA.  I'm a native english speaker and speak english, german, and spanish.
Yeah, it's a country located in the southern part of the united states of America.
I live in Bavaria. I am originally from the UK but my family came from Germany.
No, I live on a suburban area in the US. I have never been to the country of Germany.
No, I live in a small town in New York City. I am not sure how far away it is.
Yes, I'm in Nebraska. It's very far. It is the third-largest country in the US.
Yes, that's right! It's a small country in the middle of Germany, but it's a very nice country to visit.
I think so.   I have never been there but I know it's a great place to visit.
No, I live in the United States, I am not sure where the nearer of the country is.
Yes, I live in the US. It's the largest country in the world. What country are you from?
I am not sure, but it is the third-largest country in the US by area.
I am not sure, I do know that I am from a small town called Bavaria.
She was an American singer and songwriter, and actress.  She was pretty famous.
I think she's a great American singer, songwriter, actor, and actress.
Colorado. It was the 4th largest state and the 8th smallest by population.
I'm not sure but it was the only state that was bordered by Georgia, Mississippi and Maine.
Colorado is the 8th most sparsely populated state in the US. 
Colorado is in the United States, it's the 3rd least populous state in the US
I'm not too sure, but we have been involved in a lot of wars over the years.
The US has been in several wars since then.  The United States is one of the most densely populated and influential countries in the world.
I don't remember but I do know that the United States had the longest war between the two nations.
I don't know but I do know that it was a war with the united states. 
I'm not sure.  But the first one was in August of 1963.
The United States has been in a lot of wars, including the United States, the Army, and the United Kingdom.
I'm not entirely sure, but I do know that the US is one of the most powerful nations in the world.
Alaska is a Northernmost state in the US. It is very pretty there.
Alaska is the most sparsely populated and densely populous state in the world.
It was in 2001.  I was so excited when they won the award.  Halloween is coming up!
It was in 1998. She was also the youngest in the Olympics. 
Halle Berry won the 2009 Oscar Award.  I was so happy for him!
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the 4th least populous in the US
I don't know, but I'm sure it is somewhere in San Diego, CA.
I'm not sure of the greatest, but I know it is one of the largest cities in the United States.
I don't know but it was an important battle between the British Empire and the Germans.
I'm not sure but I know it was a long time ago. The US was in a war with France and the UK.
It was between 1845 and 1953 when the war started.  It was a long time ago.
I am not sure but I know it is the third-largest country in the world by area.
I don't know, but I do know that Canada has the highest GDP in the US.  I know that's a good question.
I am not sure but it is the second smallest country in the United States and the fourth smallest by area.
I am not sure but he is the chairman.  I am sure he is doing a great job.
She was diagnosed with a heart attack. She was so lucky to have her in the first place.
I don't think so, but he was a great author. He was born in 1843.
He died in 1967.  I am so sad about it.  He was so talented.
I'm so sorry for your loss. He was one of the greatest painters of the past.
I am not sure but the sunday is coming. I am hoping it does not affect my house.
I have not looked at the details, but I have been to the Sudan Canal.
sunday, the head of the federal government, and sundays are my favorite day.
I'm not entirely sure, but I'm sure it is near Bavaria.  It's a beautiful country.
Jackie Kerse studies is an American singer, songwriter and actor.
He is an American actor and singer. He was born on March 25, 1948.
Justin Bieber is an American singer, songwriter and actor, actor, and producer.
He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii. I think he's pretty cool.
I don't know. I'm not sure. But it sounds like he lives far away from home.
Her name was Jennifer.  She was my best friend.  I was very upset.
Rolling Stone!  I was really excited to see her!  She's a wonderful woman.
Rolling Stone was an American singer, songwriter and actor. She was also a dancer.
I am not sure.  But she was a very famous actress, songwriter, and dancer.
She is an american rapper and singer and songwriter.  She is also a great dancer.
They are married to the American comedian Richard Dahl, a comedian. 
Kareem Abdul Jabar was born in the United States, in the 1880s.
Kareem Abdullah Jabbara is a US singer, songwriter, and producer.
It is the largest island in the Caribbean.  The island is called "Golden Island".
I'm not sure but he is one of the most influential women in the history of the United Kingdom!
No, it's a city in Los Angeles, California.  It's also the capital.
I'm not sure but I do know that Mount Everest was the highest mountain in the world in the 20th century.
I would have to say the Appalachian National Scenic Trail, but that's just because it's the highest mountain in the world.
The tallest in the world. The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the tallest!
The Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the highest mountain in North America.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is the third largest country in the world.
Her name is Joseph and I am a big fan of her.  I am sure she will do great.
He was born in Birmingham, England and moved to Maine in 1963. 
I think he explored a lot of places like the Appalachian National Scenic Trail
He explored a lot. He went to the Americas, Africa and the U.S.
In the mountains of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. I was so excited.
I am not sure but it was in an area of the Appalachian National Scenic Trail. I would love to see it.
He was a famous rapper. His name was Richard and Maurice Richards.
I have no idea, but I know he is one of the best American singer/songwriters of all time.
I think he explored the world of the United States.  He was an American astrophysicist.
He was born in New York.  He lived in Florida and was born and raised in Haiti.
Yes!  And the laws were passed in 2001.  I was so shocked that it was over.
I am not sure. I do know that she is married to a man named Peter Jackson
Jesse was a singer, songwriter, producer, actor and producer.
Jesse Mccartney was an American singer and songwriter, producer, and actor!
I'm not sure, but it is also the 3rd-most densely populated state in the United States.
The Atlanta Falcons are one of the oldest franchises in the NFL. They were founded in 1891.
I am not sure but she was ranked as one of the most successful female athletes in the world
It was invented in the 1930's.  I think it was the best selling chocolate in the world.
The third most sparsely populated country in the world.  I am sure you would like to know.
My brother is the singer. He is also a vocalist.  I was shocked.
Yes, it's the 3rd most populous state in the US. That's a big river!
Alabama is the southernmost state in the United States and is the 4th most sparsely populated.
I am not sure but I know the earth is very damaged. It needs to be repaired soon.
The world biggest one is the Atlantic Ocean!  It is the longest in the world!
I don't know, but I do know that they have a lot of money on renovating them.
I'm not sure about that but I'm sure it would be the Atlantic or Pacific ocean
The leaders of Algeria is Abdullah. He is an Algerian American.
The Algeria is a sovereign state in the southeastern region of Africa.
I don't know but I do know that they are a very important part of Algeria.
The rulers of Algeria, which is located in the southeast region of Africa, Arabia, and Morocco.
Mount Katahdin is one of the tallest, highest mountain in the world!
I don't know but it was invented in 1863 in the Caribbean.
I don't remember but I know it's the most popular place for wearing flip flops in the world.
It was invented in the late 1960's in the United States.  It was very popular.
I'm not sure, but I know it's a romantic comedy written by Mel Brooks.
I don't remember when it was written, but I do know that it's a 1960 American romantic comedy written by Margaret Mitchell.
It was a heart attack, and it was a shock for me, but it was sudden. 
I believe the Chicago Cubs are the most valuable team in the NBA, but they have been around for a while.
I'm not sure but I do know that there are a lot of teams in the NBA and the NBA.
I have never heard of them! I know they are an American singer and songwriter.
Yes, they're an American pop punk band formed in 2008. Do you like them?
Brad an angelo kids are a famous American singer, songwriter, and producer. 
Brad Angelina Kids is an American actress who was born in New York. 
Yes, she's a beauty pageant star.  She is a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
I don't remember their names. But they're a little older now. I just miss them.
The name is Megan and Jolie. They are so cute and sweet.  Do you have any pets?
Pitts and Julie are their names. I'm so happy for them.  
I'm not sure, but I think they are the most intelligent and energetic dogs.
Pittsburgh and Jolifer. I think they are the best dogs ever.
Poland is a country that is located in Eastern Europe.  I have never been to Poland.
He teaches in the Harry Potter series. He's a great teacher. I wish I had a teacher like him in school.
I'm not sure, but I do know it's been awhile since he died.  I think he's still married to her though.
I'm not sure, but his first album was released in 1997. He is very successful.
I am not sure, but I know Hong Kong is the capital and largest in the world.
I am not sure, but I do know that Hong Kong is one of the biggest.
I am not sure, I think it is Jacob Price.  I am a huge fan of her.
I don't know, but I think she is the youngest of the three major religions in the world
It is a monarchy. The republic of the United States is a sovereign state that is located in the southeastern United States.
It is the largest Christian denomination in the world with about 2.4 million followers. 
It's in the Netherlands and Belgium. I've been there and love it.
I am not really sure, but I have been studying for several semester. I am ready to graduate though.
He was born in Chattan, Tennessee.  He lived in Cincinnati, TN.
John Cabot is a great American singer and songwriter. I love him.
It was on a Saturday afternoon! I was so surprised to see it on the big screen!
I am not sure, but I know it's been a long time. I think it will be in May.
It was released on October 30, 1974!  That was a long time ago!
I'm not sure, but I know they were founded by Rayleigh in 1897.
It was released in the 1970s.  It's been a long time since I've seen it.
He was a great player for Washington Washington. He was one of the best players of all time.
Julus Cesar was his father.  He was a great man and a great father.
His name was Julius Caesar. He was born in 1897. He died on August 30, 1985.
Julius Caesar was a very important man in the early 20th century.  He was one of the most influential people in the world.
He was a good father to me. I don't know if you have ever heard of him.
His name is James Caesar. His father is a very successful businessman. He was born in New York and moved to Los Angeles.
Thomas Paine, the university of Pennsylvania! I am so happy for him.
He was a high school senior at the University of Tennessee. I was surprised.
I'm not sure but I know that it is believed to be the first ever species to be transmitted to humans.
I'm not sure but I do know that she won the Academy Award and was nominated for Best Actress.
I think it was Leonardo Di DiCaprio.  She's one of the greatest actresses of all time.
I believe it was Leonardo DiCaprio. I think he was also an actor and producer.
I think so. She was also nominated for the Oscar Awards.   
It was Leonardo DiCaprio. He was so good! I was really impressed.
I'm not sure. I think it was Jodhi May. She was a great actress!
Tom Holland is the greatest actor of all time, he was great in the last movie he was in.
Tom Holland was the main man in the movie, but he was replaced by Meg Rayman.
It is in East Asia, but it is a small island country in the Pacific Ocean.
It is the northern part of the country. It is in the center of the U.S.
Yes, it is a beautiful country.  It's a sovereign state in the US that was founded in 1845.
Yes, Kazakstan is a beautiful country in the U.S.  It is located in the Southeastern region of the United States.
I'm not sure but I know that Kazakstan is located in the U.S. in the Central Asia
I'm not sure but I do know that it is a country located in the United States.
I am not sure but it is one of the most populous cities in the world. 
Justin Bieber was born on December 22, 2009, he was born in 1998.
The 8th House of the Night Books is coming out in December. I am excited!
The last book I read was "A Song of Fire and Ice" and it came out in 1991.  I haven't read it yet.
I think it was last week.  I haven't read it yet, I should check it out.
I am not sure but I do know that it will be released on June 1, 2018.
It's going to be Saturday, so it's a good time to go out.  Do you like going to the bars?
The house of 8th is coming out on the 8th of May 2017! I can't believe it's that far away!
It starts on August 30, 2019.  It is going to be great!  I can't wait to read it!
It was a small island in the Caribbean. It was in the Pacific Ocean.
I believe it was The Lion King.  I loved it so much, it was the best animated movie of all time.
I'm not sure, but it was a big movie.  The first movie was released in 1993.
I'm not really sure what color was the film, but I know it was made by Warner Brothers.
I think it was the first one, the original one. I was so happy to see it.
I don't know. I just know that South Korea was the first nation to be in the Korean war.
Franklin rosevelt was a president of the united states in the 1800s.
Malie is an american singer, songwriter, producer, and actor. 
I'm not sure who was first, but it was a very large island in the Caribbean.
It started in the United States in the early 20th century, but it's spread all over the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's the world's most populated of the major religions.
I am not sure but I know that the city of Chicago is the most populous in the US.
I don't know but the city is the most populous. It is the third most densely populated city.
It's called Los Angeles. It's the most populous metropolitan area in the United States.
I am not sure but it is the 3rd most densely populated in the US.
I don't think it's really important, but it's a state in the Southeastern region of the United States.
Yes, it is in the southeastern region of the U.S. state, located in the south.
South Carolina State capital is the capital and most populous city in the state of Georgia.
I'm not sure, but he was born in 1874. That's a long time!
He graduated in 1974 and he was the youngest of the four major leagues in the US.
Jamia Samone Nash is a famous singer, songwriter and dancer.
I am not sure who won, but it was a great time.  It was the last time I saw it.
The Sarataga Freeman Farm is one of the largest farmed organizations in the world.
The Battle of the Freemans. They are a huge part of the country. I love their country.
The oldest is the University of Kansas.  It was founded back in 1845!
Nevada is a state in the U.S that is located in the southeastern region of the United States
I am not sure but I know they are the third most densely populated state in the US
They are a large corporate headquarters in Los Angeles. They are very large.
The current state of Nevada is the seat of the U.S. state of Maine
Well, I'm not sure. I do know that Nevada is the 8th largest in the US by area, though.
Nevada is a state in the U.S., in the southeastern region
I'm not sure but I know it's the tallest mountain in the U.S. in the world.
I don't know but I do know the Appalachian National Scenic Trail is the highest mountain in the world.
Elvis Presley was a famous actor and songwriter.  He died in 1983.
I believe it was Elvis Presley.  I know he was a great American singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Elvis Presley. He's my favorite singer! I love his voice and his style.
The team won the championship of the united states, the team with the most points wins!
The United States Championship Series is my favorite team.  I'm a big fan of Arsenal and Manchester United.
She is a university located in the Philadelphia, New York.  I'm a huge fan.
She went to the University of Kansas University.  I am going to miss her so much!
She studied at the University of Tennessee.  She is a very good athlete.
She went to University of Tennessee, which is where I grew up!  I love her!
It would have to be Los Angeles, California. It is the most populous city in the state of Texas.
I'm not sure, but I know that there are five boroughs of New Mexico, the Bronx, Brooklyn, Queens, and Manhattan.
The capital of New Mexico is Los Angeles.  It's the biggest and most populous.
The capital of New Mexico, Tallahassee, is the most populous city of Mexico
I am not sure but I do know the capital is San Diego, California.  Have you ever been?
It is in the Midwest and the Ohio State Zipline is in Ohio.
They are a great American rapper. I was so excited when I saw them in concert.
The American singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.  He was a very talented actor
I don't know who he was, but he was a great driver.  I think I would like to see him in person.
I don't recall his name, but I know he was a famous musician. Do you know him?
He was an English singer and songwriter. I don't remember the name but he was very successful.
The children of the rapper, Jeremy Clarkson. He was the greatest rappers of all time.
The greatest rapper of all time. His real name was Richard and Maurice Ravel.
John, Jacob, and Kelly. I'm so excited. I can't wait to see what he does.
I think they were just names for her, but she was a great mother! I was so happy for her.
I am not sure but I know he had a great childhood.  He was very successful. 
The kids names were Katheryn El Elmer Freeman, Kyle, and Joseph. It's been a while since I've seen them.
The names were Megan and Megar.  We had a great time together.  I miss her.
His name was Brian and he was born in the Philippines.  I am sure he was very proud of himself.
I don't remember the exact name of them, but they were very nice kids and I loved them very much.  I miss them.
Rita Simons is a great American actress.  She is a pretty famous actress and singer.
I think the Siberian Mountains. I've always wanted to hike there. 
He was born in 1948. It was a song by Richard and Maurice Richards.
I believe it was on August 1886. I'm not sure when it was the last thing he was alive.
I don't really care about politics, but he is the most influential man in the history of the US
I don't think he's a good candidate but he is a great politician. He's been president since June of 1945.
I'm not sure, but he's the 45th president of the United States, and I don't think I'd want to talk about it.
He died in 1994. He was such a great driver. I was so sad when he died.
It was in the middle of a road trip and I didn't know where it belonged to.
I think that was in 2003.  They were one of the best teams in the world.
The Bruins won the Stanley Cup in 1963 and won the East.
I'm not too sure but I do know it was the last Stanley Cup win.
They won the first Stanley Cup in the 1970's. It was a long time ago.
They won the east in the late 2000s and they are one of the most successful teams in the world.
The Boston Cup was the last Stanley Cup ever held in the US. They won in 2010.
Rabies are a viral infectious disease that can be found in the blood. 
I'm not sure but I do know that it was first done in 1973 in the United States.
She was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer, and producer.
I don't have a name, but I know she's a great actress and singer.
She's a great actress, singer, dancer and singer and songwriter.
I think he was released in 2009, but I haven't heard it yet. What is it about?
It is in the Atlantic Ocean, which is a river that runs along the Gulf of Mexico
I don't know but I know it is very big. It is the largest river on the Gulf of Mexico.
It's the Atlantic Ocean, and it's a river in the Caribbean.
She was married to Charles Cornwall in the late 1960s.  He was a great dancer.
He was born on March 2, 1968, so quite some time ago now. 
Ginger roger is one of my favorite ginger snaps.  He was one of the most famous people ever.
I'm not sure, but I know they're married to a guy called Ginger Rigger.
Ginger roger was one of the original series of the show "Ginger Rogers"
The American singer, songwriter, and producer, Ginger Rogers, was born in New York City.
The gingerbread. It's one of my favorite ginger snacks! I can't believe it's been around since the 1960s.
I'm not sure.  I just know they are married and have been happily married for a while.  It was a long time ago.
The Ginger Rogers were an American singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.
They were a friend of mine and she was married to my best friend.  She moved away from me a few months ago.
Ginger Rogers is a great American singer, songwriter, actor, and producer.
I don't remember. I just remembered it was the first day of the year. 
I don't know, but they seem to be a very popular brand and are a ginger ginger candy company. 
They are my favorite. The ginger is one of the most popular flavors in the world.
I am not sure but I know the ginger is one of the most popular ginger flavored candles in the world.
Ginger roger is a ginger candy company.  I love ginger, ginger and whiskey
I have no idea.  I just know that I love them.  They're the most commonly consumed ginger candy in the world.
Hannah Montana is the name of the American singer, songwriter, and actor that was born and raised in Montana.
I don't know. It was so sudden. I had a fever, and it was horrible.
I am not sure. I am sure he studied somewhere in the United States.   
I am not sure, but I know that he was the founder of Mandela in Panama City
I don't remember his name, but he was the youngest.  He had a great personality.
It was a small one.  It was really small, but it was a lot of fun.  I had a great time.
I don't really know. But I know it's a division of General Motors.
I'm not sure but I know they are a division of General Motors.  I know that's a big company.
They are the American multinational automaker company.  It was founded in 1903.
They're headquartered in Honolulu, Hawaii.   They're also the world's largest manufacturer.
The United States Department of America, which is located in Pennsylvania, has been around since 1845.
I know a little bit. He was one of the founders of the US in 1894.
He was a great driver.  He was one of the best driver in the history of the United States.
She was an American singer, songwriter and producer.  I think it was in the 1990s.
I don't know but I do know that the term "people who go to space" has been around for a long time.
I'm not sure but it was in 1959. That was a long time ago. 
My guess is that the U.S. NASA was the first to launch into space.
No, it was a long time ago but it was the first one to be sent to the US!
George Bush Jr was the head of the Senate of Alaska.  He was a great president!
The Stonewall Jackson Mountains National Park in Wyoming, Mount Katahdin, North Carolina.
He plays the piano.  He was born in Hawaii.  I love him.
He is a singer, songwriter, producer, and actor.  He is very talented and has won several awards.
He's a singer, songwriter, actor, and actor. I love his voice!
He plays the piano.  I love the sound of him.  He was born in 1974.
Janet Jacksons was an American rock band formed in 1984 in Philadelphia in the United States.
I am not sure, but he was a singer, songwriter, and producer.
He was a real estate agent and he was a lawyer.  I am sorry to hear that. 
I'm not exactly sure, but I do know that Miche Jackson is a Scottish singer, songwriter, and producer.
I'm not sure, I know there's only one county that's really small in Minnesota.
Minnesota is the smallest state in the US. It has a population of around 270,000.
I am not sure, but I know they have some of the most dangerous reefs in the world.
His name is Josh, and he was born a year ago.  He is a great driver.
Zacha is a name of the american singer and songwriter from london, england.
His name is Baby and he's a great dancer!  He's also a singer.
His name is Laurent, he was born in 1948.  I love him.
Her name is Megi, she is the youngest of four of her siblings.
I have no idea but I know that she was a famous singer and songwriter.
I am not sure but I do know he was born in the United States.  He was a great driver.
His name was Jacob and he was born in New York City. I don't know what happened to him.
Her name was Jennifer Aniston.  She was born in 1974, so she must have been quite young.
Her name was Sara.  I had never heard of her before, but she was very talented.
Her name was Launday.  It was a very popular name in the United States.
Her name was Jennifer. She was born on August 25, 1997.
The city of Washington is actually the seat of the Pacific Ocean, and it is the second-most populous city in Washington.
I am not sure. But, I do know that it is one of the most sparsely populated cities in the United States.
Johnson is the Vice President of the United States, but was also a CEO of the U.S.
I'm not sure but it seems like it would be a river or lake or something.
He won the Eastern Conference Series in 1996, so it must be a long time ago now.
Her name is Jennifer Jeanne, but she was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
He was born and raised in New York City, but he moved to the United States when he was 18.
I'm not sure, but I know he is one of the best quarterbacks in the league.
I don't know. He's a great player though! He played for Manchester United.
He was born in the United States.  He was a quarterback for Manchester United.
Mario Bros. It was one of Nintendo's first games to launch back in 1989.
Mario Bros.  He was the original Super Nintendo.  The first one came out in 1997.  
Walter Mondale was born in 1968. He was an American business man. 
Walt Mondale is a American singer and songwriter. He has a great voice
It was a comedy.  It came out in 1994 and was directed by James Fenimore Cook.
Ginger Roger was a great movie. I loved it.  It was released in 2001 and starred Jennifer Aniston.
It's a long time.  I believe it dates back to the Neolithic era.
My mom is a nurse and my dad is a teacher. I have always admired her.
I am not sure, but I do know that they are a great hockey player.   
I have no idea, but I know he was one of the greatest and most successful rappers ever.
Barbara streetsand went to high school in the US. It's a private school, so I didn't know much about it.
Barbra Streisand was a private high school in Texas, but it was a small school in Pennsylvania.
He was killed by a car accident.  He was a great driver.  I miss him.
Prince Rogers was a great actor. He played the piano in a jazz ensemble.
He was a very young man. He was only 34 years old. He had a heart attack.
He died in a plane crash. I was so upset. I had to go to work. 
Prince Albert was the most well known poet of all time, and he was one of the most influential people in the world.
She's an American singer, songwriter, and actress. She's also a singer.
She was a great mother and mother.  She raised my brother, my sister, and I.
The population of India is around 800.4 million.  It's the largest country in the world.
I'm not sure but it is the second-largest country in the world, behind the US.
I am not sure but I do know that the Indian subcontinent is the 3rd most sparsely populated in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know that the population of the city is about 6.4 million.
She went to Bartonville, Arkansas and then transferred to Memphis, Missouri.
The year he died was 1974. He was an American actor and singer and songwriter
I don't know but I do know she was a very popular actress, singing, actress and singer.
It was in 2003.  It took a while for it to get out of the house.
It was a long time ago, but it still makes me feel nostalgic.  I wish I could have gone back to them.
I'm not sure, but I'm thinking of going to Estonia.  It's in the middle of the Atlantic.
I'm not really sure what the drumsmer was, but I know they were the front line.
I'm not sure what it is but she's a famous singer and songwriter.
I don't know, but I do know that the flag was originally created in 1883!
I am not sure who did it but I do know that it was the flag of a church in Bavaria.
I am not sure but California is the most populous state and has the highest unemployment rate
California is the largest state by size, but it is also the 3rd least populated. 
I'm not sure, but I know that California is the 3rd-largest state, so that's a lot.
California and Alaska.  It's the most densely populated state in the USA.
I believe it was Michael Jackson, he was the best quarterback ever for the Atlanta Atlanta Braves.
I believe the Germans did. They had a great military history in the late 19th century.
Yes, I think it was the first nation to be occupied by Germany during World War II.
I am not sure but i am sure it was a long time ago since it was one of the largest countries in the world.
I am not sure but I know they were the first country to be occupied by the US and the first to occupy Germany.
Yes, it was a long time ago! It's a great place to visit, though. 
I'm not sure but I know it's the most populous country in Europe.  Do you know much about it?
Yes, and it is one of the most influential countries in the world! It was the first country in the European union to be controlled by the United States.
It is a great river. The river is a lake. I have never been to a river but I would love to.
Obama Obama was the last American president of Africa.  He was a former president of the United States.
The first African American president was Joseph Heller. He was a very accomplished man.
I am not sure, but it was very exciting!  Obama is the 45th president of the United States
I am not sure, but it's a major intermediate highway in the Caribbean.
Yes, he was a great president. He was the 45th president of the U.S.
The Cowboys are my favorite NFL teams. They are a franchise based in Dallas.
I'm not sure but they are the oldest franchise in the NFL.  I was rooting for them!
The Cowboys! They are my favorite team.  I love how they have won three Super Bowls in their history.
I am not sure, but I do know that they were founded by Roger Penrose.
It's an island nation located in the Pacific Ocean.  It's beautiful.
Emma, she's in the UK! She's a great actress and singer too!
I believe he was born in 1949.  He was a member of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.
March 30, 2017.  She is my favorite singer/songwriter. 
I have never heard of them before.  I know they are in the Arctic regions.
My favorite river is the river of Lake Champlain, it's so beautiful
The Ravens beat New Orleans in the Super Bowl! They are so good!
I believe the Ravens were playing in the Super Bowl in 1964. They were playing against the Raiders.
Colorado is the 4th-largest state in the US.  It's a pretty large state.
Colorado, Kansas, Missouri and Alaska.  It's the third-largest state in the United States.
Colorado and Kansas are the two smallest state in the US. I am so excited.
Colorado Springs, Mississippi, Missouri, Missippi and Alabama.
It is a southernmost state that is bordered by Alaska and the Canadian border.
It's a state in the Midwest. It's the 8th largest by area in the USA!
The North Dakota state capital is Minneapolis. It is the largest city in the state.
That would be Michelle Obama! She's a great woman and has been climbing Mount Everest for a long time.
It's Michelle Obama. She was the youngest of the four women who climbed Everest.
Julia Morgan was a great mother. She was a famous actress and singer.
I think Real Madrid was the most important team in the world. I was shocked when they won the world cup.
She was born in Bethlehem, Georgia.  I was shocked when I saw her.
I am not sure but I know the Atlantic Ocean is a large river with a lot more water than any other river.
It is the Atlantic Ocean. It is one of the most sparsely populated and beautiful parts of the world.
I dont know. But I do know he was the 45th president of the United States.
I don't remember but I know it was the president of Mexico. He was the ruler of the Republic.
I'm not sure but I do know that he was president of the United States of America.  
I'm not sure, but I do know that he was born on August 25, 1963, and died in 1989.
I'm not sure but I do know he was a great player for the Washington Redskins.
That's a good question! It was George Orwell! He was the president of the United States of America.
Bahrain is a major center for the Arabian Sea and the Indian Ocean.
The city is called Memphis. It has a population of over 800. I've never been.
The city of Bahrain, which is located on the Gulf of Azeroth.
Bahra is the capital and the largest in Bahrain. It's a nice place. 
Bahara is the second-largest city in the state of Bahrain.
I don't know but it's the highest in the U.S. and Canada. I think it's a lot more than I make.
I'm not sure when he became president, but I know he was born on December 17, 1948.
I am not sure, but he is one of the best players on the team. Do you know?
He's the best player in the league and he has won more than seven world championships!
I don't know when it is, but I do know he was born on August 2, 1954.
John Adams Wife is one of the greatest actors and songwriters of all time. 
She was a great actress.  She was also a singer and songwriter.
I don't remember exactly but it seems like he was one of the greatest rulers of France.
I am not sure but the river Niagra Falls is the longest and most beautiful river in the world.
I'm not sure exactly but it is the largest city in the United States and is the second-largest city in Canada.
The river is a great place to go. It has the longest river in the world.
Niagra falls is a river in the north eastern region of the united states.
The Fall is my favorite time of year. It is the longest continuous river in North America.
The United States and the United Kingdom of the United States was one of the largest military units in the world.
It was the United States Army. The US Army was the first nation to be involved in WWII.
I don't know but I know that the government is still in charge. It is still very important today.
I don't know but it was an important part of the US government during the Second World War 2
The government of the United States was a sovereign state in 1845. It was established in 1894.
It was the first major war that occurred in the United States. It is a shame that it happened.
I don't know, but it was a very long time ago. I know there were some political and social changes in the war.
It was the second most populous country in the world and the third largest in the US. It was a huge shock.
It was the government of the United States, it was the first country to be occupied in the world.
I am not sure what country it was. But, Germany and Russia were both very important in the war.
I'm not sure but I know they were one of the most successful and dominated nations in the 1930s.
I'm not sure but the US is a sovereign state of the United States.  I do know that the United Kingdom is one of them.
I'm not sure, but i know it was a war between Germany and Italy.  
It is the second-largest country and the 4th most populated in the world.
I am not sure but it was a long time ago.  It was the largest in the European Union by land.
I'm not sure, but I do know that the United States is a great country to live in.
I am not sure but it was a big part of WW2 in the early 20th century.
The United States and the United States.  I'm not sure what the other countries were.  It was a long time ago.
I don't remember. I do know he is an American singer and songwriter.
The American rock band formed in Los Angeles, California.   They were formed back in 1981.
The Rolling Stone.  They are my favorite rock band.  Do you know of them?
Yes, they are a great band.  They are from Los Angeles, California. 
The Four List is one of the most influential bands in the history of rock bands.
I don't know but I do know that they are one of the biggest American rock bands ever formed
Kobe Bryant won three Super Bowls.  He is also considered the best player in the NBA.
Rita Simons is the American singer, songwriter, producer, actor and singer.
I am not sure, but I do know that the country is a federal republic with a sovereign monarchy.
She is an American singer and songwriter.  She was born in Honolulu, Hawaii.
The King of England? He was the ruler of England. I'm not sure who was though.
He was elected on June 30, 2017. He's been in office for a while now.
I'm not sure who was, but he was one of the leading commanders of the german army.
I don't remember his name. But I know that it was the largest battle in the world.
That is a good question.  He was the commander and the general of Berlin.
It was a general of the Republic of Ireland. I am not sure how he did it.
Her name is Mia. She's a very famous singer, songwriter and singer.
John Kennedys is my wife. He's been married since the 1960s. 
joseph fisher is a famous american poet and songwriter. 
John F Kennedy is my favorite American actress.  She was an amazing American woman.
Yes, and he is an American actor.  His name is Robert Downey Jr.
I'm not sure but I do know he was an attorney. I was very upset about it.
John Kennaddys was a great American singer, songwriter, and actor
The Atlantic Ocean, which borders the Gulf of Mexico and the Mississippi.
The Atlantic is the only ocean I've been to. I've never been farther than the Gulf of Mexico.
I am not sure, but it is very cold. It is the third-most sparsely populated state.
I think it's the Arctic region that is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
The Great Smoky Mountains in North Carolina and Alaska.  
Alaska, and it's in the north Atlantic ocean. It's really cold there.
The Atlantic islands of the Pacific.  I have never been there but I want to.
I think it was Leonardo DiCaprio, he was great in that one.
She was nominated for an Academy Award for acting, but she didn't win.
I'm not sure but she was nominated for the Academy Award in 2008.
The movie "Shawshank Redemption". It was nominated for a Academy Award for Best Actress in 2001.
I don't know but I do know that she is an American singer-songwriter, songwriters, and actress.
I'm not entirely sure, but I'm sure it's in the southern part of the state, right?
I am not sure, but I know there are more than seven borders in the world!
I'm not sure, but I know it's the capital of Los Angeles, California.
I am not sure, but I do know that the Republic is a sovereign monarchy and they have a large territory.
The border of Laos Angeles, California.  I was so happy to see it. 
The US, Canada, Spain, and Mexico.  I have never been to any of those countries but I have been to Mexico.
He was a poet, a novelist, and a screenwriter.  I think he was pretty good at poetry.
I don't think I've ever seen her.  I'm guessing she's a singer?
I think I remember her. She was an American singer, songwriter and actress.
I don't know but I know she was a great actress, singer, songwriter and dancer.
He is a famous English singer, songwriter and author. He was born on October 29, 1948.
I am not sure but it is the 3rd most populous state in the US and it is a small state.
There is the Mississippian River.  It is the longest one in the state.
I am not sure but I do know that there are more than 8 million Americans who live in the United States.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the third-largest state in population.
Eric Turners birthday is on August 2, 2011. I was so shocked!
She was a great American singer, songwriter, producer, and actress from New York. 
Elizabet Taylor was a famous singer, songwriter, and actress.
Elizabet Taylor was an American singer, songwriter, and producer
She was a great American singer, songwriter, and actress. I love her.
I am not sure, but she was a great actress, and singer, songwriter, and producer.
Elizabet Taylor is a very famous singer and songwriter. 
Prince Charles, also known as Charles Alderton, is one of my all time favorite singers.
He's dead, he was an English singer and songwriter. He was born in the UK.
I think it was the original Spongebob Squarepans on Nickelodeon.
I am not sure but I have heard that the capital is Puerto Rico.
I'm not sure. But it's a country in the southeastern region of the Americas. 
I am not sure, but I know it is a country in the Americas that is the third-largest by area.
It is a country in the southeastern region of the United States that is located on the Atlantic ocean.
I'm not sure, but it's the third-largest country in the world. 
Chile is a country in the southeastern region of the Americas. Do you know?
I am so sorry to hear that, I am sure it is hard to lose your loved ones.
I think it was Mick Jagger and Keith Richards. It was really cool!
I'm not sure, but my favorite singer is Kurt cobain.  What about you?
I am so sorry to hear that.  It must really be hard for you.  How did you die?
It was a song by the American rock band The Beatles.  It was really good.
The F120 Formula 1.  I'm so excited to see it.  Do you know who won?
The Ford F150, which is an American Ford. It was a great car for sure!
Silas Marner is an English singer and songwriter. He is also a singer.
I'm not really sure, but I do know she's a very successful actress and singer.
I am not sure, but the highest mountain is the Kalinago National Scenic Trail.
I am not sure, but I know he is married, and he has been dating for 5 years.
Yes, and he was a very good coach. He won the national team at age 18. 
Italian, english, and spanish. I'm trying to learn german and french.
Jonas Rhimes, he is a singer, songwriter and dj.
Elvis Presley's greatest album, "The Book of Souls" was released in 1964. 
Elvis Presley is an American singer-songwriter. I don't think I've heard of him.
Elvis Presley is an American singer and songwriter.  I think he is one of the best singers ever.
Elvis Presley is a great American singer-songwriter.    What about you?
Yes, I love him!  He is my favorite singer, songwriter, author.  Do you like Elvis Presley?
Elvis Presley was a great singer, songwriter, author.  He was one of the greatest musicians of all time.
That's a tough one to figure out. The longest one in Africa is the Atlantic Ocean.
The Longest. It is the only one in Africa that extends from Southwest Africa to the Arctic.
I am not sure but I do know that it is a river with a lake or ocean
She's a famous actress, and a singer.  I'm not sure who she is.
I'm not sure but Katie Bell was the main character of the series and she's very popular.
I don't know. I know that she was a very successful actress in the early 19th century.
Katheryn Bell was a great character from Hanna-Barbera, California. She was a very famous actress.
She's Katheryn Elise Winslet, and she's a great dancer!
I don't know, but I know he is an American rock and roll singer.  
It's a cappella instrument. It has a wooden string instrument with a hollow wooden body.
He plays the piano.  I think he's very talented.  He's also a singer, a songwriter, and producer.
It's the American political party in the US in 1845.  It was a great time!
I'm not exactly sure, but I know it's the largest private school in the state of Florida.
It is the University of Miami. They have a football team based in Tallahassee
They are the University of Miami, Florida's biggest university in the state of Florida.
She was the lead vocalist.  She is also a singer, songwriter, and dancer.
Montreal is the most populous city in Canada. It's the most densely populated. 
The US is the second-largest metropolitan area in North America. 
The largest metropolitan area is Montreal, Vancouver, Canada. It is very large.
I am not really sure. I know he is a great singer and songwriter.
Emily Roth is the lead vocalist of the band. Her voice is amazing! 
Eminems is one of the most successful artists of all time with over 50 million records sold worldwide
Eminimum is one of my favorites.  She is an American singer, songwriter, record producer and producer.
Eminems is a great artist and songwriter. He has been in the music industry since 1983.
I don't know all of them.  I just know he is the singer, rapper, and actor.
I don't know but they are a group of American singers and songwriters, producers, record producers and producers.
Emily Riggs is an American singer and songwriter. I love her so much!
Eminems are a singer, songwriter, actor, producer and actor, singers, and producer.
I'm not really sure. But I do know they are a big one, with over 100 million records sold worldwide.
Michael Jackson was born in 1948 and he was the greatest singer of all time. 
I think it was in August of 1999. It was a very long time ago.
Anna Niclose is a famous singer and songwriter, she's very talented.
I'm not sure but he is a legend. He was born in 1885.  
I think it's William Holden, he's been acting since 1973. 
I am not sure but I do know it's the capital of the United States.   
Katy was a great American singer and songwriter! I think she got engaged on August 30, 2017.
I don't remember exactly but I do know Kyle Perry was married to a man named Ruth Hernandez.
She is a singer, songwriter and singer.  She was born and raised in New York. 
I am not sure but I think China is the largest and most populous asia. 
I am not sure, but it is the most populous country by area in Asia.
I'm not sure but the population is very large and diverse. It's the 3rd most densely populated in Asia.
The most densely populated city is Tallahassee, but it's also the most populous in Asia.
I'm not sure, but I know that there are more than seventy cities in Asia.
Prince Rogers was an American rapper and singer. He was born in the 1960s.
I am not sure.  I have never been to South America before.  Is it in the Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico?
Obama is an American rapper. I'm not sure if he's actually president of Illinois though.
She was born in 1978. She was a very famous singer, songwriter, and author.
Jane Seymour was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
I don't know but I know that he was born and raised in Panama.  He is one of the best authors of all time.
I am not sure.  I have been there a couple times, but I have never been able to talk to them about it.
University of Michigan University is one of the world's most prestigious schools in the US
It is a state in the southeastern region of the United States.  It is one of the oldest cities in the world.
I am not sure when the game was played but I know that Miami Dolphins are the oldest franchises in the NFL.
They are playing in the playoffs, and the Miami Dolphins won the Super Bowl.
The last time I watched them was in the NFL. I was so happy to see them win.
They won in August of 1997.  They are my favorite team!  Do you like football at all?
The Miami Dolphins are the American football team based in Miamis, Florida,
I am not a huge fan of the Miami Dolphins, but I am more of an NFL fan.
When they played in the NFL, they won the Super Bowl.  I was rooting for them.
The Miami Dolphins were a team that won a Super Bowl in 1993.
Aruba is the largest state in Africa and the largest in the Caribbean.
I'm not sure but the President of Araba is the current head of the U.S. State.
Barbra Bush was a preschool girl, she was in kindergarten. I didn't know she played in a private school.
I believe the Atlantic Ocean is the longest. I'm not sure about the river.
I am not sure but I do know that it is the most densely populated of the 50 United states.
I don't know, but I know there are more than seventy rivers of water in the world!
I don't know but I do know that it's the longest in the world and most sparsely populated.
That would be the Appalachian National Mountains.  They run through Georgia, Alaska, Maine, and New Zealand.
The longest is probably the Mississippi River.  It's the largest in the U.S.
I think the ones on the Mississippi River. I'm not too sure though.
The longest is the one that runs through Wyoming.  It is the longest!
The longest is the Gulf of Mexico, which is about 4855 kilometers long.
The longest one is the Atlantic.  It is the longest.  Do you like the river too?
It was in the Philadelphia Raiders stadium.  I was so surprised.
I don't remember, but I know it is a German speaking speaking country in Austria. 
Salzburgh, it is the largest and most sparsely populated city in the US.
I am not sure, but he was the 45th president of the united states and he was a Republican.
George Clooney is an American actress and singer, songwriter and producer.
I'm not sure who is that. But it was the name of the president of the us.
Yes, it is the largest state in the United States and is located between the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean
Yes, it was the world's largest city in the U.S. in the 1960s.
I'm not sure but I know the US is the third largest country in the world by area.
I am not sure but they were the rulers of the world. They were very important. 
I'm not too sure, but I know that they were the fourth most powerful in the world. That is quite impressive.
I don't really remember but they were the ones who held the office of the U.S.
I do not remember, but I know that they are very important.  They are the largest government in the world.
I am not sure, but the president is Donald J. Trump. He is the 45th president of the world!
I think that's a good point. I'm not sure what the first 5 Vice Presidents were though
He was born on August 29, 1947. He was a very good driver.
She was a famous singer, songwriter and dancer, and actress.
I have no clue, but I know that it is in the Southeastern portion of the United States.
It's a tiny island in the Caribbean Sea.  I've never been there, but I'd love to.
I don't know but the country is in the southeastern region of the U.S
That is right!  I have always wanted to go to Tanzana.  Have you ever been?
George Bush went to the University of Alabama. It is a very prestigious school
He went to Princeton. He was the head of the University of North Carolina.
It is the third-largest airport in the US.  It's a pretty big one. 
He died in 2005. He was a great actor. I was very sad when he died.
Jackson Tiger. He was an American singer, songwriter, and producer.
I'm not really sure but I know they were the largest and most powerful in the world, and the world's most powerful.
She lived in Florida. She was in a hurricane. I was so upset about it.
I don't remember. I just remembered she was a former US president, but it was a long time ago.
Her name is Lindsey. She is very smart too. I was shocked when we met.
I don't think it was actually in Mississippi.  It's a state located in the southeastern region of the US.
I am not sure of that, but I know that Missouri is the third-most populous state in the US.
The first capital was Springfield, Missouri.  It's also the capital of Mississippi.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the second-largest city in Missouri.
I think they are the 3rd-largest country in the world and the third most sparsely populated.
Australia is the second-most sparsely populated and geologically active country in the world.
They are the largest country in the world.  I think they are also the 3rd most sparsely populated.
Australia is a country in the Eastern hemisphere, which is the third-largest country in continent.
Australia is the 8th smallest by area, and the 4th most densely populated country.
Australia is the 8th most sparsely populated country in the world.  I would love to see all of it.
I'm not sure but it's the third most densely populated of the united states
Yes, it is bigger than Australia.  It is the third-largest country in the world, though, behind China.
Yes! The Anglo-Scottish border is the longest, but the second longest.
I'm not entirely sure but i do know that austraia is the third-largest country in the world.
It's a country located in the southeastern region of the United States. 
The five countries in the world are the United States, Canada, United Kingdom and New Zealand.
Australia is the third most sparsely populated country in the world.  It's also the 3rd-largest country by area.
I'm not sure, but I know that Australia is the largest country in the world.  I'm sure it's a nice place to visit.
I don't know but the US and Australia are bordered by the Atlantic and the Pacific ocean.
I'm not really sure. But Australia is the only country that has the longest continuous land mass in the world.
The United States is the third-largest country, but only in the southeastern region of the US.
Australia is the third largest country by area. The second-largest country in the world by area!
I would assume the US.  It is the second-largest country in the world. 
Well the US is a country located in the southeastern region of the united states and it is the third-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure, but it's been a while since I've heard about him. Do you know much?
I don't know. But he was a great driver. He was also a great actor. 
It was a battle between the U.S. army and the United States in the late 1950s.
It was the World War II. It was an important time in the history of the United States.
The battle between the United States and the United Kingdom. It was really intense. The war was over in 1845.
It was an important battle between the United States and the United Kingdom in the United states. 
I'm not sure about the war but I know it was a war that ended in the late 1930s.
I'm not sure but I'm sure it was the American Civil War, but the first one was in the United States.
I am not sure, but it must be something bad. The United States was one of the largest nations in the world.
I am not sure, but it was a war between the united states and other countries. 
I am not sure but it was a war between the United States and other countries. I know it was pretty intense
The battle of the United States was between the British and the United Kingdom in the late 19th century.
Jason Derulo is an Italian singer and songwriter. He's been around since the 80s.
Canada is a sovereign country in the United States that is located in the northernmost province of Canada.
I'm not sure, but the province is located in the northwestern region of Canada
I'm not sure but the border is bordered by the Atlantic ocean and the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure, but I know that it's the third least densely populated.
I don't think anyone did, but Hitchhikers were one of my favorite characters of all time.
It is an Indian Court of the United States. I'm not sure who is. 
I don't know, but I know that the president is the chief executive. 
I don't recall who did it, but I know he was the most famous athlete in the world!
My grandparents, and my brother. I'm the youngest of five grandchildren.
She was an amazing dancer. I was so excited to see her play again.  
It's been a long time since I saw him. He was a member of the United States Army.
It was a long time ago.  He was born on October 30, 1995.
I'm not sure. I do know that Hindusism is a religion that is rooted in the Indian subcontinent.
I'm not sure but I know that the country is bordered to the eastern part of Asia and the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm a fan of the Washington Capitals!  They were the best team in the world.
The Indiana Pacers are the team from Indiana. They are a professional basketball team based in Indiana
I don't know but I do know that it is one of the most popular math subjects in the world.
I think it's the current US president, but it's been a while since they have held the position.
They were the ruling of China and they are currently the largest political party in the world. 
She was born on August 30, 1953. She was a great singer and songwriter.
I'm not sure, but I know that he was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
It was founded in 1785, but she moved to the US when she was 18.
I am not sure but I know that it is located in a small town in the Midwest.
I'm not sure but the city was founded in 1883. That's a long time ago.
I'm not sure but it's the largest country in Asia. I know it's a very diverse area.
I'm not sure, but I know it was founded in Bethlehem, Turkey.
I don't know, but Turkey is a great place for food. It's one of the top regions in the world.
It's in the United States.  The area is very diverse, so I'm not sure how much I can tell you about it.
The Turkey is in Europe, but I think it would be better if it was in Asia.
Europe, and Turkey is a great country to visit.  It's the most populous country in the world.
The first spunik was launched in 1894. It's amazing how long it has been around.
He was born in New York, but he was a big fan of the movie "Shawshank Redemption".
I'm not sure, I do know that he was born in Birmingham England. 
I don't know, but I do know that Iceland's archipelago is the third-largest in the world.
He was the 45th president of the United States.  He was a great American business man.
Franklin D. Rosevel was a president of the United States of America in 1903.
He was the 45th president of the United States in the 19th century. I think he was a pretty good president.
It was in 1963! I didn't realize he was the founder of the Democratic party.
I believe that was back in 1963, but I don't remember the exact year he was elected. He was a great president though.
Yes, I love her. She was one of the most successful artists of all time. What about you?
I'm not sure, but the border is bordered by the Arabian Sea, North-East Asia, and the Gulf of Mexico.
I'm not sure which country has the longest but it was established in 1903. 
I'm not sure but I do know that they have one of the largest borders in the world.
It's a major city in the southeastern region of the United States. It's pretty big.
Bahrain is a city in the southeastern US in the Atlantic Ocean.
They are a city that is located in the southeastern region of North America.
It is a large metropolitan area located in Bahra, Arkansas.  I am sure you have heard of it.
Bahra is a major US state in the Caribbean region of the United States.
Bahra is one of the most populous cities in the world, and it is the capital and most densely populated.
I'm not sure but I know that it is the capital and most populous city in the state of Bahra.
It is a large island in the Caribbean. It is the largest city by population.
The capital of Bahra, Arkansas is the capital of that city.  
Bahra is a major metropolitan area in the United States. It's also home to the Arctic Sea.
I don't know, but it is one of the largest urban areas in the world. 
I don't know, but I know that it's the 3rd-largest city in the world.
Bahra is a large city in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean and the capital is Munich.
Bahra is the capital and most populous city in the state of Bahrain.
The city of Bahrain is the capital, it's in the southeastern region of the country
I'm not sure but it's the most populous city in the United States.  
I am not sure.  But I do know that Bahrain is the largest city in Africa
I don't know, but I know it is a very populous city in the southeastern region.
I am not sure, but I know that Bahrain is the largest in Bahra, the capital.
I would like to go to the capital, Memphis.  I have never been there but it seems like a nice place.
It's in the capital of Bahra, Arkansas.  It's a great place to be.  Have you ever been?
Bahra is a major city in the southeast region of the US and it's the largest city in Africa.
It's called Bahrain, it's the capital and most populated city in the state of Memphis.
Bahrain is the capital.  It is located in the southeastern part of Africa
It's a major city in Saudi Arabia, and its the 3rd most populous city in Bahrain.
The capital Bahrain is in the capital of Bahra, Arkansas. It's the largest city in the country.
I'm not sure, but I do know it's the largest city in Bahrain.  I was surprised that it's so big.
It's the capital of Bahrain. It's also the second biggest urban area in the world.
It is the capital of Bahra, Arabia. It is one of the world's largest city.
It is the capital of Bahrain. It is a small city in Arkansas.
I'm not sure but I can tell you that it's the tallest mountain in Africa.
It's the capital of Belgium.  It's actually the most populated of the US.
Belgent is the capital, but it is the largest city in the EU. Do you know it?
It is a sovereign state located in the Atlantic Ocean and bordered to Bavaria and Finland.
It's the capital of Las Vegas, Nevada. It's a pretty nice place to visit.
I'm not sure but I know it is a major metropolitan area in the EU.
The Egypt is the capital of Greece, which is also one of the largest cities in Africa.
Yes, it is the capital of Egypt. It is the worlds largest city in the world.
I don't know, but I know that it's a sovereign state located in the southeastern region of the world.
I don't think so, but I know they're one of the most densely populated countries in the world!
Yes!  I have been to Egypt, and it is one of the world's most densely populated cities.
Yes, they are the third-largest city in Egypt. It's crazy how many people live there.
I don't know. I'm just glad they were able to save it. I was so upset.
I'm not sure but he's the 45th president of the United States. He's a great man!
I'm not sure, but I do know that it's a major island in the Atlantic ocean.
The capital is Sydney.  It's in the southern part of the United States.
Yes. It is the second-largest country in the world.  Do you live in a city?
yes, the capital is the capital and the second-most populous metropolitan area in the world.
They are from Saudi Arabia, and are the second largest Muslim country in the world.
I don't really know, but I know that Saudi Arabia is the largest and most sparsely populated country in the world.
I don't know, but I do know it's the largest and most sparsely populated of Saudi Arabia.
It's spoken by the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia. They have some of the most prominent languages in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know it's spoken by monks in Kingdom of Saudi Arabia.
I don't know, but I can tell you that it is one of the most sparsely populated states.
I am not sure but she is the best actress of all time.  She was born and raised in Honolulu.
I believe it was Madeleine Sharapova. She is an American singer, songwriter, and actress.
I don't remember who played it, but I know it was a big one. It was a very popular show
Drake was the best singer of the show "Mindie Dance". I think he's pretty good.
She was a character in the show "Struth or Consequences". I love her!
My favorite singer is Megan Gabrielle.  She's a great singer. 
I am not sure, but I do know that it has been a long time since I was a member of the U.S.
The first African Americans were from the Americas. They were a group of American colonists.
I think it was Jean Jackson.  She's been in the Senate since the late 19th century.
I'm not sure but it is a good question.  I know that it was a long time ago.
That's a good question. I'm not sure but it was in the 19th century. 
I am not sure.  I know that the African American senator was elected in 1962. 
I don't know but it is a chain that is headquartered in Southern U.S
She is a singer and songwriter. She was born on December 18, 1943.
Samuel Eto, Italian. He was born in Italy, but was raised in the United States.
Samuel Eto is from the capital of Cuba, and he is a great player.
He was born in Bavaria. He is one of the greatest football quarterbacks of all time.
The USA! I was rooting for them. I think it was my favorite team. I was so happy for them!
I don't remember exactly when it happened.  It was during the Civil War.  I'm sorry.
I'm not sure but I know the US is the 3rd most populated country in the world.
Well, there are three, the Atlantic, the Gulf of Mexico, and the Mississippi River
He was an American actor, actor, and producer.  He was a great actor too!
I don't think I've heard of it, but I know he's been a great author for over 30 years.
He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.  He was also an actor.
It was on June 22, 1983.  I was devastated.  
I am not sure. But it is one of the biggest cities in the state of Michigan.
It is the most populous city in Canada and is ranked the most densely populated in the world.
I am not sure.  I have heard it is a small island in the Caribbean.
It is a small island in the Caribbean Sea.  It is also inhabited by the Inuits.
Billy Jelly Jellella.  He was a singer and songwriter.
The norther parts of india are the largest and most sparsely populated.
My father was a great man. He was a real estate agent. He helped me get my money
I don't know, but I know that she is a very famous singer and songwriter.
The government buildings are located in the Caribbean.  They are also a government facility located on the Atlantic Ocean.
He was born on December 1894 in Honolulu, Illinois.
India, the country in East Asia. It's the third-largest country in the world.
I am not sure but I know that the largest mountain in India is Mount Katakh.
I'm not sure but I know that the highest mountain in India is the Mount Katahdin
I'm not sure, but I do know that the highest mountain in India is Mount Everest
I believe he was the 45th President of the United States, but I am not too sure of his exact date.
It was in 1996. He was elected in 1948. That's a long time ago!
He was elected in the 1960s.  I didn't know that was when he was a Senator.
St Paul is a great American actor, singer and songwriter.  I think they are great parents!
St Vincent De Paul was the father of a very wealthy businessman.  He was also the CEO of Pepsi.
Paul Stewart is the lead singer of the American rock band St. Vincent.
St Vincent is a Scottish comedian. He was the best actor in the show!
Stefani de Paul was one of the founders of the American film company Richard and Maurice Riggs.
I'm not sure, but he was born in 1962. I'm sure they were very close.
The Black sea, the Atlantic Ocean and the Gulf of Mexico are a major portions of the Black Sea.
The river of the Black sea. It's the most widely used river in the world.
The Atlantic is the largest river in the world and it is very close to where I live
I think it's a river called Lake Erie. It's a lake in North Carolina.
The Kiev river, it runs through the capital and is in the northern part of the country.
New York. It's the smallest of the 50 states.  I don't think I could live in a big city.
I'm not sure, but I know that the U.S. is the 3rd largest state in size.
I'm not sure, but I do know that in the United States, there are only 4.5 million people.
I don't think he is the ruler of France, but he is a great leader of France.
Her name is Megan.  It's my favorite name.  She's a beautiful woman.  I love her.
It was the Washington Washington Capitals. They were very good. They won the championship.
The Emirates are the best team to play in the world. I'm a huge fan.
It's a pretty large river in the south. The Missouri River runs through the Mississippi River.
He played the piano, guitar, and vocals. I was so happy to see him!
He was an an American sculptor, he was also a painter, and an author!
I don't really remember, but he was an important figure in the history of science and mathematics.
Leonardos Da Vicis is a great Italian sculpture artist.
It was a sculpture of a man who was inspired by an artist named Duche Da Vinci.
It's a sculpture of a famous artist Leonardi Da Vinci. He was very talented.
I don't know, but it's interesting that the celebrities are usually celebrated on the birthday of their child.
That's a good question. The birth of Jeremy Clarkson was May of 1986 and he was born on May 30, 1983.
She was born in 1994.  She is still a beautiful woman!  I love her!
Julia Morgan is an American singer, songwriter and actress born in New York City.
He has played in Barcador, Real Madrid, Spain, Portugal, and Barcelona.
She died in 1994. She was a great mother.  I'm not sure what happened.
I'm not sure but there are many.  But it is the oldest of the 50 U.S. states.
The US Senate is the highest elected official from Georgia.  They are the oldest.
The Senators are the elected officials in Georgia.  They are elected in the United States
Georgia is one of the three original states in the Southeastern United States.
The Senate of Georgia is located at the bottom of the state of the United States.
Georgia is the third least populous state in the united states.  I don't know much about them.
The Gulf of Angryland, Georgia, and the Atlantic Ocean.
Georgia is the southernmost state in the southeastern region of the united states.
Georgia is the state capital of the US and the third-largest state in the southeastern region.
I am not sure but I know the Senators are appointed for President Obama in office. 
The Alex Rider is a series of books by Margaret Mitchell.  I have read them a few times.
I am not sure but I know they were the best selling children's books in the US. 
I'm not sure, but I know they have a lot of good books.  Alex Rider is one of the best.
Alex Rider is a Scottish comic book published by Margaret Mitchell. 
Alex Rider is a British sci fi drama author, you might have heard of it.
Alex Rider is a Scottish sci fi novel.  Have you read any? 
I'm not sure, but I know that he has sold over 70 million copies in the US.
She was a great American singer-songwriter and actress and singer.
A friend of mine. I was shocked. I didn't even know he was a scientist.
The Godfather.  I have never seen it.  Is it good?  It sounds like a good movie.
I'm not sure. I was just thinking about it. I know there's a lot of good things to do in Tennessee.
I don't think I've ever been to Tennessee, but I know it's one of the largest states in the southeastern region.
I don't know. But I know that Tennessee is the 3rd most populous state.
Tennessee, it's a pretty small state in the southeastern part of the state.
The state capital is Memphis, which is in the eastern region of the United States.
Tennessee. It is the third-largest state in the southeast region of the US!
Tennessee is the southernmost state in the southeastern region of the united states
It is a state in the southwestern region of the southeastern United States.
It is a state in the southeastern region of the state of Georgia. 
I am not sure, but I know they are a state located in the Southeastern region of the United States.
I'm not sure but i know they are one of the most populous state in the southeast.
I am not sure, but I know it is a state in the southeastern region of the united states.
Zeus was the oldest of three siblings and the youngest of five.  I was so excited!
She is an an American singer and songwriter.  I love her.  Do you have any siblings?
Zeus is an African prince. I am not sure if he is the oldest or youngest.
Yes, it's amazing how old she is, I wonder how long her parents have been together.
Zeus is the oldest of 4 siblings, but I am the youngest. 
Obama Obama Obama. I'm not really sure about that but he was elected president of Ohio.
President Abby Jean Hornblower was born on March 25, 1845. He was the president of Ohio.
I'm not sure, but he was elected to president of Ohio. He's a good president.
president of america.  he is the 45th president of ohio. he was also president of us.
I don't know. But I know that the president was elected by President Jean Jett. 
Obama was president and he was born and raised in Pennsylvania. He was elected to president of Ohio.
He died in the battle of the Battle of the Armies of the Grenade. 
She went to a private elementary school, I guess I should have gone to the private one.
I don't know, but I know it was one of the largest and most influential in the world.
I believe it was a military. I know they were the first country to declare independence.
I believe it was in the 1880's.  I am not sure if it was the first one that passed.  Do you know much about it?
It was in 1881, and it was a very important one. It was the first presidential election in the United States.
I am not sure but I know that it was a long time ago.  But it was passed in the United States and Canada.
I don't remember the year but it was a long time ago.  It was a small one.
The album "Badie Gagas" came out in 1989. It was a great album.
He is an American singer-songwriter and producer. He has a lot of good stuff.
It was the last time I saw it. I am so glad I was able to go to Mexico.
It was in the 1962. I don't remember when it happened. I know they won.
I'm not sure.  I think he had a heart attack and he was old.  
He was an American actor who was nominated for four Academy Awards in his career.
I'm not sure but it was nominated for seven Academy Awards in the United States. 
I'm not sure but he was the best actor in the movie The Godfather.  He was a great actor.
I'm not sure, but I do know he was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actor and Best Director.
It's a French colonial monarchy, but I'm not sure who is the leader.
I'm not really sure but I think he was drafted by the Atlanta Atlanta Braves.
I'm not sure but his first play was in 2009 at the university of Kansas.
The US president of the US. He was elected to the US and won the presidency.
I'm not sure.  It seems like it was a very important one in the U.S.
I'm not sure. I know that the winner is determined by the amount of money in the country.
Dutch is actually the second-largest language in the world! It was first spoken in the 15th century.
I am not sure but I do know that the first Oscar was held in the late 18th century. 
I don't know.  I know they are a Canadian singer-songwriter, songwriters, and actor.
It was a book written by Joseph Heller in England, it's a very popular one.
I don't remember the first one, but it was a book that was translated into the US in the 19th century.
It was called "The Bible", it was a sequel to "Golden Girl"
The Sense and Sensibility, it was written by Joseph Heller.  I loved it!
No, not yet. But I do know that it was the best game of all time.   
George Orwell was the author. He was born in 1949 and died in 1953.
His real name was Peter Hernandez. He was born in New York. How about you?
It's in Brazil. I've never been there but I've heard it's beautiful. Do you know it?
Venezuela.  I was so shocked.  It is a very small island in the Pacific Ocean.
I am not sure but I do know the Spanish columbian government is a sovereign state in the Caribbean.
I don't know, but I do know that it's one of the most sparsely populated countries in the world.
It's located in the Caribbean. It's a beautiful country.  Do you have a favorite country?
I don't know. I just know that it's one of the three largest and most sparsely populated nations in the world.
New York City is one of the largest cities in the world and it is also the most populous city in the US.
It's called Dallas, TX. It's the most populated of the U.S. states.
New York City is the second most populous city in the United States and the third largest by area in the USA.
I am thinking of visiting Northern Mexico. It is the capital of the United States.
New York City is the most populous city in the U.S. in the United States
I'm not sure, but the book was written in 1939 and was published in 1948
I am not sure, but I can tell that the first use of the word "chimp" was in the 1450s.
I do not remember the name but I know that it is a road in the middle of nowhere.
I don't really know, but he died in August of 1994. He was a great poet.
I'm not sure what the name was, I just know that she was a great actress and singer.
No clue, but I know she was a great actress. She did not have to wear a costume either.
She was a singer and songwriter. I think she did well on the show.
Her name was Katheryn Elmer Doolin and she was a very famous actress.
Her name was Mary and she was a famous actress in New York.  She was a great actress and dancer.
I am not sure, but it is a very small island in the Caribbean. It is a little scary to think about.
He is a business man and he is the CEO and president of Maldives. I don't know who he is.
It was the oldest continuous settlement in the world and was one of the most important cities in the US
It is a river that runs along the Gulf of Mexico that runs through the Atlantic Ocean.
I am not sure, but it is a large island in the middle of the gulf of mexico.
I'm not sure, but they are the smallest and most densely developed.  
The 3 major ones are the ones that are connected to the Atlantic ocean and the Chesapeake Bay
The three major ones are the ones in the Caribbean Sea, the Atlantic, the Pacific Ocean, and Hawaii
I am not sure, but there is one in the Caribbean and one in Tanzania. 
I believe Motor-powered motorcycles first appeared in the late 1930s.
I am not sure, but he was very successful.  He is one of the greatest players to play in the world.
I don't remember his name but I know he was a very good driver. It was his first year of high school.
It is the Democratic Party, they have been in the US since the 1960's.
I am not entirely sure, but I know the province is bordered by the Atlantic ocean and the Canadian River.
The Democratic party, which is the third-largest political party in the US. 
The British Columbia is a country in the northern hemisphere in the United States
I'm not sure. I don't know. I know it's a big party there. 
Cobb counties is located in the county seat of Cincinnati.
I am not sure, but I know it is the 3rd-largest in the world.
It is in the United States.  It is the 3rd largest state in the US. 
I'm not sure but it's the third-most populous county in the United States.
I am not sure but it is the largest state in the US. It was founded in 1845
It is a small county in the Midwest.  It is the 4th largest in the US.
It was a date that was supposed to be on August 21, 1969. 
It was founded in 1777.  That is when I first heard of it.  It was very cool.
I believe it was founded in 1787. I don't know the exact date but I can tell it was a long time ago.
It's the third-largest planet in the Solar System.  It's pretty cool to think about.
It is the 3rd largest in the world. It is located in the Eastern region of the country.
I am not sure but it is the second-largest country by area in the US.
It is. It's the third-largest in the US and the fourth-most populated of all 50 states.
Odin was born in the 10th century. He was the ruler of the world.
I am not sure exactly but he was the leader of the norse nation in the 10th century
I am not sure but I know he was the ruler of the Norse kingdom. 
I am not sure what country you are referring to. But it's an island nation in the Caribbean Sea.
Yes, I am from Nepal. It is a small country in the Eastern part of the Midwest.
Well, I'm sure it depends on how you define Nepal as being the most sparsely populated country in the world.
I don't know but I know Nepal is the third-largest country in the European union. 
I have never been to Nebraska, but I know they are the 3rd largest country in the world by area.
I don't know, but I know Nepal is in the southeastern part of the world.
I'm not really sure but it looks like it is the capital of Neapolitan.
I'm not sure, but I know the Nepal and Bangladeshi border is a bit far from Canada.
I think Antiguas are the most popular. It is a regional food in the world.
Prince William was born in the UK.  He was a great dancer. 
Prince William was born in London, England. He was born and raised in Dearborn, Michigan and lived in Manhattan.
I'm not sure, maybe The Lady Vernon? I think she was pretty good.
I think he is still president.  He is also the 45th president of the U.S.
I'm not sure, but it is in the Caribbean.  It has a lot of rivers.
The Amazon River is in the United States, and it is located in Latin America.
It's in the Caribbean.  I've never been there.  What did you find out?
It's in South America in the Pacific Ocean. It is a beautiful place to visit.
I am not sure. But I do know that Amazon is the world largest online retailer by revenue.
I have no idea, but I do know Amazon is one of the biggest retailer in Europe.
I am not sure but I do know Amazon is an American multinational electronic company based in Seattle.
The river Amazon is a large corporation in Las Vegas, Nevada. 
Her name is Katheryn Elizabeth and I love that name.  It's a great name!  I love it!
James Phelps is an American swimmer and he won the 2007 Olympics.
James Phelps is one of the greatest swimmer and most decorated Olympic gold medals ever
James Phelps is an American Olympic medalist, he won four gold medals.
James Phelps is a professional swimmer in the Olympics. He is the best. 
James Phelps is my all time favorite actor. He was the greatest Olympian of all time!
Yes, I am a big fan of football, especially Nebraskas Heisman. Do you like football?
No, I don't know who is Nigerian. But I know he is an American rapper.
Not that I know of.  But, I do know they are a small island nation located in the Mediterranean Sea.
I'm not sure. I was just thinking about Nigera and how it's in Africa.
I am not sure, but I am sure they are very successful and are the largest minister in Africa.
Yes, they are a great company. I think they are headquartered in Bahassee, Niagara Falls.
Yes, they are. They are a Nordic island in the Caribbean. 
I am not sure if I am being honest. Do you know anything about Nigerian leaders?
I'm not sure about that, but I know the Nigerian Minister is in the Navy.
No, I am not sure.  It is a small island in the Caribbean.
It was on March 30, 1978.  It was a long time ago, though.
I think it was the University of North Carolina.  It was a pretty good school.
It was Arizona State University, I was there for the first semester of the program.
University of Maryland. It's in Vermont, but I haven't been there yet.
She was a high school teacher.  She went to a private school in the US.  I didn't know she was a teacher.
I don't know yet. I have been to the University of North Carolina. 
Jennifer Finch is an American football quarterback for the University of Michigan.
He was an English rock singer and songwriter, but he was born in 1984
I'm not sure, but I know that California is the 8th most densely populated of the US.
I'm not sure what country it is in. But it is bordered by the Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic Ocean, and the Pacific.
It's in the southern part of the United States. I was there once, I loved it.
I am not sure, but I know it was one of the first major cities to have a population of 800,000.
I am not sure, but I do know that he was a professional athlete and was one of the most successful people of all time.
I don't know, but I do know that they are a big part of the African-American government
I think it would be the Nigerian Minister.  He is one of the most influential minister in the world.
I don't know, but it's interesting to see how the Nigerian Minister is regarded as one of the most influential people in the world.
I'm not sure but it seems like it's been a while since I've been to Nigera.
I don't have a list.  I know that it is a big deal in the world.  
I don't have a specific list but I do know that the Nigerian Minister is a very important figure of importance.
I don't know, but I do know that the Nigerian minister was an Italian man, born in Italy.
I don't know, but I know that the list of Nigerian Ministers are very high.
I don't really understand, what do you mean by "Nigerian Minister"?
I don't know but I do know that they are the leading producers of the Nigerian minister.
The Nigera Ministers are one of the most influential women in Africa. 
No, I am not sure. I know that the Nigerian Minister is from the Northeast of Africa.
I don't know the list but I know that the Nigerian minister is the founder of the company.
I'm not sure. I just found out that Nigera Ministers were the founder of Nigreia.
I have no idea but I know they have won awards for the Nigerian ministry
I have been looking online for some information on the Nigerian Minister.   Do you know much about them?
I don't know, but I know the Nigerian minister is very successful in Northern Africa, especially in Africa.
I am not sure, but the Nigerian Minister was one of the leading women in the world.
That's a good question. I don't know much about them. I know they have had a lot of controversy.
I'm not sure, but I do know that she is an actress from Las Vegas
Obama was born in Pennsylvania and was president of the US for two decades.
Obama is an American politician and was born in Pennsylvania.   
I'm not sure but he was a Republican.  He was the 45th president of the US. 
It was Obama's birthplace of Obama. He is a former U.S. president. 
I'm not sure where Obama was born but he was born in Pennsylvania.
I don't know but it was founded in 1885 and is the third most populous country in the US.
I am not sure but I do know it is the third-most sparsely populated in the world and the second-largest country in the EU.
I'm not sure but I do know that the Belgium government is located in the capital, Brinjal.
I am not sure, but it has been a while since I've been to Missouri.
The Missouri River is in the Mississippi.  It's pretty big.
It's a Missouri-Southwestern state in the southeastern United States.
I'm not sure but I do know that the Missouri River is in the Mississippi.
I don't know, but I do know that it is the 4th most densely populated state in the USA.
It's the Missouri River. I've never been there but I've heard of it.
It's actually the Mississippi River, but it runs through the Gulf of Mexico.
I am not sure, but I do know that the Mississippi River is the highest river in Missouri.
Missouri is one of the three-third-largest U.S. states.
I'm not sure which one, but I know it's the third-largest state in the US.
Missouri is the third-largest state in the U.S.  It's a beautiful state!
Missouri. We are the 3rd most densely populated state in the United States.
I am not sure, but I know there are a lot of rivers around Missouri.
I'm not sure, but it's a state that is in the Southeastern region of Missouri.
It is the Mississippi Gulf of Mexico.   I have always wanted to go there.
No, the rivers are in Missouri. It is in the southeast region.
The Missouri River, Mississippi, and the Appalachian National Scenic Trail.
Yes! They are an American multinational government organization in Africa. I am so proud of them.
Major Jemison graduated in 2008. I think she is a great actress.
The river of the Mississippi, the largest river in the state of Maine.
I think he was in Honorary school, which is the state of Georgia.
Kobe Bryant was the best player at the NBA. He was also a great player.
I believe they are the most influential and most prestigious basketball championship winners in the world.
Kobe Bryant is one of the greatest basketball players and most decorated all time.
Kobe Bryant was an American basketball player for the Washington Capital.  He was a great player.
His name is Drew. I don't remember his actual name, but he was a great driver.
His name is Matthew.  He's a great guy!  He is also a lawyer.
That is a very interesting question. I do not know. But he was a prominent politician in the United States.
That is a great question. I am not sure but he is one of the most influential US presidents
I'm not sure but he is a great American politician.  He was elected in 1845.
I am not sure. I know his wife was a Republican but she was a Democrat. 
I am not sure but it was a horror book written by Stephen King in the United States.
I don't remember the author, but the bear was the first species to be found in North America.
I am not sure, but I have seen it a couple of times. It is one of the biggest bears in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know it was the best song ever made.  It's so good.
Marie and Peirrer were engaged in 2005.  They were married at 16. 
I don't know. But it was the first official appointment in Soviet Union. 
She was elected to the Soviet Union as the president and was replaced by a woman named Katheryn Elizabeth.
I'm not sure, but it's not like it was in the Soviet Union.
I don't know but I do know that he is the CEO of Nikita Khrushv.
I am not sure who replaced Nikita Khrush, but she did a great job.
That is a good question.  I'm not sure if I want to be the president, but I'm sure it's a tough job.
Louis Armstrong is a great American singer and songwriter, author, and producer.
Louis Armstrong was an American singer and songwriter. He died in 2008.
Louis Armstrong is an American singer-songwriter. He is also a comedian.
Louis Armstrong is a famous singer, songwriter, and author.
Louis Armstrong was an English comedy actor, singer and songwriter.
Yes, Louis Armstrong was an American singer-songwriter and songwriters.
I love Louis Armstrong.  He was an American singer, songwriter and actor
Louis Armstrong is a great American singer and songwriter. Do you know who he is?
The five books he wrote, they're called "The Godfather" and "Doctor Who"
I dont know but it was one of the most influential authors in the history of America.
Rick riardan is a great author. He is also a screenwriter. He's a good actor too.
I don't know, but I do know that it's been over a decade since he's been president.
I'm not sure, but I'm sure it's been quite a while since it was established.
The United Kingdom of New Zealand is the first United States to have elected elected a president.
I don't really recall, but I do know it was a British columbia territory.
The USA! I was rooting for them. It was so exciting to see them win! What about you?
I'm not sure but I do know that there are a few lakes in the US. 
He had a heart attack. I don't know how he did it. It was so sudden.
I don't know, but I do know he was born in 1857. He was a great president of the United States.
He died on June 30, 1884. He was a great president of the United States.
She was born on August 2, 1963. I think she was so excited!
I am not sure, but it seems to be some of the most influential people on the country.
I'm not sure, but she did win a Grammy award for her in 2003
I think it was Kate Winslet.  She was a very popular one.  I don't remember her name.
I don't remember but I know that it was a long time ago.  I was in a hurry to get it done.
He died in 1874. He was an Italian commander and he was the first ruler of the world.
I'm not sure, but I know it's been a long time since I've been there.
It was a long time ago, I was only a child so I was not sure when it happened.
Belize is the capital and most populated country in the Americas. It is also the third-largest state in the world.
I have no idea, but I do know it is the smallest continent in the world.
It is in the Caribbean.  I have never been to it.  It's on the west coast of Africa.
It's called "The Bahamas" which is a small island in the Caribbean Sea.
I don't remember, but I do know the US is the third-largest country in the US.
I don't know, but it's interesting to know that there are over 600 languages spoken.
Spanish, english, and spanish.  I have been studying spanish since I was little. 
He was born in 1968 and he was an American singer and songwriter and record producer.
Yes, I believe so.  He's also a great actor.  His real name is Peter Jackson, and he was born in New York City.
I don't remember exactly but he was born on March 1963. He was an American singer and songwriter.
I am not sure, but he was born in 1981.  He was an American singer/songwriter.
He died on August 28, 1963. I am not sure how he did it though
My husband and I were going to go to the wedding but we decided to go on our first date.
It's a small island in the Caribbean and the Atlantic ocean. It is very pretty.
Yes!  I was so happy that I could see it!  It was a long time ago! 
Frank Lee is a famous musician.  He was born on August 21, 1968.
I am not sure exactly, but he was born in 1857, he was an American singer-songwriter.
Obama is the 45th president of the United States and he is a Republican. I think he is doing great.
Obama was elected in 1983 and I'm not sure when the first president was elected. 
Obama was elected in 2004 as President of the United States.  It was an exciting time.
I am not sure but it was launched from the US to the U.S. in 1969.
That's a good question. The first Soviet Satellites was launced into 1958.
It was launched in 1968 by Bartolomeo Cristofori.
It was the Soviet Union, which is a governmental system that was established in 1853.
I'm not sure but it is the 3rd most densely populated asia. 
The United States, but I don't know which country is the largest in Asia.  
I don't know, but I know there are over seventy languages in Asia. 
The Republic of Asia, and it is the third-largest country in the Southeast Asian region.
It was in 1845.  It was a long time ago.  He was president of Mexico.
I am not entirely sure but I know that the capital is Burlington and it is the most populous city in Canada.
I am not sure but I do know that Canada is the largest country in the world.  That is a big difference.
She is Madeleine Stone and she is the lead singer and songwriter.
Her real name is Lady Gaga.  She is an English singer and songwriter.  
Yes. She is an American singer, songwriter, and producer. I have been a big fan since she was born.
It was a monotheistic religion in the 10th century. I don't know much about it though.
Yes! Edgar Allan Poe is one of the most influential poet's ever!
I don't know what you mean, but he was a very famous rapper. He died in 1983.
I'm not sure.  I know he was a great author.    He was an American author, author, and poet.
Columbus, Ohio.  They are the largest public school in Ohio, and are the second largest private school in the US.
It was Columbus, Michigan. It was a private high school.  It was the first public school in the US.
Yes, it is a great place to go to school. They have a lot of schools there, including Harvard, Princeton, and the University of Pennsylvania.
She attended Princeton, Pennsylvania. I don't think she's very smart.
He was in the great depression.  It was a long time ago.  I don't remember the exact number of years he was alive.
I believe it is a protestant religion that was founded in 1768. I have never heard of it before.
He was born in the United States in 1948. He was also a good driver. 
He passed on on on January 1984.  He was a great driver.  
I'm not sure, but he was a good driver.  He was in the Nissan Sierra.
I don't know, but he was a great driver and had to get off the highway.
I am not sure but he was an American rapper and actor from New York City, NY.
He died on August 2, 2017 at a young age, so he was a great driver.
I am not really sure but he was the oldest of five brothers and sisters. 
He had a heart attack.  He was a great driver.  I'm sure his family loved him.
He died in August of 1958. He was an American actor and director.
I am not sure but he was the one who died on August 28, 1985.
He's an American rapper who was born in New York. He was also an author.
He had just turned 34 years old. He was a good dad and his wife was also a great mother.
Bosnian is a sovereign state in the Republic of Bosna. It's a small island in the Mediterranean sea.
I am not sure, but the long river is in the Gulf of Mexico. The river flows through the Atlantic Ocean.
I am not sure about which ocean but I know that it is the largest river in the world!
He was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and actor.  He's been around since 1962.
He was born in the United States, and he was a Scottish immigrant. He is a great driver, too!
I think it's an American country. It's the third-largest country in the world, but I'm not sure.
The Huckleberry Awards, he was also the best selling novelist in the United States.
New York City is the most populated city in the world, but it's also the most densely populated
I'm not sure but I do know that he was born on August 1974.
He died on August 28th, 1959.  It was a long time ago.
Yes he died on August 30, 2017.  I'm so sorry for your loss.
I think it was around 2009 or 2011? It was the first time I saw him.
I am not sure. But he was a great actor, singer and songwriter.
He was drafted by the Dallas Cowboys in the early 1970s.
He is the Cowboys quarterback, he is also the quarterback of the Atlanta Giants.
I'm not sure but he was born on March 30, 1987 in Jacksonville, Mississippi.
The Indian Ocean. He's the president of the United States of America. He is the ruler of the Indian subcontinent.
He was a professional baseball player. He played for the NY Yankee in 1962.
Her name is Jane, and she is an American singer, songwriter, dancer, actress, and singer.
Toni Morrison is a pretty popular name for her. It's also one of the most popular names for women in the world.
Her name was Megus.  She was a famous actress and singer.  
I don't remember his last name.  He's a great dad.  I'm sure he'll be okay.
His name was Madeleine. She's an amazing actress, singer, songwriter, and dancer.
I don't remember his name but he was born on October 1964.  
Her name was Jacifer.  She lived in the United States for a few years.
Her name was Mia Khalifa, she was an American singer and songwriter.
Paul Reverend is a very famous American poet, he was born on August 1857.
It was first built in 1874.  It's been a long time since I've been there.
The Tower of Londenburg was established on June 30, 1957. 
I am not sure, I just know that the state is one of the seventh-largest states in the U.S.
I am not sure how old Obama is but I do know he was the president of the US in 2003
That is a good question, I'm not sure. I know that it's one of the oldest nations in the EU.
I'm not sure but I know it is a sovereign country in the European Union.
It was in the late 1800s. It was the first European Union to be established.
The United States, which is the third-largest country in the world.  It's really interesting.
It's not that small, but the US is the 3rd least populous of the 50 US states
I am not sure but I do know that the Republic of Ireland is one of the most populous countries in the United States.
The Republic of Ireland is the only one that is considered to be one country in the United States.
The book was released in 1948 by Jane Austen.  It was a romantic comedy.
I don't know, but I know she's been in a lot of movies. She's one of America's most successful actresses.
The youngest of the Jackson brothers is the middle of Jacksonville.  They're the only ones that are still alive.
The older brother, the younger one. The youngest is the baby. He was born in New York City and raised in Jacksonville.
I'm not really sure what the name is, but it's a small island in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.
It's a country in the United States that's in the southern part of Central America.
Yes, I'm a big fan of the U.S. I love the freedom of being able to travel anywhere.
I think it was The Godfather. It's been a while since I've seen it.
I'm not sure, but i do know that the film was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actor.
It was a documentary that was nominated for Best Actor awards.  It was really good.
It was a documentary.  It was really good.  The director was very well known for his role.
The Birds was a great film and it was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor in 2009.
I don't think I've seen any of them. The first one was in 1974 and it was a great one.
I am not really sure but the best film ever made was The Number of the Beast. 
The Birds was one of the best films in the world. It won the Academy Award for Best Picture.
I'm not sure, but he is a great author. He wrote the book "The Song of Ice and Fire" in 1845.
He was married to Elaine Scott in 1943.  She was a very successful actress.
Fabio Capello is a German singer, songwriter and actor.  He is very talented.
I'm not sure, but he was born in Italy.  I guess he is pretty good.
He is a great American singer, songwriter, and actor.  I love him.
It's a famous singer, songwriter, and actor. I don't know much about him
I don't recall the name, but it was an American pilot. She was a great pilot.
Dr. Martin Luther King was a famous American author.  He was a great actor too. 
she was born and raised in hawaii and lived there until she died in 1974
Ronn Weasley is a Scottish man.  He is a great author.  Do you like him?
She's an American singer, songwriter, dancer, and author. She's been around a while.
His name is Baby. He's a big fan of Harry Potter books. His name was Hermione.
Hermione is named after my favorite character from the Disney film "The Hermione".
Hermione is the name of the daughter who is the youngest of 4, and the only girl in the family.
The kids names are Bertie and Bert. We're going to a concert in a few months.
I'm not sure, but I do know that China is one of the largest countries in China.
I'm not sure, but I do know China is a major center of China, but it's the second-largest country in the world.
They are in Asia but not China, which is the second-largest country in China.
I am not sure about that. But I know China is one of the largest countries in the world, I think it has a lot to do with China.
China is the largest island nation in China.  It's also the 3rd-largest country in the world.
I'm not sure but the USA is bordered by China, Russia, and the United States.
I don't know but I do know that China is one of the three largest territory in the world.
Yes, and it is the only country in the world that is bordered by China, Bangle, and Russia.
Yes, China, Japan and China. I have been to China before and it was a little scary
No, I'm talking about a country that is not part of the united states.  
Yes, I have been to China a couple times.  It is also the third-largest country in the world.
I am not sure but I do know that they are the largest and most populous countries in the world.
Silas is engaged! He proposed in May 2017 and I am so happy for him.
I have no idea but they are gone for good. They are very distant from me. 
A long time ago, it was the first video game console to be released on the Nintendo Switch.
It was released on the Nintendo Switch. It was a great system. Nintendo released it on the Wii.
I am not sure, but he is the most successful man in the world. I am sure she has some great influence on him.
I'm not sure but I know that she is the mother of the American film production studio.
I'm not exactly sure, but I do know that he is the youngest of 5 sisters.
I am not sure but the US first landing was on June 2, 1962.
I'm not sure of the name.  But I do know that the Apollo Mississippi mission was completed in 1962.
I am not sure, but I know they have been sent to the moon since 1952.
The Secretary is the president of the United States, he is also a member of the President's office.
I don't know but he was born and raised in Dearborn Michigan and was a great actor.
Ruth was the first president of the United States, and was elected on March 25, 1845.
Yes he does, and he is one of the most influential and famous actors in history!
No, it's not a scary movie at all. It's a thriller movie. I love his voice.
He does!  I saw him in "Shawshank Redemption" and I was so terrified.
Yes, he was in a horror movie. I love horror movies. Do you like scary movies?
Yes, he plays in a few of them.  I was surprised by how good he is.
Yes. He was so terrifying. I think he is one of my favorite actors in the horror movies.
I have not seen that one. I am sure it will be good. What is scary about him?
No, I don't like scary movies at all.  The last one I saw was when I was a baby.
He was born in 1853. He was the founder of the Hayden Planetarium in London.
I don't remember.  But I know that he was the 45th president of the US.
I am not sure of that one but the current Dominican Republic was established in 1845. 
I am not sure, but I know he has done a lot with Hitchhikers.
He is an American actor and director.   I love him!  What about you?
I don't know, but I do know that he has made a lot of movies.  I just know he was a great actor.
I don't know, but he did win a bunch of awards for being a great actor.
I love Johnny Depp's films. He was born and raised in New York City. 
Yeah, he was born and raised in Honolulu.  He was an actor, singer, and director.
Yes, he was an American actor, screenwriter, and producer. He is a great actor.
I love his work! He is one of the most influential artists of all time! He has so many great roles!
I am not sure but it was a long time ago, I do not remember when it happened.
Edna St. Vincent died in 1909. I think she was a great dancer.
Rowland Hill is the oldest in the country, it is one of the most popular hikes in the world.
Bart harts was an American rapper. He was a big fan of rap music.
Bret harr is an American singer, songwriter, and actor. He's been around a long time.
I'm not sure, but I did have to pay for the shipping fees.  It's been a long week.
It is a very large, sparsely populated island in the middle of nowhere. It is beautiful.
It is a state in the United States located in the southern tip of North Carolina. 
It is a large island in the middle of nowhere in the Caribbean. It is beautiful there.
It is the third most sparsely populated of the 50 states.  It's beautiful there.
Its a large island in the Caribbean. It is located in the North Atlantic Ocean
It's the largest state in the United States. It's also the third most populous in the world.
It is the largest island in the US. It is in the Caribbean Sea.
That's so cool, I love the paintings of the Mona Lisa. 
I think it was Richard Bachman. He was born in 1903. 
Mona Lisa is my favorite painter. She was an American fashion designer. I think she was a good artist.
Mona Lisa was the best painter in the world. I don't remember her name, but the painting was amazing.
Yes, I'm a painter, I paint the Mona Lisa.  I love her, she's a great artist.
It was a painter of the Renaissance. He was quite good at painting.
I'm not sure, but I know he was born on August 21, 1964
It is a woodworking furniture. I am not sure what it is. 
James Maslow is a singer, and a songwriter. He's pretty popular in the US!
James maslo, he's an American singer/songwriter and actor.
James Maslow was a famous actor and singer. He was born on March 1878.
Yes. He is a great American singer and songwriter. I am a huge fan of him.
James masalow is the father of the american singer and songwriter of the world
James Maslow's mother is an English poet. She's a great poet and songwriter.
Twilight Victoria.  She's my favorite.  I love her so much.
I am not sure but i do remember he was one of the best singers of all time!
I don't know what his name is.  I'm not sure if he has any siblings.
I don't know but he was elected president of the United States in July of 1943 and became the President of the U.S.
I don't know but he was one of the leaders during the reign of the Republic of England.
I'm not sure but I know it was the most important political and social change in the history of the world.
Yes.  I believe it was the ruler of the Republic of France during the French revolution.
I think the King Charles Alderton, he was one of the first rulers of the United States.
Yes, he was the president of the United States and was elected in July of 1939.
He was born in 1887. He had a heart attack and he had to be in the hospital.
It was a long time ago, but I still remember his name.  He was born on August 30, 1948.
The fourth largest country is Canada, but the 3rd-largest country in the world
The 4th,  and the 3rd most sparsely populated country in the world.
It is North America, and it is the third-largest country in the United States.
I'm not sure, but I know the US is a sovereign country. Do you know?
I am not sure but I do know that they are the 4th largest country in the world.
The four main countries are the United States, Canada, and the United Kingdom.  Do you have any?
I am not sure. But I know that they are the 4th-largest country in the world, with 3.5 million people.
I have no idea, but I know the United States is the third-largest country in the world.
Mexico, Euro, and the Caribbean. I am not sure what they are called.
I'm not sure, but I know that they're the largest country in Africa and the largest in Asia.
I don't know but I know the US is the only country that is bordered by Alaska, Canada, and the United States.
The 4th largest country in the world and the third most sparsely populated in the us.
I am not sure but I know that it is the fourth-largest country in the world.
It is a sovereign state in the northern hemisphere.  
I'm not sure, but I know that the US is one of the most populated countries in the world.
I'm not sure, but I know it is the second-largest country in the world.
I am not sure, but I do know that it is a sovereign state in the United States.
The US is the third-most populous country in the US and second-largest nation in the United States.
I don't know, but I know that North America is the second-largest country in the world by area.
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is a federal union of the United States.
North America is the third-largest country in the U.S., in the 1960's.
I'm not really sure. I know that the US is one of the most densely populated nations in Europe, though.
I don't remember, but I do know that it is a federal republic located in the United States.
I am not sure but I do know North America is one of the largest and most sparsely populous countries in the world.
I'm not sure what country but I know that North America is the third-largest country in the US.
The U.S. is a sovereign country in the southern region of the United States 
I am not sure but I do know that the U.S. is the 3rd-largest country by area in the world.
I'm not sure, but i do know the US has the longest continuous coastline in the world.
I am not sure. But I know that is one of the largest seas in the world!
The Arabian Pinsula, the largest and most sparsely populated. 
Yes, it does. I have never been to Egypt, but it is the third most sparsely populated country in the world.
I don't know, but I know that Egypt has the highest GDP in the world.
It's a mountainous area in the southeastern part of the world, and the Arabian Peninsula is in the Atlantic Ocean.
It's on the Atlantic Ocean, and it's a little further from the Gulf of Mexico.
I dont remember, but i do know he was a great actor, he was also a great dancer
she died in 1958.  She was an american actress and singer. 
I am not sure.  It is very expensive.  They are in the Southeast Africa.
They are a sovereign state located in Africa. I have never been there, but I would love to visit.
No, I'm not sure what that is.  But it's been a long time since I've heard of her.
I don't really know, but I do know that he was born in 1983.  
He went to the University of Memphis.  It was a private school in the UK.
Jordan Barbara Charline went to a private high school in New York, NY. 
Paul Reverevere died in 1983. He is the first American president of the U.S.
I'm not sure, but I know they are one of the biggest bands in the US.
It is the capital of Guinea. It is a small island in the Mediterranean Seas.
He went to Columbia University. He's the head of the U.S.A.
No, he went to University of North Carolina.  I was surprised to find out that he is the only one to do that.
He went to college in Birmingham England. I was there and he played for the University of Alabama.
I am not sure. But I am sure he studied at a good school. He was very smart. What did you study?
He is the coach of the University of Penn State University.  He is really smart!
Mike Brown University of Pittsburgh. It's in Pennsylvania.
I don't recall his name but he was the quarterback for the University of Michigan.
It was at a wedding in the United States. I was so shocked and happy when he came to visit.
Selena was a singer, songwriter, dancer, actress.
I'm not sure, but I do know that Trump is the 45th president of America. 
The first one was held in 1961, but the first one held in 1891.
She was a great artist. She was an American singer, songwriter, dancer, producer and singer.
Yes, he was an American singer, songwriter and actor. He was born in Lyndan, Illinois.
Lyndons B Johnson was a great American singer and songwriter. 
They're a great American rock band.  Tamela Mann is a singer, songwriter, producer, and actor.
It is in the Caribbean Sea. It is a very large island in Italy.
It is a large body of freshwater water. It is in the Mediterranean Sea.
Italy is the most sparsely populated country in Europe and it is located in the Mediterranean Sea.
I am not really sure but I know that Sicily is the smallest island in Italy. 
It is an island country in the Mediterranean Sea in the Atlantic Ocean
I'm not sure, but I do know that it is in the southern tip of Georgia.
I'm not sure, but I know it's the most densely populated in the United States.
I don't know but it is the capital and the most populous metropolitan area in the world!
I'm not sure, but I know it is one of the largest metropolitan areas in the US
I'm not sure. But I do know that the population is the third-largest metropolitan area in the US.
The largest city is Dearborn, Michigan. It's the second-largest city in the U.S.
I think it was on March 30, 1994. I can't believe it was that long ago! 
I'm not sure, but it is one of the best selling albums in the world. 
The Jackson Fives album was released in 1985. It was released by Lars Ulrich
Jackson Fives album is the one that made it to number one in the Billboard Hot 100.
Jackson Fives was one of the most influential bands of the time. He sold more than 100 million records worldwide.
I don't remember the names, but I know he was a huge fan of Jackson Fives, and he was born and raised in Dearborn, Michigan.
I don't remember the name of the album, but it was a great release.  It was released in July of 1997.
Mt Everest is a mountain in the Southern portion of China and the Greece.
I would have to say Manhattan, NY. It's one of the most populated cities in the US.
I am not sure but I do know that it is the most populous city in the United States.
I'm not sure but I know there are more than seventy cities in the world. 
He was an American actor and director.  He was born and raised in Birmingham, AL.
I am not sure but I do know that it is the 8th most populous of the 50 states in the USA.
He was born on August 30, 1972. He was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
He died in 1974, so it's been a while. He was an American actor and television host.
He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii, and was born in 1886.
He was 34.  I was so upset.  He was so talented.   
I'm not sure, but I know it is a very important colonial territory.
She is an American singer, songwriter and actress. I think her first album was in 2009.
I'm not exactly sure when it came out but Katy Perry's was one of the biggest artists of all time.
She became famous in 1997, she was a singer, songwriter, and actress.
I don't remember, but they are one of the oldest teams in the league.  I think they have won more than seven World Series appearances.
I am unsure of the protocol, but I know it was invented in 1976.
I'm not sure but it's a new technology that was created in the 1980's. I'm sure it's still around.
I'm not sure but I know that it was invented in 1948.  I'm sure the internet was used back then.
It was used by the US government in 2007. I'm not sure if it was used anymore though.
They're an American professional baseball team that was formed in Houston in 1903.
I don't remember her name. I know that she was born in New York. Do you have a favorite team?
His name is Crosby, he's the greatest quarterback in the history of the game.
She won three academy awards.  She was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress in the US.
Yes, that is correct. She was nominated for the Academy Award in August of 1975.
I am not sure of the age but I know that she died in 1977.  She was a beautiful woman.
I'm not sure but I know she was very young.  Her death was in August 1962.
It was Las Vegas, Nevada. It's been a long time since I've been to it.
The Lion King. I was so happy to see it! It was such a good movie!
I don't remember the name of it.  It came out back in the 1980's and was directed by Jodhi May.
I don't know what it was, but I know it was a big one. I was shocked when it came out.
Marie Curie was the first woman to be married.  She is my favorite.  
Gandhi was an American rapper. He was born in India. He died in 1987.
Mechanical Gandhi is one of my favorite actors. She was a famous actress in the United States in the 1980s.
She was a famous fashion designer and a businesswoman in the United States. She was also a dancer, singer, and actress.
It was an investment company. I was so mad at him. He was so rude to me.
I'm not sure, but it was first used by the USS Air Force in 1960.
It was called The Apollo.  It was launched in 1979. 
I'm not sure but it's been around since the 1960's.  I'm sure it was a long time.
I'm not sure but I know there's a lot of water there. The Atlantic, the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.
The Atlantic. It is the third smallest and most densely populated of the seas.
I don't know exactly what it is but I know it is the Atlantic Ocean. 
I don't know but I do know that the first one was launched in the United States on June 30, 1845.
The first orbit in the Solar System was in 1853.  It was a small, sparsely populated planet.
I don't know but I do know that New York is the capital of the state. Do you know anything about it?
I'm not sure, but I'm sure it's somewhere in the eastern portion of New York.
New York. I am in the northeast. It is the largest state in the US.
I don't think I've been there. It's in the eastern portion of New York.
I'm not sure, but I'm sure there's one. I've been to New York City, and it's the most populous city in New York.
I think he played the piano. He's very talented and has won several Academy Awards.
That's a good question, I think it's the Appalachian National Scenic Trail, but I'm not sure.
I'm not sure but I know they are one of the world's most successful clubs in the world
I am not sure who is currently managing them. I am hoping for a new manager. 
Her name was Katheryn Elizabeth.  She was so cute.  We went on a date and she was so nice to me.
Louisianiana.  It is in the southeastern region of the United States
I'm not sure. But I do know that Louisianas are one of the most populous cities in Louiseiana.
The Louisianiana University. I have heard it is one of the largest and most prestigious schools in the state.
I'm not sure but I know that Louisianas are a major state in the southeastern region of the United States.
My favorite is Madeleine Stowe.  She's a great actress, singer and producer.
Louisianas, Mississippi, and Tallahassee. I love them so much!
The people that live there are a lot of people. The state is the third-largest state in the southeastern region of the United States.
He has done some great things. He was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii.
I am not sure. But I do know that he was an actor and dancer. He is a great actor.
Clancy Eastwood is a great actor, but I haven't seen any of his movies. 
I don't know.  I do know he was born in 1981.  Do you know who he is?
Yes he did! He is one of the best actors in the history of Hollywood.  
Yes, he did. He is also a great actor. He was also a good singer and songwriter.
I don't know, but I know it was in a parking lot and there were no other witnesses.
It's a state in the United States that is located in the southernmost part of Canada
I'm not sure but I do know that it is the 4th smallest in the world and is located in Canada.
I am not sure but I do know that the state is located in the southeastern part of the United States.
I am not sure who the first was but I do know he was married to one of the first women to marry him.
I am not sure, but the divorce was a long time ago. It is hard to say. 
He is an American singer, songwriter and actor, actor. I haven't listened to it though.
Paul Reverend Wife was an American singer, songwriter, and actor who died in 1993.
Paul reverend was an american rapper.  He died in 1973.
No he is not, I am not sure if he is. He was a singer and songwriter.
I don't know, but I know that it was held in 1948. It was held by Michael Phelps.
I'm not sure, but I do know that they were the ones who were most influential in the United States.
I'm not too sure but I know they were one of the first countries to be dominated in the war.
Micheal Jackson, he's an American rapper from New York. Do you know him?
I'm not exactly sure, but I know that Mount Everest is the most climbed mountain in the world.
I'm not sure but I do know that there were a lot of people there.  The highest mountain is Mt Everest.
Mt Everest is the highest mountain in the world.  It is also a mountain in Africa.
I don't know, but I do know that it was the highest mountain in the world. 
The highest mountain in Africa was Mt Everest. It was in the 1800s.
The highest mountain in Africa is Smoky Mountain. It's a mountain in the Sierra Nevada mountains.
She was an actress. She was also a singer, songwriter, and dancer, too.
He's the quarterback for the Denver Dallas Stafford. He was the quarter quarterback of the AFC.
He is my favorite American quarterback. He is also my favorite quarterback of all time. 
I don't know but I know that he was one of the best quarterbacks in history.
He played QB for the Washington Redskins.  He is a quarterback, quarterback and quarterback.
He died in 1994. He was a great American singer, songwriter, and actor.
I am not sure. But it was the largest and most populous of the 20th century.
I don't know but I do know that it was the first Indian-American president.
I don't know but I can tell you that he's the lead singer of the band and the bassist.
Ronan Keating.  He is an American singer, songwriter and actor. He's a pretty good actor too.
No, but I know he was in a metal band. He was a member of a punk rock band.
He is an american singer and songwriter. He was born and raised in the south.
Ronnan keaton was a great singer. He was also a songwriter and guitarist.
I don't remember, but I know he had a heart attack. His heart was beating beating beating. 
He was an orphan and died in 1989 in August of 1985.
I went to college in New York! It is a small community college. I love it! 
The University of North Carolina. I have a lot of friends in college. I don't get to see them often.
I'm not sure but I think it was the University of North Carolina, but I didn't know they were so expensive.
The University of Michigan!  It's a pretty small one, so it's not as big as I thought it was.
I am not sure but I know that it is one of the world largest public universities in the world.
He was at the University of Kentucky State University in Los Angeles. 
Jackie Robinson was born on August 30, 1949 and he was an American singer, songwriter, and actor.
Jackie Robinson was born in 1977.  He's a great actor and singer.
He died on March 28, 1943. He was an amazing author and author. I can't believe he was so young.
Yes, I love Adams Adams! She's an amazing actress and singer. Do you know her?
He won one of the best Oscars of all time! He is one of my favorite actors ever!
He was a great actor, director, and screenwriter.  He also played guitar in the Rock & Roll Hall of Fame.
The American singer, songwriter, and producer.  He was a great actor.
The American singer and songwriter? I am not really sure who he is. But she has a lot of talent.
He is an American singer, songwriter and producer. I love his music!
I don't know, but I do know he is one of the best selling artists of all times!
He's a great actor. He was born on August 3, 1963. He's been around a while.
Frank sinatras is an american actor.  He is also a singer, songwriter and producer.
My favorite artist is Frank Sinatra. I love him because he's a great actor and singer.
Frank Sinatra was a great American singer and songwriter.  I think he was also a great actor.
Frank Sinatra was one of the greatest singers of all time. He was born and raised in New York, New York.
I think it is Billie Jean Jeanne Angelos, but I'm not sure.
Frank Sinatra was an American rapper, singer, and producer.  He was born in 1948.
He is my favorite singer of all time.  He was born on August 30, 1943.
It was a book about a woman who was born and raised in New York City, but she moved to Los Angeles.
It's a mystery series by Joseph Rowling, and it's a great read.
It is The Ninth Age of the Sexes.  I have been reading it since I was young.
I am not sure. But I know that the language has been spoken in many languages since the beginning of the 20th century.
I'm not sure but I do know he was a great actor. He was born in 1958.
He is a singer, songwriter, producer, record producer and actor from New York.
I don't remember his name, but he was very good.  He was a very good dancer too, I think.
He plays a great guitarist, he is also a singer, and songwriter.
He was an American singer, songwriter, and dancer, he was also the lead vocalist.
He plays the drums. He is very talented. His real name is Jacob Price.
I have never seen him in a musical before, but I have seen him on the television.  I think he is a great actor.
No, I don't know who Zac Efron is. I just know that he's an actor.
It's a great American rapper, he's one of the best selling artists of all time.
He's not a great actor. He's a singer, songwriter, and actor.
I don't know, but Jake is the most well known actor and director of the show.
I am not really sure, but he is one of the best actors of all time. 
That is a good question.  I think it was the president.  But I'm not sure.
I believe it was James Bond. He was elected president of the United States.  He was also the chief executive of the federal government.
Yes he was a great American singer and songwriter.  He died in 1997.
I'm not sure, but I know he was born in 1943.  It was a long time ago.
I'm not sure, but I know he was born on October 2, 1974.
I am not sure, but i do know it is the highest mountain in Africa.  That is a big mountain, right?
I don't know the height exactly, but I know that the highest mountain in Africa is the Mount Everest.
I don't know, but I know it is a mountainous place in Africa. I've never been there but would love to.
Thomas Adams was a prominent figure in the 18th century. He was a famous American business man.
Thomas Jefferson was a famous American rapper. He was a great driver.
He died on June 22, 2016.  That was a long time ago.   
I'm not sure, but I know that the plane was in the process of re-inventing the plane.
He was a very old man. I don't remember his name though. It was a long time ago. 
He played for the Washington Capitals.  I was rooting for him.  He is a great player. 
he played for the seattle seahawks and was traded to the minnesota wisconsin
He was an American football quarterback for the Chicago Buccus, Illinois.  
I think he played for the Detroit Red Wings. He's a great player.
He was a great player for the Washington Capitals, but I am not sure what team he played for.  
He was a Dallas Cowboys quarterback. It was his first year in the NFL.
The Washington Capitals. They won the Eastern Conference Series in 2009.
He is an American singer, songwriter and producer. He was born and raised in New York
They're a wrestling company.  They're based in Honolulu, Hanna-Barbera.
Barbara Jordan played in the Chicago area for the Chicago Blackhawks in the 1980s.
I am not sure, but I know that it was released in 1998. It was a musical.
The first one! I was very excited when it came out.  I didn't realize it was so old though.
I'm not sure, but I know it was his first movie. It was released in 1997.
It was held in 1969, and it was in Bentonville, Arkansas.  It was a great time.
I'm not sure, but it was in New York City and the concert was held in Los Angeles. It was amazing!
It was in Dallas Texas. It was a great time. I love the concert, but it was so crowded.
She is a famous American singer, songwriter, dancer, and actor.
I am not sure but i know she is a famous actress, singer, and dancer
Eli Manning was the quarterback of the University of Maryland.  He is the quarter quarterback for Michigan.
He won the NFL quarterback, and he was also the quarterback for the University of Tennessee.
It's been a while, but it would have been Bartolomeo Cristofori
He was a pretty good actor in Psycho.  He was great in it.  I think he was a good actor.
I'm not sure, but he is a very talented actor! He was born in 1953!
He is a great actor, but he was in a couple of big roles in the 2000's.
The Godfather, he's a great actor.  He is one of the best actors in Hollywood.
he was born and raised in hawaii, he was a famous actor, director and dancer!
He's an American singer-songwriter and actor, but I'm not sure what movies he was in.
He was an American actor and dancer and singer. He was a pretty big star in his early career.
He is a great actor, I think he has won awards for Best Actor in his career. 
